
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46470 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Time and the Navy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Summing Up the Results of the Past Year and Looking to Next </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Summing Up the Results of the Past Year and Looking to Next </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Year 

<F P=102>   94UM0389A Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 1, 1994 
(Signed to press 28 Dec 93) pp 3-9 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0389A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Admiral F. Gromov: "Summing Up the Results of </F>
the Past Year and Looking to Next Year"] 
  [Text] Thanks to fundamental changes in the domestic and 
foreign policies of the world's leading countries and the 
expansion of their political and economic cooperation, the 
current military political situation is characterized by a 
reduction of the probability of nuclear missile war and also of 
a large-scale armed clash using conventional weapons. At the 
same time, the danger of the outbreak of military conflicts in 
individual areas of the world and on Russia's southern borders 
remains, including on the territories of the former Soviet 
republics. Its basis has economic, social, political and 
religious roots. 
  While taking into account the current trends of the 
development of the military political situation, the leading 
countries of the West and East are examining the goals of their 
foreign policies, their international obligations, military 
doctrines and strategies. In the process, primary emphasis is 
being made on ensuring regional security and preventing crises 
in various regions and a special role is being assigned to naval 
forces with the implementation of a thorough review of the 
concepts of their structural development and employment. 
  The Russian Navy is totally engulfed by this process. The 
missions of the fleets in peacetime and wartime have been more 
precisely defined, the Navy's composition and effective combat 
strength is being reduced, new methods have been developed for 
manning the fleets with highly professional cadres, a series of 
measures is being conducted to improve the organizational 
structure of combined formations and formations, and the 
development of new elements for basing them on the country's 
territory. A great deal of work has been accomplished while 
substantiating the prospects for development of both the Navy as 
a whole and also the component services that are part of it. 
Views on the operational employment and training of the fleets 
have changed substantially. The scope of the measures being 
conducted and the sequence and duration of their accomplishment 
have been made more precise. Specific implementation of these 
plans will depend to a significant extent on the stabilization 
of the economy and budget appropriations for the development of 
the Navy. 
  Confidence-building measures continue to be strengthened 
between the navies of Russia and other countries. Reciprocal 
visits and joint training for missions at sea attest to this. 
Last year, detachments of our ships visited ports of the United 
States, Canada, Great Britain, China, France, Norway, Germany, 
Denmark, Turkey, and South Korea. Joint tactical exercises were 
conducted with the navies of Canada, the United States and Great 
Britain, some of them with the accomplishment of combat drills 
and the employment of weapons. These cruises had not only 
political significance but also promoted the further improvement 
of the naval proficiency of the crews of our ships. 
  The missions assigned to the Navy in 1993 on the whole have 
been accomplished. In the complex conditions of the 
reorganization and limited financing of the Navy, we have 
managed to maintain the specified level of combat readiness of 
the fleets' primary combined formations and formations, their 
capability to carry out the transition from a peacetime to a 
wartime footing in a timely and organized manner and to 
accomplish primary operational missions within the established 
time periods. 
  Despite the difficulties associated with manning crews and 
maintaining the technical readiness of ships, the intensity and 
effectiveness of the combat service and alert duty performed by 
them has increased somewhat. Strategic missile submarines have 
patrolled in designated areas and have carried out alert duty at 
basing areas in readiness to accomplish assigned missions. 
General purpose forces have ensured their ability to resist the 
enemy and have monitored the reconnaissance activity of foreign 
naval forces. Pacific Fleet ships successfully accomplished 
assigned missions in coordination with the multinational forces 
in the Persian Gulf, demonstrating Russia's support of the UN 
sanctions with regard to Iraq and the Black Sea Fleet in part 
rendered assistance to Georgia in the stabilization of the 
situation at Poti. 
  Operational, mobilization and combat training measures were 
more intensively conducted last year. The practical skills of 
command authorities and staffs in the command and control of 
forces and techniques for the operational employment of forces 
in combined arms and strategic operations to repel an enemy 
aerospace attack were rehearsed in these measures. Command and 
staff map exercises, joint command and staff and staff training 
without the involvement of marking forces were the primary 
methods for conducting operational and mobilization training. 
This permitted us to maintain and improve the practical skills 
of operational echelon commanders and staffs in the command and 
control of forces but, at the same time, it resulted in a 
reduction of the number of times ships put to sea and the number 
of flights of aircraft which had a negative impact on the level 
of naval and air skills of some of the forces. 
  In 1993, combat training of Naval forces was conducted on 
the 
whole according to plan: intensively and rhythmically. The 
combined formations and formations commanded by Captains 1st 
Rank S. Simenenko, V. Shchegolev, V. Krikunov, N. Temerev and 
the submarines commanded by Captains 1st Rank V. Zakharov, A. 
Yefanov and Captain 2nd Rank V. Kvasov achieved the best results. 
  At the same time, we did not manage to attain an appreciable 
improvement in combat training. In individual formations and 
units, exercises and training classes were conducted at a low 
organizational-methodological level and did not completely 
ensure the qualitative rehearsal of specific functional duties 
for the maintenance of the high combat readiness of subordinate 
forces and for the effective accomplishment of combat training 
missions by them. Little attention was devoted to the search for 
and mastery of new technical techniques for the employment of 
forces. Passive forms of training, without the utilization of 
shore-based simulators and training classes, frequently 
predominated in training. Required measures were not undertaken 
to intensify combat training by improving the methodology for 
conducting exercises, drills and training classes. 
  Last year, the fleets were compelled to adjust combat 
training plans toward the reduction of the number of missions 
and combat drills due to the lack of an adequate quantity of 
fuel, lubricating oil, ship maintenance support, and also due to 
the failure to take into account the specific nature of combat 
training under conditions of a drastic reduction of financing, 
material and technical support, and undermanning of ship crews. 
  All of this required commanders of all levels to drastically 
increase the level of attention to base training, including the 
conduct of organizational and tactical assemblies, base, staff 
and command and staff map exercises, preparatory tactical 
exercises and other forms of training. However, established 
procedures for conducting formation base exercises were 
frequently violated, especially in the Pacific Ocean and 
Northern fleets which did not permit them to completely take 
advantage of existing capabilities to rehearse command and 
control organs and ship combat crews while accomplishing their 
assigned missions. 
  Under conditions of a severe shortage of fuel and the 
reduction of allotted overhaul periods, stricter requirements 
should have been made of planning for the accomplishment of 
missions by ships at sea. Each time ships put to sea should have 
been utilized with the maximum effectiveness, with mutual 
support by the various fleet component services of the rehearsal 
of their own missions and the comprehensive employment of 
weapons. But these requirements have not yet become a mandatory 
standard in all of the fleets. So, last year in the Pacific 
Fleet, ships put to sea to accomplish 1-2 drills -- without the 
utilization of the capabilities of supporting and coordinating 
forces. Comprehensive combat training was organized somewhat 
better in the Northern and Black Sea fleets. 
  In 1993, naval aviation successfully began to master the 
Su-27k ship-based fighter aircraft and accomplished combat 
service missions with high indicators. We can note a change for 
the better in Northern Fleet Air Force units where Colonels I. 
Bokhonko and N. Levchenko are the commanders. Pacific Fleet Air 
Force antisubmarine warfare personnel led by Colonels V. Uvarov 
and A. Akhmedyanov, and Baltic Fleet Air Force antisubmarine 
warfare personnel led by Colonel N. Somov achieved good results. 
  However, the low supply of new aircraft, spare parts for 
them, aviation fuel and other material technical resources to 
fleet air forces resulted in a reduction of crew flying hours, 
disruptions of combat training plans and, as a result -- to the 
reduction of the level of unit combat readiness and flight 
safety. The most serious situation developed in the Black Sea 
Fleet Air Force and, first and foremost, as a result of the 
unresolved issue on the status of this fleet. 
  The Naval coastal defense troops successfully mastered new 
techniques for conducting battle and prepared for operations as 
part of an airborne-maritime assault force echelon, for the 
defense of important fleet facilities and sections of the sea 
coast that are accessible for maritime assault landings in 
coordination with other naval forces and Ground Forces 
formations. 
  Despite the objective difficulties associated with the 
involvement of troops for the accomplishment of uncharacteristic 
missions and significant undermanning, combat training plans 
were largely accomplished in all formations and units. Combat 
training in the naval infantry formation which Colonel A. 
Smolyak commands was conducted in an intensive and qualitative 
manner. The artillerymen under the leadership of Colonel N. 
Kumshatskiy and the naval infantrymen where Major V. Novikov is 
the commander achieved good results. The missileers under the 
leadership of Colonels A. Zabavin and S. Kazachukhin 
successfully accomplished all combat drills. Combat training 
missions were not accomplished as well in the formation which 
Colonel Ye. Kocheshkov commands where omissions in the 
organizational work of officer personnel became the cause of 
inadequate preparation of command and control organs and the low 
firing proficiency of personnel. 
  On the whole, operational, mobilization and combat training 
missions were accomplished in a more qualitative manner in the 
Northern Fleet last year. 
  The unresolved issues of ship repair, maintenance of 
engineer 
networks, lines of communication and providing basing areas with 
technical resources, a portion of which has exhausted prescribed 
time periods and is physically and technically obsolete, had a 
negative impact on the course of fleet training. 
  The accident rate of combatants and ships in the fleets 
still 
remains high. But then again, equipment failures make up 
approximately 60% of that total number, the primary 
causes of 
which are: the low organization of service, weak special 
training of personnel and failure to accomplish the requirements 
of manuals and operating instructions. Quality remains low while 
conducting maintenance and preparing ships to put to sea, 
personnel violate explosive and fire safety requirements while 
conducting potentially dangerous work and the quality of work of 
permanent ship commissions at individual formations is poor 
while examining ships' hulls, equipment and systems. 
  In the fleets, the role of staff specialists has been 
reduced 
in the support and maintenance of the technical readiness of 
ships. They are permitting leniency in the accomplishment of 
maintenance inspections and they are not taking timely steps to 
eliminate malfunctions or to increase the level of personnel 
maintenance training. The internal resources of formations and 
ships are not being completely utilized to conduct qualitative 
scheduled-preventive maintenance and inspections. 
  The Pacific Fleet formation that Rear Admiral A. Klimenok 
commands had the most unsatisfactory accident rate last year. 
  The accident rate associated with ship command and control 
was not reduced. Half of the accidents of this type occurred in 
the Black Sea Fleet. 
  The moral-psychological state of Navy personnel is assessed 
as stable. The situation on ships and in units is controlled and 
manageable, although it remains complicated. Despite unfavorable 
trends, the majority of military collectives are distinguished 
by the appropriate observance of regulations, discipline, and 
the healthy cohesion of all categories of servicemen that 
permits on the whole the successful accomplishment of missions 
and maintenance of the combat capability of naval forces. This 
was largely promoted by the personal exemplariness of the 
absolute majority of commanders and superior officers in the 
execution of their service and military duties, by the 
certification of officer personnel that was conducted and by the 
transition to contract service that has been initiated. 
  Nonspecific work on the implementation of measures of 
socio-legal protection of servicemen, which has a negative 
impact on the moral-psychological state, the mood and conduct of 
officers, army and navy warrant officers, petty officers and 
sailors, is a serious shortcoming in the organizational and 
educational activity of commanders, staffs, and personnel 
organs. As a result, quite a bit of tension, contradictions, and 
negative trends, which undermine the foundation of military 
service --discipline, observance of regulations, and law and 
order -- are being maintained in military collectives and are 
having a pernicious influence on the overall level of military 
discipline. In 1993, they did not manage to resolve the problem 
of reducing the number of crimes. Incidents of deaths and trauma 
of servicemen as a result of the violation of safety measures 
and also suicide are not being reduced. Evasion of military 
service and failure to return from leave has become widespread. 
A vicious trend has developed toward the lessening of work with 
subordinates by certain ship, unit and subunit commanders who 
have begun to think that orders or articles of regulations can 
carry themselves out without the commanders' participation or 
monitoring. In today's situation, commanders are required to 
increase their organizing role in the mobilization of all 
personnel toward the exemplary accomplishment of their military 
duty and the successful accomplishment of assigned missions. 
  Last year, the Navy did not manage to create an integrated 
training and education system of subordinates with the active 
inclusion in it of all organs of military command and control 
and the educational structures. Ties are being slowly restored 
with the local authorities, veterans and youth organizations, 
creative unions and institutions of culture. Teaching the 
practice of educational work of commanders and superior officers 
of all levels, staff and service specialists is sporadic in 
nature and is inadequately targeted toward accomplishing 
specific combat training missions and strengthening military 
discipline. 
  We have noted the accomplishment of a series of priority 
measures to provide social protection of personnel in the Navy. 
So, with a total number of homeless of approximately 30,000 men, 
we planned to build 6,945 apartments and to obtain 344 rooms in 
dormitories, using resources allocated for capital construction. 
Furthermore, we proposed obtaining 1,254 apartments from the 
local authorities through shared participation and the purchase 
of 490 finished apartments. We also counted on introducing into 
operation a 534-seat school, two kindergartens for 1,300 people, 
four cafeterias with a 955-person capacity, seven boilers, three 
water treatment facilities, and a number of other facilities. 
However, inadequate and uneven financing permitted us to 
accomplish only 72% of our plans. Therefore, in 1994, the 
Navy 
has approved the task to obtain approximately 11,500 apartments 
through our own construction and shared participation. 
  Summing up the results of the last year, I must note that, 
despite the objective and subjective causes of an economic and 
socio-legal nature, the Navy on the whole successfully 
accomplished the primary mission --maintenance of the prescribed 
combat and military readiness. 
  The Russian Navy faces complex and responsible missions in 
the new year --1994. 
  In combat readiness. Primary efforts must be concentrated on 
the maintenance of the composition and state of naval strategic 
nuclear forces at a level that ensures the guaranteed 
accomplishment of the assigned missions under any conditions of 
the situation. General purpose forces are required to be 
maintained in a state that permits repelling aggression on a 
local or regional scale from the ocean and sea axes. 
  As before, combat service and alert duty for the timely 
detection of an armed attack that is being prepared or a 
threatening development of the situation and taking the steps 
required to increase the combat readiness of the fleets remain 
the primary methods for maintaining high force combat readiness. 
  Using all organizational and technical measures, we need to 
exclude a surprise attack, ensure the effective conduct of 
reconnaissance, the timely increase of force readiness and force 
deployment, and the capability to put a stop to aggression in 
the shortest period of time. 
  We must consider the comprehensive development of the 
organization of the transition of the fleets from a peacetime to 
a wartime footing while taking into account the various variants 
of the development of the situation to be the most important 
direction for the improvement of combat readiness. When this 
mission is being accomplished, we need to strive for the precise 
organization of work of the command and control organs and the 
coordinated accomplishment of planned measures to bring the 
forces up to the highest levels of combat readiness at all 
levels and to eliminate deficiencies revealed based upon 1993's 
results. Taking into account the intensive conduct of approved 
organizational measures and the reduction of the strength and 
composition of the fleets, we need to continuously take into 
account these changes and take the appropriate steps in a timely 
manner to support and maintain the prescribed level of combat 
readiness. 
  Senior commanders, commanders and staffs must continuously 
track and operationally react to changes of the 
military-political situation in the sea and ocean zones and seek 
rational ways to increase the effectiveness of the employment of 
forces in operations and combat operations when aggression is 
unleased. 
  In the context of implementing the Russian Federation Law 
"On 
the RF State Border", the Navy needs to carefully study the 
development of a system for the protection of the Russian state 
border in the underwater medium using Naval men and equipment to 
begin its practical inspection. 
  We need to accomplish a series of missions for the 
qualitative renewal of the ship complement, arms and military 
equipment, the reduction of the numbers of types, and the 
improvement of ship basing conditions and all types of support. 
Work will be continued on the infrastructure of the Baltic and 
Black Sea fleets and Caspian Flotilla forces at new basing 
locations on Russian Federation territory, and also for the 
withdrawal of weapons, ammunition, and materiel from Latvia, 
Estonia and Belorussia [Belarus]. 
  The rapid mastery of new ships, aircraft, helicopters, and 
modern types of arms and military equipment that are coming into 
the inventory is an important mission for the fleets. 
  During the accomplishment of operational training missions, 
the main efforts must be concentrated on the qualitative 
accomplishment of planned measures and support of the readiness 
of senior commanders, commanders and staffs for the command and 
control of forces while preparing and conducting operations and 
combat operations. We must devote special attention to the 
elaboration of the organization of coordination of naval forces 
with the formations and combined formations of the other 
services of the Armed Forces, the study and research of issues 
of the operational employment of naval forces in armed 
conflicts, local wars and emergency situations. 
  We must conduct the improvement of operational readiness 
methodology based upon the broad introduction and intensive 
utilization of computers and automated troop and weapon command 
and control systems and equipment. We need to step up the 
elaboration and introduction of computer games in the practice 
of command and control organ training, increase the quality of 
training and the conduct of exercises, training and classes, and 
strive toward a comprehensive approach to the conduct of all of 
its measures. Conduct operational-tactical and command and staff 
exercises simultaneously with several combined formations that 
are accomplishing joint missions in accordance with their 
operational designation and that are operating in one zone 
(area). In the process, when planning operational and combat 
training measures, take into account the economic and financial 
aspects of their conduct and, based upon the results of each of 
them, carry out an analysis and, when necessary, conduct 
adjustments of plans and their guiding documents in the 
prescribed manner. 
  When accomplishing combat training missions, we need to 
continue to improve the preparation of formations and units for 
combat operations as part of formations of varied forces, the 
search for and mastery of new effective tactical methods for 
their employment. Work out the formation and deployment of 
formations, the organization of support for their capability to 
resist the enemy, all types of defense, the tactics of 
conducting naval warfare with enemy ship formations with the 
support of the Air Force, fleet BRAV [Coastal Missile and 
Artillery Troops] and PVO [Air Defense] fighter aviation 
formations. 
  We must target the training of various component services' 
antisubmarine warfare forces on the improvement of the 
techniques for search, tracking, and destruction of submarines, 
comprehensive employment of all types of antisubmarine warfare 
weapons with the utilization of acoustic and non-acoustic search 
systems. 
  At tactical exercises, we need to continuously practice 
operations of ship and aircraft reconnaissance-strike groups to 
conduct reconnaissance, transmit target designation to strike 
forces, and also work out the comprehensive employment of EW 
[Electronic Warfare] systems, camouflage and other types of 
support. 
  Comprehensive training at sea, which must be anticipated by 
precisely developed, full-fledged and strictly monitored base 
training, must become the primary combat training method. We 
need to organize it in such a way that we ensure a full training 
load for shore-based simulators, ranges and training classes and 
utilize to the maximum extent possible the capabilities of 
command and control systems, weapons systems and technical 
systems of ships for the practical training of crews. We need to 
improve the organization of combined formation base exercises. 
  All of these measures must pursue one goal -- to prevent the 
reduction of naval combat training, ground forces field training 
and flying combat training for personnel. 
  Maintenance of ships, aircraft, weapons and technical 
systems 
at constant readiness and mobilization of all personnel to 
maintain their area of responsibility in a serviceable and 
combat ready state must become a constant concern of commanders 
and staffs during the course of combat training. 
  We must direct scientific research in the Navy toward the 
formation and conduct of a rational military-technical policy, 
the primary content of which, under conditions of the 
restriction of resources allocated for defense needs, is the 
conduct of measures directed at maintaining the combat potential 
of Russia's navy at a level that ensures the accomplishment of 
the assigned missions. 
  In the near future, our scientific institutions must 
concentrate their efforts on: 
  predicting the possible nature of armed combat at sea under 
new conditions, substantiation of strategic concepts, methods 
and techniques for the employment of fleet forces to defend the 
state from the sea and ocean axes; 
  developing techniques to prepare for and conduct operations 
and combat operations independently and in coordination with the 
other services of the Armed Forces, organizing command and 
control of forces and their comprehensive support; 
  substantiating the prospects for the structural development 
of the Navy, determining new ways for its development at the 
current stage, developing proposals for the reformation of 
structures, reducing the effective combat strength of the 
fleets, and improving combat and mobilization readiness under 
conditions of the reduction of the Armed Forces and their 
restricted economic capabilities; 
  researching the overall appearance of Naval weapons systems 
and the principles for its technical equipment that ensure the 
accomplishment of changed missions while taking into account the 
actual capabilities of industry; developing 
scientifically-substantiated operational-tactical requirements 
and military-economic substantiations of required changes of 
weapons systems and proposals for the adjustment of the primary 
directions of development and Naval weapons programs, draft 
NIOKR [scientific research and experimental design work] plans, 
basic and exploratory research; 
  substantiating the principles of the reduction of the VVT 
[weaponry and military hardware] list, time periods and 
expenditures for their development through standardization; 
determining priority NIOKR while taking into account the need 
for priority development of command and control, reconnaissance, 
and target designation systems; 
  developing modern mathematical model systems of operations 
and combat operations of naval forces and the introduction, on 
this basis, into practice of computer games methods for the 
operational and combat training of command and control organs 
and forces. 
  Training of scientific cadres requires special concern 
because they are the primary echelon in the new developments and 
the bearers of new ideas and knowledge. During this unstable 
period, it is important to not lose that scientific potential 
which exists in the Navy. 
  During the organization of socio-state training, primary 
efforts need to be concentrated on the formation and improvement 
of the professional knowledge of personnel, the 
moral-psychological qualities and readiness to defend the 
Fatherland, loyalty to the military oath, discipline, pride and 
responsibility for being a part of the Russian Navy that has a 
heroic 300-year history. 
  We must more completely utilize the classes in this type of 
training to teach psychological-pedagogical and legal knowledge 
and skills to military cadres. We must introduce the most active 
democratic, demonstration and emotional in impact types of 
teaching into the training process. 
  In the new training year, we must target educational work on 
ensuring moral-psychological stability and discipline of all 
categories of personnel, maintenance of the cohesiveness of 
military collectives, and strengthen servicemen's readiness to 
fight toward the accomplishment of tasked missions. In the 
process, we need to require from all cadres involved in the 
sphere of education maximum sensitivity and efficiency in 
reacting to fluctuations in the moods of servicemen, flexibility 
in the selection of methods and techniques to affect those 
moods, and to consider the specific nature of each category of 
personnel, each group and each individual. 
  The leading military collectives -- ship, company, battery 
-- 
must be the center of application of education efforts. 
  We must more boldly introduce into the educational process 
the ideological position, oriented first and foremost on 
patriotism and professionalism, loyalty to constitutional duty, 
responsibility for the entrusted task, and the dignity and honor 
of a soldier and citizen. 
  We need to use all forms of organizational and education 
work 
to strive to increase in every possible way the responsibility 
of each official for the state of military discipline and the 
state of affairs on ships, in military units and subunits, and 
the effectiveness of employed measures for the prevention of 
accidents, crimes and deaths of people. 
  We must consider the primary mission to be rooting out 
derision and harassment, crimes of insubordination, evasions of 
military service, outrages with regard to the local population, 
and thefts of state and military property, especially small 
arms; prevention of the death and traumatism of servicemen, 
accidents and catastrophes of military equipment and weapons. 
  Daily concern about material-everyday life support of 
personnel, medical service, and cultural relaxation of 
servicemen and their family members; the study of urgent 
problems, needs, and requests of subordinates and their timely 
resolution must be one of the main directions of activity of 
commanders of staffs, personnel organs, and of all officer 
cadres. 
  We must carry out the selection and assignment of officer 
cadres while considering the results achieved in the 
certification process. We must resolve personnel issues in a 
timely manner at all levels, while ensuring augmentation of 
leading cadres with trained and promising officers, admirals and 
generals, and the maintenance of continuity in leadership. 
Improve work with junior officers. Take steps to eliminate the 
reasons and conditions that cause junior officers to submit 
requests on their desire to be released from active military 
service. 
  In the sphere of military cooperation, we must consider the 
following to be priority directions: the development of 
cooperation with all CIS countries while proceeding from the 
need to strengthen collective security; the development of ties 
and the deepening of relations in the military sphere between 
states and their armed forces; development of a unified 
military-technical policy; and, coordination of coordination and 
cooperation in the defense industry sphere. 
  The most important results of work in 1993 and the missions 
for the new training year have been revealed in this short 
article. 
  I am confident that naval personnel will accomplish the 
assigned missions with dignity and honor. To do that, we need to 
work with a complete output of effort, to continuously learn, 
and to strive for high end results of work on the entrusted 
sector of service activity. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46471 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Time and the Navy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russia's Khvalynskoye Line </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russia's Khvalynskoye Line </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0389B Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 1, 1994 
(Signed to press 28 Dec 93) pp 10-12 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0389B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Captain 1st Rank Ye. Privalov: "Russia's </F>
Khvalynskoye Line"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] 
  Today the interests of various states, including those that 
have been recently formed, are once again beginning to clash on 
the water area of the Caspian Sea. Therefore, the strategic and 
economic significance of the Lower Volga and the Caspian are 
once again dramatically increasing, making them Russia's toehold 
in this region. Currently, the Caspian , from an at one time 
"internal" sea, the shores of which still recently belonged to a 
total of just two countries, is being transformed into a sea 
with a complicated international legal regime. First of all, 
this has been caused by the need to delimit the territorial 
waters and the economic zones among the sovereign states that 
have been formed on its shores. And although today Russia has 
been left with a total of 770 km of coastline, it needs to be 
defended. However, there are still no borders that are precisely 
defined by treaties and, therefore, there is no proper order. 
This is the second reason. At the present time, a mass of 
Russian goods and minerals are exported along the Volga through 
Astrakhan. Even cases of the export of weapons and other 
military equipment have increased -- there is a war going on 
nearby. Furthermore, due to the lessening of monitoring by 
Russia in the northern Caspian, fish and seals are being caught 
on an ever increasing scale here and, if this unlimited 
"fishing" continues further, the Caspian's wealth will be 
substantially reduced in several years. Take just sturgeon. The 
Russian fish hatcheries located in Astrakhan and in the oblast 
are exclusively involved with their restoration. It turns out 
that Russia is breeding valuable species of fish and the other 
states are catching them. 
  And this is far from all of the reasons why this region is 
increasingly acquiring the characteristics of Russia's southern 
coastal "outpost" on the Caspian. Add to what has been said that 
the process through which the Caspian region states are 
acquiring their sovereignty is naturally accompanied by the 
creation of institutes and all that is inherent to them, 
including armed forces with navies. Already right now the 
Iranian Navy contains 62 ships and the Azeri Navy has 15. Both 
Kazakhstan and Turkmeniya plan to have their own navies. Under 
these conditions, the role of the Caspian Flotilla is once again 
increasing for Russia. However, after the transfer of some of 
the flotilla's ships, bases, and infrastructure facilities to 
the former union republics, its forces have been significantly 
reduced. Furthermore, it has lost more than a third of its 
officer personnel: part went to Ukraine, part to Belorussia 
[Belarus], others have remained in Azerbaijan or have been 
released into the reserve. Losses of warrant officer cadres 
exceed half of their former strength. The state of the 
flotilla's surface combatants and ships also leaves a lot to be 
desired. 
  But despite everything, the flotilla exists, is developing 
infrastructure in new basing locations and is even expanding. In 
connection with this, the seamen need to resolve a mass of 
problems that are not characteristic to them. The redeployment 
has proceeded with difficulty and, first and foremost, due to 
the time factor. The time periods in which the Caspian Flotilla 
was transferred to new locations is not proceeding in any 
comparison with the planned time periods for the withdrawal of 
Russian troops from other regions. And it was vitally important 
to create at least the minimal conditions for its basing. 
However, there was practically nothing at the new locations. In 
the first stage, in 1992, there was a catastrophic shortage of 
buildings, wharf frontage, housing and financial support. The 
Russian Government, recognizing the significance of defending 
this region, has rendered substantial support to the flotilla. 
Both the President and the Prime Minister have visited it. The 
Patriarch of Moscow and All Rus Aleksiy II also consecrated this 
ground. 
  The leadership of Astrakhan Oblast was prepared and met the 
seamen as it could. Only that person who knows all of the 
difficulties of rebasing can really assess the work done by 
them. The seamen's families have been mainly housed in Astrakhan 
itself: because it is practically impossible to build houses in 
very short periods of time under current conditions, they found 
a solution in leasing some of the dormitories from fishermen, 
VUZs [higher educational institutions], and other organizations. 
Plots of land were allocated for the flotilla. The issue on the 
transfer of the fishing boat repair plant to the military seamen 
is approaching resolution. Some ships came to Astrakhan to a not 
altogether empty place; one of the flotilla's battalions was 
already deployed there. Its base was the foundation for the 
further development of the needed infrastructure. But there's 
still a great deal of work in this direction. 
  In accordance with the plan, by 1995 the flotilla must 
become 
a full-fledged combined formation that is capable of 
accomplishing all of the missions assigned to it. At the present 
time, this plan is being made a reality. So, for example, last 
year the flotilla had already obtained a number of ships and 
this year several crews left for their delivery and acceptance 
from industry. Other, including social, problems are also being 
resolved. In the social aspect, the construction of a separate 
garrison, normal housing, outpatient clinics, and a modern 
hospital are planned... 
  At the present time, some of the flotilla's ships are based 
at Zolotoy Zaton. It's supposed to be a location with a 
developed infrastructure but it has its own difficulties. 
Approach routes cause a great deal of concern. Unfortunately, 
for the time being they are ordinary dirt roads which can be 
utilized only in the dry period of the year because the first 
rain makes them impassable. And this is practically the link to 
the world: both fuel, food, spare parts and other consumable 
materials are delivered using them. Wastes, garbage, and spent 
POL [petroleum, oil, lubricants] are carried off on them. Not 
everything is satisfactory with the supply of electric energy 
and steam, especially in winter. Sometimes we have to drive the 
boilers and diesel engines of surface combatants and boats 
because of this, thereby reducing the period of their service. 
  One more problem that is new for the flotilla consists of 
the 
fact that the Volga freezes during the winter and therefore some 
of the ships need to be transferred to more southerly areas so 
that they can accomplish their missions and where we also need 
to provide living conditions for them. In the process, 
icebreakers are needed and the issue of obtaining them is very 
urgent for the flotilla. Furthermore, some of the flotilla's 
forces are located at Makhachkala. The situation there, as we 
know, is much more complicated than in Astrakhan and its 
repercussions are being felt in military posts and garrisons and 
there is an outflow of the Russian-speaking population from 
there. Officers and warrant officers are justifiably concerned 
about the safety of their families and they don't wish to serve 
in that situation. There are also not only cases of threats 
directed at the seamen and at their family members but also 
cases of direct hooligan attacks. And a tragedy occurred quite 
recently even in Astrakhan: Senior Lieutenant Yu. Plodiyenko, 
who saved his comrades at the cost of his own life, died at his 
combat post. 
  Under these conditions, it is difficult for the flotilla 
command authorities to resolve the very complex missions that 
face them today because the flotilla is practically being reborn 
all over again. And the fact that this has become possible is 
due first of all to the contributions of the people who are 
serving here: the warrant officers, officers and admirals. Right 
now the hardiest have remained at it and those who were "weaker" 
have left it in hard times: they have either left for the other 
navies, they have remained at their old places or they have bid 
farewell to the navy. Because Captain 1st Rank S. Pashkin and 
Captain 2nd Rank V. Filozop, who proved himself to be a hero in 
the emergency situation and who has been submitted by the 
command authorities for the order "For Personal Bravery", 
Captain 3rd Rank A. Gushchin, Senior Lieutenant A. Doronin, 
Senior Warrant Officers V. Ovchininkov and V. Dovgopolov enjoy 
such high prestige in the flotilla. Seamen from other fleets are 
also expressing the desire to serve in the flotilla. 
  The flotilla command authorities are resolving the problem 
of 
cadres, that is so complicated for the entire Navy, by quite 
aggressively enlisting women for military service, the fraction 
of which is reaching 6-7 percent in some units. But then again, 
assessments of their service are very positive and the 
experience of foreign navies attests that the female social 
stratum in the army can total 10-12 percent without damage for 
combat readiness. 
  The gray-haired Caspian is uneasy. Strong northerly winds 
frequently sweep over it, bringing fierce storms with them. 
Covered by steep waves, the sea becomes threatening and 
dangerous. Unfortunately, today "storms" of another kind are 
blowing over the Caspian today: storms sowing disunity, 
destruction and, at times, even death. And since there are now 
several owners on the Caspian, they will have to work together 
to resolve problems and issues that arise among them. And it is 
better to do that using a friendly, peaceful method on a treaty 
basis. 
  History has completed its latest loop. The Lower Volga is 
once again becoming one of the regions where Russia will have to 
urgently solve a mass of problems. Once again, Russians will 
hear the words that they have become familiar with since 
childhood -- Volga, Astrakhan, and Caspian. Once again Russians 
must set up border posts there, guarding the peace, calm and 
great wealth of Rus. Let's hope that this time our outposts will 
be durably placed. 
  Russia is great and there is nothing more to hand over! 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46472 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Time and the Navy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russian Naval Test Range Moves From Estonia to Leningrad </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russian Naval Test Range Moves From Estonia to Leningrad </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Oblast 

<F P=102>   94UM0391A Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 2, 
1994 (Signed to press 8 Feb 92) pp 14-17 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0391A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Capt 1st Rank V. Parkhomenko, Dr. of Technical </F>
Sciences, Professor: "Test Range Leaves Estonian Republic"] 
  [Text] Renewal of the Russian Navy within the framework of 
the new military doctrine is possible only on the basis of 
extensive scientific research, both theoretical and 
experimental, to include testing of weapons, equipment and the 
ships themselves in the field. 
  Today, one of the most important qualitative characteristics 
of a ship is its detectability by the enemy's reconnaissance, 
observation and target indication equipment, and the degree of 
protection afforded against weapons having guidance systems 
reacting to ship physical fields. 
  As we know, the parameters of ship physical fields are 
measured by both maneuvering (ship) and stationary (test range) 
resources. Both are used in the Russian Navy (in distinction 
from the U.S. Navy, which uses test ranges only). Maneuvering 
resources are mobile, and they make it possible to take 
measurements in different regions of the sea; however, owing to 
their metrological features they are used primarily for directly 
checking the correspondence of the levels of ship physical 
fields to established norms. Stationary systems do not require 
special deployment for measurements, which significantly reduces 
testing time and provides for acquisition of broader 
information, and they can be used effectively in the course of 
scientific research. 
  Under today's conditions, both our test ranges and those of 
foreign countries carry out a large number of specific tasks, 
including in particular: accumulation and analysis of data on 
the physical fields of ships of different classes, participation 
in creating new monitoring, measuring and analyzing equipment, 
development of the procedures of measuring, checking and 
standardizing ship physical fields, testing and improvement of 
these procedures in the field, and research on ship physical 
fields, particularly with the goal of revealing sources of 
fields exceeding prescribed levels and developing 
recommendations on how to reduce them. Our test ranges carry out 
these and other jobs in this area both independently and jointly 
with other naval organizations, industrial enterprises and 
institutions of the academy of sciences. In this case, the 
effectiveness of the research is related to the territorial 
location of the test range. Proximity of scientific research 
institutions of the corresponding profile, together with their 
specialists and modern apparatus, the possibility of utilizing 
the production base of industrial enterprises to manufacture 
models of instruments and equipment, and use of ships given over 
to the navy for testing under comprehensive programs are factors 
helping to increase this effectiveness. 
  Nor should we forget another function of test 
ranges--training personnel with the needed qualifications for 
institutes and directorates of the navy, the Naval Academy and 
naval institutions of higher education. 
  These specific tasks were assigned in particular to a test 
range near Tallinn and to a research base in the Crimea. 
However, in September 1992 the base located in Balaklava was 
incorporated into the Ukrainian Navy, to a significant degree 
through the efforts of base commander Captain 1st Rank O. Prodan 
and his deputy Captain 1st Rank S. Chubarov. The base is 
currently undergoing reorganization, placing its further 
existence in doubt. The fate of the test range, which celebrated 
its 40th birthday on 12 September 1993, was different. 
  Established in 1953 in Khara-Lakht Bay, 75 km from Tallinn, 
the Naval Test Range No 1 was essentially the only large 
scientific research center studying ship physical fields in the 
Baltic. It may be said without exaggeration that the entire 
country built it. This was a unique facility. The test range 
possessed sonar and hydrodynamic test beds, a test bed for 
magnetic treatment of ships and adjustment of steering controls, 
a magnetic modeling laboratory, an electric field laboratory and 
a large number of hydraulic engineering structures. Close to 
1,000 surface ships and submarines of dozens of designs passed 
through these facilities; 50 scientific research projects were 
completed, and the results were introduced into naval 
requirements, into manuals and regulations on ship protection, 
and into specifications of new equipment and apparatus. 
  Under the leadership of Rear Admiral Ya. Krivoruchko and 
captains 1st rank L. Dubinin, R. Krupnov and V. Chizhevskiy, in 
the 1970's the test range became a huge scientific research and 
testing organization having extensive ties with the USSR Academy 
of Sciences, the State Standards Committee and enterprises of 
ship building industry. During this time it significantly 
widened and strengthened its ties with enterprises and 
organizations of the Estonian SSR. Officers of the test range 
took a direct and active part in testing of the latest ships and 
submarines of the Northern and Pacific Fleets, and organized 
special research. The results served as the basis for developing 
measures to produce physical fields of ships currently afloat, 
ships under construction and those still on the planning boards. 
  The test range's associates have heard uncontested praise 
for 
developing the methods and resources of measuring ship physical 
fields and processing the data. In the navy they were the 
pioneers of automating their measurement and analysis. Nor 
should we forget the test range's contribution to training 
highly qualified specialists. More than 20 of its associates 
have become scientists with higher degrees. 
  The 9 July 1980 government decree "On Further Reduction of 
the Noise of Nuclear-Powered Submarines" called for 
modernization of the test range with the goal of developing its 
laboratory base further. There were plans for building new 
underwater test beds, replacing the measuring complexes and 
carrying out capital construction. However, cancellation of 
appropriations as a result of perestroyka processes made it 
impossible to carry out modernization by the intended deadline, 
and subsequent changes in the sociopolitical situation, and 
chiefly Estonia's departure from the USSR and then the Union's 
disintegration, made it both unsuitable and impossible to carry 
out the planned volume of work. 
  Its location within a foreign state and the uncertainty of 
the test range's status in light of the growing strength of 
nationalistically oriented circles in the Estonian Republic had 
a negative effect on its scientific activity and production. 
This is why the question of radically resolving the test range's 
fate with regard for planned withdrawal of the Northwestern 
Group of Forces and the Tallinn Naval Base to Russian Federation 
territory was raised in 1991. 
  A special commission was appointed in order to resolve the 
issues of its reorganization and to conduct negotiations with 
the Estonian side. The commission was placed under my charge. 
Fundamental agreement regarding the suitability of preserving 
this institution in Khara-Lakht Bay and using it in the 
interests of the RF Navy and the Estonian Navy was reached in 
1992 in the course of repeated working contacts with Minister of 
State Rayvo Vare and other officials of the Estonian Republic. 
Providing scientific and technical services to Baltic states in 
questions of measuring and studying ship physical fields was 
proposed as one of the directions of its activity. Proposals for 
using the test range's scientific potential in the interests of 
space were also developed with the purpose of making it a highly 
competitive organization in the very near future. 
  Essentially, only one question raised disagreement in the 
prepared package of documents on implementing the reached 
agreement: While the Estonian side insisted on staffing the test 
range with civilians or manning it with servicemen of the 
Estonian Republic, we suggested that executive positions in the 
manning table (up to division chiefs inclusively) should be 
filled by officers of the RF Navy, with all other positions 
being filled by blue and white collar workers. Changing all of 
its associates to civilian status while filling executive 
positions with our specialists who would remain as personnel of 
the RF Navy was seen as a compromise. 
  Looking back, I can say with confidence that implementing 
the 
agreement reached with R. Vare would have best served the 
interests of the navies of the Russian Federation, Estonia and 
other Baltic countries possessing naval forces, and of course 
the interests of RF citizens who had lived in the settlement of 
Suurpea since the day the test range was established. Mention 
should also be made of the fact that neither the command nor the 
associates of the test range had ever experienced cases of 
negative contacts with the indigenous population of Kharyuskiy 
Rayon in the "pre-perestroyka" period. But events were destined 
to develop differently. 
  For practical purposes, a government crisis that resulted in 
replacement of the Estonian cabinet of ministers scuttled the 
agreements, which had not been given any legal force. The new 
individuals who continued the negotiations on the Estonian side 
wished to interpret the scientific organization as nothing more 
than a Russian naval base threatening the sovereignty and 
transgressing upon the economic well-being of what they called 
their "tiny, impoverished Estonia." Administrative advisor 
Priiks was distinguished by special zealousness in destroying 
all that had been accomplished. And although the Estonians 
offered to lease us land for the test range and award it the 
status of a naval base, they asked for such an unrealistic rent 
that there was no doubt that they counted on us rejecting it. 
The situation regarding the test range was also aggravated by 
publication of Order No 126 of the Main Command of the CIS Joint 
Armed Forces dated 4 April 1992, which essentially prohibited 
all commercial activity by it. In this way, "everything is 
possible" transformed into "nothing is permitted." Consequently, 
further attempts at preserving the test range in Estonia and 
making a profitable enterprise out of it lost all meaning. 
Dozens of documents coordinated with financial, economic and 
legal departments and approved by the naval command, the RF 
Ministry of Defense and the State Committee for the Management 
of State Property, and contracts signed with Russian and 
Estonian enterprises, firms and organizations transformed into a 
useless pile of papers. The months I spent with Captain 2d Rank 
S. Sazonov, the acting chief of the test range, in Moscow and 
Tallinn "corridors of power" were wasted. 
  The fate of the test range had to be resolved quickly, and 
on 
a new legal basis. The most radical solution, one not requiring 
special effort, and apparently desired by a number of 
bureaucratic departments, was to disband it. On the backdrop of 
the devastation in the country and the enormous difficulties 
experienced by the navy, this decision might not even have 
appeared blasphemous. In this way, the test range found itself 
omitted from the list of troop units to be relocated from the 
Baltic, which for practical purposes predetermined its automatic 
disbanding. Under these conditions Vice Admiral V. Polyanskiy, 
the chief of the Ship Building Directorate, Rear Admiral I. 
Zakharov, chief of the Ministry of Defense Central Scientific 
Research Institute No 1, Captain 1st Rank O. Maslov and other 
officers had to exert a great deal of effort to substitute the 
word "disband" in the corresponding plans by the words "relocate 
the test range." 
  The relocation site (variants were proposed from the Far 
North and the Far East to St. Petersburg) immediately became an 
object of heated disagreements, ending with adoption of a 
decision in our favor. We argued the suitability of locating the 
test range in the vicinity of Leningrad Oblast, which was made 
evident by the results of special research that scientifically 
proved the advantages of its establishment precisely within this 
region. In addition, the positive working experience of a branch 
of the test range, established there in May 1992, also played a 
role. 
  A directive published by the General Staff in February 1993, 
which decided the final fate of the test range, set the deadline 
for its relocation in late 1993. Thus the work of moving the 
test range acquired a firm basis, although the real difficulties 
were only just beginning. 
  A sizable part of the territory of the Estonian National 
Park 
near Tallinn had been dedicated to us. I should say in passing 
that we took very good care of this land. Two military posts 
were located there, together with their infrastructure including 
special children's institutions, a sick bay, administrative and 
laboratory buildings, storage depots and so on. Upon studying 
and reconnoitering the terrain in the new area (a zone of 
so-called "magnetic calm"), we found that we could realistically 
hope to use an amount of territory that barely equaled a tenth 
of the former territory. Foreseeing difficulties in solving 
problems associated with reserving the land, and still 
continuing with our attempts to preserve the test range in 
Estonia, we began an effort to reconcile this issue. However, 
despite a decree of the RF Council of Ministers and a directive 
of the General Staff of the RF Armed Forces that determined the 
location of the test range, and the basic consent given to this 
by the leadership of the Leningrad Oblast Council and the local 
administrative heads, this issue has still not been resolved, 
and its resolution is the most important task of the immediate 
future. Of course, the total mutual understanding attained in 
relation to the test range's fate between us and between V. 
Pashin and V. Kopchenov, the leaders of the Central Scientific 
Research Institute imeni A. N. Krylov, and L. Khromykh, chief of 
the institute's testing station, permits temporary placement of 
the delivered apparatus and equipment in this area, and creates 
the necessary conditions for the military unit to start 
functioning. 
  We were able to retain possession of sizable amounts of 
material valuables as a result of the relocation. The property 
and apparatus were shipped by sea and by motor transport. The 
following ships and vessels were put into service for the sea 
shipments: the BDK-122, the dry-cargo transporter "Bira," the 
BTR-77, and the cable ship "Nepryadva." Motor transportation 
(20-tonne trucks) made around 40 trips. A total of over 1,500 
tonnes of freight were transferred, including unique Russian and 
imported apparatus, an electric power plant, boilers, hangars, 
transformers and so on. Special and transport launches and 
vessels registered to the test range were moved to the new 
basing area (on their own power and under tow by the icebreaker 
"Buran"), and all of the motor and tractor equipment needed to 
maintain normal life at the test range was delivered. 
  Because the RF Ministry of Defense did not appropriate 
resources for the relocation as a separate item, being a 
cost-accounting organization we made maximum use of our own 
internal reserves for this. Despite the fact that the recent 
times have been distinguished by instability of the positions of 
the military leadership regarding rights granted to scientific 
and testing organizations of the Ministry of Defense operating 
under self-financing conditions, we took all possible steps to 
ensure the test range's survival through the cold winter and 
spring of 1993, and to fulfill the relocation plan approved by 
the naval Main Command and avert the social explosions that 
nearly occurred on several occasions. Nor should we forget the 
efficient, highly professional work done by finance specialists 
headed by Lieutenant Colonel S. Kushnarev, who ensured timely 
payment for work done by the test range on the basis of 
contracts. We are also indebted to them to a significant degree 
for attaining complete mutual understanding with the higher 
financial body headed by Colonel Ye. Abrashkin, which provided 
timely assistance in converting monetary resources. 
  The work experience acquired by associates of the test range 
in 1992-1993 in servicing its ZPD [not further identified] by 
the watch method has allowed us to set up, jointly with 
specialists of the Central Scientific Research Institute imeni 
A. N. Krylov and on the basis of delivered equipment, temporary 
test beds with which to measure and check the physical fields of 
ships. Creating a high quality scientific and technical product 
in 1994 is the main objective of the test range. 
  In the first stage, it is fully understandable that such 
relocation is unavoidably associated with fulfillment of 
functions by scientific associates atypical of them (functions 
that are significantly destructive in nature), with loss of a 
stable way of life, and with periodic experience of extreme 
situations. Moreover, successes in scientific and productive 
activity depend directly on living conditions and the personal 
well-being of people. This is why the chairman and members of 
the relocation commission tried to do everything within their 
power to make the move and the initial period of reestablishment 
as painless as possible. 
  On 17 and 18 November 1993, which were unusually frosty 
days, 
a column of 20 vehicles carrying test range personnel and their 
families arrived at the new place. The last to leave the test 
range was Captain 1st Rank V. Bokov, as is expected of a 
commander. The promises of representatives of the naval command 
to accommodate all of the new arrivals in a sanatorium didn't 
materialize (we of course didn't really think they would), but 
to make matters worse, even tents were not to be had. Owing to 
the assistance of local administrative head M. Sergeyev, deputy 
director of the local affiliate of the Energiya 
Scientific-Production Association Yu. Ogurtsovskiy, chief of the 
testing station of the Central Scientific Research Institute 
imeni A. N. Krylov L. Khromykh, and director of the tourist base 
of the Manula Joint-Stock Company N. Okhrimchuk, all of the new 
arrivals were temporarily accommodated in living quarters 
allowing them to get through the winter normally. In the future, 
fully specific measures will be implemented by Colonel S. 
Trubitsyn, deputy commander of the Leningrad Naval Base, at the 
direction of the naval commander-in-chief to provide some 
housing support to the test range's associates. And we are 
seeking possibilities for radically solving the housing problem, 
doing everything necessary for this. 
  The relocation has been completed. A period of creative 
activity aimed at restoring the test range on its new territory, 
and a scientific and technical base that will be used jointly 
for the moment with the Central Scientific Research Institute 
imeni A. N. Krylov, is beginning. Study of the problems of 
planning an experimental model of the test range will reach its 
conclusion in 1994. The initial appropriations for 1994-1996 
have been planned by a decree of the Council of Ministers. The 
naval commander-in-chief approved a plan of measures for 1994 
and subsequent years to set up and develop its infrastructure. 
There are full grounds for believing that this plan will be 
carried out. 
  And so, the test range has left the Estonian Republic, 
basically preserving its equipment, personnel, and the 40 years' 
traditions and number of the military unit intact. The losses 
suffered by the RF Navy in this case are tangible. Given today's 
requirements on improving the qualitative characteristics of 
ships and raising their combat effectiveness, the importance of 
research on ship physical fields is growing. Consequently, there 
is no doubt that the test range will be restored in full volume 
in the next few years, and in a new place and on a new 
scientific and technical basis at that. Russia has sufficient 
forces and resources for this. The Estonian Republic lost 
incomparably more: A scientific research center doing work in 
which all Baltic countries are interested will apparently no 
longer exist in the foreseeable future on the shore of 
Khara-Lakht Bay. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46473 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Official Department </F>
<H3> <TI>   A Decision Has Been Made -- A Special Sarcophagus Will Cover </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    A Decision Has Been Made -- A Special Sarcophagus Will Cover </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
the   Nuclear Submarine `Komsomolets' 

<F P=102> 94UM0389C Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 1, 1994 
(Signed to press 28 Dec 93) p 36 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0389C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "A Decision Has Been Made -- A </F>
Special Sarcophagus Will Cover the Nuclear Submarine 
`Komsomolets'"] 
  [Text] The Committee for the Conduct of Special Work 
(KOPRON) under the Russian Federation Government has totally 
completed the study of materials associated with the 
investigation of the nuclear submarine "Komsomolets" that was 
lost in the Norwegian Sea on 7 April 1989. The research that was 
conducted this year has shown insignificant seepage of cesium 
and strontium radioactive isotopes from the nuclear submarine, 
which attests to a seal failure of the reactor and partial 
destruction of the pressure hull. However, the latest 
measurements have shown that, although the nuclear reactor is 
giving off a definite background, it does not pose a serious 
danger. We have detected evidence of corrosion and fragments of 
the torpedoes' warheads in the submarine's torpedo tubes. The 
warheads, which are gradually being destroyed, contain plutonium 
and, according to the assessments of KOPRON Chairman Captain 1st 
Rank T. Borisov, could result in serious ecological consequences 
in 2-3 years. KOPRON's experts have arrived at a final 
conclusion: It is dangerous to salvage the "Komsomolets" and 
therefore it is necessary to build a special sarcophagus from 
the submarine's hull, having sealed the submarine's nose section 
and torpedo tubes using a special compound (development of the 
compound is continuing). The Russian Academy of Sciences, 
Gosatomnadzor [State Committee for Nuclear Energy Oversight], 
Minatom [Ministry of Atomic Energy], environmental protection 
organs and the Ministry of Defense have supported the proposals 
of T. Borisov's committee. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46474 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Official Department </F>
<H3> <TI>   To Naval School Entrants </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    To Naval School Entrants </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0389D Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 1, 1994 
(Signed to press 28 Dec 93) pp 37-38 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0389D </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "To Naval School Entrants"] </F>
  [Text] If you have decided to tie your fate to the sea, 
this is possible! To do that, you need to enter one of the 
higher naval schools. If you have not yet been promoted to the 
9th grade, you can become a student of Nakhimov School where 
young men from 15-16 years of age are accepted (you must reach 
your 15th birthday during the year of matriculation), have state 
of health that is suitable for study at military schools and 
desire to become a Naval officer in the future. The mandatory 
condition -- is study at an English language school. 
  Parents or individuals who substitute for them submit 
requests for acceptance to Nakhimov School by 1 July. 
The documents required to do that are completed through rayon 
military commissariats (city military commissariats) at the 
place of residence. Among them are: 
  the entrant's personnel request addressed to the head of the 
school; 
  the parents' request which states that their son will 
continue to study at a naval school after graduation from 
Nakhimov School; an original certificate of birth; a medical 
examination by a military medical board under the rayon military 
commissariat (city military commissariat) at the place of 
residence; and, a progress report card for the first three study 
quarters (the candidate submits the original education 
certificate upon arrival at the school), which must mandatorily 
indicate which foreign language was studied; 
  a school reference; 
  information from the parents' work location or the residence 
location on the composition of the family and, in the case of 
the absence of either of the parents or of a divorce -- a copy 
of the death or divorce certificate. 
  Those persons permitted to take the entrance examinations 
receive a summons that gives them the right to request travel 
documents at the rayon military commissariat to the place of 
residence. 
  Upon arrival at the school, young men undergo a medical 
examination, a physical fitness test, and take competitive 
entrance examinations on the Russian language (dictation) and 
mathematics (oral). 
  The term of study at Nakhimov School when matriculating 
after 
the 8th grade is three years. Upon completion of the school, 
graduates (without examinations) are sent to higher naval 
schools for further study. 
  The school's address: House 2/4, Petrogradskiy Naberezhnaya, 
P-46, St. Petersburg, 197046. 
  Russian Federation male citizens who have a middle education 
are being accepted at higher naval schools: 
  from among civilian youth who are 17-21 years of age; 
  compulsory service military personnel and those soldiers who 
have been released into the reserve who are under 23 years of 
age; and, 
  army and navy warrant officers upon expiration of two years 
of service in the positions of army and navy warrant officers 
and officers, and also compulsory service military personnel who 
are up to 24 years of age. 
  Servicemen who desire to enter schools submit requests 
addressed to the unit commander prior to 1 April. 
  Individuals from among civilian youth submit applications 
(requests) prior to 1 May to the rayon (city) military 
commissariat at their place of residence, addressed directly to 
the chief of the selected school. The following is attached to 
the request: 
  three certified 4 x 6 cm photographs (without headgear); 
  an autobiography; 
  a reference from the place of work, study or service; 
  a copy of the middle education document (middle school 
students submit information on their progress at this period of 
time). 
  The graduate personally submits a passport, birth 
certificate, military service card (or residence permit) and an 
original middle education certificate to the acceptance board. 
  A special medical examination of candidates is conducted 
beforehand at military commissariats. Military draft boards 
carry out their selection to naval schools from among civilian 
youth prior to 25 May. 
  Matriculation of candidates who meet acceptance conditions 
is 
conducted based upon the entrance examinations. As a rule, this 
is Russian language and literature (written), mathematics 
(written), and physics (oral or written). 
  Servicemen and young men from among civilian youth, who have 
been awarded a gold or silver medal upon graduation from middle 
school or who have received diplomas with distinction upon 
graduation from middle special educational institutions or 
middle professional-technical school, take one examination on 
the profiled discipline. Upon receipt of a grade of 
"outstanding", they are released from having to take further 
examinations and, upon receiving a grade of "good" or 
"satisfactory", they take examinations on the remaining 
disciplines. 
  The term of study at higher naval schools is five years. 
Cadets are under full state support. They are annually provided 
two-week winter holidays and also a month-long summer leave. 
During the period of leave, they are provided with free 
transportation to the location where the leave is spent. 
  All cadets who have passed state examinations and who have 
defended their graduation thesis (project) are awarded the 
military rank of "lieutenant" and are handed a higher education 
diploma and the prescribed badge. 
  Having received a lieutenant's ceremonial dagger and 
shoulder 
boards, you will become a part of the glorious Naval officers 
corps. Modern equipment, surface combatants and submarines, and 
naval aviation aircraft will be under your control! Everything 
is in your hands. 
<H5>  Addresses of Naval Schools: </H5>
  Higher Naval Orders of Lenin and Ushakov, Red Banner 
School imeni M.V. Frunze (trains navigators, surface 
combatant antisubmarine warfare weapons, acoustics, surface 
combatant mine and torpedo weapons, and hydrometeorology 
specialists) V-162, St. Petersburg, 199162; 
  Higher Naval School of Submarine Navigation imeni Lenin 
Komsomol (trains navigators, missileers, submarine 
antisubmarine warfare missile and torpedo weapons specialists) 
L-93, St. Petersburg, 198093; 
  Higher Naval Order of Lenin School imeni F.E. 
Dzerzhinskiy (trains electrical engineers, shipbuilding 
engineers, electrical systems engineers) F-195, St. Petersburg, 
190195; 
  Higher Naval Engineering School imeni V.I. Lenin 
(trains mechanical engineers and chemical engineers) 4, St. 
Petersburg - Pushkin, 188620; 
  Higher Naval School of Radioelectronics imeni A.S. 
Popov (trains radiotechnical service engineers, and 
automated systems and software engineers) 4, Petrodvorets, St. 
Petersburg, 198135; 
  Kaliningrad Higher Naval School (trains radio 
communications engineers, artillerymen, and missileers), Oblast, 
Kaliningrad, 236026; 
  Pacific Ocean Higher Naval School imeni S.O. 
Makarov trains navigators, torpedomen, communicators, 
radiotechnical service engineers, electronic equipment and 
aircraft weapons engineers, and missileers), Vladivostok-6, 
690006. 
  Many young men ask the following question: how do I become a 
naval infantryman? We offer the addresses of several 
schools, after completion of which graduates are sent for 
service in these troops: 
  Far East Higher Combined Arms Command School imeni K.K. 
Rokossovskiy; Blagoveshchensk-21, Amur Oblast, 675021; 
  Blagoveshchensk Higher Tank Command School imeni K.A. 
Meretskov; Blagoveshchensk-18, Amur Oblast, 675018; 
  Lomonosov Naval College trains radiotechnical 
specialists, ship operator technicians, ship mechanic 
technicians, and electromechanical technicians for sailing on 
Naval auxiliary ships. Its address: House 18/46, Ulitsa Krasnogo 
Flota, Lomonosov, Leningrad Oblast, 189510. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46475 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Official Department </F>
<H3> <TI>   Edict Announces General Officer Promotions </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Edict Announces General Officer Promotions </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0391B Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 2, 1994 
(Signed to press 8 Feb 94) p 18 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0391B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] From the edict of the President of the Russian 
Federation "On Awarding Higher Officer Ranks to Servicemen of 
the Armed Forces of the Russian Federation" 
  The following ranks shall be awarded: 
  Vice Admiral GRISHANOV, Vladimir Vasilyevich 
  Rear Admiral BLIZNYUK, Sergey Anatolyevich 
LYAKIN, Viktor Fedorovich SERBE, Yevgeniy Yakovlevich 
SHCHEGOLEV, Vyacheslav Mikhaylovich 
  Major General KARPOV, Vladimir Vitalyevich 
  [Signed] President of the Russian Federation B. Yeltsin 
  Moscow, the Kremlin 
  31 December 1993 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46476 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Official Department </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russian, Kuwaiti Navies Conduct Joint Exercises </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russian, Kuwaiti Navies Conduct Joint Exercises </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0391C Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 2, 1994 
(Signed to press 8 Feb 94) p 18 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0391C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "First Russo-Kuwaiti Exercises"] </F>
  [Text] A joint exercise of warships of Russia and Kuwait 
was held in the period from 25 to 29 December 1993 in accordance 
with an agreement between these states. Participants from the 
Russian Navy included the large ASW ship "Admiral Vinogradov," 
the large assault-landing ship "N. Vilkov" and the tanker "V. 
Kolechitskiy"; participants from the Kuwaiti Navy included the 
missile boat "Istiqlal," eight coastal defense launches and two 
F-18 airplanes. 
  The exercise plan foresaw joint maneuvering of ships, 
communication training, search and rescue of disaster victims, 
detention and examination of a vessel, artillery firing on 
water-surface and airborne targets, and joint conditional 
strikes against an enemy assault landing detachment undergoing 
sealift. 
  On 28 December the progress of the exercise was kept under 
observation by Major General A. Al-Mumin [transliteration], 
chief of staff of the Kuwaiti Armed Forces, who gave a high 
assessment to the combat proficiency of the crews of our ships. 
  On 30 December, summarizing the results of the exercise 
aboard the large ASW ship "Admiral Vinogradov," Admiral F. 
Gromov, commander-in-chief of the Russian Navy, noted that 
Kuwaiti and Russian seamen, who successfully completed all of 
their missions, are honorably continuing the traditions of naval 
cooperation between our countries, established long ago by the 
legendary cruiser "Varyag," which entered the port of Al-Kuwait 
in 1901 to open a Russian consulate there. 
  Kuwaiti Navy acting commander Lieutenant Colonel M. Yakut 
expressed deep satisfaction in the high organization and results 
of the first joint exercises of the two countries which, he 
emphasized, were a good school for Kuwaiti seamen. 
  Captain 1st Rank A. Yakovlev, who directed the exercise, 
read 
the names of servicemen who distinguished themselves in the 
course of the combat exercises. On the Russian side these were 
Captain 1st Rank V. Chernyavskiy, commander of the large ASW 
ship "Admiral Vinogradov"; A. Denisov, captain of the tanker "V. 
Kolechitskiy"; Captain 1st Rank V. Andreyev and Captain 3d Rank 
A. Demin, officers of the operational staff; the crew of the 
helicopter under the command of Lieutenant Colonel T. Guzoirov; 
Captain-Lieutenant V. Kanev, department commander; the examining 
team headed by Captain A. Kozlovskiy; Petty Officer 1st Class A. 
Sorokin, commander of a signal detachment. On the Kuwait side 
these were primarily the crew of the missile boat "Istiqlal" and 
its commander, Major Mansur. 
  After a short rest in Al-Kuwait, where our seamen celebrated 
the New Year, the detachment of ships of the Russian Navy 
returned to sea to participate in Gulfex-22 joint exercises with 
ships of the American, English and French navies held in the 
Persian Gulf. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46477 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Official Department </F>
<H3> <TI>   1993 Naval Combat Training Championship Results Announced </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    1993 Naval Combat Training Championship Results Announced </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0391D Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 2, 1994 
(Signed to press 8 Feb 94) p 19 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0391D </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Results of Naval Championships Summarized"] </F>
  [Text] An order published by naval commander-in-chief F. N. 
Gromov announced the results of the 1993 naval championships in 
different forms of combat training. The best results were 
attained by formations, ships and units of the Northern and 
Black Sea fleets, which had won the largest number of naval 
prizes, as is evidenced by the following data (in comparison 
with 1992): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |1992                     |1993                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Northern Fleet           |7                        |10                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Pacific Fleet            |6                        |1                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Baltic Fleet             |2                        |2                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Black Sea Fleet          |4                        |6                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The crews of nuclear-powered submarines under the command of 
captains 1st rank S. Safronov and A. Yefanov and Captain 2d Rank 
V. Kvasov in the Northern Fleet, and under the command of 
Captain 1st Rank A. Mishin in the Pacific Fleet, attained high 
indicators in missile, mine and torpedo tactics. At the same 
time the greatest successes were attained by the crew of a Black 
Sea Fleet diesel-powered submarine under the command of Captain 
2d Rank K. Vasiltsev, which won two prizes. 
  In missile training, the best were the TARKR "Admiral 
Nakhimov," Captain 1st Rank A. Galanin, commander; a formation 
under the command of Captain 1st Rank Yu. Kostyrko consisting of 
two tactical groups of small missile ships and missile boats of 
the Black Sea Fleet; a coastal missile unit of the Black Sea 
Fleet under the command of Lieutenant Colonel O. Gogeyzel; an 
aviation subunit of the Northern Fleet, Lieutenant Colonel A. 
Anokhin, commander. The prize for best artillery training was 
awarded to a Northern Fleet task force under the command of 
Captain 1st Rank S. Shmakov; the prize for best fire training 
was received by Major V. Novikov's Black Sea Fleet marine 
infantry unit. Regarding organization of antisubmarine warfare, 
the commander-in-chief singled out the Northern Fleet formation 
under the command of Rear Admiral G. Revin; a unit of small ASW 
ships of the Black Sea Fleet under the command of Captain 3d 
Rank A. Permyakov; a Northern Fleet aviation subunit under the 
command of Lieutenant Colonel S. Dergunov. 
  Besides this, the naval commander-in-chief also awarded 
prizes to several formations, ships and units. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46478 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Questions of Theory </F>
<H3> <TI>   Treaty Limits Needed on ASW Activity </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Treaty Limits Needed on ASW Activity </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0391E Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 2, 1994 
(Signed to press 8 Feb 94) pp 33-36 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0391E </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Capt 1st Rank (Ret) B. Makeyev: "Limiting </F>
Antisubmarine Activity as a Factor of Strategic Stability"] 
  [Text] Limiting antisubmarine activity may be viewed as an 
important part of the overall problem of finding ways to reduce 
military activity in the world ocean. The end of the Cold War, 
elimination of former conflicts between the East and the West, 
and a number of other new factors bringing on positive shifts in 
international relations are making inclusion of the naval 
"component" in negotiation processes even more important. 
  There is no doubt that arms reduction and reinforcement of 
mutual trust in military affairs must be comprehensive, 
embracing all of their forms. In this aspect navies possessing 
enormous firepower, mobility, independence, and a significant 
ability to resist the enemy can in no way be an exception, all 
the more so because in the last few decades they have become an 
important means of offensive military activities, including 
against objectives on land. If we ignore this, a shift of the 
arms race to the sea would not be excluded. Not only might this 
be an obstacle to lowering the overall military balance to the 
level of defensive sufficiency desired by all, but it may also 
act as a powerful destabilizing factor in this process. In this 
case although unilateral steps to reduce the composition of the 
fleets doubtlessly do limit the arms race at sea to a certain 
degree, they cannot produce a decrease in the overall military 
balance, and, consequently, strategic stability in the world. If 
the state of the fleets is disregarded, such reductions will 
actually be unsupervisable, and they will doubtlessly be 
accompanied by a desire to improve naval forces qualitatively 
and to raise their combat effectiveness. This is why the 
inclusion of sea armament in the negotiation process together 
with other forms of armament is an objective reality. 
  Considering the differences in the approaches to this 
problem 
in different countries, it would appear suitable to approach its 
solution gradually, in stages. In this aspect I can propose 
three stages of its resolution. First--creating and 
strengthening measures of trust at sea, upon which both 
collective and unilateral actions of the agreeing parties need 
to be oriented. Their goal is to reduce the danger of military 
confrontation and tension, and to avert conflicts resulting from 
misinterpretation of one another's actions. While these are not 
measures of real disarmament per se, and while they do not have 
an effect on either the structure or the effective combat 
strength of the fleets, they will nonetheless create a climate 
of trust between states, and promote reinforcement of 
international peace and security. These measures should include 
agreements on preventing incidents at sea, on the creation of a 
system of notification regarding major exercises and maneuvers, 
on launchings of ICBMs and SLBMs, and on the concentration and 
relocation of naval forces, and other measures that may 
significantly reduce the probability of chance conflicts at sea. 
  In the second stage we need to reach agreement on measures 
to 
limit especially dangerous naval activities, and to reduce the 
possibility of creating conditions for a surprise attack from 
the sea and for initiation of offensive actions there of a major 
scale. Prohibiting or limiting activities of naval forces in the 
patrol zones of missile submarines, and later on in regions 
where the greatest concentration of naval forces is observed 
today, as well as in international shipping lanes, in fishing 
zones and so on, should be included among such measures. In the 
third and final stage we could raise the issue of balanced 
reduction of the composition of fleet forces, with regard for 
the effectiveness with which they can carry out offensive 
missions in agreed regions. 
  Today, productive negotiations are being conducted only 
within the framework of the first stage, as outlined above. As 
for the second, I feel that it should begin with talks on 
limiting antisubmarine activity. 
  It should be clarified here that antisubmarine activity is a 
multifaceted concept. It penetrates into all aspects of naval 
functions, and it is represented by an entire complex of 
measures directed at detecting and destroying enemy submarines 
with the purpose of preventing strikes by their missiles and 
torpedoes against ships (vessels) and coastal objectives, and at 
preventing them from carrying out reconnaissance, laying mines, 
and carrying out other tasks. As we know, antisubmarine warfare 
is accomplished by special antisubmarine forces and resources. 
  In this case, ship and aviation antisubmarine warfare [ASW] 
forces rely upon extensive networks of permanently stationed 
sonar systems, on space and air reconnaissance, and on command, 
control and communication resources, which in their integration 
make up a global system for monitoring the underwater situation 
in vast regions of the world ocean. 
  Naturally, it would be hard to accept disturbance of any 
links of this system, which ensures the safety of naval forces 
and allows them to carry out their missions at sea effectively. 
This is the principal argument offered by the American side 
whenever the discussion turns to limiting antisubmarine 
activity. However, there are links in this system, after all, 
that can and must be viewed as objects in relation to which the 
second stage of negotiations on reducing military activity at 
sea should begin. I am referring to limiting antisubmarine 
activity not in general, but only in regions of possible covert 
patrolling by strategic submarine forces, which, together with 
other strategic nuclear forces, are deterrent forces that 
provide strategic stability and maintain a potential readiness 
for a retaliatory nuclear strike against an aggressor. 
  It is fully understandable that the capability of these 
forces for carrying out this mission depends not only and not so 
much on parity of nuclear resources, regarding which the 
corresponding agreements already exist, but also on their 
ability to resist the enemy in the event of enemy actions. After 
all, in a crisis one of the sides might use its ASW forces for 
preemptive strikes against the other side's SSBNs in order to 
achieve strategic superiority both for the purpose of military 
and political pressure and in order to weaken a retaliatory 
strike as much as possible. 
  It is precisely in order to exclude such a situation and to 
increase survival of SSBNs, and ultimately to reinforce 
strategic stability, that it appears suitable to prohibit search 
operations in regions of possible combat patrols. In this case I 
am not asking the sides to reveal the specific areas of combat 
patrols by SSBNs: Keeping such areas secret is absolutely 
natural, and disclosing them is even unsuitable from the 
standpoint of raising their ability to resist the enemy in the 
event that one of the sides violates agreements. What I am 
asking for is to determine particular zones in the seas and 
oceans where such regions may be located, and into which access 
by ASW forces should be limited. 
  However, when we work out such measures of prohibition we 
need to study a number of questions, the absence of answers to 
which made such an initiative on the part of the USSR futile in 
the past. Are such restrictions on antisubmarine activities 
possible in the operational, technical, and legal aspects? Won't 
they be detrimental to other antisubmarine missions carried out 
by fleet forces? And finally, can compliance with such 
restrictions be supervised? 
  It seems to me that negotiations on this subject are 
possible 
and suitable because they significantly fill in the omissions in 
strategic arms reduction treaties. On the other, hand agreements 
reached in this case would not preclude other antisubmarine 
activities associated with defending warship formations, 
transporters, assault landing detachments at sea, naval bases, 
and so on. After all, the specific (unique) features of actions 
to seek and destroy SSBNs in their patrol regions make it 
possible to quickly distinguish them from other antisubmarine 
activities, and, consequently, effective supervision over 
compliance with agreements is possible. 
  In fact, in contrast to other missions of antisubmarine 
defense, struggle with naval strategic nuclear weapon carriers 
requires early deployment of forces for finding them and for 
keeping them under observation in order to prevent a surprise 
nuclear missile strike from the sea. Today, the possibility for 
destroying missile submarines at the onset of war before they 
launch their missiles has vitally important significance to both 
of the warring sides. All subsequent actions at sea following a 
missile launch, including actions against nuclear-powered 
submarines, would not be able to prevent or even reduce the 
damage suffered by the side that had lost the initiative and 
allowed the enemy to purposefully employ his fighting potential, 
no matter how effective these subsequent actions might be. On 
the other hand, effective and timely strikes against missile 
submarines are possible only when maneuvering naval forces 
(aviation, surface ships, and submarines) interact efficiently 
with reconnaissance forces (sonar, space, air, marine 
radiotechnical etc.). This is why the actions of maneuvering ASW 
forces are the subject of negotiations to limit antisubmarine 
activities in regions of possible patrolling by SSBNs, and why 
deployment of such forces in these regions would be limited. 
  In this case, there is no need for detailed examination of 
the actions of these forces. Within the scope of the content and 
the orientation of this article it will be sufficient to dwell 
on the basic means of using ASW forces to reveal hostile 
intentions against SSBNs, and, thus, illustrate the 
possibilities of supervising compliance with an agreement. A 
detailed examination of the specific issues regarding search 
operations in regions of possible patrolling by SSBNs is a 
matter for experts at negotiations. On our part, we will limit 
ourselves to the most general forms and means of their actions 
only for the purposes of illustration. 
  Shore-based patrol aviation occupies the most important 
place 
today in search operations against missile submarines. It 
possesses high mobility and maneuverability, a large radius of 
operations, a significant search potential, including by means 
of the latest nontraditional detection resources, and it is less 
dependent on weather conditions than ship-based ASW airplanes 
and helicopters. Therefore, presence of shore-based airplanes in 
the combat patrol regions of SSBNs is subject to strict 
regulation. In addition, their activity depends on the surface 
area of the region to be searched and on the particular search 
resources employed in this case, and, consequently, it is rather 
specific, and it cannot be lumped together with actions by ASW 
airplanes carrying out other ASW missions. 
  Surface ships, which remain the principal antisubmarine 
defense forces of carrier formations, convoys, and assault 
landing detachments, can also be tasked to fight SSBNs. Sonar 
stations equipped with low-frequency towed antennas of 
considerable length, possessing a range of submarine detection 
that is an order of magnitude greater than the operating range 
of stations with onboard antennas, are now the preferred 
resource for seeking SSBNs. In this case the nature of maneuver 
of both lone ships and ship groups, including ones employing ASW 
helicopters, and their appearance in stipulated regions for a 
period of time greater than that needed for antisubmarine 
support to the passage of ship detachments or formations, 
provide the grounds for concluding such actions to be a 
violation of agreements reached regarding the given region. 
  ASW submarines are one of the most effective and covert 
resources for finding and destroying SSBNs in their regions of 
maneuver. The modern polyfunctional sonar complexes they use, 
which operate predominantly in passive modes in combination with 
high-speed automated target classification and indication 
systems, make such submarines the most dangerous enemy to SSBNs, 
and a resource that is hardest of all to reveal in such a 
region. But even their actions are distinguished by certain 
specific features in this case, associated with the need for 
lengthy shadowing of a detected submarine, for classifying it as 
an SSBN, and so on. In addition, there are certain means of 
monitoring their presence in a given region, implemented both by 
the SSBN itself and by other naval forces supporting such 
monitoring, which carry out such tasks with the needed 
periodicity in different regions determined by agreement so as 
not to reveal the specific patrol zone of the missile submarine. 
  In general, shadowing of a submarine by any maneuvering ASW 
forces differs from observation and reconnaissance in the given 
region in that they must maintain prolonged contact with the 
submarine, with their weapons ready for immediate use. And, 
although the means of such shadowing will vary (covert and 
overt, continuous and discrete, by lone objects and their 
groups, by homogeneous and heterogeneous forces), the specific 
tactics and the nature of maneuver immediately reveal their 
essence. They could of course be concealed by other actions of 
ASW forces in contiguous zones and regions, but concentration 
itself of these forces in a given zone is a major factor 
disclosing the true intentions. Thus, these and a number of 
other specific features of the activity of antisubmarine forces 
searching for missiles submarines (the order of transfer of 
contact from certain forces to others, the particular features 
of radio exchange, build-up of these forces in a time of danger, 
an so on), which we will not discuss here, make it possible not 
to require, at negotiations, the total absence of ASW forces 
from the indicated regions, which is not to the liking of the 
American side today. The goal of an agreement must be their 
quantitative restriction to a certain pre-established level. A 
certain permissible probability of their detection of SSBNs in 
the corresponding region may be used as a criterion of this 
level. 
  This approach does, of course, require complex 
justifications 
accounting for the dimensions and the hydrometeorological 
characteristics of the region, as well as the performance 
characteristics and means of use of ASW forces. While this 
approach should be based on state-of-the-art computerized 
procedures, a simple procedure based on an algorithm 
characterizing the probability of detection of a submarine in a 
given region may be used for tentative and approximate 
assessment of the maximum permissible strength of antisubmarine 
forces in a certain region. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-023-16A>      Equation </FIG>

  where d[.sub]det[/]--range of the detection equipment of 
the ASW forces; V[.sub]_r_[/]--relative speed of ASW forces 
searching for a missile submarine on patrol; n--number of units 
of searching forces; t--time allocated to surveying the region; 
S--area of surveyed region. 
  By some simple manipulations we get: 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-023-17A>      Equation </FIG>


  Given certain assumptions, we can use this formula to 
approximately determine the nature of the ASW forces 
(homogeneous or heterogeneous) to be used in searching for SSBNs 
in prescribed regions with a prescribed P[.sub]det[/], and, 
consequently, introduce quantitative restrictions on 
antisubmarine activity in regions in which naval strategic 
forces may operate with the purpose of ensuring their ability to 
resist the enemy. The calculation procedure might be as follows 
in this case: 
  1. Determine the boundaries and total areas of prohibited 
regions: 
  (S[.sub]1[/], S[.sub]2[/], S[.sub]3[/], 
...S[.sub]k[/]); 
  2. Determine the average ranges of detection resources 
(d[.sub]det[/]), the searching speeds (V[.sub]ASW[/]) and 
the time of operation of different ASW forces in each subregion 
(t), in relation to specific hydrological and 
hydrometeorological conditions of the region, and calculate 
relative speeds V[.sub]_r_[/] with regard for the patrolling 
speeds of the SSBNs; 
  3. Calculate the search potentials of ASW forces that may 
operate in the given region: aviation--SP[.sub]av[/], surface 
ships--SP[.sub]ss[/], submarines--SP[.sub]sub[/], using 
the known approximate formula 
SP[.sub]i[/]=D[.sub]deti[/]V[.sub]_r_i[/]. After this, 
determine the overall search potential of ASW forces 
(SP[.sub]total[/]) as the sum of the potential of all 
participating forces; 
  4. Determine the areas of the zones of operation of 
different 
branches of ASW forces (aviation--S[.sub]av[/], surface 
ships--S[.sub]ss[/], and submarines--S[.sub]sub[/]) in 
proportion to the search potentials using the known formula 
  S[.sub]i[/]=S(SP[.sub]i[/]/SP[.sub]det[/]). 
  We assume with accuracy sufficient for tentative assessment 
that ASW forces will interact only within the zones of their 
operation in the search area; 
  5. Use formula (2) to calculate the number of units of 
different ASW forces which may not be exceeded in the given 
region. Because of difficulties in monitoring ASW submarines 
stationed in the region, when the calculated quantity of other 
ASW forces is present in the region, detection of just one 
submarine there would have to be treated as the limit. Moreover, 
vessels intended for long-range sonar reconnaissance would be 
categorically prohibited from entering the region. 
  The listed features of the operations and quantitative 
composition of ASW forces searching for SSBNs in a particular 
region cannot go undetected. Therefore, the appearance of 
unidentified submarines and of a certain number of ASW ships and 
shore-based airplanes in this region, carrying out some or all 
of the actions serving as indicators of SSBN search operations, 
is sufficient grounds for the conclusion that the corresponding 
side is violating agreements. 
  In conclusion, it should be noted that limiting 
antisubmarine 
operations, carried out by strategic deterrent forces, is legal 
from the standpoint of international law, inasmuch as it raises 
strategic stability at sea, it yields to control, and it does 
not undermine the principles of antisubmarine defense provided 
in all other spheres of naval activity. Reaching agreement on 
this issue would be a substantial step on the road to also 
limiting other forms of military activity in maritime regions in 
support of the mutual state interests of the agreeing countries, 
and, ultimately, it may open the road to the beginning of 
productive negotiations on disarmament at sea. On the other 
hand, stubborn rejection of this approach would be an indication 
of a certain lack of interest in successfully resolving this 
issue, which would then require implementation of other adequate 
measures. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46479 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Cruises and Flights </F>
<H3> <TI>   In a Checkmate Situation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    In a Checkmate Situation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0389E Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 1, 1994 
(Signed to press 28 Dec 93) pp 42-44 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0389E </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Captain 1st Rank A. Pilipchuk: "In a Checkmate </F>
Situation"] 
  [Text] We have grounds to call this news from 
the Northern Fleet very unpleasant: They have decided to prepare 
the Aircraft-Carrying Cruiser "Kiev" to be cut up for scrap. 
Ship repairmen have not managed to breathe new life into this 
first-born of the series of aircraft-carrying ships that are 
capable of receiving vertical take-off and landing aircraft on 
board and which was delivered to the plant quay for repair 
several years ago. The press of the economic crises has 
disrupted these plans. 
  Ships are built not for centuries but each of them has its 
own measured off time period. For example, American Iowa Class 
Battleships were destined to serve for approximately 50 years 
and many U.S. Navy aircraft carriers --for 30 years. The 
"Kiev's" fate was allotted a total of two decades and its 
younger brothers "Minsk" and "Novorossiysk" -- even less. They 
left for the ship cemetery long before the calculated time 
period, without experiencing the rejuvenating impact of capital 
repair and modernization that extend the lives of combat ships 
by many years. Having found colossal resources for the 
construction of an aircraft-carrying "squadron", the state found 
itself incapable of maintaining it. The state itself collapsed 
and the priority program for the development of surface 
combatants that are capable of unfurling the air "umbrella" of 
cover over the fleets forces at sea was buried under its 
fragments. 
  Right now it is already clear that the Russian Navy faces 
decades of intense labor for its rebirth. And not only in the 
context of the construction of aircraft-carrying ships. Speaking 
about them, we must note the obvious paradox that is so 
characteristic for us: Russia -- a pioneer of the utilization of 
aircraft from the decks of ships -- does not have its own 
aircraft-carrying fleet. During the course of the latest 
polemics on this issue, which have died down for well-known 
reasons, the sensation frequently arose that currently some 
people in our country do not at all want to see Russia as a 
powerful maritime power that is not moving in the wake of the 
policy of the Western "flagships", but that is affecting the 
course and the progress of the entire world "armada". 
  God be with them, with the clever writers, who want to 
convince us that, if we don't build one cruiser, we will be able 
to erect an entire housing microrayon. It is insulting only that 
they are being allowed to confuse unsophisticated people as if 
such simple "arithmetic" solutions exist in the economy. We 
would like to believe that common sense and a truly scientific 
approach to these problems reign and our Navy's service record, 
on which is listed over 300 years of irreproachable service to 
the Fatherland, will continue with honor and glory. But today, 
when military shipyards are nearly empty, it is important to 
preserve if only the naval cadres among which the state of naval 
aviators causes special alarm and for whom an airfield is the 
deck of a ship. And there are substantial grounds for alarm here. 
  Soon two years will have passed since the time of the 
serious 
flying accident in the Northern Fleet Air Force shipborne 
antisubmarine warfare regiment. While accomplishing a flying 
mission, a Ka-27ps (search and rescue) helicopter crashed into 
the Barents Sea and sank. The tragedy took the lives of seven 
aviators. What is the need to return to the events of the winter 
before last, and events so tragic at that? The entire matter is 
in those conclusions which the official commission, that 
investigated the causes of the accident, came to at that time 
and the "independent panel of experts" that was conducted by the 
helicopter crewmen themselves -- the fellow servicemen of the 
dead comrades. Both the one and the other cited the prolonged 
gaps in flights from the decks of ships as one of the causes of 
the accident. It resulted in an error in flying technique, in 
shortcomings in air traffic control and, ultimately, in a great 
misfortune. 
  New Regimental Commander Colonel Gennadiy Stepanov, who was 
appointed after this accident, while describing the situation 
that had developed in the unit in 1993, noted that not a single 
pilot, including he himself, a pilot-expert marksman, had a 
certification to land on a deck at that time. Yes and how can 
you obtain it or confirm it if some of his regimental colleagues 
had not taken off into the air a single time since the beginning 
of the year. The fuel that was allotted for flights was enough 
only for several officers who had just completed school "to take 
to the sky" and to permit seven instructor pilots to "fly a 
bit". In 1993, the combat training flying period actually went 
to restore flying technique in the airfield area and on a route 
over the sea. 
  By the way, the regiment has been designated for joint 
basing 
with aircraft on Northern Fleet aircraft-carrying cruisers. We 
discussed the fate of the "Kiev" above but its counterpart 
"Admiral of the Fleet of the Soviet Union Gorshkov" has already 
been moored to the plant quay of the naval plant in Murmansk for 
several years. The ship repair facility of Russia's largest 
fleet -- the Northern Fleet -- is breathing asthmatically from 
the shortage of financial resources (even the government has 
been compelled to review the issues of financing the Northern 
Fleet) and from the loss of many suppliers who were left behind 
the new borders. Ships are leaving the combat formation and not 
are being "restored to health" at the plant quays which could 
still have acquired a second breath for many years. And along 
with them, the deck is leaving from under the feet of the 
carrier-based aviators, the "squaring" of which is being reduced 
with each written off ship. 
  That is how it already occurred in the Pacific Fleet from 
the 
complement of which both aircraft-carrying cruisers -- the 
"Minsk" and "Novorossiysk" --, that were designed for VVP 
[vertical takeoff and landing] "Yak's", were withdrawn one after 
the other. I visited that fleet not too long ago as part of a 
group of admirals and officers of the Naval Main Staff headed by 
First Deputy Commander-in-Chief Admiral Igor Kasatonov. During 
the flight from Vladivostok to Sovgavan [Sovetskaya Gavan], a 
view of the dead skeleton of the "Novorossiysk" opened in one of 
the bays under the aircraft's wing. I had the opportunity to put 
to sea in this, at that time full of force, ship and my heart 
sank at the sight of the enormous "lifeless" ship. 
  At one time, we discussed at great length the imperfections 
of the Yakovlev firm's vertical take-off and landing aircraft 
that are based on aircraft-carrying cruisers. But today we 
essentially have a new "vertical take-off aircraft" that largely 
exceeds its foreign equivalents but only one floating airfield 
has remained for them and that one is in repair. Like some kind 
of hostile arm, someone's evil genie is always throwing us 
decades back in the construction of a modern navy, attempting to 
leave our gigantic maritime borders, as we shamefully say right 
now, "transparent" and actually -- defenseless. 
  If the Pacific Fleet's naval ground attack aviation has 
already been deprived of a deck, then shipborne antisubmarine 
warfare aviation is waiting its turn. The number of ships on 
which antisubmarine warfare and rescue helicopters can be based 
is steadily declining and they infrequently put to sea. In 1993, 
the number of times they put to sea was reduced practically by a 
factor of two in the fleet due to the shortage of POL 
[petroleum, oils and lubricants] (yes and those of low quality) 
and spare parts for repair. And many of them have been serving 
for nearly 20 years and need the renewal of existing technical 
resources. Incidentally, the fleet's air fleet is in the same 
condition where very many of them need repair or are subject to 
being written off. And therefore the situation with 
flying-tactical training remains extremely complicated. And here 
primarily the instructor staff takes off into the sky to 
maintain its skills. 
  Surprisingly, in the process fleet aviators have managed to 
primarily accomplish the missions with which they have been 
tasked. For example, the antisubmarine warfare crews have 
detected an entire series of foreign submarines which are 
constantly roaming off our shores. Yes, people are literally 
working miracles. But for how long will they suffice? In 1993, 
more than 1,500 Pacific Fleet seamen, including hundreds of 
aviators, submitted requests to be released into the reserve and 
nearly half of them were approved. If this is the path for the 
reduction of our Armed Forces, then we are successfully 
following it... 
  Mentally shifting from East to West, we see a similar 
picture 
in the Baltic Fleet that has also been exacerbated by the losses 
of part of the bases in the Baltic Region. Indeed, Baltic Fleet 
Air Force Commander Lieutenant-General Vasiliy Proskurnin is not 
inclined to dramatize the situation and along with his staff is 
doing everything so that ship-based helicopter crews maintain 
their skills as much as possible, even at the cost of their 
rehearsal at land-based airfields. Not everyone, and first of 
all the commander himself, understands that it is impossible to 
maintain an adequate level of training without a ship's deck. 
Already during the time of service in the Polar region, he 
nurtured the idea of equipping each fleet with floating 
pontoons, including towed pontoons, to rehearse helicopter crew 
take-offs and landings. This proposal appeared in the press in 
1993. And a firm in St. Petersburg immediately announced that it 
was prepared to patent this idea which will not become expensive 
during its embodiment but the need for something like it is high 
today. 
  When this theme ripened in my journalistic note pad, I 
visited the Russian Naval Aviation commander's directorate and 
met with Major-General Anatoliy Tikhomirov and Colonel Boris 
Ruchkin. They confirmed the entire complexity and urgency of the 
problems that have accumulated in naval aviation. Today Naval 
carrier-based ground attack and fighter aviation aviators have 
found themselves simply in a checkmate situation. Already 
several years ago training of carrier-based fighter-ground 
attack aviation pilots was occurring at the "NITKA" training 
complex in the Crimea in parallel with the construction of the 
heavy aircraft-carrying cruisers "Admiral of the Fleet of the 
Soviet Union Kuznetsov" and "Ulyanovsk" (the heavy nuclear 
aircraft-carrying cruiser that has been cut up for scrap at the 
slipways of Nikolayev Shipbuilding Plant and "Varyag" (the fate 
of this uncompleted heavy aircraft-carrying cruiser has still 
not been resolved). It is currently located on the territory of 
a neighboring sovereign state. This "NITKA" training complex 
permitted us to rehearse elements of a take-off from a ski jump 
and glide slope descents and landings while catching the 
aircraft tail hook on an arresting cable on a deck mock-up. The 
firm OKB [Experimental Design Bureau] imeni P.O. Sukhoy 
maintained a contract with the Ukrainian side for a certain 
period of time on the training of several pilots of the lead 
group for the heavy aircraft-carrying cruiser "Kuznetsov". But 
Russia needs a more serious -- on the governmental level -- 
contract with Ukraine for the mass training of pilots. For the 
time being, the heavy aircraft-carrying cruiser "Kuznetsov's" 
enormous take-off and landing deck is empty. During a two-month 
cruise, only one aircraft landed on the deck. 
  It's clear that Russia must have its own training complex or 
center to train and retrain naval fighter-ground attack aviation 
pilots. The Navy's aviation command authorities went to the 
government with a petition to grant a location and resources for 
its construction in Russia. But it seems that right now they are 
busy with other things and it is hard to predict when the 
government's hands will reach the essentially urgent problems of 
naval aviation... 
  Of course, carrier-based aviators have more problems than I 
am capable of including in these remarks. The shipbuilders, 
aircraft designers, and aircraft builders also have problems. 
The new understanding of the country's security that was set 
forth in the recently approved Russian Federation military 
doctrine places these problems among those of state importance. 
It is hard to imagine a priority direction of the structural 
development of the Russian Armed Forces, like the creation of 
mobile forces which the doctrine discusses, without the 
development of a modern navy and its most important components. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46480 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Cruises and Flights </F>
<H3> <TI>   Preparation of Nuclear Subs for Patrol Raises Concern </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Preparation of Nuclear Subs for Patrol Raises Concern </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0391F Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 2, 1994 
(Signed to press 8 Feb 94) pp 44-45 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0391F </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Capt 1st Rank K. Maklov, nuclear-powered </F>
submarine commander, by Capt 1st Rank B. Tyurin: "Is the Ship 
Ready for Patrol?"] 
  [Text] Strange as it may seem, 
although the number of combat patrols sailed by ships of the 
Russian Navy had decreased dramatically, patrol service has not 
only become more intensive for the crews, but most importantly, 
it has become harder. The reasons for this were explained to me 
at the headquarters of one of the nuclear-powered submarine 
formations of the Pacific Fleet. The truth is that because 
hundreds of ships of the fleets, including several dozen 
nuclear-powered submarines, were retired in recent years, and 
because of the insufficiency of repair support to the few 
survivors needing repairs, the numbers of which are constantly 
growing, we are forced to make more active use of ships that are 
technically serviceable, and use their life right up to the 
limit. After all, the country hasn't relieved Black Sea Fleet 
submariners of their mission of "keeping their powder dry," or 
all the more so the strategic nuclear forces of their mission 
guaranteeing stability in the world. This is why we saw several 
different submarines being prepared simultaneously for combat 
service at the Far Eastern submarine base we visited in fall of 
1993. 
  One of them is under the command of Captain 1st Rank K. 
Maklov. He is an experienced submariner who spent his entire 
career under water, and he has commanded this particular crew 
for over two years. Our short interview (the ship was being made 
ready to set out to sea) occurred in the control room. The main 
thing I wanted to clarify was this: Did the commander feel his 
ship to be fully ready for patrol? Konstantin Gennadyevich said 
the following. 
  There were more than enough problems before, but now they've 
become extremely worrisome. They concern both people and 
equipment. The thing I'm most concerned about as a commander is 
the youthfulness and, consequently, the lack of experience of 
the crew. And although it is 78 percent manned by "our own" 
people and only 22 percent manned by men "commandeered" from 
other submarines of the same class, which isn't bad by today's 
yardsticks, hardly any of them underwent training at a special 
training center. Before, such training was carried out a minimum 
of twice a year, but now that this center is on the territory of 
another state, and is being disbanded, the training has not been 
conducted for several years. As for when a new center will be 
ready, no one knows. At the old center, the crews underwent 
training for almost two months, purposefully and continuously, 
which did a great deal to raise the level of knowledge and 
training of all categories of personnel, and which improved 
operation and ensured accident-free use of the ship's weapons 
and equipment. The one saving grace is that there are 
experienced officers and warrant officers in the crew who have 
participated in many cruises. But today they are doing 
everything they can to get posted ashore, or even to demobilize. 
Consequently, what we have basically are young officers (with 
ranks of senior lieutenant and captain-lieutenant); moreover 
four are last year's graduates and nine are this year's. Who is 
going to teach them, and transmit experience to them? The older 
comrades of course, who had undergone the normal course of 
training. But aboard our submarine such officers are few and far 
between. 
  Yes, today neither department commanders nor service chiefs 
are interested in further service aboard ship. It has become 
much more difficult to serve here, mainly because experienced 
warrant officers are leaving, and the young replacements exhibit 
an increasingly lower level of both general educational and 
special training, and most importantly, a progressive 
indifference towards service. Thus, while in former times 
officers of our formation had to compete for appointments to 
higher positions, today such competition simply no longer 
exists, because officers are not aspiring for career 
advancement. For example, quite recently there was only one 
applicant in the entire formation for a vacant gunnery 
department commander's position of a ship just like this one. 
And so, before setting out to sea or on combat patrol, we are 
forced to beef up each other's crews with more-experienced 
submariners. And those who are required to serve on other than 
their own ship do so reluctantly. As a result, all of this leads 
to shortcomings in servicing the equipment, and even to its 
breakdown. 
  In turn, the equipment is also aging. We can fulfill only up 
to 70 percent of the required volume of restoration work through 
our own efforts. When it comes to drydock inspection of the hull 
and systems, plant workers have recently been doing this work in 
the so-called "limited" variant. Consequently, we find the 
condition of the ship's personal conveniences something to be 
concerned about today, even on the eve of setting out to sea. We 
are witnesses to the change that has occurred in the attitude of 
the leadership of our local naval ship repair plant to fleet 
orders. Today it is much more concerned with "hard currency" 
repairs, while submarines, and particularly their dry-docking, 
have been relegated to secondary importance. 
  It is no longer a secret to anyone that the problems that 
have accumulated in maintaining the technical combat readiness 
of ships, especially missile-carrying submarines, are reaching a 
critical point. Certain routine maintenance operations are not 
being carried out at all today on some of our special equipment. 
Such work is within the means and abilities only of special 
production personnel representing the manufacturing 
organizations and enterprises, which had previously been fully 
responsible for the promptness and quality of such work on items 
of equipment, weapons or apparatus of their own manufacture. 
Only these specialists, and not ship personnel, are permitted to 
carry out such work, or all the more so to repair the products 
of these enterprises. Now that economic ties have been broken, 
and especially now that a sizable number of such enterprises 
have found themselves outside Russia, this problem is screaming 
out to be solved. 
  We should add to all of this the "interruptions," to put it 
mildly, in the supply of technical and boatswain's equipment, 
spare parts and accessories, and POL. As for what all of this 
leads to, let me explain using our submarine as an example. When 
we go out on patrol, we do so without the volume of spare parts, 
tools and accessories specified by the norms. The appropriate 
services explain to us that the sets of spare parts and tools 
are unavailable at the storage depots because they are not being 
replenished, even though orders for deliveries are submitted 
regularly. Things are also very poor in regard to the supply of 
special tools. We were just recently able to more or less 
replenish what we needed, though it took a great deal of effort. 
Even so, we had to borrow from neighboring ships, which means we 
left them completely "naked." And special tools aren't the worst 
of it--it's now been 4 months that we haven't received any 
cleaning cloths or industrial-grade alcohol. Scarce grades of 
fuel and lubricants are issued only for combat patrols. We found 
the freon we need for the fire extinguishing system with 
difficulty. I can go on with this list for a long time yet, but 
let me talk just a little bit about food. 
  They won't of course allow us to go to sea hungry. However, 
certain products are regularly substituted today on the basis of 
a hard-to-understand system of calorie content. In addition, in 
the past we used to receive a lot of preprocessed food. It has 
now practically disappeared. Not only does the quality of food 
preparation in the specific conditions of a submarine suffer in 
this case, but also the galley equipment, which is not adapted 
to processing such food products, is overworked, and people have 
to be pulled off their watches for this work as well. One 
problem raises another. The new assortment of food products 
comes in packaging that does not meet the norms of storage and 
use aboard a submarine. The abundance of glass compels us to 
break up all of these jars before dumping them overboard, and I 
need not explain how inconvenient and bad this is under the 
conditions of a submarine. 
  And one final thing. As we talk, the ship is being prepared 
to go to sea, but there are only 20 percent of the authorized 
number of officers aboard, and around 25 seamen and petty 
officers are absent. Rather than doing work aboard ship and 
preparing their materiel, they are dealing with problems in 
various shore-based services. When a ship is at its base, the 
personnel are generally taken away from their planned lessons 
and combat training measures on a continual basis. Sometimes 70 
percent of the crew is taken away from its duties in this way. 
This is associated mostly with the present system under which 
the submariners have to see to crew life support on their own. 
But various all-hands jobs, many off-ship details, and other 
measures are frequent as well. 
  All of this doubtlessly has to have a negative effect on the 
quality of the professional training of all categories of the 
crew. Besides others, there is this criterion that graphically 
characterizes the decline in the level of professionalism: While 
literally just 2 years ago there were almost three dozen masters 
of military affairs aboard ship, and our crew was the 
formation's leader in this, now there are only three or four 
persons. Presence of a large number of top-class specialists 
even allowed us to carry out some renovation and auxiliary work 
aboard the submarine by our own efforts. Now this is no longer 
possible. In addition after we return from sea, another four of 
the best-trained specialists will probably be leaving the crew. 
And what's going to happen when the last master of military 
affairs leaves? Unfortunately, we can't see even the semblance 
of an effort to rectify the situation. Could it be that 
something is being done, but the results haven't made themselves 
known at our level yet? 
  We will be leaving for sea this week, and we will 
doubtlessly 
apply all of our strength in order to complete the missions of 
alert duty. I need not say anything about their importance and 
complexity. I feel that we will be capable of fulfilling our 
patrol successfully. But do I feel some anxiety? Certainly. I 
don't know a single person, and all the more so a commander, who 
has ever set off for a cruise of any length who wasn't troubled 
deep within his soul: Will everything fall into place, and will 
he be able to successfully overcome all difficulties and 
surprises that seamen, and especially submariners, encounter at 
sea? Worries about family left behind on shore also intensify 
such anxiety today. Even with our support, things aren't easy 
for them, and how are they going to deal with the everyday 
problems in our absence? 
  Still, it is our hope that when we return, we will be met by 
changes for the better, slight though they may be. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46481 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Weapons and Equipment </F>
<H3> <TI>   How the Large Antisubmarine Warfare Ship `Vasiliy Chapayev' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    How the Large Antisubmarine Warfare Ship `Vasiliy Chapayev' </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Was   Lost 

<F P=102> 94UM0389F Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 1, 
1994 (Signed to press 28 Dec 93) pp 59-60 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0389F </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Captain 1st Rank B. Tyurin: "How the Large </F>
Antisubmarine Warfare Ship `Vasiliy Chapayev' Was Lost"] 
  [Text] In the brigade of antisubmarine warfare ships which 
Captain 1st Rank I. Bolshedvorskiy commands, ships, that are 
either being prepared to be written off or have already been 
written off and are now subject to being cut up for scrap, 
compose an entire group. You can immediately determine them 
because the radar antennas, artillery, torpedo, and 
antisubmarine warfare weapons on them have been partially or 
completely dismantled and -- although the St. Andrew's Flag is 
fluttering on the flag staffs -- the watch crew is rarely seen 
on the decks, already not talking about other members of the 
crew. Of course, we can't even talk about the brilliance and 
cleanliness that always was inherent to even old surface 
combatants, and especially to the "large" ones that are in the 
line. 
  Today the Design 1134-a "Admiral Oktyabrskiy" and "Vasiliy 
Chapayev" large antisubmarine warfare ships (BPKs) and also 
several Design 1135 escort vessels (specifically, the 
"Gordelivyy" and "Poryvistyy") are among those ships. As they 
told me at the Pacific Fleet technical directorate, by way of 
illustration, the "Vasiliy Chapayev" BPK, due to current 
circumstances, did not serve the prescribed period (18 years 
have not passed since its entry into the line). Today, its fate 
is far from a conclusion and, unfortunately, not only for the 
Pacific Fleet. "Vasiliy Chapayev" BPK Electromechanical 
Department Commander Captain 2nd Rank Oleg Ivanovich Isakov 
shared his pain with me, let's state it quite frankly, for the 
tragedy of his native ship. 
  O. Isakov is a "Chapayev" veteran; he arrived here 
immediately after graduation from the Higher Naval Engineering 
School imeni V.I. Lenin in 1980. He began as commander of the 
machine-stoker division, having served in that position for 
three years. In 1983, he performed the duties of brigade 
assistant flag engineer and the next year he was once again on 
the "Chapayev" in the position of traffic division commander. 
From 1985 until the present time (nearly 10 years!) -- BCh-5 
commander, master of military affairs. He had the opportunity to 
participate in the "Chapayev's" last combat service and to 
"place" it, as it turned out, in its last repair which has also 
not been completed, during the course of which the ship's fate 
was drastically altered... 
  "... If you glance at `Chapayev's' biography and its service 
record, it becomes obvious that this is a ship-laborer. The 
first combat service was immediately after its transfer from 
Leningrad where they built it. Then, in the winter of 1979 
during the military conflict between China and Vietnam, the BPK 
ensured our state interests in that area. In 1982-1983, combat 
service in the Indian Ocean, in 1985-86 -- in the South China 
Sea with the accomplishment of inter-cruise repairs at the 
Soviet Naval Base on the territory of Vietnam -- at Cam Ranh 
Bay." 
  What happened to the ship, equivalents of which serve a 
somewhat longer period abroad? Who could have assumed that a 
turning point in the ship's fate would occur in May 1987 when 
the BPK, under its own power, entered the water area of 
Vladivostok Naval SRZ [ship repair plant] No 178 and was moored 
there to accomplish medium repairs and that the "Chapayev" had 
arrived at the location of its "death"? No, at that time the 
crew began to repair the ship with confidence in the ship's 
future. 
  "...The first ring of the impending `crash' was heard on the 
ship already at that time when, in accordance with the protocol 
of the approval of the volume of work and other documents that 
regulated its repair and which were approved in that same year 
-- the beginning of work was determined to be February 1988, 
that is, nearly a year after its arrival at the plant! But they 
considered this to be the result of temporary financial 
difficulties and our bureaucratic red tape. Both this and 
subsequent years were devoted to dismantling some of the 
equipment that was designated for replacement or for its 
restoration for defects, after which the plant finally began the 
unhurried repair of the ship practically only since 1990, having 
begun hull work on the BPK itself and repair of mechanisms 
removed from it in the shops. The situation was complicated by 
the fact that, according to ship operating standards, all of 
that should have already occurred in 1987; that is, 11 years 
after construction but was begun 14 years later. But this was 
nothing new for the navy!" 
  The "alarm bell" sounded with all its might when it became 
clear that the plant would be able to begin the partial assembly 
of repaired equipment only at the beginning of 1992. Moreover, 
all of that affected first of all that equipment that ensures 
the ship's survivability -- even its anchoring at the plant was 
not safe without that. You can imagine the state of the 
"Chapayev's" crew which, from the time of the survey of defects 
and the disassembly of the mechanisms at the end of 1989 and 
docking (at that time, they had removed the shafts and screws, 
approximately 40% of the organic bottom-side fittings 
from the 
BPK, having temporarily capped the openings that had been formed 
in the hull) had awaited the beginning of the reassembly of the 
repaired fixture for three whole years! Nevertheless, this 
"process sort of proceeded". Since the beginning of the year, 
they managed to accomplish the assembly of two diesel 
generators, two electrical fire-fighting pumps, 40% of the 
electric fans of the ship electrical fire-fighting system, the 
steam-ejection refrigeration units, one evaporation 
installation, an electric windlass, (ship's personnel themselves 
repaired its electromechanical portion), galley cooking stoves, 
boilers and some other work. Although all of this could hardly 
have provided what was necessary for life support and everyday 
activities of ship personnel but, as they say, it was as if 
"light had appeared at the end of the tunnel". They already 
practically did not recall that the "Vasiliy Chapayev" BPK's 
initial planned repair period was designated in 1988 with 
completion of the work in 1991. Everyone understood: The 
problems of supplying ZIP [spare parts kits] and deliveries of 
other materials had been exacerbated as a result of perestroyka 
in the country and in the Navy: They saw that there was a 
continuous drain of cadres at the plant and that there weren't 
enough workers. And yet the hope had emerged among the crew that 
they would repair the ship... 
  The primary misfortune arrived in the summer of 1992. In 
that 
year which it is customary to consider as the beginning of the 
new era in Russia's history, it turned out that there wasn't an 
approved budget in our country for the first time(!)! At that 
time, the Navy's command authorities issued a directive on 
"cessation of repair and writing off ships in December 1993". In 
accordance with it, they removed "V. Chapayev" from the plant in 
September and put it on the ship brigade's own wharf (33rd 
slip), and without restoring the heating system and with a total 
of 50% of the fire protection system on line. The 
mechanisms 
and electrical equipment that had been submitted for repair 
practically all remained there..." 
  However, while objectively examining what had happened with 
the "Vasiliy Chapayev", we must admit that the conditions for 
such a finale had already developed not in 1992 but 
significantly earlier. They had arisen already at the time when 
they had been compelled to place the BPK for repair at that ship 
repair plant which, in contrast to the other -- Vladivostok's 
"Dalzavod" Ship Repair Enterprise, was not prepared to repair 
these ships. Indeed, while striving to find a solution from its 
"dead end situation", the Pacific Fleet's Technical Directorate 
and SRZ No 178 reached an agreement with "Dalzavod" on the 
involvement of its specialists in the repair work on the ship's 
boilers, its main turbogear assemblies, and on an entire series 
of other systems and mechanisms associated with the power plant. 
However, in the future, as a result of the establishment of new 
financial relations, previous contractual obligations ceased to 
have force. This was the next major cause of the nonfulfillment 
of the appropriate volume of work. And the dramatic restriction 
of financing of the Navy in 1992 placed a period to the fate of 
this (yes and others) ships of that same Pacific Fleet in a 
similar situation. And another series of causes of "premature 
death" during recent years have graphically illuminated the 
Pacific Fleet's extremely unsatisfactory technical support -- 
the low level of training (first of all, special and repair) of 
all types of ship personnel (especially in recent years), 
beginning with compulsory service personnel and ending with 
officers and warrant officers. 
  What awaits "Vasiliy Chapayev" in the foreseeable future? 
The 
crew has been officially told that "the manning levels on the 
ship are being closed on 31 December 1993". After that, they 
will tow the ship to a dock to conduct work on conversion, that 
is, welding side openings and accomplishment of other measures 
to ensure that it is kept afloat. Part of the crew will be on 
the BPK until the work is completed. However, the completion of 
this work and its time period will depend on the availability of 
financial resources and the ship will be at the wharf for the 
time being. But on it today are only 10% of the actual 
personnel strength. There are a total of eight personnel in the 
104-man (according to approved strength) electromechanical 
compartment! The usual undermanning for the repair period has 
exceeded all limits with the "Chapayev's" departure from the 
plant. After obtaining the directive on writing off this ship, 
the "Chapayev's" crew did not receive a single junior seaman! A 
new question: How do you ensure safety while anchored if it is 
not extended? 
  But, it was as if everything was clear about the ship's fate 
-- the decision had been made. And what are the officers' 
prospects for future service? Some of them (first and foremost, 
junior officers and, of course, those officers who agree to 
continue to serve under these conditions and with this type of 
experience) will be assigned to other ships and military 
subunits. For others, service in the navy will sooner end... 
  Almost everything said about the "Vasiliy Chapayev" is close 
to the fate of the other ship of this design, the "Admiral 
Oktyabrskiy" and its crew. In conclusion, I need to say a few 
words about the escort ships "Gordelivyy" and "Poryvistyy". At 
the present time, they also are "ships of sediment". Indeed, one 
third of the authorized crew strength that is currently on them 
does not know its future prospects. What will the near future 
yield for their ships: Will they be repaired or will they also 
be written off?... 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46482 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Weapons and Equipment </F>
<H3> <TI>   Design History of First Cruiser Helicopter Carrier Told </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Design History of First Cruiser Helicopter Carrier Told </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0391G Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 2, 1994 
(Signed to press 8 Feb 94) pp 70-75 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0391G </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Arkadiy Borisovich Morin: "Project 1123 Cruiser </F>
Helicopter Carriers"] 
  [Text] The prototype of a fundamentally new 
class--the cruiser helicopter carrier, the principal armament of 
which consisted of ASW helicopters, the latest missile systems 
and electronic equipment, entered the composition of our navy in 
1976. Having relatively low displacement, it had no equals in 
foreign fleets of those times in terms of the effectiveness of 
searching for and fighting submarines. 
  Following publication of the article "Cruiser Carriers" 
(see MORSKOY SBORNIK, No 7, 1991) by Captain 1st Rank V. Kuzin, 
which contains brief information on these cruiser helicopter 
carriers, the editor's office received many letters requesting 
more details on them. Therefore, we offer the reader the 
recollections of a participant of its planning, Arkadiy 
Borisovich Morin, who at that time was the chief of the planning 
division of the TsKB-17 [Central Design Office No 17]--the 
principal executor of efforts to create our first cruiser 
helicopter carriers (presently the Nevskoye Planning and Design 
Office). 
  The scientific and technical revolution that began soon 
after 
World War II had a great influence on development of naval 
equipment. It universally brought on fundamental changes in 
views on the role of naval fleets in the new conditions. The 
United States of America, which was the undisputed leader among 
sea powers at that time (and even now), was the first to 
reexamine the priorities of its navy's missions. It was then 
that use of the world ocean as a "launch pad" for ballistic 
missiles carrying nuclear warheads, launched from 
nuclear-powered submarines (SSBNs) and targeted chiefly on the 
most important objectives in the USSR as its main enemy, assumed 
first priority. 
  At approximately the same time, the Soviet Union decided to 
create a nuclear missile ocean-going navy capable of carrying 
out the entire complex of missions at sea to defend the 
interests of the state and counter possible aggression against 
it from the seas and oceans. One of the necessary components of 
a balanced navy was recognized to be presence of effective 
antisubmarine warfare (ASW) forces within its composition, 
including nuclear-powered and diesel torpedo submarines, 
shore-based and ship-borne ASW aviation, and surface ships of 
various classes equipped with submarine search and destroy 
resources. 
  Creation of surface ASW forces began with modernization and 
improvement of the armament of destroyers and patrol escorts in 
the navy at that time, and refitting of some first-generation 
missile ships into ASW ships. Then began planning and 
construction of specialized ASW ships. However, the advent of 
American SSBNs carrying Polaris-A1 missiles (with a range of up 
to 2,200 km) raised the issue creating ASW ships for our navy 
that could operate in the outer ASW zone and would satisfy high 
requirements on armament, navigability, range and endurance. 
  In its search for an optimum direction of solving this 
problem (optimum according to the criteria of combat and 
economic effectiveness), the TsNIIVK [Central Scientific 
Research Institute of Military Shipbuilding] (presently the 
Central Scientific Research Institute No 1 of the RF Ministry of 
Defense) conducted comprehensive research jointly with other 
naval and air force institutes as well as the TsNII-45 [Central 
Scientific Research Institute No 45] and the TsKB-17 of the USSR 
State Committee for Ship Building (GKS), later transformed into 
the Ministry of Ship Building Industry. Their results 
persuasively demonstrated that successful combat with 
nuclear-powered submarines, chiefly SSBNs, required wider use of 
ship-based aviation. A continuous search for submarines over 
vast and remote regions over the course of several days and 
integrated operations against detected submarines jointly with 
other naval forces had to be provided for. 
  Basing itself on the results of this research, the TsKB-17 
wrote up, and submitted in 1958, technical proposals on 
designing two classes of helicopter carriers--small (based on a 
special design) and large (based on mothballed hulls of 
unfinished project 68-bis artillery cruisers awaiting 
"resolution of their fate"). Defense Minister R. Malinovskiy 
gave his support to both variants, and they received approval in 
the government. 
  The project requirements, which were approved by naval 
commander-in-chief S. Gorshkov on 31 January 1959, defined the 
purpose of such a ship: "Seeking and destroying the enemy's 
SSBNs and multipurpose submarines in the outer ASW zones within 
the composition of a ship hunter-killer group and in 
coordination with other naval ships and ASW airplanes." The 
objective was to "provide for continuous 24-hour searching for 
submarines by not less than two helicopters during the ship's 
entire cruising time." On the basis of the project requirements 
and with regard for results of rough plans drawn up on their 
basis, with the participation of a number of naval and air force 
institutes, the TsNIIVK prepared the draft preliminary 
specifications for the design of a ship with minimum 
displacement carrying eight helicopters. (This corresponded to 
views of higher organizations upon which creation of the new 
ships depended). 
  Concurrently, the TsKB-17 established the need for designing 
a ship of greater effectiveness and ability to resist the enemy. 
Considering the real limits placed on use of helicopters in 
strong winds, the office proposed reinforcing the ship's 
submarine detection and strike resources by including in the 
preliminary specifications a long-range sonar system, an 
antisubmarine missile system, torpedoes and mortars, and air 
defense resources. Supporting the TsKB-17 the TsNII-45 raised 
the question as to the suitability of increasing the number of 
helicopters aboard. The navy and the GKS also insisted on basing 
10-14 helicopters aboard the ship. 
  After the initial studies were carried out to determine the 
principal ship building elements more specifically, and after 
the specifications were coordinated with the GKS, on 25 January 
1960 the naval commander-in-chief approved the preliminary 
specifications for the design of the ship, which was code-named 
project 1123. However, when he forwarded the assignment to the 
TsNIIVK, G. Kozmin, chief of the navy's Main Ship Building 
Directorate, emphasized: "Considering that attention is being 
turned at many levels of government to the standard displacement 
of a ship, the work of the TsKB-17 and supervision by the navy 
should be oriented on arriving at a more sensible solution to 
all design problems and implementing all measures to reduce the 
displacement (7,000-8,000 tonnes) indicated in the preliminary 
specifications." For the same purposes, the GKS received 
conceptual designs submitted on a competitive basis by both the 
TsKB-17 and the TsKB-53. 
  A. Savichev (1904-1983), who formerly led the designing of 
project 68K and 68-bis artillery cruisers, was appointed chief 
designer of the ship at the TsKB-17. V. Fedin became the chief 
observer from the TsNIIVK. A. Fisher, who was the chief designer 
of the project 30-bis and 56 destroyers, was put in charge of 
the conceptual design at the TsKB-53. 
  The project was carried out at the TsKB-17 in close 
cooperation with the OKB-938 [Special Design Office No 938] of 
the State Committee for Aviation Equipment (GKAT), headed by N. 
Kamov (who designed the Ka-25 helicopter), and specialists of 
the air force's Scientific Research Institute No 15 supervised 
development of the ship resources of the ASW helicopter system. 
The office submitted eight variants of the ship offering 
different propulsion units and different armament packages, to 
include in a catamaran scheme. During the search for new 
technical concepts, and particularly to reduce displacement, a 
variant with an aluminum-magnesium alloy hull was additionally 
developed on the initiative of the chief hull designer A. 
Marinich (1909-1989), but it did not enjoy any support. 
  Studies showed that the prescribed displacement could be 
obtained with a steel-hulled ship by equipping it only with a 
gas turbine propulsion unit. However, this variant was rejected, 
as was the plan developed by the TsKB-53. The final decision was 
to continue the planning on the basis of a variant calling for a 
boiler and turbine propulsion unit, similar to the main 
propulsion unit of the "Groznyy" class guided missile cruiser 
(project 58), which made it possible to increase displacement to 
8,500 tons. 
  The main elements of the preliminary specifications were 
approved by a government decree almost at the end of work on the 
conceptual design, on 29 September 1960, while the conceptual 
design itself was completed on 1 December of the same year. Of 
course, the office was instructed to carry out additional 
studies to improve the helicopter technical maintenance 
conditions, to foresee the possibility for basing progressive 
[perspektivnyye] helicopter models on the ship at sea states of 
up to 6 points inclusively, reduction of the crew to 300-350 (by 
extensively introducing automation), reduction of displacement 
by combining personal-service systems and other devices, 
accommodation of personnel according to submarine, escort vessel 
and destroyer norms, and exclusion of redundancy in technical 
resources, posts and so on. As a result, another 16 variants of 
the project appeared, and out of all of them, what was referred 
to as variant 23 with a displacement of 9,300 tons was approved 
on March 1961 as the basis for the detail design, though with a 
general orientation on reducing its displacement. 
  It should be noted that the work of designing the ship's 
principal armament--the ASW helicopter system--encountered 
serious difficulties due to the absence of approved 
"requirements on grouped basing of helicopters aboard ships" at 
that time. The TsNIIVK began developing such requirements only 
concurrently with work on the cruiser's plan. However, 
immediately after approval of the conceptual design, the air 
force institute suddenly reported that "its new manning 
structure did not foresee the function of supervising the 
planning of ships with helicopter armament in industrial central 
design offices, for which reason the group of observers is being 
disbanded, and beginning in 1961 observers will not be appointed 
to ship projects." Numerous appeals by the navy and the GKS to 
the air force command regarding the need for reinstating 
supervision produced no results. In addition, the air force and 
the GKAT were late in providing the basic data on progressive 
ASW helicopters, mentioned in the government's decision, as a 
result of which development of the ship's detail design was 
based on data from the OKB-938. But when the detail design was 
nearing its completion, the air force reported that "the Ka-25 
helicopter adopted by them cannot be said to be sufficiently 
progressive in terms of its performance characteristics and the 
composition of its equipment and armament." It became necessary 
to convene an expert commission. 
  The detail design that was submitted for examination was for 
a ship of standard displacement of 9,000 tons and a speed of 29 
knots. The number of ship personnel was determined at 370. In 
its conclusion on the project the TsNIIVK proposed increasing 
the crew by 31. The naval commander-in-chief ordered the Main 
Staff to examine this question. With regard for the requirement 
of maintaining a three-shift underway watch at the main battle 
stations during a length sea cruise, the latter substantiated 
the need for a manning level of 497 persons. During joint 
examination of the justifications the TsKB-17, the TsNIIVK and 
the naval Main Staff compromised on a crew of 415. 
  Detail design 1123 was approved on 25 January 1962. A number 
of amendments and supplements were of course once again 
introduced into it, to include: the possibility for landing 14 
progressive Ka-25 and Mi-8 ASW helicopters on the ship, 
increasing crew size, changing the composition of radio 
communication resources, and raising the ship's navigability at 
a sea state of 6-7 points-- which made it possible to increase 
its standard displacement to 10,600 tonnes, with the 
corresponding decrease in speed and cruising range. The TsKB-17 
was instructed to make the corrections to the project by May, 
and to transfer the first set of working drawings on the hull to 
the plant, so that the prototype could be laid down in that same 
year, 1962. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-023-25A>      Diagram of the General Arrangement of Weapons and Armament Aboard the Cruiser Helicopter Carrier </FIG>


  Correction of the detail design revealed that in order to 
accommodate the progressive helicopters aboard the ship, the 
hangar volume would have to be increased by 81 percent, a second 
hangar for two helicopters would have to be set up on the top 
deck, and the area of the flight deck would have to increased by 
77 percent. This evoked major changes in the main dimensions and 
in the theoretical outline of the hull. As a result, the ship's 
standard displacement grew to 10,750 tonnes, while speed dropped 
to 28.5 knots. 
  Designing of the ship was seriously complicated, besides by 
several changes in the initial data on the helicopters, by 
presence of considerable quantities of experimental and 
prototype armament still in the design stage. Consequently, the 
office's designers had to work with the technical data and even 
the conceptual designs of these models. 
  One other thing should be noted. Construction of a ship of a 
fundamentally new class, which required a complex cooperative 
effort in delivering armament, equipment and materials, was 
complicated by reorganization of the country's industrial 
management system on a territorial principle beginning in 1957. 
As a result, the TsKB-17 had to draft the government decree "On 
Approving the Basic Elements and Providing for Construction of 
the Prototype of an Outer-Zone ASW Ship." It foresaw 
participation of around 200 enterprises and organizations of 
five sector state committees, two RSFSR ministries, the 
All-Russian Council of the National Economy, and republic and 
territories councils of the national economy in designing the 
cruiser helicopter carrier. This also necessitated additional 
work and coordination of the supply plan with the executors and 
higher organizations. 
  In the course of planning the ship, the office and its 
contractors successfully solved a number of new troubling 
problems in practically all specialties with the participation 
of naval and air force specialists for the first time in Soviet 
ship building experience. Special attention was naturally 
devoted in this case to resources of the ASW helicopter system. 
Items developed as part of these resources included: a 
helicopter transport system that was semiautomated (providing 
for longitudinal and transverse towing in the hangar) and 
mechanized (using tractors on the flight deck); helicopter 
elevators making the most economical use of hangar space 
possible; fuel, oil, nitrogen and hydraulic systems, and 
helicopter electric power supply. 
  The flight deck (with the main hangar beneath it) was 
foreseen in the aft part of the cruiser helicopter carrier as 
being the best protected from wave action in the presence of 
strong winds. 
  That left the fore part to accommodate the ship armament 
systems. Because of this the ship acquired such an unusual 
architecture that it was jokingly named a "half a steamship." 
Another characteristic feature of the cruiser helicopter carrier 
was presence of a high-power, long-range sonar system (employed 
for the first time on surface ships not only in our country but 
even abroad!). Owing to its considerable dimensions, its 
acoustic system was installed inside a retractable faring 
beneath the keel (with dimensions of 21x6.5x9 m), which had a 
raising and lowering device of unique design. An entire series 
of special measures had to be developed and implemented aboard 
the ship in order to reduce acoustic interference during 
operation of the sonar system and in order to support its 
prescribed range. 
  There were many other unique design features as well. Thus, 
much attention was devoted during planning of the hull to making 
it resistant to hits by enemy missiles and torpedoes, and the 
top deck above the hangar (with an area of around 2,000 
m[.sup]2[/]) was built with a unique design requiring a 
minimum number of supports. The following were located aboard a 
ship for the first time: an automated system for controlling 
water systems; electric systems for automatic or remote control 
of impulse valves, ventilation covers, fuel receiving and 
transfer fittings, and water protection; a fast-acting 
firefighting equipment activating system. A new anchoring device 
making it possible to weigh anchor without requiring personnel 
on the top deck was developed during the planning. Basing of the 
helicopters required development of special devices: fire 
curtains in the lower hangar, doors to the upper hangar, and an 
automated collapsible railing on the flight deck. Controllable 
fin stabilizers were used as roll stabilizing devices, as being 
the most reliable and effective in comparison with active and 
passive stabilizing tanks. 
  The project 58 guided missile cruiser adopted as the basis 
for the main propulsion unit was modified and improved. The 
productivity of the main boilers was raised in connection with 
the increase in steam consumption. Auxiliary boilers and 
automated desalinization and evaporating units were designed 
anew. The ship's electric power supply system foresaw the full 
volume of automation of both power plants. New models of 
electrical equipment were developed on instructions from the 
office: automated turbogenerators and diesel generators, 
synchronous generators with an amplitude-phase compounding 
system, automatic starting switches, and so on. In the course of 
planning the electric power system, with the participation of 
the Naval Academy, the office solved a number of complex 
technical problems in order to provide for: 

  -  reliable, lengthy parallel operation of generator units 
equipped with different kinds of primary engines and with speed 
governors having different dynamic characteristics; 
  -  the needed 
quantity of electric power in the presence of major consumers 
which additionally imposed sharply pronounced pulsed and cyclic 
load requirements; 
  -  the necessary dynamic and statistical 
stability of generators. 


    At the same time, the fight to reduce displacement was very 
much complicated by the need for creating good living conditions 
for the personnel. Considering the ship unsinkability 
requirements and protection against mass destruction weapons, 
portholes had to be rejected in the main hull. Nonetheless, the 
design foresaw one-and two-man cabins with an area of 5-6 
m[.sup]2[/] for officers, four- and six-man cabins with an 
area of 6-12 m[.sup]2[/] for warrant officers and chief petty 
officers with the beds arranged in two tiers, and, for the crew, 
mess decks with a space norm of 2.1-1.2 m[.sup]2[/] per 
person and with beds arranged in two tiers. A ventilation and 
air conditioning system and soundproof partitions were 
installed, soundproofing and noise suppressing devices were 
employed, a maximum amount of plastic furniture was introduced, 
and thought was given to the architectural and interior design 
and color scheme of living and public spaces. A ward-room was 
foreseen for officers and chief petty officers, and two messes 
with a centralized dishwashing facility were foreseen for the 
crew. 
  [Sentence incomplete in original]...after the TsKB-17 sent 
the planning documents and orders to the manufacturing plant in 
June 1972 together with the initial working drawings for the 
hull. In July the corrected detail design was approved, but as 
it turned out, the drama surrounding the designing of the ship 
did not end with this. During N. Khrushchev's visit to the 
Northern Fleet (in summer 1962) the navy and the GKS were 
instructed to "significantly increase the endurance of warships 
and widen their sailing region." After this, the main developer 
of surface-to-air missile systems submitted a proposal to the 
naval command and to the leadership of the corresponding sector 
state committees to increase the ammunition reserve aboard ships 
by reexamining the design of the surface-to-air missile storage 
and delivery system, as a result of which instructions were 
given to carry out the corresponding studies, to be followed by 
instructions to study installation of a radar station aboard the 
ship that was more powerful than the present one. These and 
other instructions necessitated development of 26 variants of 
particular changes for examination. And later on, during 
publication of the working design documents, consideration had 
to be given to new decisions and orders of the navy and the GKS 
(Ministry of Ship Building Industry), changes in standards and 
the minutes of technical meetings. 
  When it published the design documents, the TsKB-17 devoted 
great attention to checking the ship's weight distribution. On 
instructions from B. Chilikin, the chief of the TsKB-17 and its 
chief designer (1905-1967), each week the planning division 
submitted a summary of the current loading conditions (with 
regard for published drawings) and the position of the ship's 
center of gravity for his approval. He also made the final 
decisions when approved weight limits and their moments (on 
three coordinates) were exceeded. 
  In late 1965 the TsKB-17 carried out test calculations of 
the 
ship's stability and its ability to remain afloat when damaged, 
and tested dangerous cases of flooding with a scale model (1:50) 
in a physical modeling laboratory created in the office. The 
results turned out to be somewhat worse that the calculations 
carried out when correcting the plans. In order to meet the 
unsinkability specifications, recommendations were drawn up to 
increase the quantity of liquid ballast used in tanks after they 
were emptied. These recommendations were approved by the navy 
and the GKS by their decision in August 1966. 
  A decree of the CPSU Central Committee and USSR Council of 
Ministers foresaw construction of two ships on the basis of 
project 1123. Captain 1st Rank A. Khokhlov was appointed chief 
observer from the navy, and N. Prudnikov was appointed the chief 
builder of the prototype, which was christened the "Moskva". 
This cruiser was laid down on 15 December 1962 in Nikolayev at a 
large building dock of Plant No 444 (presently the Chernomorskiy 
Sudostroitelnyy Zavod Production Association) under rather 
mundane circumstances. After the two bottom sections of the hull 
were installed and a field joint was welded between them, plant 
director A. Gankevich and naval GUK [shipbuilding main 
administration] representative N. Grushin signed the ship's 
lay-down certificate on a table covered with red fabric standing 
beside the hull. In this case, only a few dozen plant workers 
and seamen and a small group of specialists who had to come to 
Leningrad from the TsKB-17 under the leadership of the project's 
chief designer, A. Savichev, were in attendance. But when the 
ship was lowered into the water on 14 January 1965, it was under 
festive circumstances, in the presence of several thousand 
people, and it was a major event at the plant. 
  The initial general timetable called for completion of 
construction of the prototype in 2.5 years; however, changes in 
the plans that had been approved in 1962 in the course of 
construction itself, a number of alterations, and late 
deliveries of the main armament and equipment increased the 
volume and laboriousness of the work. Consequently, the mooring 
trials of the "Moskva" went on from November 1966 to May 1967, 
plant sea trials were held in May-August, and state trials were 
conducted in August-December 1967. The state trials were 
conducted by a government commission under the leadership of 
Rear Admiral B. Lamm. His deputy was the new chief designer of 
the project, A. Marinich, who replaced the retiring Savichev in 
March 1967. After the state trials were completed Captain 1st 
Rank F. Starozhilov was appointed ship commander. (He replaced 
the first commander of the cruiser helicopter carrier "Moskva" 
G. Kopylov, who commanded the crew from February 1965). V. 
Konovalenko was appointed the manufacturing plant's chief 
inspector during the sea and state trials; (they were conducted 
in the Black Sea). 
  During the state trials around 100 Ka-25 helicopter sorties 
were flown day and night, in good and adverse weather, with the 
ship both at rest and under power, and with different 
specifications of heeling, trim and speed of the resultant air 
flow above the flight deck. The results confirmed that the 
shipboard resources of the ASW helicopter system met the 
requirements completely. 
  By the beginning of this stage of the trials 19 new models 
of 
weapons and equipment not yet adopted by the navy had been 
installed aboard the ship. They were checked out and accepted 
simultaneously with the ship, which significantly complicated 
the organization and conduct of the trials. After their 
completion, on 25 December 1967, a government commission 
accepted the ship into the navy. It was noted in the acceptance 
certificate that the latest models of armament and equipment 
installed aboard the cruiser helicopter carrier would keep its 
specifications and performance characteristics at a modern level 
for a long time to come (see Table). 


Basic Specifications and Performance Characteristics of the Project 1123 
Cruiser Helicopter Carrier and of Cruiser Helicopter Carriers of Foreign 
Navies 

Ship                "Moskva"       "Jeanne        "Andrea        "Vittorio 
                                   d'Arc"         Doria"         Veneto" 
                                   (France)       (Italy)        (Italy) 

Year commissioned   1967           1964           1964           1969 


I. ARMAMENT: 

Aviation:           14 Ka-25       8 Lynx,        4 AV-212       9 AV-212 
                                   Super Frelon 


number of landing   4              2              1              2 
pads 

number of           2              1              -              1 
elevators 

ASW: 

missile             1x2 Vikhr      -              -              1x2 Asroc 
                    ASM launcher                                 launchers 
                                                                 (combined 
                                                                 with SAM 
                                                                 launchers) 

torpedo             2x5 5330mm     -              2x3 324-mm     2x3 324-mm 
                    torpedo                       torpedo        torpedo 
                    launcher                      launcher       launcher 

mortar              2 RBU-6000     -              -              - 

Surface-to-air 

missile             2x2 Shtorm     -              1x2 Standard   1x2 Terrier 
                    guided SAM                    launcher       SAM launcher 
                    launcher 

artillery           2x2 57-mm      4x1 100-mm     8x1 76-mm      8x1 76-mm 
                    artillery      artillery      artillery      artillery 
                    mount          mount          mount          mount 

II. BASIC SPECIFICATIONS AND PERFORMANCE CHARACTERISTICS 

Standard            11,300         10,000         5,000          7,500 
displacement 

Full speed, knots   29             26.5           31             32 


Radius, nautical    6,000 (18)     6,000 (15)     5,000 (17      5,000 (17) 
miles (knots) 

Complement          541            Around 650     470            550 


  After preparations for and conduct of joint trials of the 
ship and helicopters (with their group flights), on 19 September 
1968 the cruiser helicopter carrier "Moskva" set off on its 
first long cruise in the Mediterranean Sea. In 1.5 months and in 
a complex situation of constant contact with ships and aviation 
of the USA and NATO, and a sea state of up to 6 points, the 
cruiser traveled around 11,000 nautical miles. Its helicopters 
flew around 400 sorties during the time of the cruise, surveying 
up to 10,000 square miles per day with good results in searching 
for, detecting and lengthy shadowing of submarines. This complex 
cruise confirmed the high reliability of the armament and 
equipment of the cruiser helicopter carrier. Creation of the 
cruiser and the Ka-25 helicopter was marked by state prizes. 
  In fall 1969 the second ship of this class--the 
"Leningrad"--joined the navy. In 1974, after the end of the 
Arab-Israeli War, it helped to clear mines from the Suez Canal 
(together with Pacific Fleet minesweepers) at the request of the 
Egyptian government. Because our country did not possess any 
minesweeping helicopters at that time, eight Ka-25 ASW 
helicopters had to be refitted quickly for this operation. The 
minesweepers cleared moored mines from the channel, while 
helicopters removed ground mines, as well as moored mines in 
places where ships could not operate because of reefs and 
shallow water. The helicopters also worked reliably and without 
incident in these unusual operating conditions, and their crews 
demonstrated a high class of piloting. In three months the canal 
once again became navigable. For this operation, the crews of 
the Soviet ships and helicopters earned the gratefulness of the 
Egyptian government and the USSR minister of defense. 
  In the mid-1980's the "Leningrad" visited the city in honor 
of which it was named. It stood on the Neva, not far from the 
building occupied by the design office that gave it life, where 
the collective of designers was already working on the design of 
new, larger aircraft carrying ships. 
  Both cruiser helicopter carriers sailed many long cruises 
and 
combat patrols. In 1990 the "Leningrad" was retired from the 
navy, while the "Moskva" is still one of the active ships of the 
Black Sea Fleet. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy Sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46483 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   In Foreign Navies </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Navies' Surface Combatants' Torpedo Defense Systems </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign Navies' Surface Combatants' Torpedo Defense Systems </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
and   Equipment 

<F P=102> 94UM0389G Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 
1, 1994 (Signed to press 28 Dec 93) pp 68-74 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0389G </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Captain 1st Rank V. Sukhanov and Reserve Captain </F>
2nd Rank V. Smirnov: "Foreign Navies' Surface Combatants' 
Torpedo Defense Systems and Equipment"] 
  [Text] The development of torpedo defense systems and 
equipment for surface combatants and auxiliary ships continues 
to remain one of the most dynamic directions of R&amp;D [research 
and development] and the primary orientation of purchases in the 
navies of foreign countries. This is explained by the fact that 
the command authorities of their navies view modern and future 
heavy torpedo submarines, especially "Soviet, that are following 
in the wake of the 65 class", as a serious threat to surface 
combatants and ships at sea. It is thought that they can be 
utilized in joint strikes with antiship missiles at distances 
that are beyond the maximum assured detection ranges of 
submarines that employ these torpedoes. At the same time, we 
note that a ship, due to its specific design features, is most 
vulnerable to underwater explosions, especially of torpedo 
warheads and, in the event of damage by torpedoes, has less 
chance for survival than when damaged by a missile. Therefore, 
according to foreign experts, along with other defense measures, 
we must equip the primary classes of surface combatants with a 
single multi-echelon torpedo defense system similar to the PVO 
[air defense] system, which must not only detect attacking 
torpedoes, suppress and deceive their guidance systems in a 
reliable and timely manner, but also destroy these torpedoes. 
  It is being asserted that there are no such torpedo defense 
systems on foreign surface combatants at the present time and 
defense from torpedoes is being carried out utilizing only towed 
and fired sonar countermeasures systems. And that is already 
inadequate to effectively combat modern and, all the more so, 
future torpedoes. Abroad, these circumstances have provided a 
priority for a number of efforts on the development of 
comprehensive torpedo defense systems, including, besides sonar 
countermeasures systems, attacking torpedo destruction systems 
which, in turn, have received the greatest development in the 
navies of the United States, Great Britain, and France. 
  At the present time, various types of nationally-produced 
towed torpedo decoys form the foundation of these countries' 
torpedo defense systems. In the process, sonar countermeasures 
systems are being combined into the comprehensive SSAWS 
"acoustic combat" systems (SSAWS -- Surface Ship Acoustic 
Warfare System) on U.S. Navy surface combatants and ships. The 
Nixie type towed portion of the decoys, thanks to its small 
size, as a rule is located in an below decks space along the 
right side. Two towed bodies are deployed at the same time -- 
each through its own port hole and with its own winch. On 
British ships, towed bodies of decoys that have adequately large 
dimensions (see the table), along with winches, are located in 
the stern on the upper deck. Other countries, for example 
Germany and Japan, utilize various modifications of American 
Nixie type decoys. However, I must note the development of 
national sonar countermeasures equipment on behalf of surface 
combatant torpedo defense systems in the Israeli Navy where 
today the ATC-1 small electronic-acoustic torpedo decoy has been 
developed at the level of modern Western standards. 
  At the beginning of the 1980's, work was begun, practically 
simultaneously, in the United States, Great Britain and France, 
on the modernization of existing and the development of 
fundamentally new surface combatant and ship torpedo defense 
systems based upon the SSTD (United States), Talisman (Great 
Britain), and Spartacus (France) programs. In the process, the 
American SSTD (SSTD -- Surface Ship Torpedo Defense) Program 
consists of three independent stages. 
  The 1st and 2nd stages form a purely American national 
program that is being carried out under the management of the 
U.S. Navy's Sea Systems Command (NAVSEA). During the course of 
accomplishing the program, in the first stage, work was 
completed to improve existing torpedo defense systems and, in 
the 2nd stage, new generation torpedo defense systems were 
developed utilizing modern technical solutions. 
  In contrast to the 1st and 2nd stages, during the course of 
which systems which protect surface combatants and ships from 
modern torpedoes were developed within the framework of existing 
torpedo defense systems, during the course of the 3rd stage, 
they propose developing a fundamentally new multi-echelon system 
for their defense from future torpedoes with various types of 
guidance systems and target attack methods. While considering 
the system's high complexity and cost of R&amp;D on the 
development 
of this torpedo defense system, in 1998 the U.S. and British 
governments decided to combine the scientific-technical and 
financial efforts of the two countries for the successful 
completion of work by the end of the 1990's. 
  An improved variant of the AN/SLQ-25 -- the AN/SLQ-25A decoy 
was developed during the 1st stage of this program. According to 
American experts, this is essentially a new development that 
significantly exceeds its predecessor in specifications and 
capabilities. Series production of the AN/SLQ-25A decoys had 
already begun in 1988 and deliveries of it to the navy were 
planned from April 1991. The overall need for them until the 
year 2000 was assessed at 240 systems (at a rate of manufacture 
of two systems per month). 
  In accordance with the 2nd stage of the SSTD Program, the 
following surface combatant torpedo defense subsystems have been 
developed or are at the concluding stage of full-scale 
development: an anti-torpedo; the AN/SLR-24 torpedo passive 
detection and classification system; the AN/SLQ-36 towed 
combined countermeasures system and improved fired sonar 
countermeasures systems to suppress EX-10 torpedo guidance 
systems and also a countermeasures control system (CDC). 
  The anti-torpedo was developed based on the Mk 46 small 
antisubmarine torpedo. A total of approximately 70 practical 
launches of the anti-torpedo have been conducted during 
full-scale tests against a 65 cm torpedo simulator. Based upon 
tests results, they planned to reequip 172 Mk 46 torpedoes into 
anti-torpedoes in the 1993 fiscal year. Later, they propose to 
reequip more improved torpedoes -- the Mk 50 Barracuda -- 
because, according to American experts, anti-torpedoes must 
become the primary torpedo defense systems of aircraft carriers 
in the near future. 
  An experimental model of the AN/SLR-24 passive torpedo 
detection subsystem has already been tested on the aircraft 
carrier John F. Kennedy and demonstrated its capability to 
successfully recognize the noises of a simulator of an attacking 
antiship torpedo in the background of the aircraft carrier's own 
noise. In 1992, they anticipated the delivery to the navy of two 
experimental models of this subsystem. As for the AN/SLQ-36 
towed countermeasures system, its development was completed in 
1988. 
  It is anticipated that a new torpedo defense system, which 
consists of the AN/SLR-24 subsystem, an anti-torpedo, and a CDC 
type control system will enter the inventory of American 
aircraft carriers already in 1996-1997. 
  Therefore, the participation of two international 
consortiums 
headed by the firms Westinghouse and General Electric (United 
States) was planned at this stage of work. They propose 
concentrating primary efforts on the development of highly 
effective robotic torpedo defense systems employing artificial 
intelligence technology, including short-range self-defense 
torpedo destruction systems. The scientific-technical 
achievements obtained during the course of work of the 2nd stage 
of the SSTD Program and the SDI Program are being utilized for 
their development. In the process, expanded research is being 
conducted with the involvement of the experimental facilities of 
the U.S. Navy and universities. 
  They are examining the following systems as torpedo 
destruction systems: promising specialized small anti-torpedoes; 
anti-torpedo networks with warhead-destroyers that have been 
installed in the path of the attacking torpedo and various types 
of depth charges. 
  Analysis of information materials indicates that significant 
successes have been achieved in the United States in the 
development of specialized anti-torpedoes and also 
anti-torpedoes based on small 324 cm antisubmarine torpedoes. 
For example, the completion of work in 1991 on the development 
of a 203-mm anti-torpedo for submarines and the 2nd stage of the 
development of a fundamentally new navigation system for future 
anti-torpedoes that have a speed of approximately 40 knots and 
the capability to complete turns with an angular velocity of 
approximately 50 per second have been reported. 
  Full-scale testing at Los Alamos Laboratory (New Mexico, 
United States) has confirmed the technical capability to 
dispense a 5 X 5 meter anti-torpedo network from a 324-mm 
platform and a 10 X 10 meter network from a 533-mm platform. 
Deployment of the network in the path of the torpedo is carried 
out using four hydro-rocket projectiles which explode when the 
torpedo ends up in the network. 
  At the beginning of the 1990's, the United States developed 
an anti-torpedo depth charge with a diameter of the bottom 
portion of 373-mm and a weight of approximately 360 kg, that is 
capable of carrying out ricochetless entry into the water at 
acute angles at speeds of up to 610 meters per second at 
permissible G-loads. 
  During the course of work on the 3rd stage of the SSTD 
Program, significant attention is being devoted to the 
development of a reliable torpedo detection system that provides 
the time required to implement torpedo defense system measures. 
American experts think that the problem of detection of 
torpedoes requires the development of a special torpedo circuit 
in a centralized underwater situation information processing 
system. In the process, primary emphasis is being made on the 
development of hull-mounted and towed concentrated acoustic 
systems, and of acoustic systems with a GPBA [flexible towed 
extended sonar antenna] -- torpedo detection circuits and the 
appropriate processing, analysis and information depiction 
software. It is thought that, when torpedoes are detected, their 
classification, determination of coordinates, and parameters of 
their movement must be conducted, and also detection of the main 
threat for surface combatants with the goal of subsequent 
automatic selection of the most effective technique to combat 
them. 
  A memorandum between the United States and Great Britain 
defines the following time periods during the 3rd phase of work: 
  1991 -- Selection of the variants of future torpedo defense 
systems for further work, a preliminary assessment of the cost 
of the torpedo defense system elements and systems on the whole 
and conclusion of contracts for R&amp;D; 
  1992-1993 -- Conceptual design and selection of one basic 
variant of the system for each class of ships of the U.S. and 
British navies and determination of developing firms on a 
competitive basis; 
  1994 -- (second half) -- Initiation of full-scale 
development 
of the future torpedo defense system; and, 
  1998-1999 -- Entry of series-produced models into the 
inventory. 
  The U.S. Navy Naval Systems Command has announced that the 
list of all ships on which the future torpedo defense system 
will be installed will depend on its effectiveness, operational 
requirements and production capacity. According to expert 
assessments, the U.S. Navy's need for new torpedo defense 
systems totals more than 400 sets and the British Navy's need -- 
is approximately 80 sets. Furthermore, it was noted that the 
involvement of the French Navy in the work is possible during 
the 3rd stage of the SSTD Program and that its needs are 
assessed as more than 100 sets of the new torpedo defense system. 
  Great Britain's Talisman Program is similar to the American 
SSTD Program and contains three subprograms (stages in the U.S. 
program): modernization of existing torpedo defense systems; 
development of new generation torpedo defense systems for 
surface combatants that are in the inventory and that are under 
construction; and, development of new promising torpedo defense 
systems within the framework of the 3rd stage of work on the 
SSTD Program. 
  The SEA SIREN Towed Torpedo Decoy, which is considered to be 
a next generation system, was developed based on the latest 
microprocessor technology during the course of modifying torpedo 
defense systems at the end of the 1980's in Great Britain. Like 
its predecessors -- the British 182M and GI 738 [sic] decoys, it 
is designed to deflect torpedoes with active, passive and 
combined acoustic guidance systems away from surface combatants. 
  The British are applying significant efforts toward the 
development of fired drifting sonar countermeasures devices. So, 
here they developed the ATAAC 76- and 100-mm projectiles (ATAAC 
-- Anti-Torpedo Air-launched Acoustic Countermeasure) for 
suppression of torpedoes' acoustic guidance systems at the end 
of the 1980's. A rocket-propelled projectile with a noise 
jamming generator has been integrated with the launchers of 
surface combatants of the U.S. and British navies that are 
designed to dispense jamming and decoys. The appropriate 
functioning program can be entered into the projectile prior to 
launch based upon the data received from the acoustic systems. 
After entering the water, the projectile creates powerful noise 
jamming in the water in a wide band of torpedo acoustic 
frequencies. 
  An experimental model of the Spartacus surface combatant 
torpedo defense system was developed in France at the end of the 
1980's. They proposed initiating its series production in the 
middle of 1992. This system consists of: a passive torpedo 
detection system and issuance of a "torpedo alert" signal; a 
countermeasures process control system and rocket-propelled 
projectiles with warheads in the shape of various types of sonar 
countermeasures instruments. 
  The torpedo detection system in its complete configuration 
consists of the Albatros sonar system with a flexible towed 
extended sonar antenna and U/RDT-1A (SPDT-1A) torpedo detection 
noise direction-finding equipment that operates from a DUBA-25 
type hull-mounted acoustic system antenna. 
  The joint operation of these two systems provides continuous 
360 surveillance of the situation in the passive mode, in 
the process, French experts note that the torpedo detection 
range can reach 10 or more kilometers with a torpedo DF accuracy 
of more than 10 under favorable acoustic conditions. 
  The U/RDT-1A acoustic system depicts noise spectral analysis 
data in time sequence on a color panoramic display and the noise 
frequency spectrum on a monochrome panoramic display. 
  The countermeasures processor control system is a data 
processing device of the nearby underwater situation, tactical 
situation depiction, data processing on the accomplishment of 
torpedo defense missions and control of the torpedo defense 
process. The following is carried out using a data processing 
unit: underwater situation information analysis on behalf of 
torpedo defense; target classification; calculation of the 
relative coordinates and the elements of movement of attacking 
torpedoes and target ranking based upon the degree of threat 
they pose to the surface combatant. 
  In the Spartacus system, a triangulation method jointly with 
carrying out coordinated inter-antenna signal processing from 
the bow and towed extended U/RDT-1A and Albatros sonar system 
antennas, respectively, is utilized to determine target 
coordinates and elements of movement. The system provides: 
automatic issuance of an alert signal based upon the results of 
the assessment of the tactical situation with its subsequent 
confirmation by the control panel operator; calculation of the 
availability, state, loading and readiness of torpedo defense 
systems and launchers to dispense decoys, and processes 
recommendations for maneuvering of the surface combatant and 
dispensing torpedo defense systems. 
  The following are depicted on the display: the mutual 
location of the attacking torpedoes and the surface combatant, 
the safe zone, and recommendations for maneuvering the surface 
combatant; state of loading the launchers with torpedo defense 
systems and the degree of readiness of the launchers and torpedo 
defense systems for employment. 
  Rocket-propelled projectiles with three types of sonar 
countermeasures systems have been developed for the Spartacus 
system: 
  --with a load in the form of a generator of consecutive 
explosive signals to suppress the sonar systems of the firing 
submarine and the torpedo's remote control channel; 
  --with a load in the form of water-reacting substance 
charges 
that create a powerful camouflage gas screen of small hydrogen 
bubbles between the attacking torpedo and the surface 
combatant-target during the process of the reaction with water; 
and, 
  --with a traditional electronic-acoustic load that ensures 
suppression of attacking torpedoes guidance systems using 
camouflage or diversion jamming. 
  A torpedo defense projectile is a 127 X 900-mm cylinder that 
weighs up to 50 kg. Maximum firing range is 3,000 meters. 
  The Spartacus system utilizes 1-2 Dagaie launchers to fire 
these projectiles. The onboard system consists of up to 30 
rocket-propelled projectiles with different missions. Dagaie 
launchers are universal and have up to 10 launch rails that 
serve to launch various EW [electronic warfare] munitions, 
including sonar countermeasures devices. Sagaie launch canisters 
can also be adapted to fire torpedo defense projectiles. 
  After receiving the command to fire, the selection of 
torpedo 
defense projectiles is conducted for this situation and their 
automatic launch is carried out. During the terminal phase of 
the projectile flight trajectory, speed is reduced using a 
braking parachute, the projectile enters the water and the 
jamming devices begin to operate at the assigned depth. Their 
functioning time is 2-3 minutes and the gas curtain operating 
time is 8-10 minutes. 
  The Spartacus system's operating principle is depicted in 
Figure 1. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-023-32A>      Figure 1. The Operating Principle of the Spartacus Torpedo Defense System. </FIG>

  Thanks to modularity of design, the new torpedo defense 
system can be combined with a ship's submarine defense system 
and can be installed on various ships regardless of the 
equipment and acoustic weapons on them. 
  According to Western experts, the Spartacus system, despite 
the absence of torpedo destruction weapons in it, is 
sufficiently effective because it is thought that the mission of 
reliable detection, classification and localization of attacking 
torpedoes has been successfully accomplished during its 
development. 
  Tourville Class destroyers will be the first ships on which 
they plan to install this system because these ships are 
equipped with SLASM sonar systems that ensure detection of 
torpedoes (a low-frequency hull-mounted acoustic system, a 
medium-frequency acoustic system, and an acoustic system with 
towed flexible long linear sonar antennas). 
  Beginning in 1995, they propose installing some components 
of 
the Spartacus system on seven Georges Leygues and Cassard Class 
destroyers, and also on other French Navy surface combatants. 
  While considering the French Navy's extreme interest in 
equipping the aircraft carrier Charles De Gaulle with effective 
torpedo defense systems, the system's developing firms have been 
conducting research since October 1990 to improve the Spartacus 
system for its subsequent installation on the aircraft carrier. 
  The foreign press has reported that the Israeli firm Rafael 
Armament has completed development of the ATC-1 (ATC -- 
Anti-Torpedo Countermeasure) towed torpedo defense system during 
the second half of the 1980's. The firm notes that this system, 
thanks to its compact construction, can be installed both on the 
primary classes of surface combatants and also on merchant ships. 
  A "decoy" weighing approximately 25 kg, 120 cm long and 30 
cm 
in diameter emits strong sound signals that create a false phase 
front, forcing the torpedo to move in the direction of the 
noise, completing in the process a series of consecutive attacks 
of the emitters until the total expenditure of its power source. 
  They also note that, thanks to its small dimensions, the 
ATC-1 does not impede the maneuvering of the ship-platform in 
course and speed and its installation does not require a great 
deal of area or space on the upper deck or in below decks spaces. 
  Since 1987, the ATC-1 torpedo defense system has been in 
series production by Rafael Armament in Haifa. It is important 
to note that the "decoy" was designed and tested in accordance 
with the MIL-E-16400 All-European Standard in the sphere of 
military electronics. 
  It is being reported that Sa'ar-5 class escort ships, which 
are being built for the Israeli Navy in the United States, are 
being equipped with ATC-1 decoys. The lead ship of this series 
was transferred to the Israeli Navy in 1993. 
  The primary tactical-technical specifications of foreign 
countries navies torpedo defense systems have been cited in the 
table. 


Tactical-Technical Specifications of Foreign Countries Navies' Surface Combatant Torpedo Defense Systems 

Designation of      Year of       Purpose            Operating Mode (Type    Operating     Time of       Operating    Caliber, mm,         Additional 
Model, Country,     Acceptance                       of jamming)             Frequency,    Operation,    depth,       Weight, kg           Information 
Code                Into the                                                 kHz           Minutes       meters, 
                    Inventory                                                                            Towing 
                                                                                                         speed, 
                                                                                                         knots 

1                   2             3                  4                       5             6             7            8                    9 

1. Drifting Sonar Suppression Systems 

SSAWS [Surface      Beginning     Suppression of     Low frequency noise,    Range of      .             ./-                               Stored on 
Ship Acoustic       of the        sonar systems,     -------------------,    noise                                                         racks. Fired 
Warfare System].    1980's        Suppression of     High frequency noise,   jamming                                                       from special 
Drifting sonar                    torpedo            Simulation of           submarine                                                     launchers. 
countermeasures                   guidance,          acoustic fields of      sonar                                                         Loading -- 
system, United                    Deflecting         surface combatants      system,                                                       manual. 
States                            torpedoes from                             Torpedo 
                                  surface                                    guidance 
                                  combatants                                 system 
                                                                             range 

Spartacus.          First half    Suppression of     Explosive jamming,      0.1-6 --      Up to 8, up   ./-          130/up to 50         Fired from 
Drifting sonar      of the        sonar systems,     Gas curtain,            5-80 --       to 4-6, 2-3                                     Dagaie or 
countermeasures     1990's        Suppression of     Simulation of the       Torpedo                                                       Sagaie system 
system, France                    torpedo            acoustic fields of      guidance                                                      general 
                                  guidance,          surface combatants      system                                                        purpose 
                                  Deflecting                                 range                                                         launchers to 
                                  torpedoes from                                                                                           the range. 
                                  surface 
                                  combatants 

ATAAC               .             Suppression of     High frequency noise    Torpedo       Up to 5       ./-          Up to 3,800          Connecting 
[Anti-Torpedo                     torpedo guidance                           guidance                                 meters, 76/. and     MGKh 
Air-launched                      system                                     system                                   100/.                [hardware] are 
Acoustic                                                                     range                                                         compatible 
Countermeasure].                                                                                                                           with Shield 
Drifting torpedo                                                                                                                           type shipborne 
decoy, Great                                                                                                                               launchers 
Britain 

EX-10. Drifting     Second half   Suppression of     .                       Torpedo                     ./-                               Being 
torpedo decoy,      of the        torpedo guidance                           guidance                                                      developed 
United States       1990's        systems                                    system                                                        based upon the 
                                                                             range                                                         SSTD [Surface 
                                                                                                                                           Ship Torpedo 
                                                                                                                                           Defense] 
                                                                                                                                           Program 

2. Surface Combatant Towed Torpedo Defense Systems 

AN/SLQ-25. Towed    1977          Deflecting         Continuous radiation    17-88         No less       Up to        150/approximately    Primary 
torpedo decoy,                    torpedoes with     in the CW mode,                       than 72       66/30        20                   subsystem of 
United States                     passive, active    Continuous AM-noise,                  hours                                           the SSAWS 
                                  and combined       Pulse AM-noise,                                                                       surface 
                                  guidance from      Continuous AM-noise +                                                                 combatant 
                                  surface            CW                                                                                    torpedo 
                                  combatants                                                                                               defense 
                                                                                                                                           system, Has 
                                                                                                                                           AN/SLQ-26, 
                                                                                                                                           -33, and - 51 
                                                                                                                                           modifications 

AN/SLQ-25-A.        1987          Deflecting         .                       Torpedo       .             .            .                    Developed 
Improved towed                    torpedoes with                             guidance                                                      during the 1st 
torpedo decoy,                    passive, active                            system                                                        stage of the 
United States                     and combined                               range                                                         SSTD Program. 
                                  guidance from                                                                                            New 
                                  surface                                                                                                  development to 
                                  combatants                                                                                               replace the 
                                                                                                                                           AN/SLQ-25 

AN/SLQ-36. Towed    1987          Torpedo attack     .                       .             .             .            .                    Developed 
combined torpedo                  countermeasures                                                                                          during the 2nd 
countermeasures                   and diversion of                                                                                         stage of the 
system, United                    torpedoes with                                                                                           SSTD Program 
States                            passive, active 
                                  and combined 
                                  guidance from 
                                  surface 
                                  combatants 

182M. Towed         1964          Suppression of     Continuous AM-noise,    0.2-3.5,      No less       Up to        533/74 
jamming device,                   submarine sonar    Continuous CW           19.5-80,      than 72       36/24 
Great Britain                     complexes,         radiation, Pulse        19.5-80       hours 
                                  Diversion of       AM-noise 
                                  torpedoes with 
                                  acoustic 
                                  guidance systems 
                                  from surface 
                                  ships 

181BB. Towed        End of the    Diversion of       Simulation of the       10-50         No less       Up to        . 
jamming device,     1960's        torpedoes with     acoustic fields of                    than 72       75/15 
Great Britain                     acoustic           surface combatants                    hours 
                                  guidance systems 
                                  from surface 
                                  combatants 

GI 738 [TR Note:    1977          Suppression of     .                       .             .             .            533/74               Export variant 
G 738]. Towed                     submarine sonar                                                                                          of the 182M 
torpedo decoy,                    complexes,                                                                                               decoy 
Great Britain                     Diversion of 
                                  torpedoes with 
                                  acoustic 
                                  guidance systems 
                                  from surface 
                                  combatants 

SEA SIREN. Towed    .             Diversion of       Continuous radiation    .             No less       .            .                    New generation 
torpedo decoy,                    torpedoes with     in the CW mode,                       than 72                                         of the 182M 
Great Britain                     acoustic           Continuous AM-noise,                  hours                                           decoy 
                                  guidance systems   AM-noise + CW mode, 
                                  from surface       Alternating AM-noise 
                                  combatants         + CW mode, 
                                                     Pseudo-randon noise 

TMK-6 Fanfare.      Middle of     Diversion of       Simulation of surface   1-100         No less       Up to        . 
Towed torpedo       the 1970's    torpedoes with     combatant noise                       than 72       65/30 
decoy                             acoustic                                                 hours 
                                  guidance systems 
                                  from surface 
                                  combatants 

UNIFOXER. Towed     .             Diversion of       Simulates the noise     .             No less       Up to        . 
torpedo decoy,                    torpedoes with     of surface combatants                 than 72       40/25 
the Netherlands                   acoustic                                                 hours 
                                  guidance systems 
                                  from surface 
                                  combatants 

CAAT. Towed         .             Diversion of       Simulates the noise     10-35         No less       Up to        . 
torpedo decoy,                    torpedoes with     of surface combatants                 than 72       99/22 
Canada                            acoustic                                                 hours 
                                  guidance systems 
                                  from surface 
                                  combatants 

ATC-1               1986          Diversion of       Simulates the           .             .             .            360/25 
[Anti-Torpedo                     torpedoes with     acoustic fields of 
Countermeasure].                  acoustic           surface combatants 
Towed torpedo                     guidance systems 
decoy, Israel                     from surface 
                                  combatants 

SSTADD. System to   1977          Deception of       Radiation of signals    0.2-3.5       Up to 26      .            .                    Realized the 
distort the                       enemy submarine    and noise                             hours                                           principles of 
initial acoustic                  sonar system                                                                                             reproduction 
field of a                        operators on the                                                                                         of previously 
surface                           operational                                                                                              recorded 
combatant, United                 situation in the                                                                                         noises of 
States                            area, class and                                                                                          other types of 
                                  type of platform                                                                                         targets or 
                                                                                                                                           synthesis of 
                                                                                                                                           "sound" 
                                                                                                                                           portraits on a 
                                                                                                                                           mixer by the 
                                                                                                                                           operator 


  Nearly 10 years have passed since the day of the tragic loss 
of the Argentine Cruiser General Belgrano that was sunk by the 
British nuclear submarine Conqueror on 2 May 1982. But as 
before, the West considers the conclusion of SEKAY NO KANSEN 
Commentator Oh Rekhey [transliterated] to be timely... "Aren't 
the colossal expenditures on the construction of surface 
combatants senseless from the point of view of self-defense if 
we can sink these ships without hindrance..." That is why 
foreign navies are paying such serious attention to torpedo 
defense as a very important element of the self-defense of 
surface combatants and ships. 
  Today, it seems very important to painstakingly study 
leading 
foreign experience in the area of their effective defense from 
torpedoes when a new native concept of design and construction 
of surface combatants and ships is being developed. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46484 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   In Foreign Navies </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reorienting Formations </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reorienting Formations </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0389H Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 1, 1994 
(Signed to press 28 Dec 93) p 79 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0389H </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Captain 1st Rank Yu. Makarov and Retired Captain </F>
2nd Rank A. Chirkov: "Reorienting Formations"] 
  [Text] The discussion of the Navy's new strategic concept 
continued in the June issue of this magazine and the issues 
associated with the role of strike aircraft carriers, the 
development of a new type of combat formations and joint 
utilization of fleet aviation and the Marines were examined. 
  In the articles along with the proposal on the reduction of 
the number of active strike aircraft carriers, the opinion is 
being expressed on redesignating them as amphibious aircraft 
carriers. It is thought that these aircraft carriers must be 
part of the amphibious forces. Other authors advocate 
maintaining strike aircraft carriers as part of the fleet and 
propose ways to increase the combat capabilities of carrier task 
forces while supporting the operations of forces in coastal 
areas. So, 8th Special Purpose Group Commander Captain 3rd Rank 
Katan summarizes the experience of the utilization of a special 
purpose platoon that was on board the strike aircraft carrier 
"Saratoga" for four months (June-September 1992) as part of the 
6th Fleet. On the aircraft carrier, this platoon accomplished 
combat training missions: search and rescue of personnel, search 
and capture of individual enemy facilities at sea and on the 
coast, special reconnaissance, guidance and adjustment of 
carrier-based aircraft strikes against enemy coastal facilities, 
and also peacekeeping functions and participation in the 
evacuation of the population. The missions cited were rehearsed 
in exercises and during the course of the carrier task force's 
daily activities on the Mediterranean Sea. Training of special 
purpose platoon personnel was conducted from an aircraft, a 
helicopter, from an aircraft and a helicopter simultaneously, 
and from a submarine. Based on the experience obtained, the 
appropriate regulation was developed for the utilization of such 
groups that are permanently attached to aircraft carriers that 
are part of the 6th Fleet. 
  While proceeding from the new Naval concept that was set 
forth in the White Book, the naval forces command authorities 
view the development and utilization of the new 
operational-tactical unit, the so-called naval combat group -- 
MBG -- that is an elementary unit of U.S. sea power. A guided 
missile cruiser will become the nucleus of this unit. The guided 
missile cruiser's functions will include collection, processing 
and assessment of information based on data that is arriving 
from various sources to obtain a complete picture of the targets 
that are located in the region's air-surface-underwater space 
and making decisions on the utilization of electronic systems. 
  Besides the guided missile cruiser, the naval combat group 
is 
made up of ships with the Lamps system, a nuclear submarine and 
a base patrol aircraft. If necessary, they envision reinforcing 
the naval combat group with land-based reconnaissance aircraft, 
including AWACS. They think that this composition of the group 
will be capable of carrying out surveillance, issuing target 
designation to conduct strikes against assigned targets and 
conducting defensive operations in the water-air-land space in a 
300-mile radius from the center of the group. 
  This group may be deployed in a potentially dangerous area, 
providing in the process antisubmarine defense, antiship missile 
defense and air defense and conducting airborne electronic 
reconnaissance. Coordination of operations will be carried out 
by a combined coordination center that is located on the guided 
missile cruiser. The availability of the naval combat group will 
substantially increase the combat capabilities of carrier 
forces, increasing the zone of their operations and expanding 
the circle of the missions being accomplished. This group can 
conduct delaying combat operations during the initial period and 
monitor the situation until the arrival of the carrier strike 
group or other forces. The naval combat group concept was proven 
during the course of two years (1990-1991) in the Mediterranean 
Sea. 
  The regulation developed based upon the concept of 
conducting 
combat operations by ground forces is the guiding document for 
the Marines. Its main idea consists of the joint utilization of 
air and ground Marine forces and fleet carrier-based aviation. 
Organizationally, this is expressed in the development of the 
functioning of an air-ground operational formation which must be 
rapidly deployed to the designated area to conduct combat 
operations. 
  This operational formation is capable of accomplishing air 
support missions, including providing direct air support and 
also of conducting missile-bomb strikes against enemy rear 
services facilities. They propose including combat aircraft and 
helicopters and also ground-based subunits to accomplish the 
assigned missions. 
  A reassessment is being conducted of the possibilities for 
the utilization of carrier-based aviation as a result of the 
development of Marine air-ground operational formations. So, the 
opinion is being expressed that during operations in coastal 
areas, it must accomplish the following missions: support ground 
operations by achieving air superiority air in the designated 
area; conducting strikes against enemy fixed targets that are 
located in the rear area and also providing direct air support 
to ground forces. 
  The authors of the articles think that the new Marine 
doctrine provides the initiative in the conduct of combat 
operations to aviators, which will certainly increase the 
effectiveness of the employment of ground forces. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46485 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   In Foreign Navies </F>
<H3> <TI>   PRC Naval Forces Described </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    PRC Naval Forces Described </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0391H Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 2, 1994 
(Signed to press 8 Feb 94) pp 76-82 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0391H </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Capt 3d Rank M. Shepovalenko based on foreign </F>
publications: "`The Great Wall of Steel' (Present Status and 
Prospects of Development of the PRC Navy)"] 
  [Text] The Chinese People's Republic is one of the oldest 
sea powers, one possessing the experience and possibilities for 
building almost all classes of ships. It has also developed the 
concept of using its naval forces to defend national interests. 
  The origins of the Naval Forces of the People's Liberation 
Army of China (VMS NOAK)--such is the official name of the 
Chinese naval fleet--date back to 1954, when the Soviet Navy 
started transferring submarines, destroyers, patrol escorts, 
minesweepers and torpedo boats to it. Some of these ships were 
assembled at Chinese ship building plants on the basis of our 
technical documents, and out of parts, structures, units and 
machine units we supplied. Later on the Chinese began copying a 
number of Soviet ship designs with the technical assistance of 
our specialists. This went on for almost a decade, which may be 
considered to be the first stage in development of Chinese 
warship construction. 
  After Sino-Soviet relations "went cold" in the mid-1960's 
and 
our specialists were called back home, the Chinese leadership 
found itself facing the need for developing this sector of 
industry on its own. The period from the second half of the 
1960's to the early 1980's is the second, transitional stage of 
the navy's development. It was characterized by construction of 
ships and submarines that were a further development of Soviet 
designs. 
  The mid-1980's were marked by entry of Chinese ship building 
into its third, modern stage. Its typical traits are: a quest 
for new concepts, and extensive development and implementation 
of original designs of warships and auxiliary vessels of various 
classes. 
  The "Program of Balanced Development of the Navy to the Year 
2000" was developed in the PRC on the basis of the strategy of 
"coastal oceanic defense" adopted in 1989. Several programs are 
being implemented in parallel today in accordance with this 
strategy. Construction of submarines--both nuclear-powered and 
diesel-electric--is considered to be a priority direction in 
this case. 
  Development and construction of "Xia" class SSBNs (type 092) 
is an important accomplishment of Chinese ship builders. It was 
laid down in 1978, and launched on 30 April 1981; however, 
difficulties arose later on in "perfecting" the missile system 
launching "Julang-1" SLBMs. The first launching of this missile 
from an experimental submarine in 1985 was unsuccessful, and it 
was not until September 1988 that a test launch was graced with 
success. This was, moreover, after the SSBN had already been 
introduced into the navy (Figure 1). 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-023-37A>      Figure 1. "Xia" Class Nuclear-Powered Ballistic-Missile Submarine </FIG>


  It is considered that the SLBM "Julang-1" (CSS-N-3 according 
to the Western classification) is outfitted with a single 
2-megaton nuclear warhead. However, the level of development of 
Chinese missile technology, which was sufficient for the 
launching of three satellites to different orbits simultaneously 
by a single launch vehicle in 1981, provides the grounds for 
supposing that this SLBM may be fitted out with a multiple 
warhead. The possibility is not excluded that "Xia" class SSBNs 
will be re-armed in the second half of the 1990's with a new 
missile system launching "Julang-2" (CSS-NX-4) SLBMs, presently 
under development. 
  Despite the fact that the "Xia" class SSBN is inferior to 
similar American, British, French and Russian submarines in 
level of technological execution and performance 
characteristics, its introduction into the navy marks the 
beginning of creation of the sea component of the triad of 
Chinese strategic nuclear forces. Deployment of SSBNs in the 
Yellow and East China seas significantly raises China's military 
potential, and can significantly influence the strategic 
situation in the Asia-Pacific region. 
  It was believed for some time that the lead SSBN would be 
followed by three to five similar submarines to permit 
maintenance of a normal combat patrol cycle. However, the fact 
that this submarine is still the only ship of its class 
indicates that it is experimental, and that it is being operated 
in order to acquire experience in the combat use of naval 
nuclear forces, and to perfect the design to permit construction 
of a series of SSBNs of a new class (type 094). It is expected 
that they will possess 16 launchers for higher-range SLBMs, and 
that construction will begin in the second half of the 1990's. 
  Construction of the "Han" class multipurpose nuclear-powered 
submarine (Figure 2), which was started in the first half of the 
1970's, is continuing as well. There are presently five such 
submarines in the fleet's force composition. According to 
reports in the Western mass media a number of design 
shortcomings were revealed in the lead submarine of this class, 
including in the nuclear reactor reliability system. Also, its 
noise level was high, and the effectiveness of external lighting 
and weapon control systems was low. Consequently, improvements 
were made in ships of this class beginning with the third hull. 
The design of the propulsion unit was improved, "Ying-ji-1" 
anti-ship missile launchers firing from surfaced position were 
installed behind the bridge, and the sonar system was 
modernized, with the French DUUX-5 sonar system at its basis. 
However, feeling that launching anti-ship missiles from surfaced 
position would sharply increase the submarine's vulnerability, 
the command of the VMS NOAK is considering, as one of the 
priority directions in this issue, arming them with anti-ship 
missiles launched from torpedo tubes. According to reports in 
foreign military periodicals, Chinese representatives conducted 
negotiations with a number of Western companies with the goal of 
acquiring some weapon systems, state-of-the-art external 
lighting systems, and technical documents for their subsequent 
production under a license. They include the MINICIN inertial 
navigation system and the Pivair (SPS) periscope with 
conventional and infrared observation channels produced by 
France's Sazhem [transliteration], and a sonar system with a 
long towed antenna manufactured by America's Westinghouse. Of 
course, in view of aggravation of American-Chinese relations at 
the turn of this decade and the fear the Americans have of 
losing their technological leadership, conclusion of the last 
deal is rather problematic. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-023-38A>      Figure 2. "Han" Class Multipurpose Nuclear-Powered Submarine </FIG>


  An orientation on the French SSBNs "Le Redoubtable" and 
"L'Inflexible" and "Rubis" class nuclear-powered submarines is 
noticeable in the design of "Xia" SSBNs and "Han" 
nuclear-powered submarines respectively. Similarities include 
the hull lines, the propulsion unit and propeller, and the 
arrangement of the weapon systems. And the choice of the 
external illumination and weapon control systems with which to 
modernize them, which are once again French-made, is another 
indication of continuing cooperation between the PRC and France 
in development of China's nuclear-powered submarine fleet. In 
this case, in addition to significant attention to building 
nuclear-powered submarines, in the opinion of Western 
specialists China's main efforts will be concentrated now and in 
the next decade on modernizing diesel-electric submarines, which 
represented 92 percent of the submarine forces of the VMS NOAK 
at the beginning of the present decade. 
  The most numerous among them are the "Romeo" class 
submarines 
created on the basis of technical documents for the type 633 
Soviet medium submarine. They were built in two large series: in 
the 1960's (type 031--the base modification ES3B) and in the 
first half of the 1980's (type 033, improved). However, these 
ships have also grown obsolete, and despite the fact that the 
more up-to-date French DUUX-5 sonar system was installed in the 
last submarines of the second series, in the estimation of 
specialists their ASW capabilities are rather limited on the 
whole. Moreover they are starting to be actively transferred to 
the reserves in connection with expiration of their useful life. 
Consequently, in the 1970's China began building new "Ming" 
class (type 035) submarines. In this case three submarines of 
the first modifications (ES5C and ES5D) of this class were built 
in 1970-1979. And such a slow pace of their creation permits the 
supposition that Chinese specialists encountered serious 
technical problems. This is also confirmed by the fact that 
construction of "Ming" class submarines was suspended for a 
certain time, and construction of "Romeo" class submarines was 
resumed. It was not until 1987 that construction of "Ming" class 
submarines was resumed, but only two such ships of the new ES5E 
modification were created. 
  In the opinion of specialists this is associated with the 
fact that the "Romeo" submarine type long exhausted the 
possibilities for further modernization. Which is why a new 
submarine (type 039) is being planned. It is being developed on 
the basis of the French "Agosta" class submarine. Its 
construction and commissioning are possible in the second half 
of the 1990's. It is anticipated that its hull will have a drop 
shape, and its lines will resemble those of the "Albacore" 
class. While the main dimensions and displacement are comparable 
with "Ming" class submarines, there are plans to increase the 
radius of operations of the new submarine, its diving depth, its 
submerged speed and the power of the propulsion unit. The 
submarine will probably have a single shaft, which together with 
the improved hull lines will help to reduce its noise. 
  By the way, although noise reduction occupies one of the 
important directions of work in Chinese submarine building, this 
is not a priority objective at this stage. This is explained by 
the fact that the relatively shallow and warm waters of the seas 
adjacent to the Chinese coast significantly complicate 
antisubmarine warfare, and thus significantly reduce the 
effectiveness of modern ASW forces of the navies of the world's 
leading countries in these regions. The current concept of the 
use of the VMS NOAK does not presently foresee the navy's 
emergence onto the ocean, which is something for the more remote 
future. 
  Construction and commissioning of a number of surface ships 
of a new generation was typical of China in the late 1980's and 
early 1990's. Thus, the "Luhu" class guided missile destroyer 
(type 052), which was transferred to the navy in 1993, is the 
first ship of this class of specifically Chinese design. It is 
the most powerful warship ever in the force composition of the 
VMS NOAK. The destroyer is well armed in antiship and 
antisubmarine respects, including with antiship missile system 
launchers, as well as modern electronic systems. Design 
deficiencies include the relatively weak surface-to-air 
armament: Although the short-range Crotale Navale-PDMS 
surface-to-air missile system and four 37-mm twin H/PJ-76A guns 
provide reliable air defense for the ship, it still is point 
defense. It has a combined diesel and gas turbine propulsion 
unit, which together with the smooth hull lines and modern 
superstructure architecture significantly improves its seagoing 
qualities and endurance. 
  According to the handbook Jane's Fighting Ships 
the lead ship will be followed by a second destroyer. The 
possibility is not excluded that construction of the series will 
end with this, and the operating experience will be accounted 
for in developing the design of a new guided missile destroyer 
in the second half of the 1990's. 
  "Luda" class (type 051) guided missile destroyers are 
currently undergoing modernization, during which they are to be 
equipped with the French THOMSEA ASBU [automated tactical 
control system], which includes the TAVITAC BIUS [combat 
information command and control system] and the Vega missile and 
artillery fire control system. New radar and sonar, 
radiotechnical and ECM systems, a navigation system and a 
communication equipment outfit produced in China on the basis of 
licenses from a number of French firms are also to be installed 
(Figure 3). 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-023-39A>      Figure 3. "Luda" Class Guided Missile Destroyers </FIG>


  Destroyers ("Luda-III" class) are armed with new ASM 
systems--four twin launchers of the Ying-ji-1 ASM system (the 
bow twin launcher of the ASM system is adapted for launching 
SU-1 antisubmarine missiles). New 37-mm twin turret guns are 
installed in place of four 25-mm and four 57-mm deck guns. 
Antisubmarine armament was also reinforced with the installation 
of two 324-mm triple-tube type B515 torpedo launchers firing 
A244S torpedoes. New electronic equipment was also installed 
aboard the destroyer: a towed variable-depth sonar system, and 
airborne and surface target detection and fire control radar, 
developed on the basis of Western models. The stern 130-mm and 
57-mm twin gun mounts on ships undergoing modernization under 
the "Luda-II" project are being dismantled, and replaced by a 
helicopter pad and a hangar for two Zhi-9A helicopters and a 
SAFECOPTER takeoff and landing support system. 
  Construction of "Luda" class guided missile destroyers 
obviously came to an end with introduction of the "Zhuhai" 
guided missile destroyer into the force composition of the navy 
no later than 1993. 
  Construction of new "Jiangwei" (type 055) guided missile 
escort ships is continuing. The lead ship was placed within the 
force composition of the navy in late 1992. In terms of the 
level of automation and availability of different weapon systems 
and electronic resources this escort ship is the most up-to-date 
ship of its class. It carries a six-container Hongqi-61M SAM 
system launcher (an improved version of the Hongqi-61 system). 
The aft Ying-ji-1 ASM launcher group is possibly adapted for 
launching SU-1 antisubmarine missiles. Another two "Jiangwei" 
class guided missile escort ships are presently in different 
stages of construction, and the series will number a total of 
four to six units. 
  Beginning in the mid-1980's China started modernizing 
"Jianghu" class (type 053) guided missile escort ships. The hull 
structure was changed on escort ships modernized as the 
"Jianghu-III" version (type 053HT): A twin deck bearing four 
stationary Ying-ji ASM launchers was added; the number of 37-mm 
twin gun mounts was reduced from six to four. The outfit of 
electronic equipment was supplemented by a Chinese ASBU, a 
early-warning aerial observation radar, ASM system and 
universal-caliber artillery fire control radar, light AAA fire 
control radar, and radiotechnical and ECM systems. The lattice 
mast was replaced by a tower. There are presently two 
"Jianghu-III" class guided missile escort ships in the force 
composition of the VMS NOAK. 
  In early 1993 a "Zhoushan" guided missile escort ship of the 
new "Jianghu-IV" modification was transferred to the navy. It 
differs from series "Jianghu-III" ships in having a somewhat 
altered ASM launcher, which is associated with adoption of a 
modified variant of the Ying-ji-1 ASM of greater firing range. 
The second guided missile escort ship of the "Jianghu-IV" class 
was launched in 1992. 
  The guided missile escort ship "Siping", which was finished 
as the "Jianghu-II" version (type 053HT(H)), was transferred to 
the navy in 1986. Together with the "Luda-II" modification of 
the "Jinan" guided missile destroyer, it became the first 
helicopter-carrying escort ship within the VMS NOAK. 
  The design of the ship's hull from the first ASM launcher to 
the stern was altered with the purpose of installing a 
helicopter pad and hangar: A helicopter deck was added, the 
second ASM launcher was dismantled, and the shape and height of 
the falshtruba [false stack?] were changed. Changes were made in 
the armament: A French one-barrel 100-mm Creusot Loire gun mount 
and two type ILAS triple-tube 324-mm torpedo launchers firing 
A244S torpedoes were installed. The outfit of electronic 
equipment was supplemented by the French NAJA electron-optic 
sight for fire control of the 100-mm gun mount, the SAFECOPTER 
helicopter takeoff and landing support system, and two launchers 
firing Mk.33 SRBOC passive jamming munitions. The ship carries 
one Zhi-9A helicopter. 
  Modernization efforts on other "Jiangu" class guided missile 
escort ships of the basic plan have been limited up until now to 
replacement of the single-barrel 100-mm gun mounts by twin gun 
mounts of the same caliber, and installation of early-warning 
aerial observation radar, as well as fire control radar for two 
twin 100-mm guns. Fire control radar for four 37-mm twin gun 
mounts was installed aboard some ships. 
  Modernization of the "Jiangdong" class (type 053K) guided 
missile escort ship was started in 1992. There are plans to 
install Western-made modern weapon systems and illumination 
resources or their Chinese analogues aboard these ships. 
  New escort ships--the "Luhu" class guided missile destroyer 
and the "Jiangwei" class guided missile escort ships--were 
initially planned and built as helicopter carriers: The former 
carries two and the latter carries one Zhi-9A helicopters, which 
are the Chinese version of the French Dauphin-2 helicopter. The 
armament of the Zhi-9A helicopter includes Italian A244 
antisubmarine torpedoes or American Mk.46 Mod.2 torpedoes, 
French HS-12 submersible sonar systems, and a magnetometer. The 
helicopter can be equipped with four ASM for action against 
surface ships. 
  Two ship-based Ka-27 helicopters acquired in Russia were 
transferred to the navy in 1993 for testing and evaluation. If 
they exceed the Zhi-9A in their performance characteristics, 
China may purchase an additional lot of Russian helicopters, or 
the license to manufacture them. 
  The "Houjian" class (type 520) small guided missile ship was 
built and transferred to the navy in July 1991. The new small 
guided missile ship carries strengthened missile and artillery 
armament, which is twice greater in comparison with existing 
classes of long-range warships. It is intended for action 
against surface ships on the outer perimeter of the seas 
contiguous with continental China. In the future it is to be 
outfitted with PL-9N close-range surface-to-air missile systems. 
From all appearances it is an experimental platform intended to 
study the problems of combat use of small guided missile ships 
and to check the effectiveness of new models of armament and 
equipment installed aboard them. 
  The "Houxin" class (type 037-II) small guided missile ship 
is 
the missile variant of the "Haijui" class small ASW ship. The 
lead ship was placed in the force composition of the navy in 
1991. There are five such small guided missile ships in the 
force composition today, and another three are in different 
stages of construction. The rate of construction is three ships 
a year. Introduction of such small guided missile ships into the 
navy will make it possible to partly compensate for transfer of 
obsolete "Hegu" and "Huoku" class missile boats and their 
subsequent retirement. 
  In 1992 the navy began receiving LSM class small amphibious 
warfare ships of a new design. With a displacement of 600 
tonnes, their loading capacity is 150 tonnes and they can be 
used to land personnel and tracked and wheeled equipment on an 
unimproved coast, and supply ammunition and provisions to 
troops. In distinction from small amphibious warfare ships built 
earlier, the ship's superstructure is shifted from the stern 
closer to the middle, which improved its controllability and 
seagoing qualities. The ship's artillery armament includes bow 
and stern 25-mm twin automatic guns. The cruising range is 
around 1,000 miles at a speed of 12 knots. It is anticipated 
that by the end of 1993 there will be not less than three small 
amphibious warfare ships of this class in the navy's force 
composition. 
  By the second half of the 1980's the minesweeping forces of 
the VMS NOAK were considerably worn and obsolete. They now 
possess insignificant possibilities for laying and sweeping 
mines. 
  Class T-43 (type 010) ocean minesweepers, built in China in 
the second half of the 1950's on the basis of Soviet technical 
documents, reached the limit of their useful life by the 
mid-1980's. And in connection with the absence of a new design 
of a mine warfare ship, the naval command decided to resume 
their construction. 
  Beginning in 1988 the navy started receiving "Wosao" class 
coastal minesweepers. By now there are five coastal minesweepers 
of this class in the forces, and another three ships are in 
different stages of construction. The rate of construction is 
one ship a year. The new minesweeper carries two types of 
acoustic (sonic and infrasonic), electromagnetic and small 
contact sweeps, and it is armed with two 25-mm twin automatic 
guns. Its hull is made from steel with low magnetic properties. 
The coastal minesweeper can also be used as a harbor and a river 
minesweeper. It will replace the "Fushun" and "Lienyun" 
minesweepers, refitted correspondingly out of "Shanghai-II" 
patrol boats and fishing trawlers. 
  The long-range plans for developing minesweeping forces 
foresee construction of a new class of mine warfare ships by the 
mid-1990's--minehunters. Chinese developments in this area are 
complicated by the absence of modern mine detection and sweeping 
resources, in connection with which Chinese specialists intend 
to turn to foreign developers. There are plans for basing the 
design on the Italian "Lerici" class minehunter. Nor is 
cooperation with England's Vosper Thornycroft excluded. 
Negotiations were conducted with it on this matter by the 
Chinese side in 1988. There are also plans to make foreign 
purchases of mine-seeking sonar and sweeping equipment with the 
right of its licensed production. 
  In 1988 the "Bieliejian" class minelayer was transferred to 
the navy as the lead ship in a series of three units. With a 
displacement of over 1,000 tonnes, it has bow and stern mine 
holds, each of which is equipped with a crane, and side ports 
for the mine tracks are located on the stern transom. The 
artillery armament of the ship consists of four 37-mm twin gun 
mounts. 
  Construction of the "Hainan" class small ASW ship (type 
037), 
which began in 1963-1964, is continuing (it is based on our type 
201 ASW launch). A number of changes were made in the basic 
design: The single mast was replaced by a tripod, a surface 
target detection radar was installed on it, and underwater 
illumination resources were supplemented with a French SS-12 
variable-depth towed sonar system. A similar sonar system is 
also being installed aboard "Haujui" class (type 037-1) small 
ASW ships, which are a further development of the "Hainan" 
design. The numerical strength of fleet forces of the VMS NOAK 
is shown in the Table. 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fleet Forces of the VMS NOAK as of 1 January 1994                          | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ship Class and Ty-|Fleet Forces      |Reserves          |Under Constructio-| 
|pe                |                  |                  |n (Modernization) | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Warships of the M-|300               |Over 110          |10(1)             | 
|ain Types         |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Submarines:       |36                |Over 51           |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Xia" class SSBNs |1                 |-                 |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Han" class nucle-|5                 |-                 |-                 | 
|ar-powered submar-|                  |                  |                  | 
|ines              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|diesel submarines |30                |Over 51           |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Surface Ships     |264               |59                |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Luhu" class guid-|1                 |-                 |1                 | 
|ed missile destro-|                  |                  |                  | 
|yers              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Luda-III" class  |1                 |-                 |-                 | 
|guided missile de-|                  |                  |                  | 
|stroyers          |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Luda-II"         |1                 |-                 |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Luda-I"          |14                |-                 |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Jiangwei" class  |1                 |-                 |1                 | 
|guided missile es-|                  |                  |                  | 
|cort ships        |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Jianghu-IV"      |1                 |-                 |1                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Jianghu-III"     |2                 |-                 |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Jianghu-II"      |1                 |-                 |(1)               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Other classes     |5                 |1                 |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Escort Ships      |5                 |-                 |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Hojian" class sm-|1                 |-                 |-                 | 
|all guided missil-|                  |                  |                  | 
|e ships           |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|"Houxin" class sm-|6                 |-                 |2                 | 
|all guided missil-|                  |                  |                  | 
|e ships           |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Small ASW ships   |97                |-                 |3                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Amphibious warfar-|63                |2                 |-                 | 
|e ships           |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Minesweeping ships|63                |56                |2                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Combatant Craft:  |Over 527          |Over 550          |5                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Missile           |Over 150          |Over 60           |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Torpedo           |Over 90           |Over 50           |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Patrol            |Over 127          |Over 240          |5                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Amphibious warfare|Over 160          |Over 200          |-                 | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Thus construction of warships of a new generation and 
modernization of ships within the force composition of the navy 
since the 1970's indicate transfer of the line of detection of 
the probable enemy and of fire effect upon him from coastal 
waters to the outer perimeter of the seas bathing continental 
China. However, in terms of their combat capabilities these 
ships still cannot be considered to be ocean-going ships. 
  A shortage of financial resources will obviously prevent the 
VMS NOAK from initiating large-scale series construction of new 
ship designs in the immediate future; most probably ships will 
be built in small series with the goal of testing and evaluating 
new weapons and illumination systems. Priority in developing 
surface forces will obviously be given to creating escort ships 
such as guided missile destroyers with ASM systems providing 
zonal air defense, and guided missile escort ships with 
specialized antisubmarine armament. Mine warfare ships armed 
with modern mine warfare resources will also enjoy further 
development. 
  Evaluating the prospects for developing the navy's light 
forces, it should be noted that construction of new missile and 
torpedo boats is not currently proceeding. Launches of these 
types within the fleet forces of the VMS NOAK satisfy modern 
requirements in general, but a significant number of them are 
worn, and require replacement. 
  In the second half of the 1980's China continued 
construction 
of "Huangfen" class missile boats (type 021), making changes in 
the composition of the missile and artillery armament: Eight 
(four twin) or six (two twin stern and single bow) stationary 
Ying-ji-1 ASM launchers were positioned on the sides of the 
boats in place of four Feilong-2 ASM launchers, and 30-mm twin 
gun mounts and fire control radar were installed in place of the 
bow and stern 25-mm twin automatic guns. The outfit of 
electronic equipment was supplemented by radiotechnical and ECM 
resources. 
  The transition to building small missile ships, however, 
does 
not mean rejection of further development of the 
small-displacement type of missile boats. Thus, in an 
international arms exhibition in Abu Dhabi in February 1993 the 
Chinese delegation displayed plans for a small missile boat 31 m 
long with a 118 tonne displacement, armed with four Ying-ji-1 
ASM launchers and a single-barrel 76-mm turret gun, the Oto 
Melara Super Rapid. In comparison with the "Hegu" and "Huoku" 
missile boats, this one is equipped with improved electronic 
equipment, and it has a propulsion unit with a greater power 
reserve (two diesel engines manufactured by Germany's MTU). 
  New "Huludao" and "Huxin" patrol boats are continuing to 
enter the fleet forces of the VMS NOAK and river forces of the 
border troops of the People's Armed Militia. 
  The "Huludao" class gunboat is a reduced version of the 
"Barkat" gunboat (Chinese-made), which is operating with the 
coastal defense forces of Pakistan. The boat's displacement was 
reduced from 400 to 180 tonnes, with no change in its overall 
layout. In contrast to the Pakistani model, the artillery 
armament of the new boat is limited to bow and stern 14.5-mm 
automatic guns (type 81). The boat's radius (1,000 miles under 
economical power) allows it to effectively patrol the 2,000-mile 
economic zone. The navy possesses four gunboats, and a fifth is 
under construction. 
  The "Huxin" class river gunboat is a modification of "Hapu" 
class boats. It has a higher freeboard and an altered 
superstructure configuration. Series production of the new boats 
began in 1989. There are currently eight "Huxin" class gunboats 
in operation, and another four are nearing completion. 
  Thus presence of a large grouping of combatant craft in the 
present stage (over 500 units) generally permits successful 
completion of the missions of fighting surface ships and 
maintaining favorable operating conditions in China's coastal 
zone. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy Sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46486 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma023___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-023 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs MORSKOY SBORNIK Nos 1 &amp; 2, 1994 </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   In Foreign Navies </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Mines Respond to Ship Seismic Field </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Mines Respond to Ship Seismic Field </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0391I Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK in Russian No 2, 1994 
(Signed to press 8 Feb 94) pp 85-86 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0391I </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MORSKOY SBORNIK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Capt 2d Rank V. Kamenev, cand tech sci, and Capt </F>
1st Rank (Ret) A. Votyakov, cand tech sci, docent: "Seismic Mine 
Firing Mechanisms"] 
  [Text] Many countries of the world--the 
USA, Germany, Great Britain, France, Italy, Japan and 
others--are undertaking significant efforts to improve mine 
weapons because, in the opinion of specialists, mobility, 
covertness of their placement, selectivity of destruction and 
the possibility of a prolonged effect upon the enemy during war 
raises them to the rank of strategic weapons. 
  Mines are also viewed as a variant of psychological and 
economic weapons, finding wide use in naval operations and local 
conflicts. The navies of many countries possess a substantial 
arsenal of mines and a sufficient number of carriers for their 
mass use, beginning with shallow coastal and ending with deep 
remote regions of the world ocean. 
  Recently, the "countenance" of mine weapons changed 
significantly in connection with use of the latest advances in 
science and technology. Microprocessor technology, capable of 
quickly analyzing and processing a large volume of information, 
has come to be used extensively in mine initiation, targeting 
and detonation systems. Progress in development of such systems 
also made it possible to put nontraditional fields to work, ones 
which had not been utilized earlier to create proximity firing 
mechanisms for mines. 
  Being a material body, a ship is known to be the carrier of 
a 
number of physical fields (magnetic, acoustic, hydrodynamic, 
seismic and so on). By its presence it unavoidably creates 
certain distortions in most natural physical fields, to which 
proximity systems of mine weapons react, isolating a useful 
signal from these distortions, to be used for analysis and to 
activate its devices. We will dwell here only on use of the 
seismic field for these purposes. 
  A ship's seismic field is secondary, and it is formed in the 
material of the sea-bed in response to the ship's hydrodynamic 
and hydroacoustic fields. Therefore, the corresponding sensitive 
elements of such mines evaluate and analyze the features of this 
field with the purpose of revealing perturbations introduced 
into the material of the sea-bed as a result of the presence of 
a ship or vessel in a particular region. 
  Figure 1 is a basic model of how a ship's seismic field is 
generated. It shows formation of a system consisting of a chain 
of elements that generate and shape the signal: the source of 
oscillations (the ship), the water column, an elastic medium 
(the sea-bed material), and a receiver (a mine with a seismic 
proximity firing mechanism). It is arbitrarily referred to by 
specialists as a complete seismic channel. A block diagram of a 
complete seismic channel is shown in Figure 2. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-023-43A>      Figure 1. Basic Model Showing Formation of a Ship's Seismic Field </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-023-44A>      Figure 2. Block Diagram of a Seismic Channel </FIG>


  The sum of characteristic signals of some force in a certain 
frequency band forms at the source of the oscillations. These 
oscillations transmit a perturbing effect through the water 
column to an elastic medium (the sea-bed material), evoking a 
seismic wave, which reaches the location of the mine and its 
seismic proximity firing mechanism. After the logical circuit 
analyzes the obtained information and compares it with a set of 
standards, the firing mechanism "makes the decision" regarding 
destruction of the object (target). 
  Judging from communications in the foreign press, mines 
equipped with seismic firing mechanisms began appearing in the 
ground forces of the USA and then in other armies in the 1960's. 
Sea mines appeared in the 1970's. They came to be used widely 
together with land models in shallow water, especially in 
anti-assault landing minefields. 
  The advent of such proximity firing mechanisms was brought 
on 
by: 

  -  the high speed with which seismic waves spread through the 
material of the sea-bed, owing to which the corresponding 
receiver could detect the ship's motion with some lead time, 
thus increasing the time the mine's equipment has to analyze the 
received signal in order to classify the object; 
  -  presence of a 
number of unique characteristics of seismic waves, which in 
contrast to hydroacoustic waves for example, make it possible to 
develop proximity firing mechanisms that are more resistant to 
interference; 
  -  the possibility of using geophysical methods for 
analyzing the signals--their grouping, correlation analysis and 
so on, making it possible to employ effective means of isolating 
the useful signal from the background of interference of natural 
(microcircuit) and artificial (explosions) origin. 


    The basic characteristics of mines of the world's leading 
countries with proximity firing mechanisms containing seismic 
channels are shown in the Table. 


Model,        Mine Type       Weight, kg              Laying      Type 
Country                                               Depth, m    Proximity 
                                                                  Firing 
                                                                  Mechanism 

                              Total     Explosive 



Mk 62, USA    Quickstrike     241       87            Up to 425   Mk 57 (M+S) 
              mine-bomb 

Mk 63, USA    "               483       214           Up to 30    Mk 57 (M+S) 
                                                                  or Mk 58 
                                                                  (M+S+HD) 

Mk 64, USA    "               921       430           Up to 45    " 

Mk 65, USA    "               900       500           Up to 100   " 


MOWAM, USA    mine-bomb       195       -             3-60        " (M+S+A) 

BLU-94/B,     "               -         -             Shallow     Mk 57 (M+S) 
USA                                                   water       or Mk 58 
                                                                  (M+S+HD) 

Mk 67, USA    Bottom          750       150           Up to 100   " (M+S) 


MLV-10/B,     Antitank        -         -             Up to 2     " 
USA 

BLU-31/B,     "               -         -             "           " 
USA 

Miff, FRG     "               3         0.9           "           S 

SB-MV,        "               5         2             "           " 
Italy 

LASSO, FRG    Horizontal      10.8      6.8           "           S+A 
              effect 
              antitank 

ERAM, USA     "               30        2.5           "           S+A 

Note: M--magnetic firing mechanisms; A--acoustic; HD--hydrodynamic; 
S--seismic 


  Mines with a seismic firing mechanism present the greatest 
danger because, on one hand, they are buried in the ground as a 
rule, which makes finding and destroying them much harder and 
less effective, and on the other hand, they also have other 
back-up forms of firing mechanisms. Intensive development of 
such mines is making it necessary to study the fine structure of 
a ship's seismic field more carefully, and to seek ways and 
means of fighting these mines. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Morskoy sbornik", 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46487 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Results of Winter Training Period </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Results of Winter Training Period </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0606153594 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 2 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> PM0606153594 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Colonel Anatoliy Belousov report: "No Such Thing As Bad </F>
Weather When It Comes to Combat Training. There Are Problems, 
But Even They Are Surmountable. Summer Training Period in 
Russian Armed Forces Began 1 June"] 
  [Text] The winter combat training period was more 
difficult than ever before. Judge for yourselves: Reform of 
the Armed Forces continues, troop groupings and infrastructures 
are being set up on Russian Federation territory, the withdrawal 
of troops to Russian territory is being completed, and mobile 
forces are being created.... And all this is going on when 
funding for military programs is clearly inadequate, there is a 
huge personnel shortage, and the social problems dogging 
servicemen are in practice insuperable today. 
  Nevertheless, due credit has to be given to the Army and 
Navy: Despite all these difficulties, they demonstrated during 
the winter period that they remain wholly battleworthy and 
controlled. On the whole, they fulfilled the training plans. 
And, a particularly important point, they proved their mettle 
quite well in command-staff training drills at both the 
strategic and the operational-strategic levels, and also in the 
"Baykal" and "Northwest" command staff exercises and in 
exercises for collective peacemaking forces and Border Troops on 
the Tajik-Afghan border and others. Defense Minister Army 
General Pavel Grachev noted that the weightiest successes were 
attained by the Strategic Missile Troops, Moscow and Leningrad 
Military Districts, the Group of Russian Troops in the 
Transcaucasus, and the Leningrad Naval Base. Matters fared 
worse in the Pacific Fleet. 
  So what were the specific results with which the troops and 
naval forces arrived at the halfway mark? What will the 
emphasis be on in the summer combat training period? 
<H5>  Strategic Missile Troops </H5>
  As Lieutenant Colonel Aleksandr Dolinin, our permanent 
correspondent for the Strategic Missile Troops, reports, during 
the winter half of the year the troops resolved a triple task, 
as it were. New regiments equipped with "Topol" missiles were 
brought into the effective combat strength, old missile 
complexes which had served double their recommended lifetime 
were removed from alert duty, and the testing of the new "Topol 
M" missile progressed vigorously at the test range in Mirnyy. 
  However, alert duty did not cease even for a minute against 
the backdrop of this extensive and complex work. Planned combat 
training is also progressing smoothly. Russian Federation 
Defense Minister Army General Pavel Grachev, Ivan Rybkin, and 
Vladimir Shumeyko, who visited the Strategic Missile Troops this 
year, made a high assessment of the missilemen's combat 
readiness. 
  When it comes to the plans and tasks for the summer training 
period, Lieutenant General Viktor Yesin, chief of the Strategic 
Missile Troops Main Staff Operations Directorate, stressed, then 
the triple task which was being resolved in the winter training 
period remains for the summer too. 
<H5>  Ground Troops </H5>
  The tasks for the winter period were on the whole fulfilled 
by the Ground Troops. Although only 70 percent of the planned 
number of exercises were conducted during the winter training 
period. The problems of maintaining combat readiness, improving 
the combat skill of troops, and bolstering discipline and law 
and order are now being tackled. Questions of manning units and 
combined units remain acute. At present primary officer posts 
are just over 60 percent filled, and the shortfall in the 
numbers of soldiers and sergeants is even greater. So it is 
planned to hire 90,000 men on a contract basis this year. 
<H5>  Air Forces </H5>
  An effective summary of the results of the winter training 
period, Colonel Gennadiy Lisenkov, press center chief, reports, 
was the "West-94" command-staff exercise conducted under the 
leadership of Air Force Commander-in-Chief Colonel General of 
Aviation Petr Deynekin. This exercise involved strategic 
bombers, fighters, frontal aviation, and practically all Air 
Force communications centers, and combat engineer service 
subunits and rear services subunits. 
  The crews performing alert duty proved to be up to the mark. 
The large strategic formations commanded by General V. Kozlov 
and General A. Vasilyev were commended. 
  But the airmen also have plenty of problems. The improvement 
of existing aviation formations, which are left with only 
"fourth generation" combat equipment, has been set for the 
summer training period and the period through the year 2000. 
New hardware has to be mastered quickly. However, there are 
shortages at every step here. The dearth of aviation fuel, 
spare parts, and specialist equipment used at airfields is being 
felt keenly.... 
<H5>  Navy </H5>
  The substantial changes in the foreign and domestic 
situation 
required that the entire system of views on the organizational 
development and utilization of naval forces be radically 
revised. A fitting concept was elaborated. By the end of the 
winter training period substantial measures to reform the Navy 
and give it qualities consonant with present conditions were 
completed. Combat service and alert duty remained the most 
important indicators of the real status and activity of the 
Navy. These were implemented according to plan by the forces of 
all fleets in the light of the actual situation and operational 
need. Daily combat service at sea and alert duty at bases was 
performed by several dozen ships, and almost one half of these 
were submarines. 
  According to the plans, in the summer training period ships 
will continue to resolve tasks at sea, including in the Indian 
Ocean, the Mediterranean Sea, and also the Barents and Okhotsk 
Seas, and in the Atlantic Ocean. 
<H5>  Air Defense Troops </H5>
  During the last training year the only regiment in Russia's 
Armed Forces to be deemed excellent was the Air Defense regiment 
under the command of Colonel Anatoliy Akulinin. It is too early 
to say what the situation will be this year, but the fact that 
the leaders inspired others in their wake is indisputable. 
  As Commander-in-Chief Colonel General of Aviation Viktor 
Prudnikov stressed, though numbers were cut, the quality and 
reliability of the Air Defense Troops were maintained. 
  The "Northwest" and "Repulse-94" command staff exercises 
tested and rehearsed the principles of the organization and 
control of various types of Troops and air defense systems. 
During the training period 31 exercises were carried out, and 
five surface-to-air missile units and seven aviation regiments 
conducted live fire. Those serving under Lieutenant General 
Anatoliy Bochkov were deemed to be the best. Particular 
attention will be paid during summer combat training to the 
system for monitoring Russia's airspace and to improving the 
missile early warning system. The principle for structuring the 
air defense system is also to change. It will become 
territorial. 
  The main efforts will be channeled into developing teamwork 
and coordination and training crews and subunits for action in a 
complex, rapidly changing situation, making maximum use of the 
combat potential of hardware and arms. Exercises will be 
conducted jointly with units from other branches of the Armed 
Forces. 
  But, our permanent correspondent for the Air Defense Troops 
Lieutenant Colonel Aleksandr Ivanov reports, unless it proves 
possible soon to rectify the situation regarding the provision 
of units with resources making it possible to carry out combat 
training systematically, combat readiness may decline. 
  As we can see, it has not yet proved possible in all 
branches 
of the Armed Forces to organize the training process the way it 
should ideally be. The country and the Army are going through 
only too difficult a time. So all the more respect is warranted 
by those military districts, combined units, and units where, in 
the face of objective difficulties, people are finding a way of 
retaining a planned and systematic approach and carrying out the 
necessary drills with command personnel and training exercises. 
The combat readiness of the Army and Navy is based on such 
military formations, and they primarily determine the face of 
Russia's present Armed Forces. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46488 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yarov on Servicemen's Social Protection </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Yarov on Servicemen's Social Protection </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0706162394 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 4 Jun 94 pp 
1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM0706162394 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Russian Federation Government Deputy </F>
Chairman Yu.F. Yarov by Ivan Ivanyuk under the "Interlocutor for 
Today" rubric; place, date not given: "Petty Economies in 
Maintaining the Army Are Impermissible"] 
  [Text] [Ivanyuk] For many years social policy in our 
country was built around the paternalist principle -- the 
state's "fatherly" concern for its citizens. What approaches 
are being established now and how can they be realized? 
  [Yarov] If by paternalism you mean ostentatious 
"philanthropy" for the sake of creating an illusion of concern 
for the interests of working people, then I cannot agree that 
our state feigned concern for its citizens. Our social 
achievements since 1917 have been widely recognized, and they 
can hardly be underrated now. It is quite another matter that 
these achievements were founded on a certain impersonality. 
  Today, however, the character of social policy is radically 
changing; it is now increasingly oriented toward assisting 
specific people, those who really do need assistance. And 
believe me, this is a very complex task, much more complex than 
lavishing care on absolutely everyone. 
  The main ways of reforming the economy and making social 
transformations are determined by the Russian Federation 
Government's program "The Development of Reforms and the 
Stabilization of the Russian Economy," the implementation of 
which was begun last year and is scheduled to run through 1995. 
  According to a forecast by the Russian Ministry of 
Economics, 
these social policy measures will stabilize the standard of 
living of the bulk of the population by the end of 1994. 
Citizens' income will increase 310 percent, including an 
increase in nominal wages, pensions, benefits, and grants of 340 
percent. Although the budget resources allocated for 1994 can 
only ensure the minimum social guarantees for Russian citizens. 
  [Ivanyuk] What priorities has the government specified in 
the social sphere for servicemen and members of their families? 
  [Yarov] Bearing in mind the limited possibilities of a 
newspaper interview, I will only dwell on the main points. 
First and foremost, we have finished formulating the legal 
basis of social protection for servicemen and persons discharged 
from military service within the framework of implementing the 
Russian Federation Law "On the Status of Servicemen." The 
formulation and implementation of a blueprint for targeted 
social support for servicemen who find themselves in the most 
unfortunate situations is extremely urgent: We are talking 
about servicemen who are without an apartment, who have been 
discharged without a civilian profession, who are performing 
their service in military conflict zones and distant garrisons, 
and who have been forced to redeploy to garrisons that have not 
been fully prepared. Moreover, we intend to ratify a list of 
minimum social conditions without which it is forbidden to 
implement measures to cut back and redeploy troops. 
  Also on the agenda is the introduction of a system of 
measures to ensure active enlistment of nonbudgetary resources, 
land and other potential resources, real estate belonging to 
military subunits and formations scheduled for cutbacks, and 
also citizens' private resources in order to resolve the housing 
problems being experienced by servicemen. Let me mention 
another topical problem -- the conclusion of interstate 
agreements ensuring civilized living conditions and legal 
guarantees for former servicemen in CIS countries. 
  [Ivanyuk] The government believes that the country should 
not be turned into one big social security department, we need 
to create incentives to earn money. But servicemen cannot do 
this and most of them believe that the state is failing to 
compensate them adequately for the expenses of their nomadic 
lifestyle and the lack of housing, nor is it providing them with 
the opportunity to find jobs for their wives or a normal 
education for their children, and so forth. What do you think? 
And what is to be done with the law "On the Status of 
Servicemen," half of which does not work? 
  [Yarov] Of course, the government's position on this 
question cannot be applied to servicemen by virtue of the 
specific nature of their activity. The Russian Government 
believes that the social protection of servicemen and members of 
their families is a task for the state. The program of priority 
state measures to strengthen social protection of Russian 
Federation servicemen, persons discharged from military service, 
and members of their families in conditions of economic and 
military reform and the list of state measures to implement the 
Russian Federation Law "On the Status of Servicemen" are geared 
toward this task and have been adopted because of it. 
  The following state programs have been ratified: To provide 
housing from 1993 through 1995 to servicemen, persons discharged 
from military service, internal affairs organs staff, and 
members of their families; and to withdraw Russian forces from 
the territory of other states and subsequently provide them with 
housing and facilities. 
  As regards the second part of your question, I must remind 
you that the law "On the Status of Servicemen" is the first 
legislative act to establish a system of fundamental rights and 
social guarantees for servicemen and persons discharged from 
military service. It was enthusiastically adopted although it 
was elaborated in special conditions when experience of the 
systematic solution of this problem had not yet been built up 
and confrontation between the legislative and executive branches 
could already be felt, and also the state's economic potential 
was not forecast, which meant that a number of benefits could 
not be delivered. In some cases the text of the law did not 
specify the sources of financing. The legislators also made 
flagrant errors. For example, the law affects compensation to 
servicemen for expenditure incurred on treatment at sanatoriums 
and health resorts. The benefit introduced by the law has made 
the previous situation even worse (25 percent of servicemen's 
travel costs are paid, and 50 percent of their family's). 
  Nevertheless, during 1993 the government adopted 11 decrees 
designed to implement the law. Among the issues resolved was 
the the question you yourself raised about finding jobs for 
servicemen's wives. This has been resolved by the Russian 
Government's decrees No. 1215 and 1217 dated 22 November 1993. 
  At the present time the government is working on five 
elaborated draft decrees, the adoption of which will bring us 
close to implementing the law in full (on the procedure for 
introducing benefits in respect of payments for apartments, 
municipal services, and apartment telephones, travel on public 
transport, insuring the property of servicemen serving in 
"trouble spots," and providing financial assistance for 
individual and cooperative housing construction). A total of 10 
draft decrees are in the final stage of coordination. In order 
to implement a whole series of other benefits, the government 
must obtain from the legislators a law on amending and adding to 
10 legislative acts in connection with the adoption of the law 
"On the Status of Servicemen." The State Duma is planning to 
examine this draft law in the near future. 
  [Ivanyuk] Last year considerable funds were earmarked for 
local organs of power for the construction of housing for 
servicemen released into the reserve, but a considerable 
proportion of these funds did not reach their destination. Will 
the picture not be repeated this year? 
  [Yarov] I should like, in answering this question, first of 
all to try to remove the prejudice with regard to local organs 
of power. The majority cannot be accused of squandering the 
funds allocated for the construction of housing for those 
released from military service. The problem is far more 
complex. And its roots lie primarily in the country's economic 
potential. 
  Although complaints could be leveled against some of them 
for 
their inability to deal with the funds they have received and 
sometimes, why hide it, the desire to resolve problems of the 
development of mains utility networks and the urban 
infrastructure using some of the appropriations received from 
the federal coffers for the construction of housing for those 
released from military service. The money would seem to have 
gone nowhere except into construction but at the same time the 
number of commissioned apartments can only be expressed in 
symbolic figures. Thus, under equal conditions, in 1993 the 
Sverdlovsk Oblast Administration managed to ensure the 
commissioning of 71 percent of the planned level of housing, the 
St. Petersburg Administration 69 percent, the Tomsk and Kemerovo 
Oblast Administrations 63 percent, and the Tyumen Oblast and 
Moscow City Administrations 60 percent. At the same time in 
Novgorod and Amur Oblasts only 2 percent of the apartments 
planned for the year were constructed while in Pskov, Astrakhan, 
and Kostroma Oblasts the figure was 5 percent, in Tver and 
Kaliningrad Oblasts and Maritime Kray the figure was 6 percent, 
and in Leningrad Oblast 9 percent. 
  This year the question of providing housing for this 
category 
of citizens will be no easier to resolve. At the same time 
there are no grounds for pessimism. Effective steps are being 
taken to ensure the rhythmical nature of financing and the 
implementation of regional programs. The ministries and 
departments involved have now submitted to the government a 
draft decree on the procedure for rendering free financial aid 
to servicemen and citizens released from military service who 
have joined housing construction cooperatives and are 
constructing individual houses. 
  As for the Federation components, we intend to build 
relations with them according to the following scheme: When you 
have received money from the federal budget for the construction 
of housing for those released from military service, you must be 
responsible for this money in terms of erecting the maximum 
number of apartments. 
  [Ivanyuk] The basic guidelines of social policy for this 
year provide for the elaboration and implementation of 
comprehensive regional programs for the close accommodation of 
and rational provision of jobs for servicemen. Yet plans of 
this kind existed last year and the year before that.... Is all 
this not Utopian? You familiarized yourself with the experience 
of the social adaptation of former servicemen when you were in 
St. Petersburg. How do you assess it? 
  [Yarov] No, it is no Utopia. After all, today the regions 
have acquired the opportunity to elaborate their own programs 
and to attract for their implementation both the funds earmarked 
by the budget and other nontraditional sources of finance and to 
use all available reserves and conditions. This became possible 
after the Russian Federation president signed the 24 December 
1993 edict no. 2281 "On the Elaboration and Introduction of 
Nonbudget Forms of Investment in the Housing Sphere," which 
provided the opportunity for the active implementation of these 
programs. 
  If we are speaking of the regional program for Leningrad 
Oblast, then it is still too early to assess the real successes 
here. I have had occasion to criticize them more than praise 
them. 
  [Ivanyuk] What do the Armed Forces mean for you personally? 
To judge by the consistency with which you investigate 
servicemen's problems this is connected not only with the fact 
that you are leader of the interdepartmental commission for the 
social questions of servicemen and members of their families. 
Are you personally also not indifferent to their problems? 
  [Yarov] It has so happened that in my work I have had to 
collaborate a lot with the military and to visit military units 
and ships. So I know of the Armed Forces' problems at first 
hand. They existed in the past, and they exist now. And they 
must be resolved, and as soon as possible. The people who have 
devoted their lives to serving Russia and who perform the tasks 
set them under very hard conditions, often risking their lives, 
must feel the state's special concern and attention for them and 
their families. The petty saving of money on the maintenance of 
the servicemen could weaken Russian statehood and result in the 
collapse of the army and far greater expenditure on its 
restoration. You obviously agree with me that it is simply 
intolerable to be indifferent toward such issues. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46489 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Higher Defense Funding at Mercy of Lobbyists </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Higher Defense Funding at Mercy of Lobbyists </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0706171194 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 7 Jun 94 pp 
1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM0706171194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Yermolin under "Events and Commentary" </F>
rubric: "The 18-Trillion Ruble Contest: Will Appreciation of 
the Country's Security Interests Prevail?"] 
  [Text] Again, for the umpteenth time in the last month, 
KRASNAYA ZVEZDA is addressing the problem of the defense budget 
for the current year, 1994. This week the State Duma -- if it 
does not again, for some reason, have to change the agenda -- is 
to complete discussion of the draft Law "On the Federal Budget 
for 1994." As readers will be aware, military expenditure has 
been the focus of discussion. The government draft law 
specifies a figure of 37 trillion for it. Precisely this number 
of rubles [R] is, in the opinion of the drafters of the law, 
quite sufficient to cover actual defense expenditure. The 
Defense Ministry regards R55 trillion as the minimum sum. Since 
the State Duma passed the first reading of the government 
version 11 May, the Russian president, the head of the Russian 
Government, and the Federation Council have come out in favor of 
allocating the missing R18 trillion. A number of parliamentary 
factions and committees have also deemed it necessary to stress 
publicly their agreement with the military. These include the 
Committee on Economic Policy. 
  I would remind readers that this committee, in the person of 
its chairman, Sergey Glazyev, did try to "bump up" the defense 
budget to R55 trillion during the first reading. Many deputies 
voted in favor at the time, but the requisite number of votes 
failed to be mustered. Recommendations on the draft Law "On the 
Federal Budget for 1994" have now been prepared in the bowels of 
the Committee on Economic Policy. The amendments proposed by 
the committee affect a number of items in the draft law, 
including those coming under the "National Defense" heading. 
The proposed breakdown of military expenditure reads as 
follows: upkeep of the Armed Forces -- R28 trillion; arms and 
military hardware purchases -- R11.1 trillion; research and 
development -- R5.1 trillion; capital construction -- R7.1 
trillion; Ministry of Atomic Energy expenditure -- R1.2 
trillion; servicemen's pensions -- R2.5 trillion. A total of 
R55 trillion. The following question will thus be put 
point-blank during the second reading: CAN DEFENSE EXPENDITURE 
BE INCREASED WITHOUT IN SO DOING INCREASING THE BUDGET DEFICIT? 
  Sergey Glazyev believes it can. The committee's 
recommendations name two main sources of extra revenue: revenue 
derived from the privatization of federally owned facilities, 
and revenue derived from the abolition of concessions on 
export-import duties. The first accounts for an increase of 
R13.7 trillion, the second -- R6.6 trillion. 
  In Glazyev's opinion, the sum to be derived from 
privatization indicated in the government draft is unjustifiably 
low. "Judge for yourself," the deputy says. "The nominal value 
of the state property undergoing privatization for money is R120 
trillion. The market assessment, from the standpoint of the 
profitability of the property, is R15 trillion. The export side 
of Gazprom alone, which it has been resolved to privatize this 
year, is R100 trillion, while the government is planning to 
obtain a little more than R1 trillion in revenue from 
privatization." Moreover, Glazyev is convinced that a number of 
other opportunities to obtain revenue from the privatization of 
property are still not being taken into account. For example, 
the privatization of plots of land on which enterprises 
undergoing privatization are sited, which is contained in the 
draft program, will yield quite a lot of revenue, particularly 
as the bulk of the enterprises is located within the boundaries 
of the big cities, where the price of land is climbing rapidly. 
As people will know, many enterprises were privatized with the 
state retaining a block of 20 to 51 percent of the shares, but, 
according to the parliamentarian, "The State Committee for the 
Management of State Property has not given to date any 
intelligible figures on the placement of these shares or the 
dividends obtained on them." Sergey Glazyev regards the sum of 
R15 trillion as a low estimate of the revenue from privatization 
and the commercial use of state property provided, of course, 
that, in accordance with the officially announced intentions, we 
end the stage of free "voucher" privatization and instill order 
in the milieu of state property management. 
  It must be stressed that Glazyev and his colleagues are 
talking not so much about lost privatization opportunities as 
fundamental changes in its implementation. They insist that the 
privatization program be implemented by decisions of the owner 
(the state). 
  As far as export-import duties are concerned, the potential 
here, in the opinion of the Committee on Economic Policy, lies 
not just in abolishing the illegally awarded concessions but in 
"boosting budgetary revenue by reducing the smuggling in of 
goods worth several billion dollars per annum." Establishing 
currency control and preventing the export of capital could also 
provide extra budget revenue by reducing shady transactions. I 
think that when Glazyev, a former minister of foreign economic 
relations, cites the $20 billion to $30 billion which Russian 
entrepreneurs keep in foreign bank accounts, he knows what he is 
talking about. The injection of even half that money into 
Russia's economy would substantially boost economic activity and 
augment the revenue side of the budget. 
  It should be noted that the recommendations of the Committee 
on Economic Policy are designed not just to boost the defense 
budget but also expenditure on state support for sectors of the 
national economy, sociocultural measures, science, medicine, and 
the implementation of international treaties to scrap, reduce, 
and limit arms. And all this through additional revenue in the 
light of the priorities declared in the president's message to 
the Federal Assembly. Through, as Sergey Glazyev put it, a 
"more assiduous" attitude toward state property. 
  It is clear that Sergey Glazyev expresses the views of a 
particular economic school, and his political allegiances are 
also entirely specific -- he is a member of the Democratic Party 
of Russia faction -- but another thing is clear too: The 
interests of national security should not be alien to any 
political force. And the question then arises: WHY HAS IT BEEN 
DECIDED TO COMBAT THE BUDGET DEFICIT AT THE ARMY'S EXPENSE? 
  There is no shortage of public assurances by statesmen that 
they understand the problems of the Armed Forces and share the 
concern over the future of the defense sector and its scientific 
and technical potential. But when the time comes to allocate 
the money, it becomes clear that the idea of "shock savings" on 
defense needs is close to the heart of quite a number of 
government members and parliamentarians. And it is the defense 
budget which is the focus of attention of government and Duma 
debates. In our search for an answer as to why the army is so 
blithely made the scapegoat for everything, including economic 
blunders, we have already given a platform to people of the most 
diverse political persuasion. Here is Sergey Glazyev's opinion. 
  The government is deliberately pursuing an 
expenditure-cutting policy. Not just the Armed Forces, but 
higher education, health care, science, and so forth are being 
underfinanced. The shadow sector continues to submerge the 
economy, and tax revenues are declining even more quickly than 
output. But even in this situation the government pursues the 
goal of lowering inflation by reducing the budget deficit and 
the amount of credit issued. 
  This policy is based on the naive belief that, in accordance 
with monetarist ideas on the economy, all the remaining problems 
will sort themselves out automatically. If we maintain a small 
budget deficit, inflation will fall, investment and output will 
pick up, budget revenue will increase, and there will also be 
money for expenditure. In reality, everything in our country is 
heading in the opposite direction: output is in decline, budget 
revenue is falling, budget expenditure is also falling, 
nonpayment is on the increase, and inflation is intensifying; to 
overcome inflation they lower the budget deficit -- and 
expenditure shrinks even further, output falls, and so forth. 
As the well-known proverb has it, an idiot can't do anything 
right. Moreover, such a policy proves to be both convenient 
(you can do nothing -- keep the budget deficit down and wait 
until output picks up) and advantageous (you always have the 
choice of whom to give to and whom not -- and, furthermore, 
without any responsibility). Hence the desire to reduce 
expenditure. 
  In Glazyev's opinion, those whose interests are poorly 
represented in the government leadership are the first to come 
under attack. That is to say, we are talking about a relatively 
new phenomeneon in our life, namely, lobbying. It transpires 
that the economic advisability and significance for the state of 
a particular program are sidelined -- the main thing is to get 
busy with your elbows. The army -- like, say, scientists, 
doctors, and teachers -- has not learned this yet. But again a 
question comes to mind: IF THE PRESIDENT, THE PRIME MINISTER, 
AND THE FEDERATION COUNCIL HAVE COME OUT IN FAVOR OF A 
R55-TRILLION DEFENSE BUDGET, WHO THEN IS AGAINST? 
  So far the State Duma has been against. But Sergey Glazyev 
cannot entirely accept this, if only because the Duma passed 
without discussion, on trust, as it were, the budget presented 
by the government for the second quarter of the current year. 
And all the holdups in financing the ratified articles [of the 
budget] during the first six months of the year in no way stem 
from the Duma. I asked Sergey Yuryevich how actively the 
government cooperated with the parliamentary committees in the 
runup to the second reading. After all, the press had reported 
the stance of Russian President Boris Yeltsin and the intentions 
of Russian Head of Government Viktor Chernomyrdin "to tinker 
with the defense budget." It is logical to suppose that, after 
that, joint work with government representatives was in full 
swing in the Duma committees. It turns out there was nothing of 
the kind. No fundamental modifications of the defense budget 
were proposed by the government. "The paradox of today's 
situation," according to Sergey Glazyev, "is that it is the 
Finance Ministry's decisions rather than presidential edicts or 
government decrees that are actually being carried out today. 
The Finance Ministry plays the same role in the state today as 
the CPSU Central Committee once did." All the budget-financed 
sectors are now dependent on the whim of Finance Ministry 
functionaries. The budget, however, is an instrument of 
statewide policy. The government answers -- must answer -- for 
its preparation and execution. For the time being, however, 
according to Glazyev, "the real money is received by those who 
know how decisions are made in the Finance Ministry and are 
consequently able to influence them." 
  Clearly, it has to be understood that the future of the 
defense sector and indeed of the entire Armed Forces is decided 
by financiers today. And they alone. And even if the Duma does 
ratify defense expenditure of R55 trillion, it could well be 
that no more than R37 trillion actually ends up in the defense 
coffers. 
  SO, WILL THE STATE DUMA RATIFY A "SUBSISTENCE MINIMUM" FOR 
THE ARMED FORCES OR NOT? 
  Sergey Glazyev hopes that it will, although there are more 
than enough grounds for pessimism: We are, after all, talking 
about altering the correlation of the revenue and expenditure 
sides. And this correlation was already ratified during the 
first reading. Consequently, either the budget adoption 
procedures will have to be violated or new, extrabudgetary funds 
acquired. And, of course, departmental interests (interests 
encumbered, moreover, by political considerations) will tell 
here. Admittedly, the Budget Committee -- an opponent of the 
Defense and Economic Policy Committees -- has already agreed to 
add another R4 trillion to the defense budget. A half-measure, 
to be sure, but movement for all that. 
  The main thing, Sergey Glazyev told me as we parted, is not 
to build up illusions -- if the State Duma doesn't give the army 
and the defense sector the R18 trillion, no one else will 
provide them. Neither the president nor the government has any 
"hidden reserves." 
  Consequently, the sole hope is that the interests of 
national 
security, and no others, will now prevail in the State Duma. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46490 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Columnist Criticizes Concealed Military Spending </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Columnist Criticizes Concealed Military Spending </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0806094194 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 7 Jun 94 
First Edition pp 1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM0806094194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Anatoliy Zhuravlev article under the "Day's Topic" rubric: </F>
"We Are All Hostages of the Military-Industrial Complex. Charm 
of the Directors' and Generals' Budget"] 
  [Text] On 11 May 1994, following the heartfelt speech in 
the State Duma by V. Chernomyrdin, chairman of the Russian 
Federation Government, who declared that "the government has 
done the maximum possible to observe the fragile balance of 
everyone's interests in the draft that has been submitted," the 
most important indicators of the State Budget for 1994 were 
approved: 
  income -- 124,477.0 billion rubles [R] 
  expenditure -- R194,495.31 billion 
  deficit -- R70,018.31 billion (36 percent of the sum of 
expenditure). 
  Votes for -- 237; votes against -- 77; abstentions -- 12. 
  Ten minutes after this vote it suddenly came to light that 
"there is a more than two-fold discrepancy in expenditure 
between the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of Defense: 87 
and 37. This "discovery" was made by A. Piskunov, deputy 
chairman of the Duma Defense Committee. 
  What is this figure "37"? It is the sum of expenditure in 
Section V -- "National Defense" -- R37.126 trillion. 
  It turns out that the figure of R37 trillion for expenditure 
in respect of the Russian Federation Ministry of Defense, which 
features in all the previous versions of the State Budget 
submitted by the government, does not suit the military 
department, which secured the creation of a special commission 
consisting of State Duma deputies and representatives of the 
government and the Security Council. In a closed session the 
commission decided on defense expenditure in the sum of R55 
trillion, i.e. 50 percent more than proposed by the government 
and signed by the prime minister. It is curious that the 
commission's corresponding protocol on this subject supposedly 
even has a corresponding conciliatory resolution of the Russian 
Federation president, but the chairman of the government knows 
nothing at all about this protocol. He at once confirmed this: 
"...I do not know who discussed this question with whom or 
where. It is possible to examine everything not only within the 
limits of a 36-percent deficit." But since R55 trillion 
corresponds to 41 percent [figures as puiblished] of the budget 
deficit, the corresponding amendment to the Law on the State 
Budget did not get through. Despite repeated attempts to force 
through this additional expenditure. 
  They decided to return to this subject later, and a closed 
plenary session of the State Duma was even planned for 27 May to 
examine secret [zakrytyy] subheads of the budget. The session 
did not take place. I will not repeat the sham grounds for 
deferring this examination until 8 June this year. I believe 
that the deep-seated reason lies in tactics, as is customary 
with the military. Undisguised agitation for an increase in 
military spending has been mounted in the pages of the press and 
on radio and television during these two weeks. Even deputies 
on the reforming wing have begun to frighten their other 
colleagues with the sociopolitical consequences of underfunding 
the defense sphere, with the loss of military technologies, with 
a shortfall in export proceeds, etc. The recommendation which 
the upper chamber of the Federal Assembly formulated at its 
closed session 2 June 1994 is also along the same lines. So 
/the adoption of a so-called compromise military budget, but 
essentially an astronomical one forcibly extorted by the bigwigs 
of the military-industrial complex, is virtually predetermined/ 
[passage between slantlines printed in boldface]. They will 
vote, like dear little deputies wishing to please the military, 
for R55 trillion for our generals and general directors 
[generaly i generalnyye]. 
  Before showing what this is fraught with, I should, for 
purposes of a clearer comparison, decipher this colossal sum 
somewhat: 
  maintenance of the Armed Forces -- R26.3 trillion 
  purchases and development of armament and military hardware 
-- R17.4 trillion 
  capital construction and expenditure by the Ministry of 
Atomic Energy -- R8.8 trillion 
  servicemen's pensions -- R2.5 trillion. 
  Let us note that the Ministry of Defense has 2.1 million 
servicemen. And yet there are also many other military people 
in Russia. There are approximately 300,000 in the Internal 
Troops of the Ministry of Internal Affairs, approximately 
200,000 in the Border Troops, and almost 80,000 in the Federal 
Counterintelligence Service. Expenditure on these departments 
"sits" in Section VII -- "Law-Enforcement Activity and Security 
Organs" -- and amounts to R12 trillion. 
  Let us count up, dear reader, and add on to the R55 trillion 
the other expenditure on people who wear shoulder boards, as 
well as other expenditure connected with preparation for war and 
for other emergency situations. What used to be called "civil 
defense" has now acquired the name of the "Ministry for Affairs 
of Civil Defense, Emergency Situations..." and is headed by 
generals, has thousands of servicemen, and uses up approximately 
R2 trillion in Section XII, including R344 billion on 
mobilization preparation. 
  Does Section XI -- "Replenishment of State Stocks and 
Reserves" -- have no bearing on defense expenditure? Some R5.9 
trillion is planned for this, plus almost R0.5 trillion under 
Section X -- "Reserve Funds." 
  Section XIV -- "Financial Assistance for Organs of State 
Power of Components of the Russian Federation and Local 
Self-Management" -- contains the following interesting long line: 
  "-- subsidies for budgets of closed 
administrative-territorial formations within whose bounds 
installations of the Russian Federation Ministry of Defense and 
Ministry of Atomic Energy are located." 
  The small town of Shkotovo-17 in Maritime Kray, or the city 
of Petropavlovsk-Kamchatskiy-50. You will not find them on the 
map, but this unexpectedly slipped through in the draft State 
Budget: "to transfer from the Federal Budget on account of the 
first quarter of 1994..." subsidies in the sum of almost R3 
billion each. Line by line -- and R583 billion has been clocked 
up for a few dozen numbered cities. Is this military or 
nonmilitary expenditure? 
  There is one more "nonmilitary" subhead of expenditure -- 
XIV 
[figure as published], entitled "Other State Expenditure." 
Military expenditure is also hidden here. For example: 
  -- payment of allowances for dependants and children of 
servicemen -- R150 billion 
  -- the Russian Defense-Sports-Technical Society (the former 
DOSAAF [Voluntary Society for the Promotion of the Army, 
Aviation, and Navy]) -- R9 billion 
  -- rent for use of the Baykonur Cosmodrome -- R135 billion 
  -- the Federal Railroad Troops Directorate -- R282 billion 
  -- the Federal Road Construction Directorate under the 
Russian Federation Ministry of Defense, and others -- R171 
billion. 
  This subhead is particularly rich in concealed additional 
expenditure of a military nature. It includes, in addition to 
that enumerated, military research by the Ministry of Health, 
the Committee for Convention Problems of Disarmament, the State 
Technical Commission, and other departments headed by generals. 
Also hidden here is expenditure by the Federal Directorate of 
Special Construction with its 100,000 military construction 
workers and multitude of generals, other military construction 
directorates, corporations, etc. I managed to dig up 
approximately R1.5 trillion in expenditure of a military nature 
concealed under this subhead. 
  It is hardly worth denying the involvement with the military 
sphere of the R755 billion on the "defense industry conversion" 
line or the R837 billion under "realization of international 
treaties on the elimination, reduction, and limitation of arms." 
  I could enumerate still more, but I have already clocked up 
a 
sum approaching R80 trillion. I am not sure whether the R4.2 
trillion contained in line IV -- "Basic Research and Promotion 
of Scientific and Technical Progress" -- (much of which will, 
moreover, be used in military matters) will be realized or 
whether Moscow, which is stuffed with military structures, will 
get its R3 trillion in subventions to perform the functions of 
the capital. I am not sure whether VUZ's [higher educational 
institutions] and vocational and technical schools will get R5 
trillion, and culture and art R0.86 trillion. But I do not 
think that anyone is in any doubt that the aforementioned R80 
trillion will definitely be spent. For at the beginning of the 
year a soldier's complete set of uniform clothes along with 
synthetic leather [kirzovyy] boots cost R500,000. How many 
wearers of boots and uniforms we have! Not counting the 
generals' expensive stars. All this unproductive, 
nonreturnable, irreversible expenditure in the State Budget will 
certainly be passed. This is almost 65 percent of the revenue 
part of the State Budget. Truly a wartime budget. 
  The author has gone too far, you will say. Not at all. I 
still have not added in expenditure on the current upkeep of 
military commissariats, on severance pay on being drafted for 
military service, on funding of military training in technical 
colleges and VUZ's, expenditure under the Russian Federation Law 
"On the Status of Servicemen" (running to many trillions of 
rubles), the average monthly wages of enterprise workers at the 
time of their participation in military training courses, etc. 
In addition, hidden funding of military expenditure is provided 
out of the income made from selling military property and from 
the economic activities of economically accountable enterprises 
-- for example, the 100 military state farms. This and other 
revenue is not taken into account in the budget. 
  By the way. The government recently submitted to the State 
Duma information entitled "On the Implementation of the Federal 
Budget for 1993." Take a look, messieurs deputies, at this very 
curious document. 
  It states, in particular: "Total revenue -- R17,124.03 
billion." In the "expenditure" column: line "8. Defense -- 
R7,209 billion" (42 percent of the revenue part). Lines 2, 6, 
7, 10, 16, and 21 also contain approximately R3,500 billion of 
additional expenditure of a military nature. Altogether, 
approximately 63 percent of the revenue part. This was the 
budget that was realized last year. In 1994 there was an 
attempt to lower this threshold just a little. But this attempt 
came up against very tough resistance from the 
military-industrial complex and its latter-day lobbyists in the 
Federal Assembly. They make everyone knuckle under: their 
colleagues at the voting desks, the government, the president, 
and you and me, the taxpayers. 
  We are all hostages of our military-industrial complex. No 
military reform is taking place in the country. The switch to 
professional Armed Forces is being blocked with references to 
Russia's special geopolitical position, and there are still many 
millions of soldiers. Russia's technological backwardness is 
being conserved. All this behind closed doors. They use 
mystery to conceal lies. The economic consequences of the 
militarized nature of the budget and of the resumption of the 
arms race will be catastrophic. It is time to call a halt and 
look back. For Russia has been living throughout the 20th 
century under virtual wartime conditions and under the occupying 
regime of its own homegrown military-industrial complex. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46491 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Grachev Performance in Brussels Wins Praise </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Grachev Performance in Brussels Wins Praise </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0706103194 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 7 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> PM0706103194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Manki Ponomarev article: "The Russian Side Firmly Upheld </F>
Its Interests. The Western Press Acknowledges This, Commenting 
on the Results of the Visit to Brussels of General of the Army 
Pavel Grachev, Russian Federation Minister of Defense"] 
  [Text] The visit of General of the Army Pavel Grachev, 
Russian minister of defense, to Brussels at the end of May, his 
meetings with the NATO leadership, and his speech to the North 
Atlantic Cooperation Council had been planned long ago. The 
closer the date of the visit came, the more attention it 
attracted and the more frequently the Western countries' mass 
media carried forecasts of its course and results. Very 
contradictory opinions were expressed -- some people even 
predicted the visit's total failure. 
  Such a pessimistic approach was evidently connected with the 
delay over Russia's joining the "Partnership for Peace" program, 
which came as a surprise to many people, and with the 
contradictory statements on this which came out of Moscow. 
"Initially Russia's position was not clear enough," Paris LE 
MONDE stated. Assessments of this kind only served to boost 
interest in the upcoming Brussels meeting. 
  But the most important thing was that, despite everything, 
Russia's authority and influence and its role in ensuring 
stability in Europe and throughout the world are so great that 
far-reaching expectations were associated with this meeting. 
People were expecting the talks with the Russian minister to 
elucidate, above all, the prospects for developing relations 
between the Russian Federation and NATO and, consequently, to 
draft a scheme of a future European security system. Naturally, 
they were also expecting an exposition of the fundamentals of 
Russian military doctrine. 
  Thus, Pavel Grachev was faced with a difficult task. He had 
to convince his former opponents and potential partners of 
Russia's fundamentally new approach to problems of ensuring 
security, to secure their approval for the principles of the 
Russian Federation's joining the "Partnership for Peace" 
program, to eliminate accusations of Moscow's neo-imperialist 
ambitions, and, at the same time, to uphold its right to special 
relations with the West, mindful of Russia's status as a great 
power with tremendous nuclear might and its permanent membership 
of the UN Security Council. This under conditions of NATO's 
obvious reluctance to assume additional commitments to Russia 
out of fear that this might bring about a weakening of the 
alliance's influence in the world. 
  There is no need to describe in detail the entire course of 
the Russian Federation defense minister's visit to Brussels. It 
received quite wide coverage in the Russian press. But I must 
emphasize at once that his mission succeeded. LE MONDE wrote at 
the end of the visit that it "made it possible to draw the 
sides' positions closer together and showed the goodwill for 
cooperation between Russia and NATO." 
  In the opinion of the Western press, Pavel Grachev's 
personal 
qualities played a considerable part in achieving that result. 
People had been expecting to see in Brussels "the jaded leader 
of a demoralized army," as THE NEW YORK TIMES wrote. But they 
saw a self-confident and firm military leader. "A good man, but 
dangerous," one German general commented respectfully on him in 
the press on returning from Brussels. London's THE TIMES wrote 
of the Russian minister that he "played a virtuoso game with the 
alliance" at the meeting in Brussels. 
  But it is not, of course, just a matter of Grachev himself. 
In the meetings with the NATO leadership he advanced a well 
thought-out position which had been worked out carefully 
together with the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and which had been 
examined and approved by the Russian Federation Security Council 
and president. This lent special weight to his words. 
  So, in Brussels the Russian side unequivocally declared that 
it was prepared to join NATO's partnership program in the very 
near future and presented its interlocutors with a document 
containing the main parameters of Russia's involvement in 
implementing it. At the same time it was proposed to prepare a 
large-scale program of bilateral political and military 
cooperation between NATO and Russia consonant with the latter's 
place in Europe and the world. At the same time the report on 
the main provisions of Russian military doctrine, which Pavel 
Grachev delivered at the conference of defense ministers of the 
North Atlantic Cooperation Council countries, emphasized that 
the political bases of this doctrine reflect two interconnected 
tasks -- prevention of war and readiness to rebuff an aggressor. 
  According to Western press data, NATO rated highly the 
Russian document, which contains the main parameters of 
participation in the partnership program and of its realization, 
particularly in the military sphere. "NATO cannot treat Russia 
the same way as Tajikistan or Albania," FRG Defense Minister 
Volker Ruehe declared. "Russia must become a strategic partner 
of NATO and feel that people reckon with it as such." 
  I could also cite other statements and assessments of this 
kind concerning the results of the Brussels meeting. Many other 
articles, however, have also appeared in the Western press. The 
reaction to these results expounded in them was restrained, to 
put it mildly, and sometimes even sharply negative. A statement 
by Sergio Balanzino, deputy secretary general of the alliance, 
that it is no good Russia reckoning on special status, since all 
are equal in the partnership program, was cited, for example. 
"The North Atlantic Alliance has no intention of adopting any 
documents that would endow Russia with special rights," he 
declared. Germany's FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE regarded Russia's 
desire to legitimate consultations with NATO on questions of 
European security as an attempt to erode the entire North 
Atlantic Alliance. Britain's DAILY TELEGRAPH pointed out that 
NATO must make the development of cooperation with Russia 
dependent on "Moscow's conduct in the near abroad." At the same 
time it is frequently emphasized that such guardedness is 
perfectly justified, since "NATO must be ready for a worsening 
of the situation in Russia." 
  Particular skepticism was shown in the West in respect of 
the 
substance of the Russian military doctrine. It is said, in 
particular, that its provisions make intervention in the near 
abroad possible. In an interview in the newspaper LE FIGARO 
British Foreign Secretary Douglas Hurd did, indeed, admit that 
Russia has special interests here, but he emphasized that 
concern for them "must not transcend international law." Other 
doctrinal provisions were also criticized. 
  What can be said about all these attacks? To some extent 
they reflect the essence of the debate in Brussels. This is on 
the one hand. On the other, they attest that Pavel Grachev 
firmly upheld Russia's interests and did not forgo them, despite 
all the pressure that was put on him. Russia is joining the 
partnership program with a sense of its own dignity and is sure 
that it will be able to arrange fully equal and constructive 
cooperation with the North Atlantic Alliance. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46492 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shaposhnikov Urges `Nonbloc Coexistence' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shaposhnikov Urges `Nonbloc Coexistence' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0306130194 Moscow KOMSOMOLSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 2 Jun 94 
p 6 </F>

<F P=103> PM0306130194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMSOMOLSKAYA PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Marshal of Aviation Yevgeniy Shaposhnikov: "How </F>
Should We Shape NATO? Marshal of Aviation Yevgeniy Shaposhnikov 
Suggests We Consider This Issue"] 
  [Text] The chiefs of the leading Russian Federation mass 
media recently received an official invitation to visit NATO 
Headquarters in Brussels -- to familiarize themselves with the 
organization in greater detail. The invitation was hardly an 
accident -- the NATO leadership currently has a considerable 
interest in ensuring more vigorous support for its "Partnership 
for Peace" program from Russia's fourth estate. 
  Within Russia itself the arguments about whether or not to 
join the NATO program have been raging for three months now. 
According to KOMSOMOLSKAYA PRAVDA's information, the Russian 
Federation president and Foreign Ministry leaders received a 
report on this subject 24 May from Marshal of Aviation Yevgeniy 
Shaposhnikov, currently Boris Yeltsin's representative at the 
"Rosvooruzheniye" State Company. KOMSOMOLSKAYA PRAVDA has also 
learned that the marshal did not address himself to the Russian 
Federation Defense Ministry because of the absolute inability, 
in his view, of certain military department leaders to take 
other opinions on board. 
  [Shaposhnikov begins] ...In the postwar period politicians 
in the leading countries wasted a historic chance to strengthen 
allied relations between the states and peoples which defeated 
fascism and to offer the world new conditions for normal 
coexistence without the threat of military confrontation. In 
subsequent decades huge efforts were needed to convince people 
of the fruitlessness of these kinds of relations. 
  There are now grounds for believing that our relations are 
moving to a qualitatively new state -- from distrust to 
cooperation, from confrontation to partnership, from the arms 
race to arms cuts. Naturally these processes are complex, 
multifaceted, and sometimes ambiguous. Also ambiguous is their 
assessment by our society -- which has to be taken into account. 
But if mutual extremism in assessing events, phenomena, and 
trends is eschewed, the question still arises: Why has NATO not 
been disbanded if it has no enemies and there is no 
confrontation? In fact, the bloc is beginning to expand. 
  The fairness of this question is obvious even to NATO 
members 
themselves, since, under the conditions of detente, the bloc 
would, figuratively speaking, be "unemployed." Having lost its 
simple and comprehensible guideline of the image of the enemy, 
military force -- and not just NATO's -- is today in a profound 
ideological crisis. This is why the bloc participants have been 
looking for a raison d'etre for several years now. One idea 
they have come up with is the "Partnership for Peace" program, 
which allows NATO to exist, but in a new and broader makeup, 
with its claims to the establishment of a "new world order" 
under its flag disguised.... 
  Against this backdrop Russia's passivity is unjustifiable. 
  ...The invitation to participate in the program leaves 
Russia 
with a difficult and crucial choice to make. Let us look at the 
likely scenarios and possible consequences of this choice. 
  Were Russia to unconditionally sign "Partnership," NATO's 
influence would extend east to the Pacific and the Chinese 
border -- which would not only upset the balance of power in the 
East but could also lead to a resumption of confrontation with 
our great eastern neighbor. Other negative consequences are 
also possible. 
  Were Russia not to sign "Partnership," it could find itself 
isolated from Western countries, and the borders of the NATO 
bloc would come right up to our own borders. This could be 
followed by the breakdown of the trust and mutual understanding 
achieved during the detente period and would provide favorable 
grounds for the reemergence of the Cold War -- something that 
the world has grown tired of. 
  Raising the question of Russia's special role in 
"Partnership" is also not the best "approach," since it is seen 
as a negative by other partner countries (owing to its 
similarity to the Molotov-Ribbentrop Pact). If their views are 
disregarded and agreement is reached with the leading NATO 
countries on this kind of role for Russia, then this would again 
be a case of hypocrisy and disguised hegemonism unworthy of 
great Russia and its proclaimed principles of living without any 
elder or junior brothers. 
  Consequently we need to seek a solution which on the one 
hand 
would release Russia from what is, for it, an unacceptable 
choice while on the other hand confirming its role and 
importance in the world community through its ability to propose 
formulas that are not only consonant with its prestige but are 
shared by many countries. 
  The peoples of the world, not only now but always, are 
united 
not by vestiges of the past in the form of military blocs but on 
a more noble basis, the essence of which continues to be trust, 
cooperation, and security. Consequently the world community 
needs not military blocs but more civilized mechanisms for 
regulating their relations. Such mechanisms exist -- the United 
Nations, the CSCE, and others. The CIS and its structures can 
be listed among these organizations with certain provisos. 
  But, under the new conditions, all these organizations are 
insufficiently effective in ensuring proper trust, harmony, and 
security in the world. Thus, there is a need to reform and 
improve both the world organization (the United Nations), and 
regional organizations (the CSCE, the CIS, and so forth), while, 
on the other hand, dismantling military blocs and transforming 
them into peacekeeping military mechanisms as components of the 
aforesaid political organizations. 
  This is the essence of the concept of nonbloc coexistence 
among states. 
  And it should be Russia that proposes it, reaffirming its 
genuine adherence to peace, equal rights, trust, cooperation, 
and democracy and its desire to travel the road of reform, not 
merely becoming part of the economic area of the leading 
countries and sometimes a raw-material appendage, but also not 
rejecting the opportunity for cooperation on an equal footing 
with all countries. 
  Building this concept envisages the existence of a worldwide 
(main) organization (the United Nations) and its derivatives -- 
regional structures. The worldwide organization would deal with 
general and more important issues, while the regional structures 
would deal with individual [chastnyye] issues -- economic, 
environmental, social, and information matters, the safeguarding 
of security, and so forth. Both would complement each other. 
Since the world is still far from perfect, and security has not 
been ensured in the world, these structures should include 
military organizations and contingents of peacekeeping forces 
which could be brought into action on the basis of UN decisions 
or at the request of its regional structures at an early stage 
of the emergence of possible conflicts, as well as forces 
designed to help the population and to deliver humanitarian aid 
during natural disasters, accidents, and catastrophes. 
  It would be expedient to train these (coalition) 
peacekeeping 
contingents at special regional training centers under definite 
programs (some for operations under tropical conditions, others 
for operations in mountainous terrain or deserts, and so forth) 
with equipment, command and control, and logistical systems 
standardized as far as possible and developed under competitive 
conditions. At the same time, armaments and military hardware 
intended for national armies (not within the peacekeeping 
forces) will be developed under state plans and programs, which 
will ensure their competitiveness. 
  Depending on its place, role, and geostrategic position in 
the world, the same country could be a member of one or several 
regional organizations. In this connection Russia could be a 
member of the CSCE, the CIS, an organization of Asia-Pacific 
region states, the Association of Black Sea States, and, of 
course, the United Nations. And the CIS would have a more 
specific and clear-cut outline in both form and content. 
  This, in my view, could mark the establishment of a new 
order 
in the world, in which Russia would have the initiative by dint 
of its worth and prestige, and military force would acquire new, 
nonideologized guidelines and moral and legal supports.... 
  The strengthening, let alone the expansion of the military 
bloc would serve to create not a new world order based on a 
single footing but a new world disorder, since the monopolar 
system of organizing life has always been unstable. Naturally 
the NATO bloc is not yet ready to be dismantled, but the idea of 
gearing it to reform in the foreseeable future and to engaging 
in peacekeeping missions -- perhaps within the CSCE framework -- 
could be shared by many states. 
  Today's politicians must not waste this chance. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46493 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   24 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> STRATEGIC DETERRENT FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Removal of Nuclear Device in Adit 108-K </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Removal of Nuclear Device in Adit 108-K </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944D0042A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 24 May 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 944D0042A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Andrey Vaganov: "The Days of the Nuclear Device </F>
in Adit 108-K Are Numbered. But First They Must `Scare Up' 1 
Billion Rubles and Eight Meters of Heavy-Weight Concrete"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Details </H5>
  "The Russian side will provide for financing and performance 
of the entire complex of work for dismantling the nuclear device 
and the material part of the physics experiment FO-100-SZhR in 
adit 108-k at the Semipalatinsk Testing Ground according to a 
schedule agreed upon by the parties." So goes the first article 
of the "Agreement Between the Russian Federation Government and 
the Republic of Kazakhstan Government for Dismantling the 
Nuclear Device Placed at the Semipalatinsk Nuclear Testing 
Ground Before It Was Closed," signed in Moscow on 28 March 1994. 
  Effective 25 October 1990, a year's moratorium was 
unilaterally introduced on nuclear testing. This step was 
undertaken by the country's top leaders without serious 
consultation with members of parliament and specialists. As a 
result, a nuclear device with a capacity of 0.4 kilotons 
(equivalent to 400 tonnes of trotyl charge) was left prepared 
for underground testing in adit 108-k. 
  The time period of the moratorium had not even expired when 
on 29 August 1991, Nursultan Nazarayev, by an order to close the 
Semipalatinsk Testing Ground, ruled out the possibility of using 
it further for conducting underground tests. This situation 
applied fully to the physics experiment OF-100-SRZh that had 
been prepared at site 108-k. 
  Thus this nuclear charge, small by today's standards, lay in 
the adit cut in the granite monolith of Degelen at a depth of 
126 meters. Incidentally, the verb "lay" does not quite fit the 
real state of affairs. Without careful continuous technical 
service this unintentional unique experiment--never before in 
world practice has a nuclear charge remained so long, four 
years, outside warehouse premises--threatened to end with an 
uncontrollable nuclear explosion at any moment. With the 
collapse of the USSR the situation at the Semipalatinsk test 
site, which had become a constituent part of Kazakhstan's 
national nuclear center, evoked constantly growing alarm. Last 
winter, as a result of a series of accidents in municipal 
utility networks, the system for maintaining the normal vital 
activity of the city of Kurchatov--the capital of the test site, 
as they called it--was put almost completely out of commission. 
Consideration was also given to the question of emergency 
evacuation from it of the Russian military unit that served, 
among other things, the nuclear charge in adit 108-k (see 
NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA for 24 November 1993). (Before that 27,000 
people had already left the city, mainly military and civilian 
specialists providing support for nuclear research.) 
  Work on the present agreement began in the autumn of 1992. 
But in reality up until the last moment it was not completely 
certain that it would be signed during President Nazarbayev's 
official visit to Russia. The fact is that at the end of January 
1994 Kazakhstan made a proposal to include in the text an 
additional article making it incumbent on the Russian side to do 
"special work to clean up after the activity related to the 
nuclear device." The Russian Federation Ministry of Atomic 
Energy would not agree to this proposal and was able to convince 
the Kazakh side to withdraw it. 
  Be that as it may, by the end of 1994 the nuclear charge was 
to have been dismantled and removed from the adit, and all the 
material part of the experiment was to have been moved unimpeded 
to the Russian Federal Nuclear Center (All-Russian Scientific 
Research Institute of Technical Physics--VNIITF) in 
Chelyabinsk-70. Specialists of the VNIITF in conjunction with 
the All-Russian Scientific Research and Planning Institute of 
Industrial Technology carried out the project entitled "Opening 
and Eliminating Object 108-k." 
  It is possible to judge the seriousness of the task facing 
them if only from the fact that as of the first half of 1993 the 
estimated cost of the work was R650 million. In the opinion of 
certain of the experts at the Ministry of Atomic Energy of the 
Russian Federation, the real cost would exceed a billion. 
Incidentally, there is nothing surprising here: After all, adit 
108-k is essentially an extremely complex engineering and 
technical structure. It is 592 meters long. The nuclear device 
is housed in the so-called end box (KB). The protective 
shock-absorbing complex, which is actually supposed to guarantee 
maximum safety when conducting the nuclear explosion, consists 
of several load-bearing elements: the first section--a concrete 
ring 49 meters long, and 19.5 meters--from especially 
heavy-weight concrete with a metal filler; the protective 
sealing element seven meters in length made of concrete, and 
several other sealing elements. 
  The project envisions opening the adit and drilling a 
bypass. 
This working should provide access to the end box from the rear 
side through an eight-meter concrete wall. The opening of 
concrete protective elements and drilling the bypass were to 
have been done by the blast-hole drilling method. The concrete 
wall in the immediate area of the end box was to have been 
opened with mechanical picks. The overall volume of mining work 
will amount to about 1,233 cubic meters, and the volume of work 
for dismantling cable lines and metal elements--about 114 tonnes. 
  The agreement also envisions a scenario if for one reason or 
another it is impossible to extract the nuclear device. In this 
case it is to be destroyed right in the end part of adit 108-k 
with an applied charge of chemical explosive that will 
completely preclude the release of nuclear energy. 
  On 12 April of this year the deputy prime minister of the 
Russian Government, Oleg Soskovets, signed an order to the 
Ministry of Atomic Energy of the Russian Federation, the 
Ministry of Defense, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, the 
Ministry of Economics, the Ministry of Finance, the Ministry of 
Internal Affairs, and the Russian Federal Oversight of Nuclear 
and Radiation Safety: "Request that you take measures to 
implement the agreement." 
<H5>  From NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA Files </H5>
  Since 1961 at the Semipalatinsk Testing Ground 348 
underground nuclear explosions have been conducted, of which 
five were under the program for working on the application of 
nuclear explosive technologies for industrial purposes. 
Underground explosions were conducted with nuclear explosive 
devices placed in both horizontal (215 explosions) and vertical 
(133 explosions) workings. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46494 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> STRATEGIC DETERRENT FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   British Provide Nuclear Weapon Transport Containers </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    British Provide Nuclear Weapon Transport Containers </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM3105085794 Moscow IZVESTIYA in Russian 26 May 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> PM3105085794 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow IZVESTIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Viktor Litovkin report: "West Helping Us Get Rid of </F>
Surplus Nuclear Weapons"] 
  [Text] Jonathan Aitken, Britain's minister for defense 
procurement, has stated in parliamentary hearings that his 
country has dispatched to Russia its first consignment of 
supercontainers for transporting nuclear weapons. This was 
reported by the British Defence Ministry Information Service. 
  The consignment consists of 10 of the promised 250 special 
containers. Moreover, 20 armored trucks will be sent to Russia 
to transport specific loads such as nuclear warheads. London is 
helping Moscow to safely transport withdrawn nuclear weapons 
with a view to accelerating their dismantling and destruction. 
The British Government has allocated 35 million pounds for this 
purpose. This was stipulated in a 9 November 1992 bilateral 
agreement. 
  The Russian Defense Ministry confirmed the British report. 
Moreover, it said that we had already received not 10 but 48 
supercontainers, which arrived the other day on a British 
commercial vessel at the port of St. Petersburg. Admittedly, 
they were not all handed over to the military -- six containers 
are being kept by the Russian Ministry of Atomic Energy, which 
is the main recipient of such foreign aid in our country. 
  Apart from the supercontainers and the armored trucks, 
Britain has promised to supply us with five reserve prime 
movers. One of them has been being tested on our roads for a 
year now and, I was told by the military, has proved to be quite 
a reliable vehicle, able to meet the technical demands made of 
it. 
  The people I spoke to at the military department refused to 
show any photographs of the British equipment or to give its 
performance. They stated that confidentiality on these matters 
is a requirement of the joint memorandum and one of the 
conditions for the safe shipment of nuclear weapons from their 
bases to the railroad and the recycling plants. 
  Nonetheless, they said that the supercontainers are 
outwardly 
almost indistinguishable from the ordinary 10-cubic-meter 
containers used for shipments by rail and sea, and the armored 
trucks are almost no different from international refrigerated 
trucks. Except that their off-road capability and engine power 
are far greater than those of ordinary vehicles, and the armored 
cab is capable of protecting the nuclear weapon from bullets and 
grenade fragments in possible acts of terrorism or sabotage. 
The supercontainers are also protected against fire. Even if a 
major fire is raging around them, the air around the warhead 
does not reach a critical temperature. 
  Apart from Britain, the United States, Germany, and France 
are also giving us help in getting rid of our surplus nuclear 
weapons, and an accord exists with Italy -- an agreement has 
been signed but has not yet come into force. 
  The U.S. Government has allocated $400 million for these 
purposes. The German leadership contributed 10 million German 
marks [DM] last year for Russia to ensure the safe shipment and 
temporary storage of nuclear weapons and to draw up plans for 
processing and recycling weapons-grade plutonium and uranium. 
This year it has provided another DM9 million, some of which 
will go to Ukraine. 
  But, the military told me, not a single cent, penny, or 
pfennig has crossed the CIS borders. All the money is still in 
the United States, Britain, France, and Germany. Naturally so. 
In helping Russia and the other former Union republics that 
still have nuclear weapons on their territory to get rid of 
their surpluses, Western governments are at the same time 
securing major orders for their own firms and providing work for 
their own plants. 
  Of course, the people I spoke to said, we could get by 
without their help, but then it would take many a long year to 
get rid of the nuclear weapon overhang. 
  Whereas previously we would transport up to 20 nuclear 
weapons a year with many natural precautions and in conditions 
of heightened secrecy, now, for instance, more than 2,000 such 
warheads have to be withdrawn from Ukraine in the space of three 
or four years. In the two months since they began to be 
evacuated, 180 warheads have already been withdrawn on three 
trains. This is not only very labor-intensive work but is also 
very costly. 
  Incidentally, foreign aid has not yet been used for these 
shipments, while the cars intended for the nuclear weapons have 
been in service for 15-20 years already, new cars have not been 
built for years, the track on which they will run has also not 
been repaired for a long time, and if it were not for Western 
aid it is not clear where all the funds would come from. The 
military budget could not afford it. 
  At the same time, my interlocutors stated that Western aid 
accounts for just a few percent of the total volume of work that 
is being done and will have to be done by Russia itself and its 
military and civilian specialists. Back in 1991 a special 
20-year federal program was drawn up for enhancing the security 
of nuclear weapons, recycling surplus weapons, and burying the 
fissionable material. It required expenditure of 240 billion 
rubles in 1991 prices. 
  Today the figure would be quite different. Perhaps this is 
why the program has still not been ratified by the Russian 
Government, although it has not been rejected. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46495 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> GROUND TROOPS </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Smelchak' Artillery System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Smelchak' Artillery System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0439A Moscow TEKHNIKA I VOORUZHENIYE in English No 1-2, 
1994 p C3 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0439A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow TEKHNIKA I VOORUZHENIYE </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] System of adjusting artillery weapon with 
laser guidance for 240-mm mortars is intended for damage of 
armoured vehicles, launchers and artillery systems, control and 
communication points, defensive installations, bridges, 
crossings. 


Set 

240-mm towed mortar M-240 

Round 3VF4 with 240-mm adjusting high 
explosive mine 3F5 

Laser range finder 1D15 

Means of synchronization 1A35K, 1A35I 

Means of radio communication R107M (R108M) 

Main operational and technical characteristics 

Range of fire, km                           3.6-9.2 

Range of laser target indication, km        0.2-5.0 

Mines expenditure for target damage,        1-3 
pieces 

Time of homing guidance, s                  0.2-3.0 

Delivery set 

240-mm towed mortar M-240, pieces           2 

Round 3VF4 with 240-mm adjusting high       200 
explosive mine 3F5, pieces 

Laser range finder 1D15, pieces             1 

Synchronizer unit 1A35K + 1A35I, pieces     1 

Radio station R107M (R108M), pieces         3 

Field telephone TA-57 with cable P-247M,    6 
pieces 

Training set: 

training mock-up 3PU34, pieces              3 

training station 9F647 "Sizyak", pieces     1 

240-mm training round VF864A, pieces        20 


  For the additional information, with proposals you can 
address: 117342, Moscow, Vvedensky str., 3, "AMETEX". Phone: 
(095) 285-56-36. Fax: (095) 923-57-93 "AMETEX" 
  COPYRIGHT: "Tekhnika i vooruzheniye", 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46496 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kravchuk Position on Division of Bases </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kravchuk Position on Division of Bases </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0418B Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 26 Apr 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0418B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Anatoliy Polyakov: "Leonid Kravchuk Agrees to a </F>
Russian Naval Base in Sevastopol"] 
  [Text] The Ukrainian mass media are actively 
discussing the negotiation results, or more accurately the 
absence thereof, following the meeting between the military 
delegations of Russia and Ukraine. Many emphasize that the 
positions of the president and the military department of 
Ukraine are at opposite poles. 
  On Sunday, Leonid Kravchuk said on television that the 
various statements made by Defense Minister Vitaliy Radetskyy do 
not represent the position of the government of Ukraine. 
  "I support the realities that have evolved in Crimea," he 
noted. "A Russian naval base may be created in Sevastopol, and 
Russian ships should be stationed in Kerch, Feodosiya, Balaklava 
and other ports on the basis of supplementary agreements." 
  Leonid Kravchuk stressed that he never said that the USA or 
any other third party needed to participate in the negotiations. 
The meeting of the defense ministers was not a culminating 
point, but only part of the search for the final results. In 
Kravchuk's words, he exchanged opinions with Viktor 
Chernomyrdin, and they came to the conclusion that a meeting at 
the level of the presidents of Russia and Ukraine was needed in 
order to solve the Black Sea Fleet problem. 
  Judging from everything, Leonid Kravchuk does not yet share 
the same opinion regarding the future of the Russian fleet in 
Crimea held by Defense Minister Vitaliy Radetskyy, as was also 
true earlier of ex-Minister Konstantin Morozov. Moreover, it 
might be more proper to say that their views on its fate are 
diametrically opposite. Whether they find a common language, or 
another leader of the Ukrainian military department will have to 
be retired, only the immediate future will tell. 
  Nor did Leonid Kravchuk leave unattended the statements by 
Yuriy Meshkov concerning secession of Crimea, calling them 
ill-conceived. He emphasized that all Crimean edicts conflicting 
with the Constitution and laws of Ukraine will be nullified in 
the future as well, except of course those pertaining to 
economic reforms in Crimea. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46497 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Grachev's Position in Black Sea Fleet Talks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Grachev's Position in Black Sea Fleet Talks </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0418A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 26 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0418A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Maryukha: "It's Easy To Divide Ships on </F>
Paper. It's Harder To Observe the Interests of the Sides"] 
  [Text] An abundance of the most acute problems--political, 
economic, diplomatic, purely military, and even moral--have come 
together in the Black Sea Fleet like a tight sailor's knot. 
Unless we solve them, we could hardly hope to emerge from the 
`Black Sea dead-end' and relieve the tension under which Black 
Sea seamen are living and serving today," stated General of the 
Army Pavel Grachev, the Russian defense minister, at a Ministry 
of Defense press conference. Therefore, even despite the 
considerable concessions by the Russian delegation, and its 
patience with the excessive demands of the Ukrainian side, which 
sometimes went contrary to agreements reached previously, the 
first round of talks on dividing the Black Sea Fleet was unable 
to put an end to the protracted litigation: The military were 
unable to draft and initial a treaty that the presidents have 
already agreed upon. They weren't even able to sign a protocol 
on nonagreement of the parties, which naturally follows in such 
a case. Still, it cannot be said that the negotiations have 
broken down, or have reached an insurmountable impasse. 
  The Russian Federation defense minister gave a large number 
of examples leading to the conclusion that the position of the 
Ukrainian side at the talks in Sevastopol was in diametric 
opposition to statements and announcements of the Ukrainian 
president. In particular, an item concerning joint basing of the 
Black Sea Fleet and the Ukrainian Navy in Sevastopol, an item 
concerning "corridors" for the passage of Russian Black Sea 
ships to their bases that is discriminatory from the standpoint 
of international law of the sea, and a demand that the ships and 
vessels of the fleet be "transferred to the sides" fully manned 
(as if some third party is giving the Black Sea Fleet to Russia 
and Ukraine) were introduced into the document drafted by the 
Ukrainian side. Where all of this comes from, emphasized General 
of the Army Pavel Grachev, is from the fact that first of all 
the Ukrainian side does not wish to operate with universally 
recognized legal terms, and secondly, local executors are trying 
to interpret the Agreement on Stage-by-Stage Settlement of the 
Problems of the Black Sea Fleet, signed on 15 April in Moscow, 
to their own advantage. 
  The act of dividing the ships, regarding which the 
negotiators did manage to reach agreement, having included all 
watercraft on the lists with accuracy "down to the sloop," was 
termed by Pavel Grachev as only the first stage of division. 
Division of the Black Sea Fleet is a lengthy process that will 
not fit within the framework of the current year, nor possibly 
even the next, 1995. 
  But the main thing is this: We first need to resolve the 
matter of separate basing of the Black Sea Fleet and the 
Ukrainian Navy. "We did not demand removal ships of the 
Ukrainian Navy from Crimea," Pavel Grachev stressed, "the ships 
could be based together, including at the five bases that we 
propose leaving for the Black Sea Fleet. But the headquarters 
must be separated. Where the headquarters of the Ukrainian Navy 
are to be located is a matter for Ukraine to resolve, but 
Sevastopol must remain the main base of the Black Sea Fleet." 
  The search for consensus on this most important item of the 
15 April agreement went on until the very last minute, 
emphasized special ambassador Yuriy Dubinin, who participated in 
the press conference. And while the fact that it was not reached 
is worthy of sympathy, it doesn't warrant a dramatic outburst. 
The documents signed by the presidents of Russia and Ukraine 
were drafted in such a way that there is nothing in them left 
for interpretation at the level of the executors. They need to 
be fulfilled or not fulfilled. From all appearances, the 
Ukrainian delegation took the path of nonfulfillment, which 
predetermined the outcome of the meeting in Sevastopol. 
  There simply cannot be a third party to the process of 
settling the Black Sea problems--this is a matter exclusively 
for Russia and Ukraine. This was categorically stated by 
participants of the press conference at the Russian Ministry of 
Defense. There is a way out of the "Black Sea dead-end" even in 
the absence of interference from without. We need to continue 
the negotiation process. However, we need to begin the second 
round not with debates but with an effort to agree on terms and 
on the subject of discussion. In the words of Pavel Grachev, it 
would be suitable to create state commissions under the 
leadership of the prime ministers or their first deputies in 
preparation for the next such meeting, and include 
representatives of all interested ministries and departments in 
their membership so as to determine exactly how much is owed to 
whom. Otherwise, the discussion would simply continue "with 
raised voices." 
  However, Yuriy Dubinin stated during the press conference 
that there are grounds for believing that the problems of the 
Black Sea Fleet will be resolved peacefully, and in the 
interests of the peoples of Russia and Ukraine. As the special 
ambassador explained, it was agreed that Russian President Boris 
Yeltsin will make a visit to Ukraine, during which a major 
treaty between the two states is to be signed. This could bring 
the process of unraveling the Black Sea knot to its conclusion, 
so long as the aides to President Leonid Kravchuk do not let 
down their leader, as they have done before, in fulfilling 
Ukraine's international obligations. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46498 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Black Sea Settlement Dependent on Ukrainian Domestic Politics </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Black Sea Settlement Dependent on Ukrainian Domestic Politics </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM3005110994 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> PM3005110994 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Commentary under the "Theme of the Week" rubric by observer </F>
Aleksandr Golts: "The Moscow-Kiev-Simferopol Triangle Could 
Become a Bermuda Triangle. For the Black Sea Fleet"] 
  [Text] If Sigmund Freud, the founder of psychoanalysis, 
were alive today he would surely have written a book about slips 
of the tongue by politicians, their press secretaries, and 
journalists who write about politics. Because these slips of 
the tongue demonstrate in a very curious way a connection which 
exists between problems in the subconscious of all those people 
but which, aloud, is flatly denied. The recent Russo-Ukrainian 
talks are a prime example of that. 
  Let me remind you that initially it was stated that the 
meeting between the Russian and Ukrainian heads of government 
would be dedicated to the situation in the Crimea, which has 
deteriorated. However, it emerged that this was a slip of the 
tongue. The two countries' delegations concentrated not on the 
confrontation between the authorities in Kiev and the Crimea but 
on the division of the Black Sea Fleet. As far as I am aware, 
no one at an official level has made a direct link between the 
problems of the fleet and mutual relations between Kiev and 
Simferopol, which deteriorate periodically. But this slip of 
the tongue makes you wonder. At the very least it sheds light 
on why it has proved impossible for so long to reach final 
agreement on the fate of the Black Sea Fleet. 
  A miracle has not happened now either. The Russo-Ukrainian 
talks have become bogged down again. Once again on the problem 
of the basing of the Russian Black Sea Fleet and the Ukrainian 
Navy. Let us be frank here: Even though the technical details 
of the forthcoming division are highly complex, that is not the 
essential matter. The nub of the problem is the political will 
of the contracting parties or rather the lack of it on the part 
of one of them. The fate of the Black Sea Fleet at the end of 
the 20th century is paradoxically reminiscent of the fate of 
Poland at the end of the 18th century. Two hundred years ago 
that country was also being constantly partitioned. The 
slightest fluctuation in the balance of relations between the 
major European powers aroused in them an irresistible desire to 
engage in a trial of strength with one another by embarking on 
yet another partition of Poland. 
  The paradox of the Black Sea Fleet is that the initiator of 
each new attempt to divide it up is the country in the weaker 
position, namely, Ukraine. A debtor forced to settle its 
account with Russia using its most valuable assets -- its oil 
and gas reserves -- finds consolation for its complexes in a 
petty squabble over for a legacy which will not bring Ukraine 
either economic or military-political advantage. The question 
here is not so much one of Russo-Ukrainian relations as of the 
internal political struggle in Ukraine. 
  In Kiev they forgot long ago, if they ever knew at all, that 
the fleet was designed to safeguard the security of the state. 
Just as they seem to have forgotten that it is dangerous to 
turn the nuclear missiles stationed on Ukrainian territory into 
a bargaining counter. But how else can you explain the fact 
that whenever the situation in the Crimea hots up, politicians 
close to the Ukrainian president suddenly begin alluding to the 
possibility of Kiev's withdrawal from its international 
commitments on these weapons. And this causes considerable 
unease in the world. 
  The whole point of this is that in the minds of the 
Ukrainian 
politicians the fleet is first and foremost a symbol. Not just 
of a naval presence but also of the right to Sevastopol. A city 
which was created and which exists primarily as a naval base. 
But Sevastopol, in the minds of many people in Ukraine, is the 
key to the Crimea, which is so determinedly trying to break free 
from Ukraine's embraces. But whenever the talk turns to the 
symbols that are used in the political struggle, all rational 
discussion becomes impossible. 
  That is because whenever attempts have been made to reach 
agreement on the Black Sea Fleet, Ukrainian politicians on 
returning to Kiev began interpreting those accords in such a way 
that they effectively rendered them meaningless. The solution 
to these riddles is simple. The Ukrainian president understands 
perfectly well that if he concludes a more or less reasonable 
agreement (which, in any event, will be a compromise) his 
political opponents will not be slow to accuse him of betraying 
the national interests. The fact that it proved impossible to 
demonstrate even a semblance of agreement during the present 
talks is evidence that on the eve of the presidential elections 
Kiev is bound hand and foot. 
  Meanwhile, REUTER reports from Kiev that a Ukrainian 
Government representative, who asked to remain nameless, has 
stated that Ukraine "is going to ask the UN Security Council to 
examine the question of the unlawful stationing of foreign 
troops on its territory and demand their complete withdrawal." 
"We mean the Black Sea Fleet, of course," that representative 
stated. 
  The matter is further complicated by the fact that, by all 
accounts, it is in Ukraine, not Russia, as many people feared, 
that the military are beginning to play an autonomous political 
role. The attempts at strong-arm actions against the Black Sea 
Fleet followed by threatening statements from Ukrainian Defense 
Ministry spokesmen -- all these things are in conflict with 
President Kravchuk's official line. 
  It must also be said honestly that despite its partner's 
constantly improper conduct, Moscow is quite limited in the ways 
that it can exert pressure. Suggestions about "switching off" 
the oil and gas supply in retaliation should be regarded as an 
emotional response. After all, a sharp worsening of the 
domestic political situation in Ukraine and an increased threat 
of the disintegration of Ukraine are certainly not in Russia's 
interests. The balanced stance adopted by Moscow during the 
present crisis in the Crimea confirms that. Incidentally, it is 
obvious that by no means everyone in Simferopol realizes that 
the "war of nerves" that nearly began accompanied by overtly 
provocative rumors about "tank columns" heading toward 
Sevastopol could have extremely regrettable consequences. 
  By all accounts Russia is going to have to negotiate 
patiently and consistently without letting itself be sidetracked 
either by Kiev's improvizations or the appeals of extremists, 
and such people exist in the Crimea, too. It remains to be 
hoped that those people who would like to turn the fleet into a 
pawn in a political game will remember that we are talking here 
about a major naval grouping equipped with the most modern 
weapons. After all, during the incident in Odessa the bolts of 
the Kalashnikovs were already being released.... Let us hope 
that in the event of further confrontation the 
Moscow-Kiev-Simferopol triangle (where only Moscow is 
demonstrating a balanced approach) does not become a Bermuda 
Triangle for the Black Sea Fleet. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46499 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Pacific Fleet Commander's Dismissal Called `Unfair' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Pacific Fleet Commander's Dismissal Called `Unfair' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0106090194 Moscow IZVESTIYA in Russian 27 May 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> PM0106090194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow IZVESTIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Boris Reznik report: "Explosion After Explosion. Pacific </F>
Fleet Protests Against Its Commander's Dismissal"] 
  [Text] Maritime Kray -- This is the second week running 
that there has been a sound of firing amid a range of hills near 
the Maritime Kray village of Novonezhino, where the Pacific 
Fleet Air Force arsenal is located. The sound is made by 
engineers collecting and destroying the missiles, bombs, 
mortars, and shells that were dispersed in the wake of the 14 
May explosion.... Things are worryingly deserted for many 
kilometers all around -- there are deserted houses with broken 
windows, militia cordons.... 
<H5>  In Defense of the Admiral </H5>
  At the same time, the Pacific Fleet is being rocked by other 
explosions covering ships, combined units, and ground, air 
force, and hydrographical services over a huge area -- 
explosions of protest against the dismissal of Admiral Georgiy 
Gurinov, commander of the Pacific Fleet. Telegrams and letters 
are being sent to Russian President Boris Yeltsin and Defense 
Minister Pavel Grachev from officers' collectives appealing for 
the decision to remove their commander to be reviewed. This is 
a hitherto unheard-of phenomenon in military circles. Petitions 
have been fearlessly signed by all 142 of the Fleet's admirals 
and staff officers, officers' assemblies at the Admiral Makarov 
Naval College, and around 3,500 officers, ensigns, and sailors 
in the nuclear submarine fleet.... Veterans from the Pacific 
Fleet and the city of Vladivostok have come to the commander's 
support, along with the Council of Soldiers' and Sailors' 
Mothers.... 
  Grachev's telegram to the Pacific Fleet stated that Adm. 
Gurinov had been dismissed for "...serious shortcomings in his 
organizational activity relating to leadership of the Fleet." 
The accusation was formulated in the relatively classic way -- 
it can be used to remove any commander, including a flag 
officer. And at any time, if we proceed on the Dostoyevskiyan 
basis that "...absolutely anyone can be blamed for anything." 
Just how far does Gurinov's guilt square with this very severe 
punishment? Why have Pacific Fleet sailors been taking a moral 
stand in defending their senior admiral en masse -- going 
against the unwritten list of bans that prevents people speaking 
up for their commander before his superiors? 
  In order to understand this, we need to compare the 
situation 
in the Pacific Fleet a year ago, before Gurinov arrived, with 
the way things are now. 
<H5>  Difficult Inheritance </H5>
  Last May, when IZVESTIYA was introducing Adm. Gurinov to 
readers as the Pacific Fleet Commander, we noted that he was 
inheriting a lot of naval problems. We need only recall the 
monstrous neglect and complete chaos at the Fleet's training 
schools on Russkiy Island, where four sailors died of 
starvation, cold, maltreatment, and illness. The then command 
was very much involved in commerce. Pacific Fleet auxiliaries 
suddenly turned up off foreign shores in the hands of very 
dubious firms. The Fleet was constantly rocked by accidents and 
people would be killed. The combat training indicators were 
very low.... 
  The Pacific Fleet is the kind of cumbersome organization 
that 
takes years to get to know and get to grips with its problems. 
Gurinov managed to change a lot in one year. This is not my 
opinion -- it is the view of prestigious military and naval 
specialists (around 100 of them) who, on the instructions of the 
Defense Ministry and the Naval High Command, recently carried 
out comprehensive checks of all the local services and combined 
units. Speaking at the time at a press conference on the results 
of the checks, Igor Kasatonov, Deputy Commander in Chief of the 
Navy, made a high assessment of the Fleet's combat readiness, 
had some warm words to say about its commander, and referred 
approvingly to the morale climate in combined and other units.... 
  Military matters are a subtle area -- they are not something 
you discuss with "all and sundry." But here is, for us, an 
important and accurate piece of information -- under Adm. 
Gurinov's command the Pacific Fleet significantly improved all 
the main objective indicators of its activity (its 
operational-tactical and headquarters training), strengthened 
military discipline, reduced its accident rate.... Ships that 
had been languishing offshore finally put to sea, and the combat 
training plan was completely fulfilled. 
  We would note that the current command is steering the Fleet 
through the turbulent maelstroms and deadly shoals of our common 
life -- which is by no means improving. We should ponder on the 
fact that since the start of the year the Pacific Fleet has not 
been allocated even 25 percent of the minimum amount of 
appropriations it had requested. There is not even enough money 
to pay wages. There are no funds to deliver provisions and fuel 
to remote Fleet centers scattered around the coastline and 
islands. Ships return from combat standby duty and the crews 
should be sent on leave, but it is impossible -- there is no 
money to buy tickets from Aeroflot. Housing construction for 
officers has virtually ground to a halt -- in May, for instance, 
only 350 million rubles [R] of the R18.5 billion required for 
these purposes were allocated.... 
  Despite these and many other circumstances beyond its 
control, the Pacific Fleet is, to use military language, 
"fulfilling its mission" and carrying out its difficult job, 
which has now lost all its romance. 
  So what exactly happened between April and early May to make 
Pavel Grachev suddenly describe the Pacific Fleet as the worst 
in the Armed Forces and call its commander unsuitable? That is 
a puzzle not only to the men of the Pacific Fleet. Why, they 
ask, are some people keeping their commands when performance and 
morale are plummeting, while others lose their jobs at a time 
when, despite everything, they have the situation "under 
control"? 
  Since not the slightest attempt was made to offer a reason 
for the Pacific Fleet commander's removal, this gave rise to a 
lot of assumptions. The usual intrigues -- including military 
intrigues -- are suspected in Moscow's corridors of power. But 
more often people say that the reason for the admiral's 
dismissal is connected with the explosions at the Novonezhino 
arsenals. 
<H5>  Special Danger Zone </H5>
  Every morning I turn on the radio in suspense to hear what 
has blown up where. If there is no such report, I breathe 
easier -- we have gotten away with it. But in general, there 
are so many accidents, particularly here in the Far East, that 
it sometimes seems as though they are being churned out by some 
diabolical factory with a view to depriving us of our spiritual 
peace. It would be better not to know what kind of dangerous 
stuff is hidden away from view in the harmless-sounding 
"prohibited areas" that are scattered across all parts of the 
Far East, even to be found in cities shaded by nearby woods. 
About a year ago a retired military man who had "nothing to 
lose" -- since he was emigrating that very day to live in one of 
our nearest-neighbor countries -- came into the IZVESTIYA 
correspondents' center and said that there was a chemical 
weapons arsenal in Khabarovsk behind a green-shaded corner as 
you turn toward the Krasnaya stream. One faulty bomb is all it 
would take to do away with this city of 700,000. 
  We who live here would like to know how reliably these most 
dangerous weapons are guarded and by whom. But unfortunately, 
when we are talking about arms, particularly of such a dangerous 
type, social forces become socially impotent. We find ourselves 
in servile dependence on Defense Ministry generals and we are 
forced to reassure ourselves with the mantra: "They have a 
clearer picture." Admittedly, in this instance the people of 
Khabarovsk can be reassured: In preparing this article, I 
phoned Lieutenant General Valeriy Samsonov, chief of staff of 
the Far East Military District, who told me that the chemical 
weapons arsenal had been removed from Khabarovsk. But how many 
other arsenals are left? 
  The military told me that, when the thousands of tonnes of 
bombs went off at Novonezhino, they prayed that the missile fuel 
dumps nearby would not go up by accident or (it does not bear 
thinking about!) some smoldering rocket would not fly off to 
Bolshoy Kamen and hit a submarine with a nuclear reactor. As is 
now clear, the sheer chance that the explosions in Vladivostok 
and Novonezhino happened on the same day -- 14 May -- two years 
apart is seen by many people as neatly preordained, and even the 
possibility of sabotage is not being ruled out. Our usual lack 
of organization has been evident in our investigation into the 
cause of this latest disaster. But more of this later; for now 
we will try to see how many weapons and munitions have been 
amassed in the Pacific Fleet alone, who guards them, and in what 
way. 
  I have obtained the document -- a submission from the 
Military Prosecutor's Office -- "On Eradicating Violations of 
Legislation on the Storage of Weapons, Ammunition, and 
Explosives." This is the fruit of a two-month (February-March 
last year) investigation into the Pacific Fleet's arsenals 
carried out not only by prosecution personnel but also by 
specialists from the Navy High Command's Missile and Artillery 
Armaments Directorate. Here are some selected extracts from the 
document: 
  "...The bulk of the arms checked do not accord with the 
requirements of the guidance document on ensuring the 
safekeeping of weapons and ammunition. The premises in which 
they are stored are not made of reinforced concrete or of brick 
with reinforced concrete roofs and floors. Many dumps are too 
full and the ammunition is not stacked safely. Appropriations 
for the construction of new dumps are not being allocated. Not 
a single paragraph of the long-term plan for the construction of 
technical security facilities in 1991-1995 has been carried out. 
As a result, most of the installations checked have homemade 
alarm systems which cannot provide reliable security. Almost 
half of the wooden boxes in which the weapons and ammunition are 
stored are unsuitable, stacks of shells of different calibers 
have collapsed, shells are scattered around and many of them are 
rusty, yet they are not being written off or destroyed...." 
  We would note in passing that these outrages were happening 
before Adm. Gurinov even arrived to command the Fleet, so that 
according to normal logic he should not be held responsible for 
them. As a rule, the arsenals were replenished irrespective of 
the real needs of the Pacific Fleet or of what its commanders 
wanted. There are plenty of examples of this, but we will take 
the most immediate -- the Novonezhino arsenal. Rear Admiral 
German Ugryumov, Pacific Fleet chief of military 
counterintelligence, told me that at the time of the explosion 
around 2,000 standard carloads of aviation ammunition of various 
yields and calibers had built up there -- almost three times 
more than the potential storage norm. A considerable proportion 
of this dangerous cargo was dispatched here, on the orders of 
the Defense Ministry leadership, from...the Baltic. Maybe the 
shores of the Pacific were in particular need of bombs, 
missiles, and shells that were superfluous to the Baltic? It 
turns out that they were transported across the entire country 
so as to be...destroyed here. It is ideas like that, not a lack 
of ideas, that constitute real stupidity. 
  Ammunition to be recycled accounted for more than 70 percent 
of what was stored in the Novonezhino dumps. How much is at 
other dumps? This is a big secret, but people in the know have 
told me that Defense Ministry officials have long regarded the 
Russian Far East as a huge dump for radioactive material and 
explosives. The local authorities are stubbornly trying to 
ensure the adoption of a national program for the destruction of 
unnecessary armaments. The government assures us that there are 
no funds available at the moment, while...throwing away much 
bigger sums on endlessly "overcoming obstacles." For instance, 
Svetlana Parinov, chairman of the Maritime Kray Economics and 
Planning Committee, reported that the Novonezhino explosion 
would cost the treasury at least R31 billion. This amount does 
not include the losses suffered by the Fleet. Add to this the 
colossal expenditure on the clear-up operations after the 
explosions at the Vladivostok arsenal two years ago and 
innumerable "trivial" accidents of which Russian readers are no 
longer informed because they are considered so routine.... 
  Who has worked out how much money will be needed to guard 
and 
maintain "dead" -- decommissioned -- nuclear submarines? Their 
missile launchers are removed, but their nuclear reactors remain 
in place. These need to be constantly monitored by highly 
skilled specialists in order to prevent a disaster. These craft 
have been waiting to be recycled for years, and they are being 
joined by new submarines all the time.... Their crews, 
disbanded on paper, have been forced to continue their now 
simply stupid, although extremely responsible service. 
  If such fabulous expenditure is to be avoided, the 
government 
should clearly come up with the funds to set up facilities to 
destroy unnecessary arms. But clearly we should start by 
organizing reliable security at the arsenals. The way this is 
currently organized is graphically visible from the same 
prosecution submission: 
  "...Weapons and ammunition dumps in the Pacific Fleet are 
mainly guarded by squads of paramilitary security force riflemen 
which, owing to their low pay, are not fully staffed and 
experience considerable manpower turnover. Absences without 
leave and drunkenness are widespread among the security 
staff...." 
  Now let us imagine the old men and women compelled out of 
great necessity (who would agree to guard weapons dumps far from 
home, without any uniforms or normal food, for a miserable 
salary?) to guard things on which not only human life but the 
continued presence on the map of entire cities depends. And 
this is happening at a time when criminal structures are doing 
everything to get their hands on weapons. 
<H5>  The Boys Wanted a Little Silver... </H5>
  Let us return to the Novonezhino explosion. It is now clear 
that it was not the result of an agricultural fire, as all the 
press had initially reported. The accident was caused by two 
sailors from the arsenal's security subunit. The motives and 
circumstances of the incident were set out in such a 
contradictory way by the newspapers that I turned for the most 
accurate information to Boris Larichev, Pacific Fleet deputy 
military prosecutor, who is conducting the criminal case. Here 
is what he said: 
  "That day Seamen D. and A. were not on patrol. D. had heard 
that aircraft missile battery units contained silver, and, after 
he had whispered the information to his comrades, they 
infiltrated the dump. They found the missile stacks and, not 
knowing where the battery units were located, started unscrewing 
something with a bayonet. This turned out to be a tracking 
flare -- it ignites when the missile is fired and burns for 
around 20-25 seconds. Ignition can be triggered by friction or 
a blow, which is what happened -- D.'s blade cut through the 
foil covering the tracking flare and it ignited right in D.'s 
hand. The sailor was burned, and then the whole rack caught 
fire. The guys were scared, ran to the guardhouse, and then 
took cover with the entire guard behind some mounds...." 
  This is what the Fleet got from these stupid young men who 
had reinforced their untoward tendencies at vocational and 
technical college. Now they face Article 251 "footnote" of the 
Russian Federation Criminal Code -- "violation of the 
regulations governing the handling of weapons and items and 
substances posing a heightened danger to those in the 
vicinity...." This article provides for terms of imprisonment 
ranging from three to 15 years. The courts will probably 
consider the fact that, thank God, nobody died during the 
explosions to be an extenuating circumstance. This time we got 
away with it. 
  Now let us enquire just what sort of order reigns in that 
security detachment if the sailors could "fumble about" in the 
arsenal entirely unmolested. The fact is that there was hardly 
any security provided at all for a huge number of terrible 
weapons. There were only 16 guards on duty instead of the 64 
there should have been. No observation was being carried out 
from guard towers and no checks were being done at checkpoints. 
Contrary to regulations, these measures were replaced by 
patrols of sailors armed only with bayonets around the four-km 
perimeter of the arsenal. Yet it was storing not just aviation 
ammunition but various small arms, which are so attractive to 
the criminal world and those connected with it. Here at the 
Novonezhino dumps forged documents had recently been used to 
steal 41 Kalashnikov assault rifles, 31 Makarov pistols, 140 
grenades, and over 20,000 rounds.... The crime was committed 
with the participation of Major Votinov, former chief of the 
arsenal, and other officers and staff from law-enforcement 
organs. These weapons are now being confiscated from the mafia 
and hired killers.... 
  The Fleet and the people of the Far East know that Gurinov 
had begun to seriously restore order at Pacific Fleet arsenals. 
He issued a stern order to shoot to kill anyone who attempted 
to infiltrate military arms dumps. The decision to dismiss him 
leaves people confused and bitter. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46500 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Voronin of Defense Industry Committee Argues Case for </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Voronin of Defense Industry Committee Argues Case for </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Aircraft   Carriers 

<F P=102> PM0306144094 Moscow KOMSOMOLSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 1 Jun 94 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM0306144094 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMSOMOLSKAYA PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Academician Gennadiy Voronin, deputy </F>
chairman of the Russian Federation State Committee for the 
Defense Industry, by Igor Chernyak; date, place not given: 
"Instead of Aircraft Carriers -- Peter the Great's Boats. 
Academician Gennadiy Voronin, Deputy Chairman of the Russian 
Federation State Committee for the Defense Industry, on the 
Approaching Demise of the Russian Navy"] 
  [Text] [Chernyak] Gennadiy Petrovich, what prompted you 
to contact the paper? 
  [Voronin] The dire state of the Russian Navy on the 
threshold of its 300th anniversary. Battleworthy ships are 
leaving the Russian Federation Navy in droves -- the Soviet Navy 
never experienced losses of this kind in its entire history, 
either in peacetime or even in wartime. Aircraft carrier losses 
are particularly serious. Of the five aircraft-carrying 
cruisers which were recently built and which are not even 
halfway through their scheduled lifetime, only two now remain. 
Moreover, the fate of one of them is predetermined. 
  The warship building program between now and the year 2003 
does not provide for the construction of any aircraft carriers. 
Moreover, the scientific and industrial projects on aircraft 
carrier construction are no longer functioning and they could 
begin to be irrevocably destroyed in the very near future. 
Unless urgent measures are adopted, it will take us decades to 
reach the level we were at in the late eighties and early 
nineties. 
  [Chernyak] But the West can still afford to build aircraft 
carriers -- it has lots of money. It is too expensive for 
Russia.... 
  [Voronin] It has been the popular view in recent years: 
Aircraft-carrying ships are allegedly not necessary, because 
they are "expensive," "ineffective," and "aggressive." But, as 
a rule, these "justifications" are not confirmed by the 
calculations. Evidently, their authors believe that bald 
pronouncements, with an apparent military-analytical flavor, are 
enough for the general public. I will tell you that the first 
aircraft-carrying cruiser, the Kiev, which we built in 
1970-1975, cost the country less than 270 million rubles [R] at 
1975 prices, and counting the aircraft complement -- R320 
million. The heavy aircraft-carrying cruiser Admiral Kuznetsov, 
with its complement of ultramodern fighters, cost no more than 
R850-990 million at 1990 prices. Compare that with the cost of 
a Nimitz-class U.S. Navy aircraft carrier -- $3.038 billion. At 
the same time, the inclusion of heavy aircraft-carrying cruisers 
in naval groupings makes them 1.5-2 times more effective. In 
other words, the effective strength of fleets has to be doubled 
in order to achieve the same results without heavy 
aircraft-carrying cruisers. If one is talking about the value 
of the naval forces and various onshore facilities remaining 
intact in the first two-three weeks of conventional combat 
actions, it would far exceed the amount spent on the creation 
and upkeep of aircraft carriers. 
  [Chernyak] But there is an "alternative" path -- deployment 
of shore-based fighter aircraft in addition to those in the air 
defense system.... 
  [Voronin] It would only be partial cover: The range of 
shore-based aircraft and the amount of time they can spend in 
areas where our naval forces require cover is limited, since 
mankind has yet to invent an aircraft that can continue flying 
indefinitely and has not raised a generation of pilots capable 
of being at the controls for days on end. Indeed, what is 
needed is further supplies of aircraft and the creation, often 
in remote areas, of basing systems and all types of support and 
maintenance for newly formed aircraft units (at least 15 fighter 
regiments per fleet). So expenditure on the implementatiom of 
this alternative would not compare (we are talking about tens of 
times as much) with expenditure on the creation of heavy 
aircraft-carrying cruisers. 
  [Chernyak] What about the aggressive nature of aircraft 
carriers -- after all, what we have is a defensive doctrine... 
  [Voronin] But the Soviet doctrine never envisaged waging 
combat actions in theaters overseas. Therefore, the idea of 
creating attack aircraft carriers was not developed here. Our 
Navy's aircraft-carrying ships have always been built as the 
main means of protecting their forces and facilities and this 
construction has always been for defensive purposes. 
  [Chernyak] Whom do you intend to defend yourself against -- 
indeed, according to the military doctrine, Russia has no 
enemies. 
  [Voronin] Let us look at the military doctrines and tasks 
facing the Western countries' navies. The U.S. military 
doctrine is based on such tenets as, for example, "U.S. world 
hegemony is to be achieved" and "the main opponent is the CIS 
and Third World countries." Hence the maritime strategy whereby 
the U.S. Navy must be capable of posing a nuclear missile threat 
along the perimeter of the CIS countries, destroying CIS and 
Third World countries' armed forces groupings in their entire 
operational depth, blockading the CIS Navy off its own coast, 
and preventing it from deploying on ocean routes. 
  [Chernyak] But the United States now has a new maritime 
strategy.... 
  [Voronin] It does not identify a new opponent, but assumes 
that the United States now has undoubted supremacy at sea, based 
on an assessment of the state of the Russian Navy. The concept 
of fighting the Navy of the former USSR on the ocean is replaced 
by the concept of using the U.S. Navy in maritime areas 
adjoining our coast and waging combat actions in conjunction 
with the Army and Air Force in order to gain supremacy on dry 
land. 
  So we, Russia, remain the chief opponent. You can judge for 
yourselves whether we need aircraft carriers when our new 
"partners" have that kind of doctrine. Not to mention the fact 
that the U.S., British, and French Navies have aircraft carriers 
with offensive weapons -- attack aircraft. 
  [Chernyak] What is the situation in the United States 
regarding aircraft carriers? 
  [Voronin] They are continuing to build mighty ships such as 
Nimitz-class nuclear-powered aircraft carriers. They are 
large-displacement (90,000-100,000 tonnes) ships, carrying some 
90 aircraft. Their main purpose is to deal heavy blows to enemy 
territory and armed forces, using their aircraft. Special 
escort forces have been set up to support aircraft carriers' 
combat activities, because they are used in carrier battle 
groups or multipurpose carrier groups -- 8-10 cruisers anmd 
destroyers per carrier. There are 15 of these groups in the 
U.S. Navy. This number will diminish somewhat by 2000, but 
there will then be eight nuclear-powered aircraft carriers, and 
construction is planned to continue. Moreover, the Americans 
are not scrapping the aircraft carriers they withdraw from 
combat service, but they are transferring them to the reserve, 
keeping around 60 percent of the maintenance personnel (for 
example, the aircraft carrier Lexington, withdrawn from combat 
service in 1991, and the Midway, withdrawn in 1992, are being 
held in reserve and have not been sent for scrap). 
  We know also that a blueprint has been drawn up for future 
aircraft-carrying ships in Britain, France, Spain, and Portugal, 
where ships of limited displacement of betweeen 8,000 and 20,000 
tonnes are planned (in Spain one has been built). Even a small 
country like Thailand has ordered a Principe de Asturias-class 
aircraft-carrying ship from Spain.... 
  [Chernyak] What are you proposing? 
  [Voronin] We do not consider it possible today, indeed we 
are incapable of building aircraft carriers like the Admiral 
Kuznetsov -- it is very expensive and, in fact, the main base is 
now in Ukraine. But in order to ensure that the Russian 
Federation Navy does not lose the potential to provide air cover 
for its forces at sea, it would be entirely acceptable to decide 
to build small aircraft carriers of comparatively small 
displacement (12,000-15,000 tonnes). We have the potential to 
do this at the moment -- the specialists, designers, and 
shipbuilding capacities are still available. We could even make 
them for sale abroad -- more and more countries, including Third 
World countries, are showing an interest in ships of this class. 
All this would considerably facilitate the task of of equipping 
our Navy with aircraft carriers, if only three or four per 
fleet, primarily for the Northern and Pacific Fleets. 
  [Chernyak] Not a bad idea : It would be no worse than the 
arms race in terms of ruining us.... 
  [Voronin] It is not a matter of building 10 aircraft 
carriers quickly. We favor a methodical, deliberate, and 
consistent continuation (without stopping and starting) of the 
construction of aircraft-carrying cruisers, but at Russian 
shipyards. Personally, I think it is time to immediately launch 
a state order for the planning of small aircraft-carrying ships: 
It would enable us to retain the development collective and 
start preparing for the construction of a series of aircraft 
carriers in St. Petersburg and Severodvinsk, with an export 
version in mind (countries with nonglobal economies would be 
able to afford them). It must be borne in mind that only three 
or four countries would be able to afford to develop 
aircraft-carrying ships of this class. But if we waste time, 
even according to the authors of "Jane's Fighting Ships 
1993-1994," "there is a danger of the drift or even collapse of 
the whole Russian shipbuilding industry." 
  I think it would be advisable also for the Russian 
Federation 
Defense Ministry to review the way it thinks about the Navy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46501 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Varyag, Kievs To Be Scrapped </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Varyag, Kievs To Be Scrapped </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   LD0306172894 Moscow ITAR-TASS in English 1618 GMT 3 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> LD0306172894 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ITAR-TASS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [By ITAR-TASS special correspondent Vladimir Gondusov] </F>
  [Text] Sevastopol June 3 TASS -- The Varyag 
aircraft-carrying cruiser, whose construction was begun in 1987 
in Nikolayev and suspended three years ago, will be scrapped on 
decision of the Ukrainian authorities. The metal will be sold 
abroad. 
  The cruiser of over 60,000 tonnes displacement is 340 meters 
long and 76 meters wide. Russia has several ships of the type, 
including Kiev, Novorossiisk and Minsk. 
  Kiev has scrapped the almost-built Ulyanov aircraft-carrier, 
and sold its metal abroad dirt cheap, Deputy Black Sea Fleet 
Commander for Operation and Repairs Rear-Admiral Aleksandr 
Aladkin told ITAR- TASS today. The same will be done to the 
ships to be received by Kiev as result of the Black Sea Fleet 
division. 
  The Admiral is skeptical about Ukrainian claims the republic 
is a major ship-building state. In his words, all the eight 
ship- building plants of the republic depend on the delivery of 
accessories. "It is half the work to build a ship's hull. It 
should be equipped and armed, and Ukraine cannot do this on its 
own," said Aladkin. 
  The Nikolayev plant has almost finalized the construction of 
the Admiral Lobov cruiser. But they will still have to buy an 
air-defence system which is produced in Russia and costs 65 
billion rubles, he added. 
  Aladkin is sure that the Black Sea Fleet should be divided 
as 
soon as possible, as this is the only way "to make sure that 
Ukraine is unable to maintain even a small part of the fleet". 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46502 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Okean-SP' Coastal Radar Tracks Shipping Movements Off </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Okean-SP' Coastal Radar Tracks Shipping Movements Off </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Baltiysk 

<F P=102>   PM0606101594 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 2 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> PM0606101594 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Valeriy Gromak report: "Okean Changes Profession"] </F>
  [Text] Baltiysk -- The problem of ensuring the safety of 
warship and civilian vessel movement has always existed for 
Baltiysk. Today, considerably more Kaliningrad-bound foreign 
ships have started passing through the main base of the Baltic 
Fleet, which has made the problem of ensuring safety even more 
complex. The Russian Maritime Transportation Department has 
recently certified the fact of the creation in Baltiysk of the 
oblast's first coastal system of shipping movements. Its base 
is the "Okean-SP" coastal radar complex which can automatically 
track 55 targets at once. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46503 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Exercise Rehearses Handling of Naval Battle Casualties </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Exercise Rehearses Handling of Naval Battle Casualties </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0306150194 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 3 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> PM0306150194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Lieutenant Sergey Voyeykov and Major Oleg Pochinyuk report: </F>
"Medical Personnel Also Carry Out Exercises. Even at Sea"] 
  [Text] A tactical-special exercise to deploy posts for the 
reception of wounded and casualties and organize medical support 
for personnel in the event of a mass influx of casualties from a 
maritime theater of operations has been held under the 
leadership of Major-General (Medical Service) Georgiy 
Sharayevskiy, chief of the Navy Medical Service, on Kotlin 
Island. 
  One of the objectives of the exercise, the first on such a 
scale in the last 10-12 years, was to rehearse cooperation 
between medics from various branches of the Armed Forces. 
Lieutenant-General (Medical Service) Ivan Chizh, chief of the 
Russian Federation Defense Ministry Main Military-Medical 
Directorate, was familiarized with the course of the exercise. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46504 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> NAVAL FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official Describes Expedition to Komsomolets </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Official Describes Expedition to Komsomolets </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   LD0806124894 Moscow Radio Moscow World Service in English 
1810 GMT 7 Jun 94 </F>

<F P=103> LD0806124894 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow Radio Moscow World Service </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [From the "Commonwealth Update" program] </F>
  [Text] The board of directors of the Russian ministry for 
emergency situations [Ministry for Civil Defense, Emergencies, 
and Natural Disasters] has held an open session to report on 
preparing an expedition to the Norwegian Sea, where the 
Komsomolets nuclear- powered submarine sank in deep waters. 
More from our correspondent Irina Korneyeva, and here is what 
she writes. 
  I shall remind our listeners that the two torpedoes with 
nuclear warheads, each containing 3,200 grams of plutonium-39, 
were most dangerous environmentally. The torpedo launchers were 
partially demolished due to the submarine's depressurizing. 
There is an imminent danger of radioactive leakage into the 
environment due to a free water exchange in the afore sections 
of the atomic submarine. According to some reports, this can 
become a reality in 1995. Therefore, a decision was taken in 
Moscow to carry on rescue works at the site of the Komsomolets 
wreckage this summer. 
  The director of the Main Board for Underwater Rescuing 
Missions, Mikhail Talokolnikov, describes the forthcoming 
mission as follows: 
  [Begin Talokolnikov recording, in Russian with superimposed 
English translation] To minimize radioactive leakage we have 
entrusted the mission with the following tasks. Firstly, the 
mission should try to partially seal the afore sections of the 
submarine, using deep water submersible apparatuses. Secondly, 
it should monitor the radio-ecology at the wreckage site in an 
an attempt to pinpoint most likely directions of the plutonium 
products' diffusion due to corrosion. Thirdly, it would examine 
the hub of the submarine and the floating rescue camera box, 
which has broken up and now lies at the bottom six km to the 
west of the submarine. 
  I shall recall that the final pressurizing of the submarine 
hub is due to take place in 1995. This will be a second stage 
in implementing the safety of the submarine. Special rubber 
seals were developed to block a possible radioactive leakage due 
to a corrosion. The first consignment is already aboard a 
research vessel, Academician Keldysh. These rubber seals will 
be mounted from the Mir manned deep submersibles, equipped with 
manipulators. An expert analysis shows these works will present 
no dangers to pilots or to the environment. Besides, the 
submersibles are relatively cheap. Their manufacturing costs 
will exceed the monitoring costs only by 15 or 20 percent and 
will amount to 4.6 billion rubles, $4.1 million. 
  As to the ecological monitoring, a wide-ranging program is 
envisaged. Diverse and novel types of equipment are to be 
tested during the pending mission. One of the appliances will 
stay at the bottom of the sea to register medium radiation for 
one year after the mission is over. This will be done for the 
first time in the history of underwater works. Now a wide 
ecological monitoring is necessary, for real background readings 
at the site of the wreckage are particularly important if taken 
this year. If this is done experts will be able to monitor the 
changes in the environment pollution. [end recording] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46505 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> REAR SERVICES, SUPPORT ISSUES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Military Construction Workers Strike Over Underfunding </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Military Construction Workers Strike Over Underfunding </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0706125594 Moscow IZVESTIYA in Russian 7 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> PM0706125594 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow IZVESTIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Viktor Litovkin: "Military Construction </F>
Personnel on Strike. They Are Not Asking for Money, They Want 
To Earn It"] 
  [Text] Worrying reports are coming in from military 
districts and fleets. The latest was from the Northern Fleet. 
An unprecedented event has occurred there -- military 
construction personnel have gone on strike. According to our 
information, around 2,000 military construction personnel, 
including 915 commissioned and 200 warrant officers, and 8,500 
of their civilian colleagues have not received full pay since 
the beginning of the year. The military personnel are there to 
serve, but there is no work for them. There are no construction 
materials and the electricity has been switched off. 
  They received only one-third of the pay for a completed 
production assignment, and then a large part of this sum was 
automatically taken off them by the city bank in Murmansk for 
overdue municipal payments and taxes. The military construction 
personnel marched to the central square in Severomorsk, the 
fleet's main base, to demand money, to demand that their minimum 
social needs be met. 
  "The situation is critical, unfortunately," I was told by 
Lieutenant General Oleg Borisov, deputy chief of Construction 
and Troop Billeting of Russia's Armed Forces, when I asked him 
to comment on the report. "And not only in the Northern Fleet. 
We have unpaid accounts totaling half a trillion rubles [R], 
and I have no idea where we are going to get the money to settle 
up with the construction personnel." 
  The Army constructs housing and other facilities -- combat 
missile complexes, naval stations, airfields, and nuclear weapon 
dumps -- using state funds. According to the draft federal 
budget, R3.7 trillion were to be allocated for this purpose, 
although the requirement was three-four times greater, but the 
military had received only R795 billion as of 25 May. 
  Moreover, in May the allocation of money for the 
construction 
of housing was 30 percent down on April. Military construction 
personnel I know told me that if it goes on like this the 
military construction complex will collapse altogether. 
  The problem is aggravated by the fact that under the state 
program providing housing for servicemen, as approved by the 
president, the army was supposed to construct 220,000 apartments 
in 1993-1995 from federal budget means. Local authorities were 
constructing another 180,000 apartments for officers discharged 
into the reserve or who have retired. This would make it 
possible by the end of this year to cut the number of people 
waiting for apartments to 118,000. Now, because of the failure 
of the program, the waiting list, instead of decreasing, will 
increase to 155,000 families. Incidentally, the army's figure 
for people without apartments now stands at 133,700. 
  Even the 8 billion plus German marks allocated by the FRG to 
house families leaving Germany and credits from other foreign 
states are not much help. The problems are not solved merely by 
40,000 extra apartments. Moreover, there is no money for the 
construction of cultural and consumer facilities, as the 
official documents say, alongside the housing: boiler houses, 
stores, kindergartens, schools and hospitals, utilities. How 
can you give people houses without heating, water, and drains? 
  One reason for the parlous state of the army's military 
construction complex is the fact that the money allocated by the 
state budget for the construction of housing was not fully 
indexed by the Finance Ministry, or the indexing came very late. 
The money that has entered the military units' accounts is not 
commensurate with the current levels of prices of construction 
materials, electricity, heat, and machinery. Because of this, a 
debt of R290 billion built up last year. Only R110 billion were 
allocated to pay the debt. The question is -- Where to get the 
remaining R180 billion. 
  But, according to generals I know, the military does not 
want 
and does not intend to go cap in hand to the government. The 
military is well aware that state money is in short supply, so 
it is prepared to seek its own way out of the situation. 
  For instance, it constructed 3,000 apartments last year 
using 
nonbudget sources -- sale of vacant property that no longer had 
any military importance, and wheeled engineering equipment -- 
and the resources of housing construction cooperatives and 
individual builders. Just as many will be provided this year. 
But these apartments are a drop in the ocean of housing 
problems. 
  The military is prepared to use the experience accumulated 
by 
Moscow construction workers, who, despite meager funding, are 
annually providing thousands of apartments for people on the 
waiting list and providing their construction complex with new 
machinery and materials. This is being done in Moscow by 
auctioning off part of the housing constructed under city plans. 
  Why does this right not extend to military construction 
personnel? They would be able to partly rectify matters by 
auctioning off a proportion of the apartments they have 
constructed. 
  Taxes are another problem. The army being what it is, a 
state institution that is unable to make a profit, it should be 
exempt from transport and special taxes, payment for allocation 
of land, and from value-added tax.... All this takes the lion's 
share of the budget funds allocated to it for capital 
construction and restricts the latter's pace and potential. 
  According to the plan, military construction personnel 
currently owe officers 20,000 apartments. This figure could 
double by the end of the year. Dozens of military construction 
units are without work. In the Northern Fleet they have now 
switched to ways of fighting for their rights, such as strikes, 
which are unthinkable as far as the military is concerned. 
  But there is still no visible way out of the crisis for 
them. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46506 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> PEACEKEEPING FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   TV View of Peacekeeping Battalion in Training </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    TV View of Peacekeeping Battalion in Training </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   LD0306191494 </F>
<F P=103> LD0306191494 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
BFN 

    [Editorial Report] St. Petersburg Fifth Channel Television 
Network in Russian at 1605 GMT on 3 June broadcasts the 
"Weekdays" current affairs program, which this week visited a 
Russian battalion of peacekeeping forces formed on the basis of 
the 129th Guards Motorized Rifle Regiment, and soon to be 
deployed in South Ossetia after completing specialist training 
near St. Petersburg. The program is 12 minutes long. 
  Interviewed at the beginning of the feature, Major-General 
N.F. Tkachev, commander of the Russian peacekeeping motor rifle 
division, comments on the status of his command: "We are an 
ordinary Land Forces unit, a motor rifle division, which is 
charged with carrying out the duties of a peacekeeping unit, an 
essential function that arose when conflicts in our former 
republics on the borders of Russia began. We are guided by our 
training program for peacekeeping forces subunits, which was 
developed by the Land Forces General Staff. Unfortunately, it 
has to be said that we still have no legal documentation to 
establish the status of our duties. There is an order by the 
defense minister which determined additional privileges on the 
basis of Russian legislation for those soldiers who carry out 
their duties in conflict areas. So far there is no other 
document." 
  On the proportion of soldiers serving by contract in 
conflict 
areas, Tkachev says: "We have conscripts and we have contract 
servicemen. In the battalion that is in Tskhinvali at the 
moment there are about 70 contract servicemen. Officers and 
warrant officers are practically all on contracts. Other ranks, 
conscripts, naturally carry out the same duties as they do. 
Today we only send volunteers, be they on contracts or 
conscripted, and only after careful training. That is, all 
those who are now being sent to the conflict zones have served a 
minimum of six months." 
  A major, identified by caption as "AP Prilepin, regimental 
psychologist," explains in an interview that volunteers for 
service in conflict areas are carefully screened and selected 
for given specialities in particular units, with unsuitable 
candidates being rejected. His duties also include 
psychological support for soldiers, he says: "The peace-keeping 
duties that face us are of a kind that demand the development 
and provision of a whole complex of measures, including 
essential psychological rehabilitation during and after service 
there." 
  Vox pops with individual soldiers on their fears at being 
sent to a conflict area then follow. The soldiers emphasize 
that they are volunteers and satisfied at having received 
additional training to fulfill their new role, but said they 
have little idea of what awaited them in their new posting. 
  Captain K.P. Samosyuk, company commander, agreed that 
training could be improved to take account of local conditions. 
"Additions to the training program for peacekeeping forces are 
essential. More specialized training should be introduced, and 
physical training. Because the soldiers serving here are mostly 
conscripted from Leningrad, Arkhangelsk, Vologda Oblast, and so 
on, while the peacekeeping mission has to be carried out--our 
division is in the Caucasus, in Moldavia [Moldova], mountainous 
places. And 18 months ago one battalion was sent to Tajikistan, 
another region a long way from our forested boggy part of the 
world." 
  Video throughout shows interviewees, training facilities, 
and 
large numbers of marching troops. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46507 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Radetskyy on Importance of Military Councils in Armed Forces </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Radetskyy on Importance of Military Councils in Armed Forces </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0411A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 11 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0411A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by General of the Army Vitaliy Radetskyy, minister </F>
of defense of Ukraine: "Military Councils: An Important Body in 
the Administration of the Organizational Development of the 
Armed Forces of Ukraine"] 
  [Text] Military Councils as collegial advisory bodies in 
the Armed Forces of Ukraine have deep historical roots. There 
have always been military councils. The tradition of a collegial 
approach to deciding the most important questions and those 
having a bearing on the future emerged at the same time that a 
Ukrainian military force first began to form. The Zaporozhian 
Cossacks invested such councils with a special ritual. 
  The Zaporozhian Cossacks usually held their general councils 
on 1 January, on the feast of the Intercession of the Blessed 
Virgin Mary [Pokrova] (the feast of the patron of the 
Zaporozhian church), on the second or third day of Easter, as 
well as at any other time that the Cossacks troops requested the 
convocation of a council. 
  The councils dealt with the most important matters affecting 
the life of the army: making peace and declaring war, organizing 
military campaigns, punishing criminals, and distributing lands 
and property among the kurins [barracks in which 
Cossacks lived in a permanent fortified camp or Sich, and, by 
extension, to the military unit that lived in them; also 
translated as a "platoon"]. The distribution of lands and 
elections were held every year without fail. 
  A few days before the council was to be held, the entire 
Cossack army gathered at the Sich. The Cossacks made special 
preparations for the council -- they put on their best clothes 
and weapons and attended church, first matins and later Mass, 
which were celebrated with great ceremony on these days. These 
services were followed by communal noonday meals in the 
kurins. 
  After the meal, a cannon shot was fired to signal that the 
council was about to begin. A kettle-drum was brought out of the 
church, and the drummer sounded the preparatory signal. He was 
followed by the Osavul [Adjutant-General], who 
carried a large military banner into the main square. A second 
roll of the kettle-drum signaled the actual "assembly." The 
rank-and-file Cossacks were followed into the square by the 
Starshyna [Cossack Officer Corps] wearing the 
insignia of their rank. They were greeted by a drum roll. When 
they reached their assigned place, the officers bowed to the 
whole assembled company, which stood in a circle around the 
square. 
  After the lands had been distributed by lot, the 
Koshovyy [Sich Camp Commander] asked the assembled 
company if it wanted to change the entire Officer Corps in 
keeping with tradition at the start of a new year. In response, 
the Cossacks either supported his leadership, or they demanded 
that he lay down his mace [bulava]. In the event that the latter 
happened, the whole officer corps resigned, except for those 
whom the Cossacks asked to stay on in their posts. Genuinely 
democratic elections were then held to elect candidates from all 
the kurins. 
  The election was also regulated by custom: each elected 
officer twice refused the post for which he had been chosen, 
while the ritual of smearing his head with dirt was to remind 
him not to think of himself as better than the rest of the 
Cossack brotherhood. If a foreign ambassador was present at the 
Council in order to make some request of the Cossacks, he set 
forth the terms he was offering before the entire company, after 
which the matter was decided in his absence. If there was 
disagreement between the officers and the rank and file, 20 
representatives were elected, who conducted detailed talks with 
the ambassador and concluded an agreement. 
  There was no formal vote: the matter was decided by 
acclamation, that is, by a decisive numerical majority voicing 
support for a decision. 
  In addition to general councils, if the Starshyna 
did not want to convoke such a council, there were smaller 
councils "in the kurins," called skhodky: the otamans 
[leaders] of the kurins gathered in the Camp 
Commander's kurin [kurin koshovoho]. These meetings 
were held to discuss minor campaigns and secret and urgent 
matters. 
  Small councils [skhodky] in the palankas [the 
eight military districts outside the Sich in the so-called "Free 
Lands of the Zaporozhian Forces"] dealt with insignificant 
matters and were held by married Cossacks who lived outside the 
Sich. 
  By the end of the 17th century, a General Council was called 
only to elect the Hetman or ratify treaty articles with Moscow; 
other matters were decided by a council of officers. This 
council met at Christmas or the feast of the Epiphany and at 
Easter. It dealt with planning campaigns, the construction of 
forts, and the maintenance of subunits. It was this council that 
came to resemble a real military council. 
  The things that are useful and warranted at each historical 
stage assume a new content to suit the needs of subsequent 
periods. 
  Today, when Ukraine is building her Armed Forces in 
difficult 
economic and sociopolitical conditions, military councils play a 
unique role. In accordance with the directive issued by the 
President of Ukraine on 24 March 1993, which ratifies the 
Statute on the Military Collegium of the Ministry of Defense of 
Ukraine and the Statute on Military Councils in the Armed Forces 
of Ukraine, they have the status of permanent collegial advisory 
bodies. 
  One of the main tasks of today's military councils is to 
work 
out recommendations on such issues as maintaining the combat and 
mobilizational readiness of forces, strengthening military 
discipline and the social and legal protection of military 
personnel, improving the effectiveness of the exercise of 
command over the troops, conferring military ranks and awards, 
receiving reports from commanders of subunits within the 
different combat arms and formations of the Armed Forces of 
Ukraine and from the military districts on their activity, and 
submitting their conclusions to be included in drafts of 
normative acts to be sent to the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine. 
  What is new in the work of the military councils? 
  Today's military councils play an important role as a 
collegial organ in implementing cadre policy. This procedure for 
appointing generals and officers to responsible posts and for 
conferring military ranks precludes the kind of protectionism 
that we often saw in the past. The military council deals with 
the issue of training reserve cadres. 
  In their work, the military councils are guided by the 
constitution and laws of Ukraine, the decrees of the Supreme 
Council of Ukraine, the edicts and directives of the president 
of Ukraine, the decrees and directives of the Cabinet of 
Ministers of Ukraine, the decisions of the Defense Council of 
Ukraine, and the orders and directives of the minister of 
defense of Ukraine. 
  To guarantee that the military council performs its tasks 
effectively, its chairman must ensure that the discussion of 
issues at the council meetings is unconstrained, principled, and 
comprehensive and that the views of all participants are taken 
into account when decisions are made. He also sees to it that 
the council's decisions are implemented. 
  It has become customary for members of the council to make 
regular reports about their personal role in carrying out the 
council's decisions and on questions pertaining to preventing 
accidents and traumatism among military personnel, the guards, 
etc. There is now greater oversight of implementation of the 
council's decisions, translated into orders issued by 
commanders: the commanders report on the execution of these 
orders. 
  After analyzing the positive results of the work of the 
Military Council of the Odessa Military District, it is clear 
that this council has introduced a fine tradition of conducting 
visiting sessions. 
  Such sessions are held directly in the combined formations, 
formations, and military units. At the same time, practical 
instruction on questions put on the agenda for discussion are 
held with commanders and chiefs of services. Urgent measures are 
applied on the spot to make the necessary provisions for combat 
instruction and other vital activities of the troops. 
  In my opinion, another positive fact is that participation 
in 
the meetings of the military councils and field exercises are 
not confined solely to the Chairman of the Oblast Council of 
People's Deputies, who is a member of the Military Council, but 
that representatives of the local state executive organs, of 
local and regional self-government organs, and of enterprises, 
institutions, and organizations are also invited. This gives 
them an opportunity to acquaint themselves with the kind of 
socioeconomic and purely military problems that the Armed Forces 
of Ukraine face today, as well as with the military equipment at 
the army's disposal. 
  In addition, this gives military personnel an opportunity to 
work more closely with the representatives of local government. 
As we know, every military formation is stationed on the 
administrative territory of an oblast or a rayon, and 
fulfillment of the laws of Ukraine on the social protection of 
military personnel depends in large measure on how well the 
military councils work with the leadership of local government 
organs. Neither the local authorities, nor the military units 
can carry out such measures as organizing the defense and 
communications of a region, mobilization, conscription into 
military service, and military recruitment on their own. And 
what about purely everyday matters?! The oblasts and rayons rely 
on assistance from the military to bring in the harvest, while 
the latter, in turn, ask for help with housing. 
  It has become customary for the military councils to seek 
the 
help of the local authorities in preventing desertion and 
avoiding the draft. 
  One can make a long list of the issues that need to be 
solved 
jointly, but the key question facing both the military and local 
authorities is how to solve anything at all in the present state 
of overall economic decline. 
  Clearly, matters are not confined solely to economic and 
everyday social problems. Providing care for invalids and war 
and labor veterans, establishing patronage relations between 
enterprises and military units, and the military and patriotic 
education of youth -- these are issues that have to be dealt 
with on a national scale. 
  Unquestionably, the military councils, like the Armed Forces 
of Ukraine, are still young, but in the short time that they 
have existed, a certain amount of positive experience has been 
accumulated which should be made public. 
  As Defense Minister of Ukraine, I do my best to ensure that 
the military councils of the Armed Forces of Ukraine not 
continue the worst traditions of the military councils of the 
former Soviet Army, in which these bodies performed punitive 
functions (deciding whom to dismiss from his post, whom to 
demote in rank, etc.). An officer left such military councils 
demoralized. Crudity, boorishness, and conduct humiliating to 
officers and generals were the hallmarks of these councils. As a 
rule, these were not gatherings at which colleagues met to 
exchange views, but rather a place where punishments were meted 
out. 
  Historical experience testifies that military councils 
should 
serve as assemblies of military personnel for consultation -- 
that is, serve the very purpose they were meant to serve when 
they were first formed. As such, they will enhance the authority 
of the commander, provide him with an opportunity to reveal his 
personality, and strengthen the principle of unity of command 
[yedynonachalstvo]. This will allow him to put forward vitally 
important recommendations in all fields, ranging from the 
practical implementation of military policies in the Armed 
Forces of Ukraine to the things that pertain to the ordinary 
concerns of everyday life. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46508 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   High Costs of Arms, Equipment Procurement Stressed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    High Costs of Arms, Equipment Procurement Stressed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0406A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 29 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0406A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Candidate of Military Sciences Oleksandr </F>
Manachynskyy under the rubric "Point of View": "There Are Small 
Armies, but There Are No Cheap Ones..."] 
  [Text] Regardless of the fact that the ideas of 
cutbacks in the army and weaponry, shutting down bases and 
withdrawing troops from foreign territories have moved to the 
practical plane, no one anywhere is talking about the complete 
elimination of armies. The discussion, on the contrary, concerns 
improving and optimizing them, and trying to make the armed 
forces effective and, at the same time, cheap. 
  So how are matters proceeding in Ukraine? No one has any 
doubts that the army costs a lot and needs to be cut back. But 
what are the realities? Defense appropriations under the 
approved budget are 14,741,870 karbovantsi (1.17 billion dollars 
at the exchange rate of 12,600 karbovantsi to the dollar used by 
the National Bank, or 387,945,000 dollars at the market 
settlement rate of 38,000 karbovantsi to the dollar). Is that a 
lot or a little? Let us compare. The 1993 defense budget for 
Slovakia was equal to 284,340,000 dollars, Poland 2.25 billion, 
Hungary 1.16 billion and neutral Sweden, which maintains an army 
of 65,000 people, 5.24 billion dollars. The planned U.S. 
military budget for the 1994 fiscal year is 263.7 billion 
dollars, with overall military spending as a percentage of GNP 
in 1992, according to the data of SIPRI, 5.4 percent in the 
United States, 4.0 percent in Great Britain, 3.9 percent in 
Turkey, 3.4 percent in France and 2.2. percent in Germany. 
  Military spending per capita will reach 1,100 dollars this 
year in the United States, 730 in Great Britain, 810 in France, 
815 in Norway and 500 dollars in Greece and the FRG. They are 
283,500 karbovantsi (at the different exchange rates, from 7 to 
21 dollars) in Ukraine. 
  The following circumstances should also be taken into 
account 
when evaluating the military budget of Ukraine: 
  First, the increase in inflation in Ukraine in 1993 was 
approximately 47 percent a month, so it is being cut back 
substantially every year even without any formal reduction in 
military spending. 
  Second, it must be kept in mind that the cost of military 
hardware and weaponry, as well as some types of operations, has 
increased substantially with the transition to economic 
accountability and self-financing. 
  Third, the cutbacks in the size of the armed forces and the 
realization of the START-1 treaty, as well as the conversion of 
the military-industrial complex, will require additional 
appropriations rather than cutbacks in the first few years. 
  Fourth, it should be taken into account that the military 
inventories are filled to overflowing with obsolete hardware, 
and the weaponry and hardware needed to replace them are 
expensive. All of this in the aggregate is not fostering an 
augmentation of military might and reserve capacity and, most 
likely, gives rise to the question of whether it will be very 
easy to provide for defensive sufficiency under such conditions. 
The answer suggests itself. 
  It is not just a matter of the military budget, however, but 
also its structure. The distribution of overall appropriations 
of the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine by dedicated purposes is 
not precisely known, but one can already state today that the 
funds that are being allotted for the procurement of weaponry 
and military hardware are insufficient, since the rate of aging 
of that material is quite high. The military budget for 1994, 
with a regard for the current social and economic situation, is 
naturally quite large. The funds that are being allocated for 
the country's defense, however, do not seem all that large 
against the background of the overall non-productive 
expenditures and losses in the national economy, as well as the 
presence of criminal capital in the country (which includes the 
"shadow" economy), which are measured in the hundreds of 
millions of karbovantsi. And the fulfillment of the requirements 
of the Military Doctrine and the implementation of the armaments 
program, the realization of which has been approved, does not 
withstand any criticism at this time. The picture is similar 
with the financing of military scientific projects aimed at the 
development of modern types of weapons. Here is an example: 
Science is an average of about 15 percent of military spending 
for the Americans. The U.S. government spends 76 billion dollars 
on all science today. Sixty percent of that is for purely 
military programs. 
  The breakdown of budgetary appropriations for defense in 
Ukraine gives no precise answer as to how much of the budgetary 
funding is going to science. The amount of that spending, in the 
estimation of specialists, is less than ten percent, and that 
naturally provides no opportunity to conduct basic and 
investigative research. 
  This situation is leading to entirely foreseeable 
consequences in the near future--we will not be able to create 
advanced weapons systems. We will not be able to if the 
state--and there is still no other customer or other source of 
financing aside from the state budget in Ukrainian military 
science--does not direct the necessary quantity of funds to 
basic and investigative research, the development of 
dual-purpose high technologies and the creation of scientific 
and technical potential. 
  It should be borne in mind that equipping the troops with 
weaponry and military hardware depends substantially on the 
state of the economy. Moreover, the influence of scientific and 
technical progress on the quality of those weapons and military 
hardware is being manifested in more and more pronounced fashion 
of late. There is rapid growth in the cost of weaponry and other 
mat&eacute;riel, first and foremost owing to the large 
concentration of efforts in scientific research and development 
connected with the creation and production of new arms systems. 
  The sharp rise in the cost of weapons is restricting ever 
more the capabilities of the economy with regard to their mass 
production. A trend toward compensating for quantitative 
indicators through qualitative characteristics--an increase in 
destructive power, accuracy etc.--is thus being noted even today 
in foreign armies. This inevitably leads to further complexity, 
and hence, to increases in the cost of the weapons. 
  Spending has increased considerably on the operation of the 
weaponry, which is now approximately half of the funds that are 
spend for the technical equipping and upkeep of the armed 
forces. The cost of operating some of the most complex combat 
systems is sometimes even higher than the cost of production. 
  Military-economic spending is also increasing as a result of 
the increased speed of the obsolescence of weaponry. The 
upgrading of the armaments of the NATO armies thus occurred 
every 15 years in the 1950's, every 10 years in the middle of 
the 1960's and is now approximately every 6-7 years. The 
replacement periods of weaponry have been shortened so much that 
some models are removed before the start of series production. 
That is the fate that befell the Sergeant York self-propelled 
anti-aircraft gun mount in the United States in the 1980's. 
  The funds for the procurement of weaponry and military 
hardware for Ukraine, in the estimation of specialists, do not 
exceed 20 percent--they are, that is, not all that much. This 
could have a negative effect on the condition of enterprises in 
the defense sectors of industry, and cause an increase in the 
ranks of the unemployed. The defense complex, aside from the 
social consequences, could also lose its basic scientific and 
industrial potential, in which advanced technologies are 
concentrated. The outflow of highly skilled specialists is even 
today leading to a weakening of the position of Ukraine in the 
creation of high-technology models of weapons and military 
hardware. All of this will ultimately cause the appearance of a 
threat to the national security of Ukraine. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46509 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Communications Head Samoylenko Reviews Branch's Progress </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Communications Head Samoylenko Reviews Branch's Progress </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0411B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 6 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0411B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lt. Gen. Valentyn Samoylenko, chief of </F>
communications of the Armed Forces of Ukraine: "In Full Swing. 
The Signal Troops of the Armed Forces of Ukraine at Work"] 
  [Text] Military communications evolved in the remote past, 
when the unique features of East Slavic military art began to 
emerge. At that time, troops in the battlefield were led by 
voice commands, the personal example of their commanders, and 
signals sent by audible devices. That is how commanders passed 
on orders and instructions and received reports. 
  However, these simple means of communication could be used 
to 
exercise command over troops only as long as military actions 
took place on small areas of land, usually on open ground, and 
commanders personally observed the battlefield. 
  Fundamentally new means of communication came into use in 
the 
wars fought in the second half of the 19th century and the 
beginning of the 20th century -- the telegraph and the 
telephone, the invention of which was made possible by the 
important contributions of such leading scientists and inventors 
as T.L. Shylling, V.S. Yakobi, V.B. Yakobi, P.M. Holubytskyy, 
Ye.I. Hvozdyov, A.A. Stolpovskyy, and others. 
  On 25 April (7 May) 1895, an important event took place in 
the history of mankind. On this day, A.S. Popov, in a paper 
delivered at the session of the Physical Division of the Russian 
Physico-Chemical Society, reported the discovery of a new means 
of communicating -- radio. The device he created made it 
possible to transmit electrical oscillations (signals) without 
wires. This was a truly great discovery. 
  From this moment on, scientists in many countries began 
working intensively on the practical application of this 
wonderful phenomenon. 
  Radio technology [radiometody], which involves the 
generation 
and propagation of radio waves, also forms the basis of 
radio-relay, tropospheric, and space communication lines, radio 
broadcasting, television, radiometry, phototelegraphy, and many 
other fields. 
  Radio communication uses wave frequencies that range from 
hundreds of hertz to tens and more gigahertz (GHz). Very low 
frequency [VLF], low frequency [LF], high frequency [HF], and 
ultrahigh frequency [UHF] radio communication lines enable 
control in all fields of human endeavor. Radio performs 
miracles. Radio waves are reflected from meteor trails, and they 
penetrate the thickness of the ocean's waves; they are used 
underground and in space; they bring us information about other 
bodies in the universe. 
  Radio communication plays a particularly important role in 
the Armed Forces. Clearly, no modern war can be won without 
reliable, uninterrupted communications. To lose the ability to 
communicate means to lose the ability to control your forces, 
and the loss of the ability to exercise command over forces 
inevitably results in defeat. This fundamental principle, 
established during the years of the Great Patriotic War, remains 
equally important today. 
  Radio makes it possible to exercise command over troops and 
weapons at any time of the year and at any time of day or night, 
requiring no search and no superstructure [bez poshuku and bez 
nadbudovy], when stationed in one place and when on the move, 
over the heads of the enemy. 
  Modern military radio equipment makes it possible to block 
the interception of information and sometimes even to prevent 
the discovery that radio waves are being used. 
  This radio equipment has made it possible to create 
fundamentally new organizational structures of mobile signal 
centers at various echelons of command. These structures are 
easily operated, mobile, and provide commanders and staffs with 
means of communication both in place and on the move [na mistsi 
i v rusi]. 
  The role of technical training of military personnel -- of 
every soldier and every commander -- has grown immeasurably in 
modern times. The range of skills that a member of the signal 
troops [voyin-svyazkivets] has to master has expanded 
significantly. Thus an officer must have the knowledge and 
skills of a well-trained service engineer. Sergeants and 
privates can also be trained to perform the tasks of technicians 
or mechanics. This has established the requirements in the 
training of signal troops. The majority of graduates of military 
signals schools, training units, and subunits are true masters 
in their field, capable of operating complex modern equipment. 
  In the experienced hands of military signals personnel, the 
means of communication make it possible for the command 
[komanduvannya] to exercise uninterrupted and timely control of 
forces and weapons. And the signal troops of the Armed Forces of 
Ukraine have experienced hands. 
  The Signal Troops of the Armed Forces of Ukraine work 
diligently and painstakingly to hone their professional skills. 
During the winter academic term, a series of complex training 
exercises involving the radio communications system were carried 
out by the Signal Troops of the Armed Forces of Ukraine. The 
results of the exercises revealed excellent skills in operating 
complex radio communications equipment by signals specialists 
and the ability of officers to command subordinate subunits in 
providing support in the control and command of troops. 
  The collectives commanded by officers V. Mystyuk, I. 
Royenko, 
V. Shevchyk, A. Yemets, and S. Maslov perform with special 
distinction. The discipline, assiduity, and excellent knowledge 
of regulation equipment [vyvirena tekhnika] exhibitied by the 
personnel of these units and subunits allows them to perform 
their assigned tasks quickly and with a high degree of 
efficiency. 
  Officers V. Sanarov, S. Butuzov, V. Tabak, A. Levchenko, V. 
Lysakonov, S. Dmytriyenko, and F. Kulishenko have shown 
themselves to be excellent specialists and good methodists 
[metodysty]. 
  Many good things can be said about the crews [ekipazhi] led 
by warrant officers Yu. Semenov, V. Rybachuk, S. Pyenkin, V. 
Bryshchatyy, P. Bondar, V. Mandalyna, V. Dehtyarov, and S. 
Litvynenko. Even in peacetime, the signals personnel continue to 
perform their professional duties in the ranks of the UN 
peacekeeping forces in the former Yugoslavia. M. Metla, V. 
Kichkar, V. Kulykov, S. Kyrpychnyy, and L. Zolotoholovyy perform 
their duties with distinction. 
  Watch duty [boyove cherhuvannya] is part of performing a 
battle mission [boyove zavdannya]. The high degree of 
responsibility and conscientiousness exhibited by A. Volva, M. 
Chechko, M. Hrytsyuta, S. Derkach, V. Bilenkyy, Yu. Prokhorov, 
I. Kulyk, Yu. Mostovyy, and V. Oliynyk have won them the respect 
of their commanders and peers. 
  Much praise is merited by female military personnel and 
employees [viyskosluzhbovtsi i sluzhbovtsi] of the Armed Forces 
who serve as radio operators, telegraph operators, and telephone 
operators [radysty, telehrafisty, telefonisty]. In particular, 
employees [sluzhbovtsi] of the Armed Forces M. Kornet and L. 
Matveyeva. 
  The annual reinforcement of the officer corps of the Signal 
Troops with graduates of the Kiev Institute of Control and 
Command and Signals [instytut upravlinnya i zvyazku] and the 
Poltava Higher Military Command Signals School [vyshche viyskove 
komandne uchylyshche zvyazku] also contributes to the excellent 
performance of tasks designed to guarantee communications. A 
great deal of effort and energy is devoted to the training of 
future officers by instructors V. Starkov, V. Dudolad, and V. 
Tymoshynskyy. 
  On the eve of the Great Victory Day over fascism, I would 
like to wish veterans and young soldiers, experienced and novice 
signals personnel good health, personal happiness, and continued 
success in the building of the Armed Forces of Ukraine and 
ensuring these forces with a high degree of combat readiness. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46510 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kobzar Stresses Strengthening Discipline in 26 April Address </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kobzar Stresses Strengthening Discipline in 26 April Address </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0405C Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 29 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0405C </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Inf. NA: "Strengthen Discipline and Learn To </F>
Work in a New Way"] 
  [Text] The chief of the Main Directorate of Indoctrination 
and Socio-Psychological Work of the Ministry of Defense, 
Lieutenant-General Anatoliy Kobzar, spoke to the attendees and 
instructor personnel of the Scientific-Research and 
Methodological Center of the main directorate on April 26. These 
meetings with educational officers who are studying at the 
two-month skills-enhancement courses have become a tradition. 
  Lieutenant-General Anatoliy Kobzar called the attention of 
the officers to the political situation surrounding the Crimea, 
and related in detail the work of the Ministry of Defense [MO] 
delegation during the recent meeting of the ministers of defense 
of Ukraine and Russia in Sevastopol. 
  Anatoliy Oleksiyovych, speaking of problems in the life and 
activity of the military and the tasks of the bodies for 
indoctrination and socio-psychological work, dwelled on such 
important elements as mobilization readiness, the development of 
new forms and methods of influencing the personnel, military 
discipline and the training of cadres for indoctrination and 
socio-psychological work. 
  He pointed out in particular that the work of the bodies for 
VSPR [indoctrination and socio-psychological work] aimed at 
resolving the tasks of mobilization readiness is proceeding too 
slowly. This is explained by the fact, said Lieutenant-General 
Anatoliy Kobzar, that we have squandered progressive work 
experience in this area and appreciably weakened its base. The 
task was posed to the officers in this regard, and directions 
for activity were indicated, of teaching people during periods 
of measures relating to mobilization readiness, gathering the 
necessary information and creating a suitable 
educational-materials base. 
  There are substantial areas of unfinished work that must be 
eliminated in the functional duties of the deputy battalion and 
company commanders for indoctrination and socio-psychological 
work with regard to the training and indoctrination of the more 
active core personnel from among conscript servicemen. It was 
pointed out that these classes (actions at various levels of 
combat readiness) should necessarily conclude with the combat 
coordination of the subunits and the active personnel. 
  The chief of the Main Directorate for VSPR, speaking of the 
development of new methods of influencing servicemen, emphasized 
that we should have a creative approach to the indoctrination of 
people, rather than simply carrying over mindlessly the forms 
and methods of former party-political work, and make more 
extensive use of television and radio, newspapers and journals 
so as to create an information expanse not just within the Armed 
Forces, but also all around them. 
  The capabilities of humanities training, the Centers for 
Culture and Leisure, ethnic studies rooms and unit clubs are 
also not being utilized to the full extent, the speaker pointed 
out. Opportunities in the regions where units are stationed 
should also be utilized more extensively in this regard. 
  Particular attention was devoted to the upsurge in military 
discipline, and strengthening it. 
  Concern was expressed with regard to the fact that some 
officers and warrant officers have been avoiding indoctrination 
work with their subordinates, and are moreover themselves not 
setting an example with regard to service. 
  The tasks of the educational officers flow out of this; they 
should, figuratively speaking, take their place in battle in the 
prevailing situation. This signifies that they should not stand 
in for the work of the commanders, they should not duplicate 
them, but should rather supplement that work with the specific 
forms and methods that are characteristic of VSPR. 
  It was understood that the deputy commanders for VSPR, in 
order to conduct indoctrination and socio-psychological work 
successfully in the collectives, have to improve their own 
knowledge and skills more actively, making maximum use for that 
purpose of the opportunities of the Professional Training Day in 
the units. All of the workers in indoctrination and 
socio-psychological work must be given opportunities for 
training on that day. 
  Lieutenant-General Anatoliy Kobzar answered the questions of 
those in attendance after his speech. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46511 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   30 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Expanded Military Collegium Meeting Considers Future Force </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Expanded Military Collegium Meeting Considers Future Force </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Development 

<F P=102>   94UM0405B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 30 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0405B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Item from press service of the Ministry of Defense of </F>
Ukraine: "Session of the Military Collegium of the Ministry of 
Defense"] 
  [Text] An expanded session of the Military Collegium was 
held yesterday at the Ministry of Defense [MO] of Ukraine. It 
was chaired by Minister of Defense General of the Army of 
Ukraine Vitaliy Radetskyy. The state program for the building 
and development of the Armed Forces of Ukraine was reviewed. The 
members of the collegium analyzed the long-term plan for the 
building of the Ukrainian military--the three stages of which 
are planned to conclude in the year 2000--proceeding from the 
provisions of the law "The Defense of Ukraine" and the military 
doctrine of the state. That program will be submitted, after its 
refinement, for the consideration of the State Defense Council. 
  Also considered was the question of measures for further 
improvements in the training of skilled personnel at military 
educational institutions. It was noted that the work on the 
reformation of the system of military education in Ukraine has 
been carried out with insufficient preparation and with a whole 
series of mistakes. All of these errors have been taken into 
account, and a system of measures has been developed to promote 
improvements in the training of military personnel. 
  Representatives of the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine and 
scientists took part in the work of the collegium. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46512 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Air Defense Training, Readiness Problems Aired </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Air Defense Training, Readiness Problems Aired </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Zaporizhzhya Garrison Difficulties </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0390A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 11 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0390A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Capt. Oleksandr Dranikov: "Garrison Life: A </F>
Concerned Individual's View: Are Secrets the Only Thing Being 
Protected From Outsider Eyes in the Zaporizhzhya Garrison's Air 
Defense Unit?"] 
  [Text] "Did you say the military unit?" asked the old man. 
"I usually walk through its territory on my way home from the 
bus stop. It's closer that way because it saves me walking 
around," continued my guide. Exchanging the customary phrases 
about the weather and the price of bread, we found ourselves 
near a gray fence. 
  "You need to go that way," said my new acquaintance and 
pointed to the right. 
  "What about you?" I asked, knowing that the old man also had 
to cross the territory of the military unit. 
  "No-o-o," he drawled. "I pass through a hole in the fence, 
not through the checkpoint [kontrolno-propusknyy punkt]." 
  With that we parted. About two hundred meters away, I saw a 
rickety white-and-blue gate, behind which I could see the parade 
ground. My arrival elicited no reaction from the soldiers at the 
checkpoint. The duty officer [cherhovyy chastyny], who stood 
next to them, also showed no special interest in the unknown 
officer. A live broadcast of the Winter Olympic Games was being 
shown on television. I remembered the talkative grandfather and 
thought to myself: "The old man needn't have crawled through his 
hole; he could have walked through the checkpoint without 
bending his back, both literally and figuratively." No one 
stopped me; only the need to find out where I could find the 
commander forced me to introduce myself to the duty officer 
[cherhovyy chastyny]. So much about what actually happened. 
  In theory, however, the relevant officials of the SAM 
brigade 
vigilantly supervise compliance with the checkpoint regime and 
thereby, the protection of military secrets. 
  On my second day on this assignment, I was asked to submit 
my 
pass allowing me to work in the operational units. Inasmuch as I 
did not have one, I was refused permission to visit the 
battalion on duty. There's no finding fault with that. Colonel 
Shetulskyy, the deputy commander of the brigade, was acting in 
accordance with his orders and instructions. I had to be content 
with collecting materials in the support subunits and staff 
offices. 
  However, it was not the wounded pride of a journalist that 
compelled me to take up my pen. I simply began to have some 
doubts: Are military secrets the only thing being protected from 
outsider eyes in the unit? 
  About an hour before a trip that ultimately did not take 
place (and they did not ask to see my pass until almost the 
moment before I was to get into the car that was leaving for the 
garrison of a group of battalions, the brigade's officers told 
me that the buildings of the officer personnel of the battalions 
were extremely badly heated. The temperature in the apartments 
never rises above 18 degrees, and then only if electric heaters 
are used. Virtually all the residents use electric heaters, as a 
result of which power in the electric circuits falls to 150 
volts, causing power failures. 
  In addition, the children of the officers are not always 
able 
to get to school. Because of fuel shortages, the school bus did 
not operate on a regular schedule. This circumstance became the 
subject of serious discussion at the corps commander level. 
Following this, the situation improved. "Internal reserves" were 
found at brigade headquarters. But after a month or two, the 
children were once again running about the base instead of 
attending school. 
  Obviously, the fuel situation is critical. Even the training 
of the launcher crews has to be conducted in the manner of 
"simulate manually, what the machine would do". Although, 
frankly, this kind of training is of little use. In order to 
approach the launching equipment, the driver of the loading 
vehicle must back up some 30 meters onto rails. This requires 
practice, not simulation. The total distance that the loading 
vehicle has to travel during training is only 200 meters. If 
there is not enough gasoline to travel 200 meters, what hope is 
there of transporting school children, who need to be driven ten 
kilometers? 
  But not all the vehicles in the unit are laid up. There 
seems 
to be enough gasoline for the command vehicles. I saw for myself 
that the "personalky" [personal use vehicles] do not spend too 
much time in the car pool. 
  It is possible that things are not all that bad in the 
brigade. But I cannot judge, because I did not see. The 
"facilities" were not the only thing I was not allowed to visit; 
they did not let me into the residential zone of the base of the 
battalion group [mistechko hrupy dyvizioniv], nor into the 
soldiers' barracks. I have reported only what I learned from the 
officers. Probably the laurels of the literary hero who loved to 
bellow "No admittance!" give some officials no peace. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46513 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Air Defense Training, Readiness Problems Aired </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Air Defense Training, Readiness Problems Aired </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Follow-Up, Reply From Zaporizhzhya </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0390B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 27 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0390B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [NARODNA ARMIYA report under the rubric "Response": "Are </F>
Secrets the Only Thing Being Protected From Outsider Eyes?"] 
  [Text] Issue No. 43 of our newspaper of 11 March 1994 
published a report under the above title describing the 
unsatisfactory organization of military service in the air 
defense unit of the Zaporizhzhya garrison. The editors received 
a letter signed by Col. A. Toropchyn, which reads, in part: 
  "...A number of things described in the article were indeed 
true... The command of the Southern Region of the Air Defense 
Forces of Ukraine met with the officials of the unit. The 
article `Are Secrets the Only Thing...' was discussed in the 
directorate and the subdivisions of the unit. A series of 
additional measures were worked out to improve the organization 
of military service in the unit, the performance of his duties 
by the duty officer, and compliance with the checkpoint regime. 
Steps have also been taken to prevent late deliveries of fuel 
and lubricants to the subunits, and regular transportation of 
children to school has been organized. Passenger cars are to be 
used only for duties involving combat readiness..." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46514 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Air Defense Training, Readiness Problems Aired </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Air Defense Training, Readiness Problems Aired </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Command and Control Problems Affect Training </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0390C Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 27 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0390C </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sr Lt Yuriy Povkh: "The SAM Operators Did Not </F>
Have `To Shoot' in the Rear Hemisphere."] 
  [Text] I have visited the command post of the Air Defense 
Forces many times. And even though I did not have a sense of 
seeing something new when I looked at the numerous screens and 
monitors [tablo], on this occasion, as well, I could not rid 
myself of the feeling that I was in the most important facility. 
How else could it be, given that everything that happens here is 
the final result of the work of all the country's air defense 
forces? 
  The training exercise that was being conducted that day at 
the command post's intelligence-gathering and information 
processing center [RITs] was no exception. 
  In our present situation, it is no exaggeration to say that 
it is very important to have as much information about the enemy 
as possible. This is especially true in the case of the Air 
Defense Forces. Without accurate and timely information about 
hostile aircraft, the highly accurate SAM complex and 
interceptors remain blind. To prevent this from happening, the 
Radiotechnical Troops of the Air Defense Forces of Ukraine 
constantly conduct training exercises at various levels of 
subordination for the purpose of improving the effectiveness of 
air reconnaissance. 
  ...It is never quiet and calm in the RITs room. Information 
about the situation in the air over the whole country and beyond 
its borders arrives here all day and all night from subunits, 
command posts, units, and formations stationed across the whole 
of Ukraine. The large screen was lit up with markers of planned 
[side-] numbers [borty]. Every so often, the monitor lit up -- a 
new target had appeared. However, the first part of the exercise 
was already in full swing. As it progressed, the officers of the 
RITs command post and their colleagues from the mobile command 
post were undergoing a theoretical test of their knowledge of 
documents on organizing combat duties, combat operations in the 
RITs, and the operational use of the combat arms of the Air 
Defense Forces. The usual procedure was used: a question on a 
card, twenty minutes to prepare, and then the answer. The 
examiners were officers in charge of the training exercise. Col. 
R. Kim, chief of the combat training division of the 
Radiotechnical Troops [RTV], and Col. H. Avramenko, chief of the 
command post of the Air Defense Forces, did not stint in asking 
additional questions to assess how well the officers were 
prepared. Lt. Col. O. Ohoreltsev and Lt. Col. V. Moshenskiy 
demonstrated excellent skills. Lt. Col. Serebryakov and majors 
Kolesnikov and Polyanskyy gave assured answers. On the other 
hand, officers Potyomkin, Kublo, Sokol, and Latyshkevych gave 
answers that were not up to their expected level of nowledge. 
They ran into difficulties answering questions on the structure 
and organization of foreign armies and on the tactical and 
technical features of Air Defense equipment. 
  After the last answer is heard, the examiners announce the 
results. Officials are charged with holding additional classes 
on subjects in which individual officers demonstrated 
insufficient proficiency. This time no drastic measures are 
taken; requirements with respect to the theoretical knowledge of 
officers are very strict at the command post. An unsatisfactory 
level of knowledge can result in disciplinary action here, even 
removal from the performance of service duties. 
  Then the crew take up their usual places. The last orders 
ring out. The numbers on the electronic clock have already 
passed the "H-hour". 
  Groups of "enemy" targets begin to appear on the screens and 
plotting boards, where just seconds ago there were only 
individual blips. Several directions light up virtually at the 
same time. More than half the blips symbolizing the "enemy" are 
red in color. These need to be dealt with first, because these 
targets are coming it at low and very low altitudes. For that 
reason, the leader of the exercise gives special instructions on 
following them and producing the information needed to destroy 
them. 
  Gradually, the tension in the RITs approaches the critical 
point. But the faces of the officers of the duty watch remain 
calm and concentrated. Reports are coming in over the 
communication channels from the various sectors about the 
actions of the "enemy." The "enemy" gives no quarter, as they 
say. Across the entire range of altitudes, from very low all the 
way into the stratosphere, despite the mounting of active 
resistance, the strike group of targets is approaching ever 
closer to the country's border. 
  "In the southwestern sector, the target is... the command 
post!" states another report. 
  The information about this target is processed as quickly as 
possible and passed on to the commander for a decision. 
  Fighter aircraft lift off. Radar conditions become even more 
complicated. Given the situation, Col. R. Kim assigns part of 
the information for manual processing. 
  While the automated command and control system [ASU] 
responded faultlessly to changes in the situation in the air (it 
is, after all, a machine), those manning the plotting board 
performed somewhat less efficiently. Lacking sufficient 
experience, they were unable to deal with the large volume of 
work. As a result, the amount of information given them was 
decreased in the course of the exercise. Despite this, they made 
many mistakes in depicting the actions of "enemy" targets. This 
was revealed when they compared the situation on the map board 
with the attack plan. But it would not be fair to blame only 
those manning the plotting board. After all, their job is only 
the final link in the long information transmission chain, which 
consists of many specialists at various levels. As became 
obvious later, the telegraph operators at the communications 
node also made mistakes. The RITs officers should also have 
reacted more decisively when information disappeared, and they 
should have acted more boldly in checking through the 
communication channels. 
  But this will become apparent later; meanwhile, the RITs is 
receiving the first reports about targets that have been 
destroyed. The numbered arrows that had just "crossed" the state 
border are being replaced by markers that resemble envelopes. 
However, it is too early to speak of complete success. There are 
still many hostile aircraft in the skies, attempting to reach 
their assigned targets. 
  Colonels R. Kim and H. Avramenko are devoting particular 
attention to the interaction of units and formations. Their 
concern is understandable: this is one of the most important 
prerequisites for carrying out the combat mission. 
  ...The exercise is over. The hour of intense combat activity 
has passed with lightning speed. It is now time to analyze the 
actions of the duty watch of the RITs. 
  "The objective of this training exercise for the battle crew 
has been attained in all respects," states Col. H. Avramenko. 
"The work was done using both automated and nonautomated means, 
which required of the specialists the ability to combine these 
two methods during the course of a massive strike. The exercise 
also exposed the shortcomings in our work. Above all, it 
revealed an inability to quickly analyze the actions of the 
targets depending on their importance and other factors. It also 
revealed inadequate oversight of the quality and quantity of 
information. In the future, we will have to devote more 
attention to ensuring more decisive action by the crew of the 
RITs as well as the communications center specialists to avoid 
information gaps." 
  At the outset of the exercise, Hennadiy Volodymyrovych had 
said that when surface-to-air missile operators shoot in the 
rear hemisphere, this signifies a defect in the work the 
Radiotechnicaol Tropps. Applying his statement to everything 
that I heard and saw, I think that the SAM operators would not 
need to do so. The level of air surveillance remains high, as 
does the performance of the brain center in this chain -- that 
is, the RITs command post of the Air Defense Forces. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46515 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Defense &amp; Security Commission Disbands, Notes </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>     Defense &amp; Security Commission Disbands, Notes </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Accomplishments 

<F P=102>    94UM0405A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 26 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0405A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by commission senior consultant Volodymyr </F>
Mokhurenko: "With a Sense of Duties Fulfilled"] 
  [Text] The last session of the Commission of the 
Supreme Soviet of Ukraine on Issues of Defense and State 
Security with its current composition was held. Commission 
Chairman V. Lemish and its members--People's Deputies of 
Ukraine--exchanged ideas and summarized its legislative work 
over the last three years. 
  The commission, created by the Supreme Soviet of Ukraine in 
April of 1991, was able to work out a sound legal foundation for 
the creation of mechanisms for the practical resolution of 
questions in the military sphere, the building of Ukraine's own 
armed forces and other military formations, and to provide for 
state security. The commission brought into development some 23 
laws of Ukraine and 47 decrees of the Supreme Soviet of Ukraine 
on fundamental issues in the military sphere and state security, 
as well as 11 decrees and eight edicts of the Presidium of the 
Supreme Soviet of Ukraine and nine directives of the Chairman of 
the Supreme Soviet of Ukraine. 
  The Supreme Soviet of Ukraine on 11 October 1991 approved 
the 
conceptual framework for defense and the organizational 
development of the Armed Forces of Ukraine that was submitted by 
the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine and the Commission of the 
Supreme Soviet of Ukraine on Issues of Defense and State 
Security, as well as the decree "The Creation of the Defense 
Council of Ukraine." 
  The laws of Ukraine "The Defense of Ukraine," "The Armed 
Forces of Ukraine," "The National Guard of Ukraine," "The State 
Border of Ukraine," "The Border Troops of Ukraine," "Universal 
Military Obligation and Military Service," "Mobilization 
Training and Mobilization," "Social and Legal Protections for 
Servicemen and the Members of Their Families" and "Pension 
Support for Servicemen and Individuals and Supervisory and 
Regular Personnel of Bodies of Internal Affairs," as well as the 
decrees of the Supreme Soviet of Ukraine on the procedure for 
the entry into force of those laws, were developed, prepared and 
adopted by the Supreme Soviet of Ukraine proceeding from the 
conceptual framework for defense and the organizational 
development of the Armed Forces of Ukraine. 
  The Supreme Soviet of Ukraine also adopted the law "The 
Civil 
Defense of Ukraine." 
  The Supreme Soviet of Ukraine has approved the text of the 
Military Oath, the Statute on the Duties and Rights of Personnel 
in the National Guard of Ukraine, the size of the Border Troops, 
and the Statute on the Procedure for Manpower Acquisition for 
the military, logistical and financial support of the National 
Guard of Ukraine and the Border Troops of Ukraine. 
  The Supreme Soviet of Ukraine approved in October 1993 the 
Military Doctrine of Ukraine and defined its principal aspects, 
as well as approving the overall structure, size, weaponry and 
logistical support for the armed forces. 
  The participants in the parting session of the commission 
thus pass along to their successors--the newly elected People's 
Deputies of Ukraine--a full-fledged package of legislation on 
issues in the military sphere and state security, with a sense 
of duties fulfilled and wishes for success in the continuation 
of this work with regard to its improvement. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46516 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Pay Procedure Violations Investigated </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Pay Procedure Violations Investigated </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0405D Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 12 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0405D </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Item from the press service of the Ministry of Defense of </F>
Ukraine: "Materials From the Verification Have Gone to the 
General Procurator of Ukraine"] 
  [Text] Information was received by the Minister of Defense 
of Ukraine on violations of the prevailing legislation in the 
Financial and Economic Main Directorate. General of the Army of 
Ukraine Vitaliy Radetskyy charged the Control and Auditing Main 
Inspectorate of the Ministry of Defense with conducting a 
comprehensive verification. 
  Instances of gross disregard for the requirements of laws by 
officials of the directorate were confirmed. The results of the 
verification were reviewed by the Military Collegium of the 
Ministry of Defense of Ukraine. Since the violations that were 
ascertained require a legal evaluation by the procuracy and 
investigative bodies, the Military Collegium has made the 
decision to transfer the materials from the verification to the 
General Procurator of Ukraine. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46517 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> BALTIC STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Discipline Violations in Armed Forces Detailed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Discipline Violations in Armed Forces Detailed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1321A Riga DIENA in Latvian 11 May 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1321A </F>
<F P=104>  Riga DIENA </F>
<F P=105>  Latvian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liga Laizane: "9,000 Discipline Violations in </F>
the Armed Forces."] 
  [Text] Riga, May 6. Last year, 9,000 discipline violations 
were found in the Armed Forces, as reported on Friday by Valdis 
Petersons, Chief of the Mobile Department and Personnel 
Department of the Armed Forces (AF), at the meeting of AF unit 
and subdivision commanders. 
  AF Commander Dainis Turlais stated at the meeting that the 
Army units are artificial creations, where interrelationships 
are regulated only by laws and regulations, not by personal 
sympathies or antipathies. The duties of the Army do not include 
the re-education, within 18 months, of hooligans into decent 
citizens. 
  Fifty-six percent of all violations, as mentioned by V. 
Petersons, were related to carelessness in the fulfillment of 
duties, involving violations during guard duty and internal 
service, 20 percent of violations -- drinking, 16 percent -- 
unauthorized departure from the post and not returning from 
leave on time, as well as 3 percent of cases of callous 
harassment of fellow servicemen. V. Liepins stated that the 
latter are difficult to identify because they are being covered 
up, and it could be assumed that there have been many more such 
cases. Specifically, those with the least education are the ones 
harassing their fellow servicemen. 
  Overall, regulations were mostly violated by soldiers in 
obligatory service, although 17 percent of these 9,000 
violations were incurred by instructors, 3 percent by officers 
and 0.8 percent by deputy officers. Thirty new officers and 200 
re-enlisted servicemen have been retired from duty because of 
drinking. 
  Last year, 16 servicemen lost their lives in the Armed 
Forces. Two of these were by suicide, and there were also 12 
attempted suicides by servicemen. The remainder died in 
accidents. As stressed by Ivars Grava, Chief of the Legal 
Department of the Armed Forces, in the Army last year, not a 
single serviceman intentionally murdered another servicemen. 
Nevertheless, V. Liepins confirmed the facts that the body of 
one serviceman was found with knife wounds in a courtyard of one 
of the houses on Marijas Street, and the body of one serviceman 
-- by the railroad tracks. The causes of death for the others 
were drowning, traffic accidents while on leave, heart disease, 
and also two cases where the servicemen had not used care when 
handling their firearms. 
  The Chief of the Medical Service of the Armed Forces stated 
that a very serious problem in the Army is the development of 
psychological problems -- pathological personality changes, 
which, especially in the first three months of duty, create a 
poor relationship with fellow servicemen, and the commanders are 
unable to deflect conflict situations. Because of this reason, 
many servicemen have been retired. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46518 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   25 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> CAUCASIAN STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Defense Commmission Chair Accuses Shevardnadze of </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Defense Commmission Chair Accuses Shevardnadze of </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
`Capitulation' 

<F P=102>   AU0706101394 Tbilisi MIMOMKHILVELI in Georgian 25 May 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> AU0706101394 </F>
<F P=104>  Tbilisi MIMOMKHILVELI </F>
<F P=105>  Georgian </F>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Nodar Natadze, leader of the Georgian </F>
Popular Front, chairman of the Parliament Standing Commission on 
Defense and Security, by "Sakartvelos Khma" independent radio 
company correspondent Giorgi Kurdovanidze; place and date not 
given: "'Eduard Shevardnadze Is Unable To Govern Georgia'" -- 
all questions published in boldface] 
  [Text] [Kurdovanidze] Batono [Georgian polite form of 
address] Nodar, during the signing of the treaty of 14 May on a 
full-scale political settlement to the Georgian-Abkhazian 
conflict, the views of your commission were ignored. Will your 
commission make a statement about this at the next session of 
Parliament? 
  [Natadze] The views of our commission have indeed been 
ignored during the process of negotiations concerning the 
Abkhazian conflict. As we are unable to participate in the work 
of the Georgian delegation, it is natural that we will not be 
able to have any influence on the results of the negotiations. 
As regards making a statement in Parliament, the commission has 
specific plans but a statement will be made not on behalf of the 
commission but by ordinary parliamentarians. 
  [Kurdovanidze] Batono Nodar, your attitude to this document 
is well known. Could you comment briefly? 
  [Natadze] Our defeat in Abkhazia is possibly a double 
defeat: first de facto, second de jure. De facto, everything 
that could have been lost has already been lost except for the 
upper part of the Dali gorge. We gain nothing from a 
cease-fire; only in the Kodori gorge can there be a temporary 
cease-fire. Yet, this will also not be a victory because 
signing the treaty will not prevent the opposing side from 
engaging in warfare. As for the legal side, up to now, we had 
not lost; however, with this document, we have lost badly. Its 
signature means that the Georgian state is capitulating not only 
on the military front but also from the legal standpoint. It 
surrenders the most important defense barrier that we have in 
this sphere. 
  [Kurdovanidze] Batono Nodar, this document was preceded by 
eight agreements that were signed by the Georgian delegation. 
Is not the agreement of 14 May the logical result of that 
policy that has been conducted by the Georgian authorities over 
the last two years? 
  [Natadze] Of course. This is the logical escalation of our 
policy of capitulation. However, I wish to emphasize that the 
deterioration of our position and the development of the 
scenario do not come to an end with the signing of this 
document. The scenario embraces the following stages: When the 
Russian Army arrives on the left and right banks of the Enguri 
River and occupies a zone stretching approximately 20 
kilometers, they will be given the chance to work on the 
citizens in the way they want. It is clear in what way this 
will be. They will try to activate those people who are 
dissatisfied with the government's policy and form an armed 
opposition, which will lead, if not to a civil war, then to 
civil strife and slaughter. Then, they will succeed in 
spreading tension to Poti. As soon as this happens, at the 
invitation of the authorities or even without it, they will 
enter Poti and occupy it. The whole scenario is developing in 
such a way that the Russians will occupy Poti. Why are they 
interested in doing this? Because, by taking Poti, they will 
cut off not only Georgia but also Armenia and Azerebaijan and 
the whole of Central Asia beyond the Caucasus from the ocean. 
In this way, the plan to create a West-East corridor will be 
thwarted for some time. Russia, on the other hand, will 
continue to exert total influence upon both the Caucasus and the 
whole of Central Asia. I do not exclude that, as early as two 
years ago, before the war in Abkhazia had begun, the wholly 
despicable campaign in Zugdidi and Tsalenjikha had been aimed at 
preparing the psychological ground for the future experiment 
with Poti. 
  The arguments presented by E. Shevardnadze that we need this 
document because Russia is powerful and we cannot resolve this 
problem without it, does not signify in any way that the problem 
will be solved following its intervention. It is possible that, 
on this occasion also, Russia will deceive us. The head of 
state likewise does not exclude this. Then, what is the point 
of trying something for the sixth time that has been attempted 
five times before? It turns out that Shevardnadze expects the 
Russians to go against what is written in the document. 
However, I view this to be naive. 
  [Kurdovanidze] That is to say, you believe that the 
government's and E. Shevardnadze's policy toward the Abkhazian 
problem cannot stand up to any criticism. Do you not think that 
one way of recovering Abkhazia is for the head of state to 
resign? 
  [Natadze] Shevardnadze is unable to govern Georgia. First 
of all, he cannot control the internal situation. He is unable 
to combat the wave of criminal gangs [bandokratia] and the 
economic collapse against which a struggle could be launched and 
is unable to create an army, which could be done very well. E. 
Shevardnadze is able to resolve diplomatic and political 
problems better than others and, therefore, his departure from 
the political arena would not be advantageous. Shevardnadze is 
of such value to us that we can pay a high price for him, but 
not any price. Consequently, it is necessary to limit 
considerably his powers. As regards the internal government of 
the country, these functions should be transferred to more than 
one person. The Georgian Government's policy toward Russia has 
been one of capitulation from beginning to end and, in reality, 
disadvantageous to us. It is necessary for Russia to have a 
Georgian leader who is sympathetically disposed toward it and a 
government that is willing to please. Therefore, they will do 
everything to ensure that Georgia has a pro-Russian government. 
  [Kurdovanidze] Batono Nodar, does the parliamentary minority 
have a concrete plan of action regarding this question? 
  [Natadze] Today, in Parliament, there is no longer so much 
importance attached to how much support this or that position 
receives or to what extend it is well argued and how sound it is 
in essence because, in a crisis situation, support mechanisms 
change and, in the end, the greater part of the deputies in 
Parliament will adopt that position that it considers expedient. 
The session held on 13 May clearly showed us that Shevardnadze's 
position is extremely weak. As soon as it was demonstrated that 
the head of state was unable to hold the views that he used to, 
his blind followers began to abandon their positions like rats 
fleeing a sinking ship. For example, a meeting of the Union of 
Georgia's Citizens (I would call it the Union of Slaves) was 
held on Sunday that was designed from the start to be an 
extravagant congress, but few people turned up. I would call 
this meeting "Walpurgis morning" as the witches gathered in the 
morning instead of at night. Thus, we can use the following 
words to characterize Shevardnadze's policy -- collaborationist 
and puppet-like in its status. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46519 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> CAUCASIAN STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russian Influence on Inexperienced Georgian Military </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russian Influence on Inexperienced Georgian Military </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Leadership 

<F P=102>   PM0706114194 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 4 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> PM0706114194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Petr Karapetyan under "In the CIS Armies" </F>
rubric: "`The Russian General Will Come...', They Said in 
Tbilisi. And He Has Come"] 
  [Text] Every spring there is a new Minister of Defense in 
Georgia.... 
  Tengiz Kitovani became head of the military department in 
May 
1992. The hero of the anti-Gamsakhurdia action and father of 
the National Guard immediately declared his intention to 
urgently set about building unified armed forces. But in the 
wake of the attacks on Russian military units (just take that 
one incident -- there were casualties on both sides -- with the 
tank regiment in Gori!), the hijacking of automobiles, the 
"privatization" of Russian servicemen's apartments, and the 
political intrigues, the good intention has remained precisely 
that -- a good intention. 
  What is also indicative is whom Tengiz Kitovani (an 
architect 
by education; his military experience consists of three years of 
draft service in the Belorussian Military District) intended to 
build an army with. Tengiz Kalistratovich had as his deputy, 
for example, a man who was a complete civilian, although he had 
been elevated to general by the former. This was Tamaz 
Dumbadze, a graduate of the Moscow Institute of Soviet Trade. 
And another general, also homegrown, with a diploma from a 
Georgian polytechnic institute, is Dzhemal Chumburidze, chief of 
the National Guard Main Directorate. He has been Deputy Defense 
Minister as of March 1993. 
  Incidentally, generals were appointed on the basis of 
completely farfetched talk to the effect that Georgians were not 
given promotions in the Soviet Army. And since that was the 
case, Tengiz Kalistratovich evidently decided, yesterday's 
colonels, lieutenant colonels, and captains should be raised to 
the rank of general. Everyone was rewarded! But was this done 
on merit? 
  Georgiy Karkarashvili. In 1990 he was a captain in the 
Soviet Army, chief of staff of an artillery division; and since 
14 September 1992 he has also been a general in the Georgian 
Armed Forces. Paata Datuashvili. In 1990 he was a lieutenant 
colonel and commander of a rocket artillery division in the 
Transbaykal Military District. He has become a major general 
and Georgian first deputy defense minister. 
  The list of "wild-growing" generals can be continued. But 
are we talking only about generals? The commander of a 
detachment of seven or eight men has already called himself 
colonel and commander of a battalion. Hence the joke was born: 
"In the Georgian Army the first military rank is that of major." 
  Either there was no one to get involved in army 
organizational development or, despite the cunning nature of the 
propaganda of the time, no "Soviet generals," even retired ones, 
could be found? 
  But there are some. Colonel General Anatoliy Kamkamidze, 
Lieutenant Generals Levan Sharashenidze, Mikhail Elbakidze, and 
Robert Tavadze, Major General Panteleymon Georgadze.... They 
had served in the Soviet Army for decades, but they nevertheless 
did not get the top roles in the Georgian Army. Admittedly, 
Levon Sharashenidze spent four months as minister of defense 
(January-May 1992), until his first serious conflict with the 
leadership of the National Guard. Pantaleymon Georgadze (the 
father of Igor Georgadze, the Republic's current security 
minister) spent some time in command of Border Guard Troops, but 
he did not last long after disagreeing with parliament in his 
views concerning the organizational development of the Army. 
The other "red generals" became the deputies of yesterday's 
captains. 
  On the other hand, the "armed men" in Georgia felt free 
under 
Tengiz Kalistratovich to earn their living sometimes by robbery 
and sometimes by terror. 
  Never mind robbery! The fall of 1992. There is war in 
Abkhazia and parliament is examining the composition of the new 
Cabinet of Ministers in Tbilisi. The deputies refuse to confirm 
Tengiz Sigua, Kitovani's comrade-in-arms in the 
anti-Gamsakhurdia action, in the post of prime minister. By a 
curious coincidence, it was precisely when National Guard troops 
started wandering the corridors of parliament (only the 
slow-witted did not realize why this should suddenly happen) and 
a rumor spread around town that "Kitovani's guys" want to come 
to visit for a couple of days from Abkhazia that the deputies 
voted as one for Sigua. 
  Kitovani got his deserts several months later, in May 1993. 
The parliamentary deputies suddenly "remembered" that Tengiz 
Kalistratovich had not been confirmed in the post of minister of 
defense (and, it turned out, this should have been done straight 
after the parliamentary elections in fall 1992), and they 
rebelled, saying that this was out of order. The issue was put 
to the vote and was rejected. But Kitovani's game was already 
up by then. The Georgian detachments were suffering defeat 
after defeat in Abkhazia; it did not prove possible to tame the 
rebellious autonomous formation, as Kitovani had promised; 
disagreements with Eduard Shevardnadze intensified, and only one 
solution remained: To get out. 
  Which he did, having spoken to Georgiy Karkarashvili 
beforehand. What they talked about is unknown, but 
Karkarashvili often repeated afterward that if it had not been 
for the parting words of Kitovani, who "made him a man," he 
would not have complied with Eduard Shevardnadze's request that 
he become minister of defense. One way or another the new 
appointment took place -- and, alas, in a form which ensured 
continuity of the style of leadership of the Armed Forces: 
Reforms were not carried out, and at the front things went 
worse then ever. There were ambitions and promises to launch a 
large-scale offensive against the Abkhazians (this brought a 
skeptical smile to the people who knew the state of the Georgian 
Armed Forces). In a word, Karkarashvili was like his teacher, 
and observers noted entirely fairly that the former captain was 
brave and knew how to fight, but was useless as a commander. In 
February 1994, in the wake of the Abkhazian nightmare, Georgiy 
Karkarashvili resigned. His relations with Eduard Shevardnadze 
appeared to have deteriorated seriously after Karkarashvili, 
during a Zviadist offensive in the west of the republic, 
repealed an order of the supreme commander in chief and refused 
to fight against Loti Lobaliya.... 
  After Karkarashvili, the Georgian parliament prevaricated 
for 
almost four months over the appointment of a new minister. This 
time passed amid reflections about the future of the national 
army. Not just reflections, however. A resolution was adopted 
on the procedure for awarding military ranks. Given the 
complete anarchy of previous years in this respect, the step was 
a prudent one. The 300 Georgian officers who did not respond to 
the appeal to return from the Russian Army were discussed with 
bitterness. Furthermore, reports are coming into the Georgian 
Ministry of Defense's personnel organs with a request...to 
assist in transfers to the Russian Army: People have gotten fed 
up with low pay, the lack of social protection, the lack of any 
service prospects. Parliamentary Speaker Vakhtang Goguadze spoke 
very emotionally and unexpectedly as follows: "Georgia will be 
free when a Russian general summons the leadership of the 
Georgian Army and announces to it: 'Congratulations. 
Henceforth Georgia is free. I wish you all the best.' And in 
response, Georgian servicemen will shout a grateful `Hurrah' and 
swear an oath of loyalty to Russia. There is no other way 
out...." 
  The opposition claims: "The Russian general has already 
arrived." By "the Russian" they mean Lieutenant General Varden 
Nadibaidze, whom parliament confirmed in the post of defense 
minister in May of this year. (He was born 31 March 1939 in the 
village of Mleta in Georgia's Dushetskiy Rayon. He graduated 
from the Ordzhonikidze Military Automobile School and the Rear 
Services and Transportation Academy. He has served in the Kiev 
Military District, the Group of Soviet Forces in Germany, and, 
since 1972, in the Transcaucasus, where he rose to deputy 
commander for armaments of the Group of Russian Forces in the 
Transcaucasus.) 
  So why "Russian"? Nadibaidze is no arriviste; he is from the 
real and true Georgian heartland. Admittedly, during his years 
of service he has forgotten the language somewhat, and only 
gives interviews to journalists in Russian. And the opposition 
holds this against him. Once again, a general who has served in 
Russia has been appointed to the post of minister -- and the 
opposition has noted this "point" too. 
  Everything can be corrected: The language can be brought up 
to standard, and the transfer (and that will doubtless happen) 
to the national army will be officially registered. Something 
else is far more important: The military department is not 
headed by an architect or a pianist but by a functioning general 
who does not represent the interests of any political parties, 
clans, or groups (unlike his predecessors). This happens once 
in a blue moon.... 
  As for Russia, then, no matter what it might say, its 
interest is the same as before: Having for a neighbor a united, 
stable state. And if the "Russian" General Nadibaidze 
facilitates this, then what is there in this that runs counter 
to Georgia's national interests? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46520 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> CAUCASIAN STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Afghan POW on Service With Azeribaijani Forces </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Afghan POW on Service With Azeribaijani Forces </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1306A Yerevan GOLOS ARMENII in Russian 26 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1306A </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan GOLOS ARMENII </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Grigoryan: "End of a Legend?: A Captive </F>
Mujahidin Debunks the Myths"] 
  [Text] Various rumors, frequently bordering on 
fantasy, concerning mujahidin have been going around for several 
months now. The news media of Azerbaijan, skillfully stirring up 
interest in them, have been creating, not unsuccessfully, in the 
person of the mujahidin the heroic image of fighters for the 
faith and professional warriors. However, for a long time we 
were unable to find out what the mujahidin actually represent. 
Various gossip and rumors from Karabakh were highly 
contradictory, and it was difficult ascertaining anything 
specific. Altogether recently the Karabakhers succeeded in 
capturing near Fizuli a mujahidin whose evidence has thrown a 
good deal of light on the situation. Bakhtior Verbollakh 
Baberzai, commander of a "twenty" (20 men), was born in 1974, is 
from the Rashiddustan tribe, lived in the city of Mazar-e Sharif 
in the north of Afghanistan, and had left behind at home a 
mother and sister. During a bout of artillery shelling he was 
wounded in the eye and arm. Our doctors had to work very hard to 
get him back on his feet. What, for all that, has brought the 
mujahidin to Azerbaijan: Muslim solidarity or a chance to make 
some money? 
  The prisoner confessed that all the talk about fighting for 
the faith and against the infidel is merely an attempt to 
conceal the real reason for the appearance of the mujahidin in 
the zone of the Karabakh conflict. They were all promised 
generous compensation. Each warrior was promised approximately 
$5,000 a month. Even before arriving in Azerbaijan, each Afghan 
was paid an advance of 50,000 toman. They were then taken to 
Beylagan, where the first disappointment awaited them. They were 
arrested in the city by a military patrol and were sent to 
prison, where they were treated none too kindly and, in 
addition, had all their money taken from them. 
  Baberzai received his baptism of fire near Goradiz, which is 
where they are positioned still. The talk about several thousand 
mujahidin is correct as far as it goes since there are at the 
front one [line missing] 200 or 300 men. They fight according to 
this schedule: One day a week they are at the front, the 
remaining days are time off. The mujahidin are allowed to go in 
their time off to Baku and Mingechaur. A special flight takes 
those wishing to spend their time off at home in Afghanistan. 
  All problems arising with the mujahidin are resolved by 
their 
compatriot, one Vaidallakh, who is to be found in Baku and who 
is their official representative. 
  The prisoner was the commander of a "twenty." Of the 20 men, 
15 were Afghans, five, Azerbaijanis, whom, Baberzai maintains, 
they killed themselves. Relations with the Azerbaijanis did not 
amount to much right from the start, and all contacts with them 
were reduced to a minimum. "Money and drugs--that's what [line 
missing] the prisoner, maintaining that the Azerbaijanis 
remember them only when they want to obtain narcotics. The drugs 
trade is highly profitable, he says, and the income from it is 
frequently higher than the compensation promised by the 
Government of Azerbaijan for military services. 
  Concerning habitation and sustenance, the prisoner confirmed 
that they eat and live separately, since their coreligionists 
"live like the impious." Medical services are organized in 
Beylagan, where the wounded and sick mujahidin are treated. 
Despite the promises of the authorities, not all return home, it 
is true. Lest they attract the discontent and anger of the 
relatives of the deceased and also to conceal the true picture 
of losses among the Afghans the Government of Azerbaijan does 
not send all the deceased home. Many of them have found eternal 
refuge on Azerbaijani soil. 
  As far as the rumors concerning clashes with Russians are 
concerned, the prisoner admitted that his group had not 
encountered them personally. But clashes between the mujahidin 
themselves, the supporters of various groupings and parties, 
occur very often, which is causing the authorities of Azerbaijan 
a great deal of trouble. 
  The prisoner is, despite it all, optimistic. He acknowledged 
that he misses his mother and sister very much and hopes, with 
Allah's help, for a safe return home. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46521 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMS TRADE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Conflicting Edict, Decree Put Arms Trade in Dilemma </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Conflicting Edict, Decree Put Arms Trade in Dilemma </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0706100394 Moscow IZVESTIYA in Russian 4 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> PM0706100394 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow IZVESTIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Aleksandr Sychev report: "Russia Could Again Be Competing </F>
Against Itself in the Arms Market"] 
  [Text] "Be in no hurry to engage in the arms trade 
independently. You are not ready for foreign markets." 
Contrary to expectations, that warning from Yevgeniy 
Shaposhnikov, the Russian president's personal representative at 
the "Rosvooruzheniye" State Company, did not give rise to any 
objections from the leaders of manufacturing enterprises or 
Russian weapons designers who are striving for the right to 
independent foreign economic activity. 
  The conference on the problems of further cooperation 
between 
"Rosvooruzheniye" and military-industrial complex enterprises 
was prompted by the dual position which the Russian arms trade 
has been in for a month now. On the one hand, the president's 
edict of 18 November last year brought in a state monopoly whose 
implementation prescribed the formation of the "Rosvooruzheniye" 
State Company. On the other hand, the government decree of 6 May 
this year to all intents and purposes abolished the state 
monopoly. The right to trade on foreign markets will once again 
be granted to enterprises -- provided, admittedly, they are 
successfully certified for the purpose. 
  Russia's military-industrial complex, Shaposhnikov stated, 
is 
rapidly collapsing. The programs to convert production and to 
recycle accumulated weapons are not being implemented, state 
orders continue to fall, skilled cadres are leaving the sector, 
and production of a whole host of components -- specifically, 
certain types of munitions -- is being stopped. Some 400 
military-industrial complex enterprises have been shut down. In 
the first five months of 1994 the Defense Ministry owed the 
defense sector over 4 trillion rubles [R] -- not counting the 
R700 billion that was not paid last year. One way to avert 
collapse is to try to win a slice of Russia's exports pie, which 
has shrunk from $22.6 billion in 1987 to just $2 billion in 
weapons sold in 1993. Government Decree No. 479, which created 
another moot case in Russian legislation, was also a reflection 
of these interests. 
  The top state authorities seem not to have noticed the 
contradictions between the two acts. A Security Council session 
was scheduled for 8 June at which it had been proposed to set up 
a certification commission to study applications from people 
claiming the right to establish direct ties with foreign 
partners. The session was postponed to July -- only because the 
same day sees the signing of contracts on the basis of plans for 
the delivery of MiG-29's to Malaysia, to which many of the 
people invited to the council session will have traveled. 
  Optimists at the session gave assurances that we are no 
strangers to differing interpretations and contradictions and 
that the system of Russian military-technical cooperation will 
be improved. Aleksey Shulunov, president of the League to 
Assist Defense Enterprises, believes that the end product will 
be to combine a state monopoly with broader involvement of 
manufacturers and developers in military-technical cooperation. 
And the conference participants could not conceive of the arms 
trade without "Rosvooruzheniye," which has warned that it will 
not service firms that "strike out" on their own. 
  But pessimists recalled the recent period when there was a 
liberal attitude toward arms exports. Nobody has calculated how 
much Russia lost through the free-for-all that prevailed then. 
When Malaysia expressed interest in buying a major batch of 
MiG-29's, around 50 firms, state institutions, and ordinary 
Russian citizens vied with each other to offer it their services. 
  Not a single military-industrial complex enterprise has yet 
applied for a license. Stanislav Filin, deputy general director 
of the "Rosvooruzheniye" State Company, believes that there will 
be few applicants, and that even fewer licenses will be issued. 
Nonetheless, powerful science-and-production associations are 
pressuring small firms in an attempt to win their consent to 
have them represent their interests in foreign markets. It 
cannot be ruled out that these giants will once again start 
stealing clients from each other. After all, apart from the 
contradictory presidential edict and government decree, there 
are no other acts of legislation in Russia regulating the arms 
trade. Under these circumstances Russia will hardly be able to 
count on increasing its share of the world arms trade. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46522 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94036" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMS TRADE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Enterprises Involved in Foreign Military-Technical </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Decree on Enterprises Involved in Foreign Military-Technical </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Cooperation 

<F P=102>   94UM0435A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0435A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Decree No 479, 6 May 1994, of the Government of the Russian </F>
Federation "On Granting Enterprises the Right to Participate in 
the Russian Federation's Military-Technical Cooperation With 
Foreign Countries," signed by Chairman of the Government of the 
Russian Federation V. Chernomyrdin] 
  [Text] In order to raise the effectiveness of the Russian 
Federation's military-technical cooperation with foreign 
countries, the Government of the Russian Federation resolves: 
  1. To approve the attached Statute on Certifying and 
Registering Enterprises for the Right to Export Armament, 
Military Equipment and Military Work and Services, and make it 
effective as of 1 May 1994. 
  2. To grant, to enterprises developing and manufacturing 
armament and military equipment that are certified and 
registered as participants of foreign economic activity in the 
area of military-technical cooperation, the right: 
  to seek foreign clients in countries in which 
military-technical cooperation is not prohibited, to demonstrate 
and transmit, in the course of negotiations, specifications and 
performance characteristics of armament and military equipment 
allowed for export, to communicate a tentative price agreed upon 
by the established procedure, and to conduct advertising and 
other marketing activities; 
  to sign contracts and to independently export, on the basis 
of licenses obtained by the established procedure, armament and 
military equipment manufactured by them over and above state 
defense orders, and military work and services; 
  to select intermediaries from among organizations that have 
received permits by the established procedure to engage in 
foreign economic activity in the area of military-technical 
cooperation. 
  3. As a partial amendment to item 3 of the Statute on the 
Procedure for Licensing Export and Import of Military Products 
(Work, Services) on the Territory of the Russian Federation, 
approved by Decree No 80, 28 January 1993, of the Council of 
Ministers and Government of the Russian Federation ("Sobraniye 
aktov Prezidenta i Pravitelstva Rossiyskoy Federatsii" 
[Collection of Acts of the President and Government of the 
Russian Federation], No 6, 1993, Article 484), to establish that 
spare parts, training and auxiliary property pertaining to 
armament and military equipment shipped to foreign countries 
earlier shall be exported, and the work of technical maintenance 
and repair of these items (including using series-manufactured 
associated items in exchange for those removed from production) 
shall be carried out, without a decision being rendered by the 
Government of the Russian Federation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46523 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94037" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMS TRADE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statute on Registration of Enterprises for Arms Exports </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statute on Registration of Enterprises for Arms Exports </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0435B Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0435B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Statute on Certifying and Registering Enterprises for the </F>
Right to Export Armament, Military Equipment and Military Work 
and Services, approved by Decree No 479, 6 May 1994, of the RF 
Government; published in abbreviated form] 
  [Text] This 
Statute was written with the purpose of supporting 
implementation of Edict No. 507, 12 May 1992, of the President 
of the Russian Federation "On the Russian Federation's 
Military-Technical Cooperation With Foreign Countries," and it 
determines the procedure for certifying and registering 
enterprises developing and manufacturing armament and military 
equipment (referred to henceforth as enterprises) for the right 
to export armament, military equipment and military work and 
services (referred to henceforth as military-technical 
cooperation). 
  Enterprises shall be certified for the right to engage in 
military-technical cooperation by the Interdepartmental 
Commission on the Russian Federation's Military-Technical 
Cooperation With Foreign Countries at the request of the Russian 
Federation State Commission on Defense Sectors of Industry. 
  Enterprises shall be certified for the right to engage in 
military-technical cooperation within the range of armament and 
military equipment they develop and manufacture as objects of 
their activity. Export of military-technical products 
manufactured by other enterprises shall be permitted, if in 
accordance with technical standards the indicated products are 
delivered as part of a system or a complex of armament 
manufactured by the exporting enterprise. 
  In order to undergo certification the enterprise shall 
forward the following set of documents to the RF State Committee 
for Defense Industry, to include a certificate from an agency of 
the Russian State Committee showing that an OKPO [All Russian 
Classification of Enterprises and Organizations] code has been 
awarded (eight symbols); a notarized copy of the founding 
documents (together with supplements and amendments) and a 
certificate of the enterprise's (organization's) registration as 
a subject of entrepreneurial activity in the Russian Federation; 
a certificate from the corresponding RF bank indicated existence 
of ruble and foreign exchange accounts, and information from the 
applicant indicating existence of accounts with foreign banks in 
its name or the name of companies of which it is a participant 
(if a foreign exchange account does not exist at the moment of 
submission of the application, information on it shall be 
presented to the Russian Federation Ministry Foreign Economic 
Relations and the Russian State Committee for Defense Industry 
after the account is opened); the enterprise's financial 
statements for the two preceding years (prior to registration). 
  The State Committee for Defense Industry shall forward 
copies 
of the application and appended documents to the Ministry of 
Foreign Economic Relations, the Ministry of Defense, the Federal 
Counterintelligence Service, the Ministry of Economics, the 
State Customs Committee and the Rosvooruzheniye State Company, 
and it shall schedule the date of the application's examination, 
which shall be conducted not later than 3 weeks from the day of 
its receipt. The enterprise shall be notified of the examination 
date a week in advance. 
  The enterprise's application shall be reviewed by the 
Certification Commission under the State Committee for Defense 
Industry (referred to henceforth as the commission), the 
personnel of which shall include representatives of the State 
Committee for Defense Industry, the Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations, the Ministry of Defense, the Federal 
Counterintelligence Service, the Ministry of Economics and the 
Rosvooruzheniye State Company. The personnel of the commission 
shall be approved by the RF State Committee for Defense Industry 
in coordination with interested organizations. 
  A protocol shall be drawn up on the basis of the results of 
the commission's meeting. 
  Within a week after the meeting the State Committee for 
Defense Industry shall file a proposal with the 
Interdepartmental Commission on Military-Technical Cooperation 
With Foreign Countries on granting the enterprise the right to 
participate in military-technical cooperation, to which the 
meeting protocol and a draft decision of the RF Government shall 
be appended. 
  In the event that the proposal to grant the enterprise the 
right to engage in military-technical cooperation is rejected, 
the reasons for the rejection, and when necessary, the opinions 
of the members of the commission or of persons authorized for 
this by the appropriate organizations shall be indicated in the 
meeting protocol. Within a week's time from the moment of the 
decision's adoption the enterprise shall be given a written 
reply together with the reasons for rejection. 
  Within a month's time the Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations shall register the enterprise as a participant of 
foreign economic activity in the area of military-technical 
cooperation on the basis of a decision of the Government of the 
Russian Federation granting the enterprise the right to engage 
in military-technical cooperation. The registered enterprise 
shall receive an extract from the register, signed by the 
Russian Federation deputy minister of foreign economic relations 
and authenticated by the seal of the Ministry of Foreign 
Economic Relations. 
  The RF Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations shall maintain 
a register of enterprises having the right to engage in foreign 
economic activity in the area of military-technical cooperation, 
and it shall transmit information regarding inclusion of 
enterprises on the register to the State Committee for Defense 
Industry, the State Customs Committee, the Federal 
Counterintelligence Service, the Foreign Intelligence Service, 
the Ministry of Finance, the Central Bank, the Ministry of 
Economics, the Ministry of Defense, the Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs, the Russian Federation State Committee for the 
Management of State Property, the Russian Federal Service for 
Foreign Exchange and Export Control, the Rosvooruzheniye State 
Company, and trade representatives abroad. 
  Within 10 days after consummation of a transaction, an 
enterprise registered as a participant of foreign economic 
activity in the area of military-technical cooperation shall 
submit the following to the State Committee for Defense 
Industry, the Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations, the 
Ministry of Defense, the Russian Federal Service for Foreign 
Exchange and Export Control and the Rosvooruzheniye State 
Company: copies of the contracts and supplementary agreements; 
information on progress in implementing the contracts (the 
stages of fulfillment of the contracts) and their fulfillment in 
their entirety; information on foreign currency received into 
the account of the enterprise for fulfilling work according to 
the contract (not submitted to the Russian Federation Ministry 
of Defense). 
  The Interdepartmental Commission on the Russian Federation's 
Military-Technical Cooperation With Foreign Countries shall have 
the right to suspend an enterprise's activity in 
military-technical cooperation at the request of the appropriate 
ministries and departments for a period of 3 months in the event 
of the enterprise's violation of RF legislation, decisions of 
the President and Government of the Russian Federation, 
instructions of the Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations, the 
Ministry of Finance, the Central Bank, the Russian Federal 
Service for Foreign Exchange and Export Control, and the RF 
State Customs Committee regarding military-technical 
cooperation, export control, and foreign exchange, financial and 
customs regulations on foreign economic activity; in the event 
of deliberate or negligent violation of legislation of foreign 
countries as a result of which economic, military or political 
damage may be inflicted upon the Russian Federation; in the 
event of failure to fulfill obligations under state defense 
orders, and unlawful transactions; in the event of secrecy 
violation; in the event of failure to fulfill obligations in 
settling with suppliers of associated articles connected with 
export deliveries; in the event of unconscientious competition 
between Russian exporters in the foreign market. 
  The Interdepartmental Commission on Military-Technical 
Cooperation With Foreign Countries shall notify the 
corresponding ministries and departments of the decision 
adopted, and instruct them to draft a decision of the RF 
Government depriving the enterprise of the right to engage in 
military-technical activity. 
  On the basis of a decision adopted by the RF Government 
depriving the enterprise of its right to engage in 
military-technical cooperation, the Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations shall strike it's name from the register of 
enterprises have the right to engage in foreign economic 
activity in the area of military-technical cooperation, and so 
notify the corresponding ministries and departments as well as 
the Russian Federation's trade representatives abroad. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46524 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94038" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Losses Due to Weapons Sales Efforts </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Losses Due to Weapons Sales Efforts </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0420A Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA in Russian No 
82 (156) 5 May 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0420A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Kucherenko: "How Does Russia Trade in </F>
Weapons?"] 
  [Text] There is probably no area that's a 
greater mystery to the layman than this. We all wholeheartedly 
believe that Russia and its powerful military-industrial complex 
are capable of conquering world markets, putting an end to the 
shameful dependence upon raw material exports. But should we 
console ourselves with illusions? 
<H5>  Weapon Exports Comparable to Chocolate Imports </H5>
  By October of last year a large group of experts from the 
Council of Ministers, the Central Bank, the Ministry of Security 
and the Interdepartmental Commission to Combat Corruption ended 
their inspection of the manner in which our foreign trade 
organizations are selling arms beyond the border. And at the 
same time, the manner in which orders of the president and 
government of the Russian Federation are being fulfilled. 
  As it turns out, the latter have been ignored. Trade in 
weapons and combat equipment proceeded unsupervised, as a result 
of which there was "significant political and economic damage to 
the state interests of Russia and, most importantly, its 
taxpayers." 
  The dramatic changes in policy and military doctrine that 
occurred since 1990, the collapse of the Warsaw Pact and the 
USSR, and the money reforms rended military-technical 
cooperation with 30 countries. In comparison with 1991, arms 
exports fell by a factor of three in 1992, to $2.3 billion. In 
1993 this indicator was barely over 2 billion. A figure close to 
that of exports of Mars and Snickers bars to Russia last year. 
In the opinion of the inspectors, under these conditions the 
leadership of the MVES [Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations] 
was unable to enter the new world markets and sell the 
accumulated reserves of defense goods. 
  From press files: "In 1993 the USA's share in exports 
of arms and military equipment to developing countries reached 
57 percent. Russia's was 5.5 percent."--KOMMERSANT WEEKLY, 8 
March 1994. 
  In the meantime, the work of Spetsvneshtekhnika and 
Oboroneksport--organizations subordinated to the MVES--was not 
subjected to any coordination. Unlawful acts were committed with 
the complicity of executives of the Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations, the then Vice-Prime Minister G. Khizha and his staff, 
and former executives of Spetsvneshtekhnika and 
Oboroneksport--S. Krasnov and S. Karaoglanov. 
<H5>  Even Though the Arsenals Were Stuffed Full </H5>
  Krasnov and Karaoglanov proposed including manufacture of 
new 
lots of arms for export in the state defense order, even though 
the storage depots were stuffed full with the same weapons, and 
no contracts had been signed for their purchase. For example, 
Spetsvneshtekhnika and Oboroneksport ordered products amounting 
to $5.4 billion. This order was approved by a 17 March 1992 
decree of the Council of Ministers, signed by Gaydar. However, 
the military-industrial complex managed to produce only 3.1 
billion worth of the "articles," of which only 1.1 billion worth 
were delivered abroad. For practical purposes, the other $2 
billion were pulled out of the pockets of taxpayers and 
deposited in arsenals in the form of guns and tanks. The budget 
deficit was increased. The inspection noted in this case that 
the MVES never did pay the plants in full for their work. 
  Whatever happened to these 2 billion? Three hundred 
eighty-two T-72S and T-80U tanks, 194 MSTA-S and Giatsint 
self-propelled guns, 16 Uragan and Smerch multiple rocket 
launchers, 12 Tunguska self-propelled SAM launchers, and 16,000 
missiles of different types and classes--enough to create a 
reserve for a good army. Add to this that by that time, the 
balance sheet of the MVES's foreign trade associations showed 
half a billion dollars' worth of unexported armament. 
Oboroneksport alone had 50 tanks, 1,800 missiles, 10 ships, 6 
MiG-29s, small arms and ammunition, and spare parts for 
airplanes. At that moment ship builders were building four ships 
for export valued at $70 million on the basis of orders of 
merchants from the MVES, at the same time that six finished 
vessels of the same class were standing around with nothing to 
do. 
  Even though it was unable to sell off these reserves, 
Oboroneksport once again placed orders in 1993 for 8 Uragan 
systems and 20 Shturm-S antitank systems, unsupported by 
contracts signed with buyers. 
  The inspectors reached the following conclusion: "In the 
last 
few years...the profit losses exceeded $2.6 billion." The amount 
lost was almost as much as had been promised to us by the G7 in 
support of the "radical reforms." As much as the price of 20 
million tonnes of oil. The conversion program in Omsk Oblast is 
"sucking up" the equivalent of $200 million. And completion of 
the nuclear-powered vessel "Ural," which ground to a halt at the 
building dock, will take 8 billion rubles, or $5 million. 
<H5>  Azeri Rockets and Shturmoviki Sukhogo </H5>
  Besides these, there are also some other losses that are 
harder to reckon. Because cases were revealed in which weapons 
were manufactured "under the table," circumventing state defense 
orders, contrary to Decree No 517, 24 July 1992, of the 
Government of the Russian Federation. 
  Thus, in April 1992 air force commander P. Deynekin and 
then-First Deputy Minister of Industry V. Glukhikh (now the 
chief of the Roskomoboronprom [Russian State Committee for 
Defense Industry]) signed an agreement in Russia's behalf to 
produce 180 type Kh-29 air-to-ground missiles in Azerbaijan, 
allegedly on the basis of an order from the Ministry of Defense 
for Su-25 ground-attack aircraft. An order amounting to 153.4 
million of the old rubles was placed with the Iglim Association. 
This decision was illegal at least because Azerbaijan was not in 
the CIS at that time. Deynekin further violated the law "On 
Deliveries of Products and Goods for State Needs" by signing a 
decision on the basis of which manufacture of the Kh-29 was paid 
for not by the Ministry of Defense but by a certain small 
enterprise called Ekooptimum, which had no right to engage in 
such transactions. Moreover, there has been no demand for such 
missiles for several years already, which is why the Ministry of 
Defense had no plans for ordering them. 
  Iglim made them. Though not for our air forces, but for 
export. In this case Ekooptimum paid for a total of 10 units. 
By as early as February 1993 Deynekin and A. Bratukhin, the 
first deputy chairman of the Roskomoboronprom, once again signed 
a similar agreement with the Azeris, which was approved by the 
then-Vice Prime Minister G. Khizha. This time the object was 320 
Kh-29s for 312 million, and once again, in circumvention of the 
state defense order. In violation of the 27 March 1993 
presidential edict, deliveries of these missiles were later 
freed from payment of customs duties without a ruling by the 
Foreign Exchange and Economic Commission, the Ministry of 
Defense and the MVES. 
  Iglim managed to manufacture 175 missiles, which were then 
fitted out by over 40 Russian state-owned plants. Their 
ownership was then transferred to a limited partnership--the 
Shturmoviki Sukhogo Concern, headed by V. Babak. Obtaining 
financing from the budget, it was this concern that paid the 
Azeris for their work. It also signed an unlawful agreement with 
Iglim, also disadvantageous to Russia, to export the Kh-29s and 
divide the hard currency profits--60 percent to Azerbaijan and 
40 percent to the concern. But they were unable to sell any of 
the missiles, and the money diverted by Shturmoviki Sukhogo 
became frozen in these goods. 
<H5>  The Mechanics of Enrichment </H5>
  Yes, we did sell weapons abroad, but in all cases through 
middlemen. And the money that could have been gone to the 
hard-up military-industrial complex and budget wound up in the 
pockets of dubious dealers. 
  From the files of NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA: "...The 
inspection established that in many cases foreign trade 
organizations of the Russian MVES sold arms and military 
equipment through Russian and foreign middlemen in violation of 
presidential edicts...No 507, 12 May 1992...and No 1621s, 24 
December 1992.... Some high-placed officials in a number of 
ministries and in the Government of the Russian Federation were 
unfortunately drawn into these unlawful actions.... Commercial 
organizations were enriched at the expense of state 
resources." 
  In October 1992 Spetsvneshtekhnika, which was headed by 
Major 
General V. Braylovskiy, sold the latest model of the T-80U tank, 
the Tunguska SAM launcher and other equipment worth $10.7 
million to the Liberian firm A. Bidner, Inc. with the support of 
Vice-Prime Minister Khizha, receiving $1.1 million in 
commissions for this. This equipment was to be subsequently 
delivered to England. What was it, we wonder, that kept 
Braylovskiy from selling the goods directly to the British, 
without giving the lion's share of the profits to a middleman? 
In this case Spetsvneshtekhnika siphoned off a considerable 
amount of money to the Russian Military-Industrial Association, 
supposedly to fund the search for a customer. Does this mean 
that the deal now involved two middlemen? To make matters worse, 
this association is a purely commercial venture, and it has no 
right to engage in military-technical cooperation. 
  On the other hand, Braylovskiy and Khizha violated Yeltsin's 
Edict No 1621, according to which export of the T-80U was to be 
strictly prohibited prior to 1993, while export of the Tunguska 
was not foreseen at all. 
  Here is another example. With the assistance of Glazyev, the 
head of the MVES, and that same Khizha, and jointly with our 
MiG-Servis firm, the Main Administration for Collaboration and 
Cooperation (GOSK), headed by V. Trofimov, who was subsequently 
dismissed from his position, sold aviation property and 
documentation (for the MiG-23 and MiG-29) to the 
Russian-Singaporean venture Remora Ltd. for a total of $5 
million. All of this was shipped to Angola. 
  As it turned out, MiG-Servis is a limited partnership 
established by the MiG Joint-Stock Scientific Production 
Complex, the GUSK and Spetsvneshtekhnika; it possesses a 
negligible amount of as yet unpaid authorized capital totaling 
R2 million. Moreover, because the GUSK and Spetsvneshtekhnika 
are state-owned organizations, what we have here is 
commercialization of the work of public officials--officials who 
enjoy a profit from something that they are supposed to do 
anyway by the nature of their work. 
  What is remarkable is that in selling goods to Remora, this 
firm was actually concluding a deal with itself. Because Remora 
is an offshore organization off the Isle of Man, 40 percent of 
which is owned by MiG-Servis. (The remaining 60 percent are 
owned by Singapore's CMI Impax.) 
  The inspection established that MiG-Servis appeared on many 
licenses and customs declarations as the manufacturer and 
shipper of the fighters, which did not correspond to reality (it 
did not even have the right to participate in military-technical 
cooperation). On the other hand, Remora did not have a permit to 
purchase goods from either the Angolans or the English. So it 
happens that by channeling state property to its offshore 
middleman, MiG-Servis unlawfully received a quarter of a million 
dollars. 
  By the same means MiG-Servis sold state property to Germany 
in 1993 to reequip the Bundeswehr's MiG-29 regiment. According 
to data of the Russian Federation's Foreign Intelligence Service 
and the Counterintelligence Directorate of the Ministry of 
Security, M. R. Valdenberg (the general director of MiG-Servis) 
allegedly purchased an aircraft repair plant in Dresden, on the 
basis of which the firm Elbe Flugzeugwerke was established. In 
the meantime, the FRG's federal department for military 
equipment purchases did not authorize MiG-Servis to purchase 
spare parts for MiG-29s in Russia. We note in this case that 
despite the fact that around 500 warplanes were idling at our 
air force bases, permission to export only four MiGs was given 
by a 12 May 1992 order of the RF Government! 
  More than enough interesting things were discovered. There 
was also the fact of the unlawful issuance of a license by 
Deputy Minister V. Shibayev of the MVES for delivery of two 
portable Igla surface-to-air systems together with 60 
125-millimeter projectiles to the Germans through the Liberia's 
EBC Investment Corp. and Germany's GLS. And there is the fact 
that five Gardeniya-IFU ECM stations went to Egypt by way of 
Bahrain's Continental Trading Center with the blessing of MVES 
GUVTS [Main Administration for Military-Technical Cooperation of 
the Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations] chief Kotelkin. 
  With the connivance of its officials, Russia turned its 
profit over to numerous resellers who, according to the 
inspection data, had neither permits from the governments of the 
importing countries to make military purchases, nor end-user 
certificates. Unfortunately, these are not isolated facts. 
<H5>  The Old With a New Face? </H5>
  This is only a small fraction of what is happening in our 
arms trade. But what are the authorities doing to curb this 
lawlessness? 
  Spetsvneshtekhnika, Oboroneksport, and the GUSK [Main 
Administration for Collaboration and Cooperation] of the MVES 
were abolished, and the monopoly on arms trade was transferred 
to the state-owned company Rosvooruzheniye (RV). Will this make 
things better for us? 
  It would be worthwhile to acquaint ourselves with the 
executive leadership of the new company. 
  From press files: "The founders of the state-owned 
company Rosvooruzheniye are people known in the country: 
Vladimir Shumeyko (who pushed through the edict establishing 
Rosvooruzheniye), Oleg Soskovets (who approved the edict in 
behalf of the government), and Viktor Chernomyrdin (who approved 
the company charter)"--KOMMERSANT WEEKLY, 8 March 1994. 
  Supervision over observance of the interests of the state in 
the company was assigned to A. Korzhakov, the chief of the 
president's secret service. We must give Korzhakov's talents 
their due: He commands the secret service, and somewhere he 
picked up on the fine points of international arms trade. This 
normally requires graduating from an economic VUZ, 
familiarization with international law, and experience in 
foreign trade. But he managed to do all of this quite easily, as 
a second job to protecting the president. 
  Marshal Ye. Shaposhnikov was appointed B. N.'s 
representative 
at RV in February. 
  Obviously the two of them will easily replace the entire 
staff of specialists from the disbanded Interdepartmental 
Commission to Combat Crime and Corruption, and at the same time, 
manage to get on with it in the absence of a state concept of 
military-technical cooperation in Russia. And this concept is 
exactly where those infamous state interests which Shaposhnikov 
and Korzhakov are called upon to protect are supposed to be 
expounded. 
  From press files: "...Rosvooruzheniye intends to carry 
out its activities through authorized banks--Menatep, Mostbank, 
Intermed, Moscow National...."--KOMMERSANT WEEKLY, 8 March 
1994. 
  Once again, familiar structures, which spare no efforts for 
the good of the motherland. 
  We can say with confidence that the structure of RV is 
imperfect. For example, the company has been granted the right 
to export some military products without having to draft special 
government permits, and on only on the basis of coordination 
with Grachev's department. With its recently created Unified 
Automated System for Supervising Strategic Exports, the MVES has 
completely distanced itself from this work. Nor has anything 
been said about the role to be played in this by the Federal 
Service for Supervision of Foreign Exchange, to which the 
Council of Ministers delegated its rights of implementing 
general state foreign economic policy. Won't this once again 
lead to lack of supervision? After all, RV will begin setting 
the rules of armed trade and acting as a merchant itself. 
  On the other hand, RV has been proclaimed to be a 
state-owned 
enterprise, one which can establish subsidiary companies not 
only in Russia but also abroad--investment, insurance, dealer 
(trade), trust and other kinds of companies. Attraction of 
foreign middlemen to consummate the deals is also foreseen. At 
the same time the company has the right to issue permits for 
export of military products. Doesn't this perpetuate the 
possibility for public officials to finance private middlemen 
under the table? After all, RV is a cumbersome organization, and 
consequently it wouldn't be difficult at all for its workers to 
establish a firm for themselves somewhere on the Isle of Man or 
in Liberia, and sell state-owned weapons through it, depriving 
the country of hard currency profits; in the exact same way that 
the firms MiG-Servis and Remora Ltd. did. 
<H5>  Strengthening Statehood While Dispensing With Supervision? </H5>
  In general, although RV is considered to be a state-owned 
company, the rights it has been granted are purely those of a 
private company. And its general director operates as the sole 
and absolute owner. Thus, the state is not responsible for the 
obligations of state-owned RV, and it is given the right to 
dispose of its property and profits, and acquire and alienate 
property. Moreover, "other rights may also be granted to the 
company by the government of the Russian Federation." RV has 
also managed to acquire the possibilities for creating funds 
that are not called for directly by its charter. But isn't this 
legalization of that absence of supervision that last year's 
inspection revealed?! 
  For example, RV is endowed with the right not only to 
maintain a monopoly on trade in products of the 
military-industrial complex, but also to invest into its 
development. This combination of functions, plus the absence of 
supervision, makes it possible for officials to siphon profits 
from the sale of public wealth into subsidiaries, especially 
foreign subsidiaries. And if the authorities do in fact wish to 
strengthen statehood and put things in order, it would be more 
reasonable to make Rosvooruzheniye only a merchant that would 
transfer the profits strictly into the federal budget--under the 
watchful eye of the authorities. These resources should be 
invested only by an entirely different state structure, one not 
associated with RV. Separation of functions creates an obstacle 
to embezzlement of state property. 
<H5>  Who Stands to Gain From a Monopoly? </H5>
  In this case, Rosvooruzheniye enjoys a complete monopoly 
over 
export of military equipment. At the same time, the procedure 
currently effective in the USA is as follows: After filling a 
state order, a military-industrial company can then proceed to 
work independently. Most importantly, as long as it does not 
violate the state concept of military-technical cooperation, the 
law, and international agreements signed by the government. And 
of course, the buyer must have an end-user certificate and a 
permit from the government of its country allowing it to engage 
in such transactions. 
  Russian weapon manufacturers--the immediate producers, who 
have established regional associations--also demand the same 
procedure. After all, their enterprises are perishing from 
poverty, the collectives are falling apart, and cities in which 
defense industry is located are suffering. But those in Moscow 
who are working to strengthen statehood have no wish to grant 
them this right. This is not to mention the fact that we do not 
have a concept of military-technical cooperation! 
  Why is one needed? A monopoly on trade, you see, is a unique 
possibility for unconscientiously plundering the manufacturer, 
for imposing low purchase prices on him, or for raking in an 
ungodly percentage for intermediary services. And the 
manufacturer can do nothing about it--he himself is prohibited 
from engaging in trade. You see, an official who markets the 
goods of some tank plant across the border has to make some 
money for himself, and for his subsidiary organization, and for 
the Western middleman. What is left in this case for the labor 
collectives? And it looks like when the military-industrial 
complex descends to abject poverty, the middlemen will come to 
it as its privatizing saviors; with wallets bulging at the 
expense of the plants. 
  This future is a fully possible one. In March 1992 Volskiy's 
experts, who analyzed the behavior of the military-industrial 
complex under the conditions of the Gaydar-supervised 
disintegration, established that defense plants could not enter 
the foreign market because the commissions foreign trade 
organizations were demanding were too high. Describing the 
woeful situation resulting from the severing of ties in the 
former USSR, in spring 1993 V. Mashits, chairman of the 
Committee for Economic Cooperation with Commonwealth Member 
States, noted that state-owned intermediaries, which had 
cornered all of the quotas and privileges in advance, were 
demanding up to 25 percent of the amount of a transaction! 
  One could, of course, also understand the proponents of the 
monopoly enjoyed by RV. It is needed in order that independent 
merchants would not get in each other's way in foreign markets, 
bringing down prices and inflicting damage on the country. But 
then a strictly fixed low percentage for intermediary services 
needs to be legislated, and a judicial mechanism needs to be 
foreseen concurrently. One which would make it possible for the 
weapon manufacturer to go to the Antimonopoly Committee, and 
make the foreign trade worker live up to his responsibilities in 
the event of his negligence or acts of extortion. But it's 
somehow hard to believe that the present government will do this. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46525 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94039" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Unique' Russian Exhibits at `Aircraft Engines-94' Show </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Unique' Russian Exhibits at `Aircraft Engines-94' Show </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM2305105794 Moscow Russian Television Network in Russian 
1600 GMT 14 May 94 </F>

<F P=103> PM2305105794 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow Russian Television Network </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [From the "Vesti" newscast: Video report from Moscow </F>
"Aircraft Engines-94" exhibition by A. Peslyak and M. Fokeyev, 
identified by caption] 
  [Text] [161545] [Peslyak over video of entrance to 
exhibition, first sentence partly obliterated by music] In 
addition to aircraft engines, car, tractor, and ship engines and 
other power plant are on show. Engines produced in Perm, St. 
Petersburg, Omsk, Ufa, and Barnaul are by no means inferior to 
the output of the world-famous BMW or Pratt &amp; Whitney 
companies. 
  Academician Kuznetsov, for example, is presenting his new 
engine developed in Samara -- a unique environment-friendly and 
economical engine for large-capacity aircraft. [video shows 
movie of engine in action] 
  The Mozhayskiy Academy, which produces the nuclear-powered 
Topaz on which the Americans are so keen, has discovered a new 
motion principle. Mikhail Ostrikov, the creator of the miracle 
magnet, sees a great future in the skies and on earth for this 
essentially everlasting engine. [161627] [video shows general 
views of exhibition and described exhibits] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46526 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94040" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Impact of Conversion on Job Prospects </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Impact of Conversion on Job Prospects </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0106101494 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 27 May 94 
First Edition p 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM0106101494 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with A. Savenkov, director of the Russian Federal </F>
Employment Service's "Intellectual Resources" interregional 
center, by Inna Rozanova; date and place of interview not 
stated: "If You Have No Job You Cannot Lose It" -- first 
paragraph is introduction; passages between slantlines are 
Rozanova insertions] 
  [Text] The clan of defense monsters accustomed to a 
comfortable existence at the state's expense has found itself in 
the clutches of conversion. The panic over the absence of 
orders for research and development and production reigns not 
only in the top echelons of the military-industrial complex 
leadership. Highly qualified cadres -- society's intellectual 
elite and virtuoso workers -- have found themselves unemployed. 
A. Savenkov, director of the Russian Federal Employment Service 
"Intellectual Resources" interregional center, tells the tale. 
  [Rozanova] Aleksandr Valentinovich, in periods of social 
upheavals the Russian intelligentsia traditionally asks age-old 
questions: "Who is to blame?" and "what is to be done?" How 
would you answer the first question? 
  [Savenkov] It is not the government, not any parties or 
legislative organs, but solely the leaders of the 
military-industrial complex enterprises who are to blame for the 
situation which has taken shape. The economic situation 
dictates its own laws. And, of course, one can name dozens of 
enterprises where the leaders perform miracles of heroism, 
saving the unique formations entrusted to them. A fine example 
is the capital's steel scientific research institute, which has 
now become a joint-stock company and continues to work for the 
defense industry. The collective headed by director Vladimir 
Shashkin has been able to face up to the market. 
  [Rozanova] The concept of conversion has been in existence 
for a long time now.... 
  [Savenkov] There are conceptual documents. But a concept is 
something unsteady, a subjective view of objective processes. 
It is not even a program, not a plan of measures, still less a 
law. What is needed is a law, a clear law down to the trivial 
details, so that when it is implemented the features of the 
country's sectors and regions can be considered. I myself am a 
supporter of swift, resolute actions and am entirely in favor of 
the transformations initiated by Yegor Gaydar. But the most 
complex thing is that each person, whether he is unemployed, a 
scientist or a millionaire, is a person, not a machine. So the 
law on conversion should first of all consider the realities of 
the person and only second should it consider the economic 
aspect of the problem. 
  [Rozanova] Last year alone about 1.5 million people were 
laid off from defense production facilities. Are the 
unemployment growth rates in the defense industry high now? 
  [Savenkov] By the end of last year the rate in the defense 
complex was lower. People are being misled into thinking that 
all financing problems will soon be resolved and state orders 
and credits will be issued. But that faith is leaving people. 
Another layoff of manpower from military-industrial complex 
enterprises is forecast. 
  /From the newspaper's files 
  According to the figures of the Russian Federal Employment 
Service as of early 1994: 
  -- in "closed" cities every second unemployed person is aged 
18-29 while throughout Russia as a whole young people make up 
one-third of the total number of unemployed; 
  -- the unemployed who have been unable to find work for 12 
months or more comprise 17.9 percent of the total number of 
unemployed in the "closed" cities. Throughout Russia as a whole 
this figure is considerably lower, to wit 12.9 percent./ 
  [Rozanova] Well, is there any concealed unemployment -- 
switching to a part-time working day or week? 
  [Savenkov] Yes, and this is now one way of preserving the 
cadres potential. The military-industrial complex knows that 
usually there are no more than five high-class specialists in a 
particular avenue of scientific research at the defense 
industry's enterprises and scientific research institutes and it 
is enough for two of them to "fall out of the nest" for the 
remaining three to be unable to do anything to ensure that the 
enterprise is not reduced to chaos and is not faced with the 
need to change its technological orientation, its sectorial 
direction, and its products list. 
  But in general terms, relying on salvation with the aid of 
concealed unemployment is to hope that a soap bubble will last 
an eternity. 
  [Rozanova] One of the main cadres problems of conversion is 
the loss of the level of skill of defense production workers. 
But there is also the opinion that, on the contrary, workers 
from military plants will have to improve their qualifications 
in order to learn to make teapots instead of missiles -- after 
all, these people were used to fulfilling orders on supermodern 
equipment while workers in civilian industry are literally 
working miracles on antiquated machine tools. 
  [Savenkov] Paradoxical though it may seem, those deprived of 
their ultramodern equipment will have to be retrained: They 
will be unable to compete with workers on obsolete machine 
tools. And these people will have to summon up the courage to 
realize that nothing terrible has happened. 
  The demands of the day -- to be prepared to change your 
profession and undergo retraining -- will enable people to 
survive in the most difficult situation. Another characteristic 
of the current period is the education of the population in the 
spirit of professional mobility. So they do not try to chain 
themselves to the city or settlement where their nearest and 
dearest are buried, where they have developed friendships with 
colleagues, or even where they have family. People must be 
taught to move around in search of work -- in order to save 
their families, their friendships, and even their cities or 
settlements. 
  [Rozanova] Outstanding specialists, once preoccupied with 
defense topics, are now free to think and work. Many of them 
have decided to change their lifestyle, setting up small 
businesses, for example, based on their departments or design 
bureaus, and without demanding massive credits from the state. 
But can you say that small businesses are a solution? 
  [Savenkov] They are one of the most effective and honest 
ways out of the present grim situation. They are a way of 
helping people not lose their skills, but retain them for better 
days. But some leaders are finding it difficult to take such 
steps, because it deprives them of their power monopoly. They 
are clinging to power to the bitter end and are even refusing to 
lease premises and equipment to their own people and are not 
registering small businesses, and this is a bad policy by bad 
leaders. 
  What would I recommend? Under the guidance of the 
administration, conclude articles of association with small 
businesses based on departments or design bureaus, so that when 
the "light at the end of the tunnel" appears, all this potential 
will work for the benefit of the mother enterprise. Not 
allowing premises and equipment to be privatized, but leasing 
them out. 
  /From the newspaper's files 
  According to the figures of the Russian Federal Employment 
Service, as of 1 January 1994 in the "closed" cities the 
proportion of unemployed people with higher and secondary 
specialized education was 53.2 percent of the total number of 
unemployed, while for Russia as a whole this indicator was much 
lower -- 37.9 percent./ 
  [Rozanova] The mono-cities are literally on the brink of 
extinction now.... 
  [Savenkov] The mono-cities are the result of the GULAG 
principle in the building of our society. There are two 
diametrically opposed options for resolving the problem. The 
first is a dead city which all the people have left and where 
all the windows are broken, which, incidentally, is not uncommon 
abroad. The second option is that the state shrugs aside all 
principles and market laws and simply provides the money to feed 
these people. 
  The best option of all is that of compromise. I think the 
first thing the administration should do in each city is to make 
an inventory of manpower resources in conjunction with the 
employment service. Usually, the employment service's team of 
experts consists of leading specialists in the sphere of 
economics, law, business, sociology, and psychology, and as a 
rule the group is able to make a diagnosis within a week. Then, 
with the active participation of the local trade union and 
administration, the working people should be briefed on the 
situation the enterprise is in and on what could happen if this 
or that path is taken. They should be asked what other jobs 
they could do. What other speciality are they prepared to be 
retrained in? 
  [Rozanova] And what is your view of the problem of the 
"nuclear brain drain" abroad? 
  [Savenkov] If you think about it, what exactly are we trying 
to ban? The spread of knowledge on the most efficient and 
ecologically clean form of energy, which resembles in its 
parameters the energy of the sun, wind, and tides? If it is a 
question of weapons, that is a problem for the politicians. But 
let us not drag into political battles scientists who can find a 
solution to practically any problem if the finance is available. 
If there is a financially advantageous order to be had, even if 
it is directed against humanity, people will always be found who 
will carry it out. The fight should be against the "clients for 
death," not the engineers and workers. 
  And what if you look at the "brain drain" the other way 
round? If the transplantation of specialists to other countries 
is regarded as aid to neighbors, as a friendly act? This will 
help our country's science too. After working for a given 
period, our specialists will come home rich and happy. 
  [Rozanova] Judging by your answers to my questions, the 
"Intellectual Resources" center has done good theoretical work. 
But has it yielded a practical return? 
  [Savenkov] Of course. We are testing our theory at about 10 
settlements in Moscow Oblast -- in the cities of Zhukovskiy, 
Odintsovo, Fryazino, Balashikha, Kaliningrad, Pushkino, 
Pavlovo-Posada, and Dubna, and the settlement of Kurovskoye in 
Orekhovo-Zuyevskiy Rayon. For instance, at the "Istok" 
enterprise which is undergoing conversion in the science city 
of Fryazino, in less than six weeks this year, with active 
financial and organizational assistance from Viktor Ponomarev, 
director of the Moscow Oblast Employment Center, more than 50 
new jobs for women were created, for the "Istok" employees who 
had been subject to cuts and for the unemployed people of the 
city of Fryazino. A line was installed and production started 
up for the production of Russian-designed hearing aids at 
"Istok" in record time. 
  /From the newspaper's files 
  According to the figures of the Russian Federal Employment 
Service: 
  -- In the first quarter of 1994 in Russia as a whole the 
number of unemployed increased 29.7 percent, whereas in the 
"closed" cities it increased 22.8 percent. 
  -- As of 1 April 1994 in Russia as a whole there were 4.7 
unemployed citizens for every vacancy registered with the 
employment service. In the "closed" cities this indicator was, 
on average, 4.1./ 
  [Rozanova] All the same, can we end our conversation today 
on an optimistic note? 
  [Savenkov] We not only can, but should. Because Russia is 
still here, whether people like it or not. Russia is an 
unsinkable cruiser, and no storms will make it sink to the 
bottom of history. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46527 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94041" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Arms Producers Blame State Bureaucracy for Plight </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Arms Producers Blame State Bureaucracy for Plight </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   MK0306101094 Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 3 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> MK0306101094 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SEGODNYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Pavel Felgengauer report in the "Defense Sector" column: </F>
"The Impoverished Military Industrial Complex Finds Freedom 
Beyond Its Means. Arms Producers Confer With State Company 
Rosvooruzheniye Leadership"] 
  [Text] May's government Resolution 479 granted 
manufacturers the right independently to export arms. It would 
be quite natural to interpret the liberation of 
"military-technical cooperation" as a victory by the military 
industrial complex. Those "liberated," however, seem to be of a 
different opinion. 
  Yesterday a conference was held in Moscow between main arms 
and military equipment producers and the leadership of the state 
company Rosvooruzheniye on "prospects of military-technical 
cooperation" under new conditions. Rosvooruzheniye 
representatives (Marshal Shaposhnikov, Viktor Samoylov, and 
department chiefs) called for unity and partnership in the 
common struggle for survival by Russia's defense industry and 
its army. The manufacturers related amazingly well to this 
appeal. 
  As of now, arms producers may choose their own 
intermediaries 
but virtually all "liberated" plant directors and general 
designers have spoken in favor of continuing cooperation with 
Rosvooruzheniye. Moreover, manufacturers consider Resolution 479 
harmful or at best senseless. The fact is that in the past two 
years many arms producers have managed to secure a whole number 
of individual "preferential" government resolutions and edicts. 
Now these firms and research and production associations will 
again have to undergo the protracted process of bureaucratic 
licensing to obtain the rights they enjoyed in the past. 
  Besides, on their own, the producers did not sell very many 
weapons. Vladimir Kuzmin, general director of the Dementyev 
MAPO [possibly Moscow Aviation Production Association] (MiG 
aircraft), said that in the past two years MAPO spent $3 million 
for advertising and promotion (air shows, and so forth) of MiG 
fighter aircraft abroad. Yet in spite of dozens of business 
contracts, "not a single serious hard currency contract has so 
far been concluded." (The Malaysian contract has been prepared 
with the participation of Rosvooruzheniye). MAPO's general 
director called on all manufacturers to cooperate with 
Rosvooruzheniye, which not only has representative offices and 
old business links in many countries but also available 
resources for easy credits against contracts signed. The 
producers themselves have funds neither for marketing nor making 
prepayments to component manufacturers in order to meet contract 
terms. Military industrial complex directors are not content 
with the conditions set by commercial banks. 
  What conference participants saw as an artificially inflated 
rate of the ruble to the dollar and also rapidly increasing 
overheads cripple the effectiveness of arms exports. Export 
production of ammunition and spare parts is currently losing 
money in all cases, while deductions and taxes imposed by the 
Finance Ministry have made arms export -- for instance, to 
India, which pays in "clearing" dollars or rupees -- 
unattractive, and therefore the contracts concluded are not 
being honored. 
  In any event, all military industrial complex "generals" are 
at one in that their chief enemy is not Rosvooruzheniye but 
state bureaucracy, which hinders the expeditious exporting of 
new weapons. The conference criticized most the Finance Ministry 
and the Defense Ministry's Export Control Committee. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46528 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma025___94042" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-025 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Military Industrial Complex Prepares for Finance Conference </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Military Industrial Complex Prepares for Finance Conference </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   MK0706082094 Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 7 Jun 94 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> MK0706082094 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [V.A. report under the "Military-Industrial Complex" rubric: </F>
"Industrial Capital Wants To Merge With Banking Capital"] 
  [Text] A press conference at the General Staff Academy was 
held within the framework of preparation for the international 
conference entitled "Integration of Banking and Industrial 
Capital" scheduled for November. Its venue was perhaps supposed 
to underline once more that the initiative comes from the 
military-industrial complex enterprises. No wonder: They have 
been faced with the fait accompli of a "precipitous conversion." 
Very indicative in this sense was the question to participants 
in the press conference: "Is there today a military-industrial 
complex in Russia at all?" It was asked by none other than a 
major general of the General Staff Academy. 
  Another general, Yuriy Yashin, chairman of the State 
Technological Commission under the Russian Federation president, 
stated confidently that there is a military-industrial complex 
in Russia. What there is not is a program of conversion as 
such. The present federal budget cannot provide sufficient 
financing to all sectors, even less so to such a 
capital-intensive sector as the military-industrial complex. At 
the same time, commercial banking structures are making no 
active motions in this direction. This, despite the fact that 
they have invested in foreign banks approximately the worth of 
today's budget deficit. 
  The planned conference according to the concept of its 
organizers -- the Russian Federation Ministry of the Economy, 
the State Committee on Defense Industry, the Ministry on 
Economic Cooperation, the Association of Russian Banks, and also 
a number of powerful state and commercial structures -- is 
supposed to reverse this negative tendency. The conference is 
expected to result in producing specific methods for the merger. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46529 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yeltsin Calls for New Border Security Regime </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Yeltsin Calls for New Border Security Regime </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0433A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0433A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by ITAR-TASS correspondent Vladimir Gondusov under </F>
the rubric "Correspodents of KRASNAYA ZVEZDA and Telegraph 
Agencies Report": "Russia's President Has Presented a Border 
Policy Concept"] 
  [Text] The concept of Russia's border policy was 
presented today by Boris Yeltsin at a conference of higher 
command staff of the Russian Federation's Border Troops. 
  Upon arriving at the Main Military Commissariat Boris 
Yeltsin 
announced that he intends to discuss the difficult missions 
facing the defenders of Russia's border. The president indicated 
the need to set up a new system of border protection with the 
Baltic, Transcaucasus and other CIS states. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46530 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lt-Gen Sokolov Arrives Gudauta </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Lt-Gen Sokolov Arrives Gudauta </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0433B Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0433B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by KRASNAYA ZVEZDA correspondent Vitaliy Denisov </F>
under the rubric "Correspondents of KRASNAYA ZVEZDA and 
Telegraph Agencies Report": "Peacekeepers Are Prepared To Enter 
Abkhasia"] 
  [Text] Lt-Gen Aleksey Sokolov, deputy commander in 
chief of Russia's Ground Troops, has arrived at Gudauta in the 
area of the Georgian-Abkhasian conflict in connection with the 
imminent deployment of CIS peacekeeping forces there. 
  It is expected that he will meet with Georgia's leaders in 
Tbilisi on 28 May. The purpose of the meeting is to discuss 
issues pertaining to the input and deployment of Russian "Blue 
Helmets" in the area of the conflict. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46531 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   New SSBN `Kursk' Undergoing Trials </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New SSBN `Kursk' Undergoing Trials </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0433C Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0433C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by KRASNAYA ZVEZDA correspondent Vladimir Gundarov </F>
under the rubric "Correspondents of KRASNAYA ZVEZDA and 
Telegraph Agencies Report": "The `Kursk' in Champagne Bubbles"] 
  [Text] On 23 May dock trials began at Severodvinsk on 
the new nuclear missile submarine `Kursk' commanded by Capt 1st 
Rank V. Rozhkov. 
  As pointed out by Ivan Vasilyev, in charge of releasing the 
order, the nuclear submarine has a number of improvements, 
including the navigational system, and improved living 
conditions for the crew. The new nuclear submarine will become a 
part of Russia's Navy in December of this year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46532 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Col-Gen Yakovlev Discusses Servicemen's Socio-Economic </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Col-Gen Yakovlev Discusses Servicemen's Socio-Economic </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Complaints 

<F P=102>   94UM0437B Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 2 Jun 94 pp 1-2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0437B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Colonel General Valentin Alekseyevich </F>
Yakovlev, first deputy chief of Russian Federation Ministry of 
Defense Main Cadres Training and Assignment Directorate, by Oleg 
Falichev, KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, date, place and occasion unknown, 
under rubric "Today's Guest": "Service, Unfortunately, Is Not 
the Most Prestigious Job"; photograph of Yakovlev included] 
  [Text] 
  [Box insert] 
  Calling Card: Colonel General Valentin Alekseyevich Yakovlev 
  Born 7 May 1942 in the village of Toryal, Novotoryalskiy 
Rayon, Mari ASSR. Finished Leningrad Higher Combined Arms 
Command School imeni S. M. Kirov, the Frunze Military Academy 
and the General Staff Military Academy. 
  Served in positions from platoon commander to commander of a 
naval infantry division in the Black Sea and Pacific fleets. 
Commanded an army corps. Since September 1991 has been first 
deputy chief of the Russian Federation Ministry of Defense Main 
Cadres Training and Assignment Directorate. 
  [End box insert] 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] Valentin Alekseyevich, we live in a 
difficult time, a time of trial and error, a time of "polishing" 
laws and establishing young Russian statehood. Not everything is 
turning out for us for now as we would have liked, as was 
planned and as was promised the people, and above all, perhaps, 
in the social sphere, which fully affected people in 
shoulderboards... Letters and complaints come to state 
authorities, to the Russian Federation Ministry of Defense and 
to KRASNAYA ZVEZDA from servicemen and military retirees 
concerning a violation of their rights to privileges established 
by laws in force. Therefore permit me to converse with you on 
behalf of our readers, a portion of whose letters you 
familiarized yourself with the day before. 
  Here is the most typical one. It came from Lieutenant A. 
Yemelyanenko, who serves in the Baltic. The officer justly 
complains that he is not being paid an interest-free loan and 
the so-called appointment allowance. Officials refer to the fact 
that his personal file has not arrived in the unit from his 
previous duty station and it is impossible to give out the 
money. The lieutenant concludes the letter with a question: "Why 
do I have to fulfill contract terms and the Ministry of Defense 
does not?" 
  [Yakovlev] Naturally we could not ignore this 
letter. First of all we contacted the Russian Federation 
Ministry of Defense Main Military Budget and Finance Directorate 
and received appropriate explanations. In particular they 
clarified that an interest-free loan for initial acquisition of 
household goods has been paid since March 1993 in accordance 
with the Russian Federation Law "On the Status of Servicemen." 
It is paid for three years in an amount up to 13 times the base 
pay and allowances. As of today it is over 1.5 million, which, 
you will agree, is no small amount for young officers for the 
present difficult times, although, of course, sad blunders also 
occur. 
  In addition to this, we phoned the unit where Lieutenant 
Yemelyanenko presently serves and learned that by this time the 
personal file already had arrived, about which the officer has 
been informed. Funds will be paid him according to the 
prescribed procedure. 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] Letters from Lieutenant V. Tovmach, 
Senior Lieutenant S. Levkov and Major A. Dadykin contain 
uneasiness over the uncertainty of social guarantees to 
servicemen performing contract military duty. You will agree 
that there are questions here too, as they say... And the main 
one is Did we introduce contract service a little early? 
  [Yakovlev] The organization of performance of 
contract military service matured long ago in the midst of our 
society. As of today it is a very important element in elevating 
Russian Federation Armed Forces combat readiness, democratizing 
the Army (Navy) environment, and strengthening discipline and 
law and order in military collectives. It is also without 
question that this system can operate effectively only on 
condition that the interested parties (a specific serviceman on 
the one hand and the state in the person of the Ministry of 
Defense on the other) comply with their commitments fixed in the 
corresponding contract. 
  Unfortunately, the reality is such that the mechanism of 
mutual responsibility does not always operate, through the fault 
of both parties. Take just time periods for concluding 
contracts. Social guarantees are given officers for the entire 
transition period, which is established until 31 December 1994, 
but this should not at all mean that those servicemen who wish 
to continue military service invariably will sign an application 
about their desire to serve the homeland further on the last day 
set aside for this procedure. 
  Circumstances force us to take many factors into account 
which influence this situation. First is the accounting of 
officers on whom one can plan for replacement, for appointment 
to a higher position, and for schooling. Naturally we cannot 
consider those who vacillate and have not determined their 
choice as being potential candidates. Therefore explanatory and 
organizational work continues vigorously--not forcible actions 
by commanders (supervisors) to conclude contracts with those who 
have not yet concluded them. Some military district commanders 
issued orders on this account. This also was done in particular 
in the Ural Military District, from which Major Dadykin's letter 
arrived. The deputy chief of the Ural Military District Cadres 
Directorate reported that a contract for performing duty under 
paragraph "a" for a period of 5 years already had been concluded 
with the officer based on his application. 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] Valentin Alekseyevich, there are many 
letters in which officers are perplexed as to why the Ministry 
of Defense permits them to conclude contracts only under 
paragraph "a," although other forms of contracts had been 
proclaimed at one time. Air Force Captain A. Andryushkin from 
Pskov Oblast, Captain A. Kochetkov from Maritime Kray and many 
others ask about this. 
  [Yakovlev] The decision on having officers 
conclude contracts only under paragraph "a," part 1, Article 33 
of the Russian Federation Law was made by the Russian Federation 
Minister of Defense based on the right granted him to establish 
forms of contracts and the procedure for concluding them 
(paragraph 6 of Russian Federation Supreme Soviet Decree No 
4983-1 of 19 May 1993 "On Certain Measures Connected With Use of 
the Russian Federation Law On Military Obligation and Military 
Service'"). This was substantiated by the need to maintain a 
proper level of troop strength with the Russian Federation Armed 
Forces reform and a large number of officer reassignments. 
Officers who enter military service from the reserve can 
conclude contracts under paragraphs "b" and "c." 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] We also linked great hopes for 
solving acute social and everyday problems with the Russian 
Federation Law "On the Status of Servicemen," which entered into 
force on 1 January 1993. I recall that entire lines of people 
wishing to purchase pamphlets with this and other legislative 
acts formed in our editorial offices. And what happened? Many 
provisions of this very necessary law are not in effect. 
Moreover, there is talk of revising the others... 
  [Yakovlev] Let us dot the "i's." The main portion 
of provisions of this document, which is really very important 
for strengthening the Armed Forces, succeeded in being 
implemented immediately after it was adopted. Above all this 
concerns norms of pay and allowances and certain other 
supplementary payments. 
  At the same time, it is impossible to disagree with 
servicemen's concern over further delay in putting certain rules 
of this law into effect (transportation privileges, payment of 
monetary compensation at the moment the serviceman and his 
family go on leave, property insurance and so on). It is the 
responsibility of the Russian Federation Government to develop a 
mechanism for implementing these privileges, but necessary 
government decisionmaking has dragged out unjustifiably despite 
the fact that the Ministry of Defense has made proposals on this 
score. 
  The main reason is the extremely difficult economic 
situation 
in the country and absence of finances for implementing the Law 
"On the Status of Servicemen." But the law exists, and any 
arguments contradicting it naturally are not recognized (either 
in military collectives or by military courts at various levels) 
as sufficient for "freezing" established privileges. People ask 
for what is due them, but there is no possibility of satisfying 
their requests. Voluntarily or not, the Russian Federation 
Ministry of Defense ends up in the role of hostage. 
  The situation which has formed in this area cannot last 
indefinitely. Unhealthy sentiments on this score are ripening in 
the troops (fleets). There also is open speculation in the 
example of some not too respectable servicemen (especially among 
young officer graduates of military schools), who figure on 
leaving the Armed Forces in this way with maximum advantage to 
themselves. 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] But is any kind of solution at all 
seen here? 
  [Yakovlev] Several options for solving the problem 
are possible theoretically. 
  The first and most radical one is to legislatively repeal 
privileges which did not come about as unsupported by necessary 
appropriations. It is not hard to predict the consequences of 
such a step: exacerbation of the sociopolitical situation in 
military collectives. Servicemen will consider this as nothing 
other than fraud on the part of the state. The Armed Forces will 
suffer not only moral, but also military-political harm. 
  The second way is for fastest implementation of all rules of 
the law without consideration of the Armed Forces' real economic 
capabilities. That approach outwardly is attractive, but at the 
existing and planned level of financing of defense expenditures 
it will only drive the "disease" inside the body. The Army and 
Navy economy simply will not bear up under this additional load. 
  In my view, the talk today can and must be about phased 
implementation of the law's rules that have not yet been put 
into effect, with specific financing of these measures from the 
federal budget, and this has to be resolved at the legislative 
level. 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] Military service is a special kind of 
state activity. A person in shoulderboards is bound by many 
restrictions and is largely unprotected. Higher pay and 
privileges are called upon to stimulate military service of 
officers and warrant officers and compensate for all possible 
material and moral costs. This is covered by laws, but it is 
different in real life. Officers V. Kozin and V. Raskatov of the 
Tambov garrison and others write that this hits the prestige of 
military service hard and prompts young officers to "flee" to 
"civilian life." How great is this outflow? 
  [Yakovlev] Yes, servicemen's insufficient social 
protection and comparatively low standard of living contribute 
to a drop in prestige of service and to disillusionment of a 
considerable portion of the youth in selecting a military 
profession. As a result there is a drop in Armed Forces manning 
and a continued outflow of young officers from the Army. More 
have begun to be discharged both among those who are rather 
experienced but who have lost prospects in service and among 
those from 31 to 40 years of age needed in the Army and Navy. 
  As a result, military service as a special kind of activity 
is not the most prestigious profession today. Let us take a 
civil aviation pilot and military pilot for comparison. Both 
experience similar mental stresses and have identically high 
responsibility, but the aircraft commander at Sheremetyevo-2 
receives up to 3 million rubles a month, while an aircraft 
commander who is a major and a first class pilot with 15 years 
or more service receives approximately 400,000 rubles, i.e., 5-6 
times less. 
  This is just one example, but many can be found, and the 
comparisons will not favor servicemen. It is not surprising that 
competition for military educational institutions continues to 
fall. In 1992 it was 1.6 persons per slot and in 1993 it is 
already 1.4, and that is for schools providing free education in 
specialties that are in short supply under civilian conditions. 
This trend is most noticeable in Air Force and Navy military 
educational institutions, where competition essentially was 
absent in 1993. As a result the schools are forced to accept 
civilians who are on the borderline of professional suitability. 
  A trend also has become apparent toward an increased number 
of cadets expelled immediately before signing a contract. The 
basic reason is lack of desire to learn and disillusionment in 
choice of a military profession. Over 50 percent of all cadets 
who have left school have been expelled from military 
educational institutions for these reasons. 
  In this situation, further delay in placing into effect even 
a portion of privileges proclaimed by law can lead unavoidably 
to a final fall in prestige of military service, which will not 
enable manning the Army and Navy to the extent which permits 
keeping combat readiness at the proper level. 
  In conclusion I will emphasize that there has to be a 
precisely adjusted, long-range social policy with respect to the 
Army. Only this will permit removing many acute questions which 
KRASNAYA ZVEZDA readers ask. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46533 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Servicemen's Welfare Group Says 25-30 Soldiers Die Daily </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Servicemen's Welfare Group Says 25-30 Soldiers Die Daily </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   LD1206151094 Moscow INTERFAX in English 1443 GMT 12 Jun 94 </F>
<F P=103> LD1206151094 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow INTERFAX </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] A serviceman dies in the Russian Army every hour, 
Anatoliy Alexeyev, chairman of the International Committee of 
Defending the Rights of Servicemen and Their Families told 
Interfax. He said that 25 to 30 soldiers and officers died daily. 
  According to the Defense Ministry, over 2500 people died in 
the Russian Army but the committee believed that the real figure 
was at least twice that. 
  A 19,000 rubles, about 9.5 dollars, pension is paid for a 
soldier who died in the line of duty but only to parents who are 
older than 50. No pension is paid to the family of an officer. 
  Alexeyev said that the military prosecution office had not 
opened a single case against commanding officers of the units 
where soldiers were killed. No investigation of a death of 
servicemen in the times of peace has been brought to a 
conclusion. 
  He also said that the human rights of servicemen and 
draftees 
were continuously infringed on. In particular, numerous youths 
whose weight was below the norm and who could not therefore be 
legally drafted were forcibly held in recruiting offices and fed 
until their weight was brought up to the norm and then sent to 
the Army. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46534 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMED FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lopatin Analyzes History, Results of Military Reductions </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Lopatin Analyzes History, Results of Military Reductions </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0428A Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA in Russian 26 
May 94 pp 1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0428A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Lopatin under rubric </F>
"Nongovernmental Report": "A Professional Army Instead of an 
Armed People"] 
  [Text] In May 1994 it was two years from the day the 
Russian Armed Forces were formed. All this time the Russian 
military headed by P. Grachev have been saying over and over 
again that a combat-effective Army is being created from the 
Soviet Armed Forces rear which Russia inherited, and that is why 
there are so many shortcomings and problems. They say that the 
Army is being reduced, but to defend the enormous expanse the 
numerical strength of the Armed Forces should be not one percent 
of the population as provided by law, but 2.1 million 
servicemen. The say that a reduction in officers costs 
enormously more than their pay and that the problem of Armed 
Forces manpower acquisition is "one of the weakest points of 
military organizational development" and consequently it is 
necessary to keep the draft until the year 2000, placing all 
persons of draft age "under arms." Finally, they say that what 
"previously was worked out and implemented over many years" has 
been done in the Army in two years. Is this so? 
<H8>  Transferring Instead of Scrapping </H8>
  According to USSR Ministry of Defense data, after 
disintegration of the USSR there were over two million 
servicemen on the territory of Russia as of 1 January 1992 out 
of a Union Army of three million, including 575,000 officers and 
280,000 warrant officers, 80 percent of nuclear weapons, over 
60,000 pieces of armored equipment, around 60,000 artillery 
tubes, 6,000 combat aircraft and helicopters, over 500 combatant 
ships and 70 percent of supplies. On the territory of Russia 
there also remained 813 of the main enterprises of the 
military-industrial complex, supplying 80 percent of arms and 
military equipment to the USSR (the annual output was over 400 
aircraft and helicopters, around 500 tanks, over 500 artillery 
systems, over 20 combatant ships, around 400 missiles and 25 
space vehicles). 
  In the following two years Russia gradually increased its 
military potential by subordinating to itself groups of forces 
abroad and troops on the territory of a number of former Union 
republics (Georgia, Armenia, Belorussia, Moldavia, Tajikistan, 
Kirgizia...). During 1992-1993 270,000 servicemen, 3,100 tanks, 
6,000 BMP's and 1,500 aircraft were removed to Russian 
Federation territory from the far and near abroad. 
  In essence there was a gradual transfer of the Union Army 
together with the military department from certain hands to 
others (initially unified USSR Armed Forces, then combined CIS 
Armed Forces, and finally Russian Federation Armed Forces). That 
is how it always has been in world practice: with a change in 
state leadership, the army has been resubordinated by the 
traditional method--the military leadership was bought (or 
bribed), concessions were made in the form of partial reforms or 
the promise of them for the lower Army strata, and the oath was 
administered to military units, with actions by enemies of the 
new authority suppressed. That was how it was this time as well. 
The exceptional experience of the Bolsheviks, who created the 
Red Army through a scrapping of the old one, was not repeated. 
Thus, the Russian Armed Forces were formed by changing uniform 
and name, with resubordination and maximum preservation of the 
Union Army. 
<H8>  Preservation Instead of Reduction </H8>
  In 1850 it wa believed that one million soldiers were 
sufficient to defend all European countries. A half-century 
later, in 1900, the numerical strength of standing armies had 
been brought to three million. Toward the end of the 20th 
century there are 25 million persons under arms in the world 
(including around 8 million in Europe, 3 million in the Near 
East, around 10 million in Asia, 3.5 million in America and 1 
million in Africa). 
  In Russia the numerical strength of the standing army also 
rose: in 1725 there were 210,000 in the regular Army, 28,000 in 
the Navy, and 100,000 Cossacks; in 1913 there were 1.35 million, 
including over 1,700 generals and 150,000 officers. 
  After disbanding the Russian Army of 10 million in a few 
months in 1917, the Bolsheviks subsequently introduced the 
practice of sharp reductions in the Army, which repeatedly led 
to social shocks both in the Army as well as in society: 

  -  1922-1923--Army reduced from 5.5 million to 562,000; 
  -  1945-1947--8.5 million demobilized (2.8 million remained); 
  -  1953-1955--1.1 million, including 119,000 officers, 
discharged 
because of reduction; 
  -  1956-1958--a reduction of 600,000, including over 100,000 
officers. 


    With the beginning of perestroyka in the USSR, the reduction 
in the Army proceeded basically through a decrease in the 
authorized strength of servicemen, which greatly exceeded their 
actual number: 

  -  1989-1990--from 4.2 to 3.7 million, including 100,000 
officers and 50,000 warrant officers; 
  -  1991--by 700,000, including 150,000 officers and 90,000 
warrant 
officers, with a shortage of 660,000 persons in the USSR Armed 
Forces. 


    Thus, in the Soviet period a reduction in the Armed Forces 
as 
a rule took place in 1-2 years, and at the proposal of the 
military department itself, but without a program being 
developed to settle servicemen being discharged to the reserve. 
This was explained either as a transition from war to peace, or 
as a reduction in those who even so already had served the 
prescribed terms, or simply as a reduction in "dead souls" from 
the shortage of personnel, or as a "reduction" through removal 
of troops from the Armed Forces makeup (1989--Railroad Troops, 
MVD Internal Security Forces, KGB Border Guard Troops; 
1991--Civil Defense troops and road construction units; 
1994--according to the plan, "peacemaking forces" and the 
Airborne Troops. 
  In January 1992 B. Yeltsin announced a reduction in the 
Armed 
Forces of 700,000 persons from their actual number. In September 
of that same year the Russian Federation Law "On Defense" 
established that by 1 January 1995 "the actual number of Russian 
Federation servicemen in the peacetime Russian Federation Armed 
Forces cannot exceed one percent of the Russian Federation 
population," i.e., in 2.5 years there was to be a reduction of 
another half-million in the size of the Army. The military 
department committed itself to preparing a program for the Armed 
Forces reduction. 
  But in February 1993 the Russian Federation Minister of 
Defense announced, and the Russian Federation President 
confirmed then as well, an authorized strength of Russian 
Federation Armed Forces of 3.5 million, including 2,218 
generals, 692,000 officers, and 2.8 million privates and NCO's, 
with an actual numerical strength of 1.8 million servicemen. A 
half-year later Grachev announced the authorized strength of the 
Armed Forces already as 2.34 million with an actual strength of 
around 1.5 million, although, as we know, nowhere did anyone 
announce a reduction of 1.2 million in the Army during this 
period. The state program for Armed Forces reduction just had 
not been prepared, but on the other hand the task of "reducing 
the Armed Forces to the prescribed level" according to basic 
provisions of military doctrine had been postponed for a year 
(until 1996), and the Armed Forces numerical level itself, 
established by law, was arbitrarily raised by Grachev from 1.5 
to 2.1 million. While he had declared repeatedly in 1993 that 
the Army had to be "small and completely professional" and the 
numerical strength of the Armed Forces, as specified by the Law 
"On Defense", would be brought to 1.5 million, in 1994, 
admitting that the Armed Forces were only at 54 percent strength 
in privates and NCO's, he nevertheless asserts that we need an 
Army of two million, but a reduction in the Armed Forces is 
possible in 1994 by 200,000 and in 1995 by another 200,000. For 
the umpteenth time he explains his position by the need to 
defend the homeland and by the threat of social shocks, although 
the task of reducing an Army of 1.5 million by increasing it by 
400,000-600,000 persons does not lend itself to understanding. 
  One might ask why such sly statistics are necessary. They 
permit the following: 

  -  preserve over 150 formations and the entire gigantic 
superstructure above them (hence the 7 to 50 percent personnel 
strength of units, by which an attempt is made to patch 
"Trishka's caftan" of combat readiness [from a Krylov fable, 
meaning that fixing one thing results in damaging another]; and 
substantiate the need for 2,500 generals and greater 
expenditures for Army upkeep; 
  -  preserve the existing military system, including universal 
military obligation, and not hasten with military reform; 
  -  announce, if necessary, another "peaceful" initiative in 
reducing the Armed Forces. 


    That is how it was under M. Gorbachev, and that is how it is 
under Yeltsin. As a result, with an Armed Forces reduction of 
2.7 million announced over the last five years, the overall 
number of those under arms in Russia's 16 departments remained 
practically the same--3.5 million. But even if everyone who 
reaches the age of 18 (in Russia this is around one million 
persons annually) were to be placed under arms, as Grachev 
wishes to do, even then one could not reach the level announced 
by our generals in the interests, of course, of "ensuring 
Russia's security." 
<H8>  What Does History Teach? </H8>
  As follows from the unclassified report which the USSR 
submitted to the League of Nations in April 1931, the numerical 
strength of servicemen in the USSR as of 1 January 1931 was 
562,000 in the Armed Forces, including 38,000 command personnel; 
28,000 in the Border Guard Troops; and 17,000 in OGPU [United 
State Political Directorate] Internal Security Forces. 
  At that time 1.2 million persons reached draft age annually, 
of whom 300,000-350,000 were not physically fit. The principle 
of an "armed people" professed by Napoleon and von Moltke, who 
even intended to provide the Army as the teacher of their 
nations by passing all people through the barracks, required 
teaching military affairs to 900,000 persons annually. But with 
a two-year term of service it was possible to pass only 270,000 
temporary duty personnel through the RKKA [Workers' and 
Peasants' Red Army] and other troops. It was necessary either to 
increase the Army to 1.7 million or combine a regular army with 
a militia system (a regular division passed 1,900 persons 
through a year and a territorial division 3,500, with 
expenditures for training one fighting man being R535 in 2 years 
and R291 in 5 years respectively). With the economic and 
political isolation of the USSR, which did not possess nuclear 
weapons, the second path was chosen as being most economical and 
effective. The situation has changed fundamentally under present 
conditions, as follows from Russian Federation military 
doctrine. First of all, "the immediate threat of direct 
aggression being unleashed against the Russian Federation has 
dropped considerably" and Russia "does not regard a single state 
as its enemy," considering "as partners all states whose policy 
does not harm its interests and does not contradict the UN 
Charter." Secondly, traditional Armed Forces have a tertiary 
significance as a deterrence factor in ensuring military 
security after nonmilitary means and nuclear weapons, first use 
of which we rightly rejected. Thirdly, the Russian Federation 
ensures its security through entry into or cooperation with 
collective security structures. And finally, an overall 
reduction of armed forces and military expenditures is occurring 
in the world. 
  The country's economic capacities changed substantially 
simultaneously with this: 

  -  Russia's territory and its population and draft resources 
are less than in the USSR by one-third and one-half 
respectively; 
  -  gross domestic product [GDP] for 1992-1993 dropped 30 percent 
along with a growth in domestic debt and the budget deficit; 
  -  over 40 million Russians were below the subsistence minimum 
in 
1994. 


    The situation has changed, but we continue to try to fit the 
practice of military organizational development to the theory of 
"massive war" and an "armed people." Speaking recently in the 
State Duma to substantiate increased military expenditures, 
Chief of Russian Federation Armed Forces General Staff Colonel 
General M. Kolesnikov asserted that "armed conflict will require 
a mass army four times larger than the present one" and that 
today we cannot fight for four years in a row as during World 
War II. Having 30 million persons on military registration, of 
whom 6 million are the top-priority reserve, we continue to try 
to place all youth under arms, sending one-third of draftees to 
"other troops" to perform duty--Border Guard Troops (150,000), 
Internal Security Forces (around 400,000), and Railroad, Road 
Construction and other troops (in 15 departments in all), 
including troops under joint-stock companies (such as 
Rostelekom, Dalspetsstroy and so on), which altogether 
contradicts the Russian Federation Constitution. 
  The demand is not to increase the number of privates, but to 
reduce the number of supervisory personnel with a change in the 
table of organization structure by reducing the number of highly 
paid general and officer positions and increasing the proportion 
of NCO's and civilian personnel. But only 10 of the 115 military 
educational institutions on the territory of Russia with an 
annual graduation of 37,000 officers have been reduced in two 
years. As before, up to 30,000 young officers are graduated each 
year with a simultaneous increase in monetary allowance for 
cadets to R130,000 per month. 
  It would appear that neither world experience nor our own 
history teaches us anything. In Czarist Russia before World War 
I only 26 cadet schools and 38 warrant officer schools were 
training commanders for an army of 1.5 million, with an annual 
graduation of 3,000 officers and 19,000 warrant officers. In the 
summer of 1941 there were 1.3 million officers in a Red Army of 
10 million, while by the end of 1941 Germany had only 148,000 
officers at all fronts, of whom only 23,000 were regular. In 
1941 both Russia and Germany were relying on NCO's--professional 
junior commanders. In the world practice of military 
organizational development today, the norm for states with a 
highly developed economy is a ratio in which 0.05 percent are 
generals, 10-15 percent officers, and 35 percent junior 
commanders, with an overall numerical strength of servicemen not 
exceeding 0.7-0.8 percent of the country's population and with 
the proportion of military expenditures at 3-4 percent of GDP. 
For Russia this would mean having the numerical strength of the 
Armed Forces at one million, including up to 700 generals, up to 
200,000 officers and up to 350,000 junior commanders. 
<H8>  `Be, Rather Than Appear To Be' </H8>
  These parting words left for the German General Staff by A. 
von Schlieffen seemingly acquire special pertinence in our 
Russian reality. 
  On the one hand, Russian generals record and the Russian 
Federation President approves among basic provisions of military 
doctrine such principles of ensuring military security in the 
Russian Federation as "conformity of Armed Forces organizational 
development to the country's political goals and economic 
capacities and to the course of reforms," and "use of domestic 
and world experience in military organizational development." 
  On the other hand, with growing military expenditures, the 
practice of military organizational development does not conform 
to the country's political goals and economic capacities. 
Dissipation of allocated forces and assets to a large number of 
formations and units, an absence of interest in service among 
officers, massive draft dodging among civilian youth, and 
"commercialization" of service all lead to decay of the Army. As 
a result there is neither money nor an Army. 
  This is occurring because, using military reform as a cover 
and speculating on problems of servicemen and workers of the 
military-industrial complex, state and military bureaucrats 
demand increased expenditures not for transformations, but for 
preserving the previous system, partially canceling the 
dissatisfaction of its representatives through increased pay. 
This enables keeping the military-bureaucratic apparatus at the 
previous size and permits its uncontrolled use of sources of 
incomes in the military department for their personal goals. 
  Only through military reform is it possible to obtain a 
combat-effective army with a real and inevitable reduction of 
military expenditures. The goals proclaimed in Russia of 
building a democratic, rule-of-law state and civilian society 
demand a decisive rejection of the practice of mass education of 
society through the Army, general militarization of citizens, 
and militarization of their labor. A professional army of one 
million on a volunteer basis must come to replace the "armed 
people," with introduction of alternative (civilian) service and 
with retention of service by conscription only in wartime. Today 
every third state in the world has a fully professional army on 
a volunteer basis, including the United States, Great Britain, 
Canada, Japan, India, Pakistan and Australia. 
  How can we shift to a professional army with fewest losses 
and costs, in the shortest time and with greatest effectiveness? 
  An optimum solution to this problem requires fulfilling the 
following basic conditions: 
  1. If we immediately recognize the actual numerical strength 
of the Armed Forces to be authorized and plan military 
expenditures, withdrawal of troops, real reduction and military 
reform on this basis. 
  2. If we cut the number of units and formations in half and 
man the rest with the freed-up personnel (1994-1995). 
  3. If we change the ratio of branches of Armed Forces 
through 
a significant reduction in the proportion of ground troops and 
air defense and shift to Armed Forces organizational development 
based on missions (1994-1995). 
  4. If we reduce military schools (by 40-70 percent for 
branches of the Armed Forces) and military academies (leave one 
per branch) and bring the annual graduation of officers to 
10,000 (1994-199(5)). 
  5. If we reduce the size of command and control entities 
(above all at the expense of the intermediate level) with a 
threefold reduction in the number of generals' positions and 
with the granting of pensions and of the benefits prescribed by 
law (1994). 
  6. If we reduce the number of officer positions, with the 
discharge (at their wish) of those who have served the 
prescribed terms, with presentation of an opportunity to fill 
previous positions in administrative management entities and 
logistic, medical and financial support entities, positions of 
technical specialists and positions in military science with 
civilian personnel, and with the discharge and settling of the 
remaining portion of officers under a reduction (1994-1998). 
  7. If we reduce the number of positions filled by warrant 
officers (by 80-90 percent), with the right granted to fill a 
number of previous positions by civilian personnel 
(storekeepers, chiefs of depots, storehouses and messhalls, and 
so on) and positions of junior commanders, with nonextension of 
contract with persons who have not been certified (1994-1996). 
  8. If we revise the time periods, conditions and curriculum 
for training junior commanders based on a number of military 
schools being reduced, bringing in servicemen from among cadets 
and warrant officers, and increasing the prestige of their 
service (1994-1995). 
  9. If we carry out the reduction and certification of 
cadets, 
warrant officers, officers and generals for further service 
through competitive professional selection, with mandatory 
reorganization and professionalization of military cadre 
entities and with greater rights granted to servicemen's 
assemblies (1994-1996). 
  10. If we revise the conditions, time periods for going over 
to contract service, and content of the contract (not only 
obligations of the serviceman, but also responsibility of the 
state is necessary), with priority conclusion of contracts (for 
2-5 years) with officers and persons certified for positions of 
junior commanders and of technical specialists in combat teams 
and crews (1994-1995). 
  Fulfillment of these ten "if's," which define the concept of 
transition to a professional Army through a structural reduction 
in the Armed Forces, will permit having a professional army in 
Russia already in this century. 
  A professional army is not an end in itself. 
  Transition to a volunteer method of manpower acquisition and 
to contract service permits resolving problems and tasks which 
are difficult to resolve under the present system of military 
organization: 

  -  preserve combat effectiveness and increase combat 
readiness of the Armed Forces with a reduction in their 
numerical strength; 
  -  perform selection and manpower acquisition based on strict 
competition with increased demands on candidates instead of 
registration without competition and mass call-up; 
  -  relieve officers of performing duties of junior commanders 
and 
privates, and relieve the Army of the function of a "cheap labor 
force"; 
  -  ensure high professionalism through an interest in service 
and 
responsibility of both parties to the contract (both the 
civilian and the command element); 
  -  lower the number of 
accidents, breakdowns and crashes and increase the operating 
life of equipment, reducing the volume of military orders for 
its production; 
  -  substantially reduce the number of instances of loss and 
injury 
among personnel, eliminate causes of "dedovshchina" and elevate 
the level of military discipline; 
  -  free up additional working hands for the country's national 
economy (by reduction and non-call-up) and also free up real 
estate, equipment and property in the Armed Forces, which in 
other countries led to an increase in GDP and full compensation 
for additional expenditures for transition to a professional 
army; 
  -  ensure stability of the Army in an unstable society, and 
prestige of military service amidst strong anti-Army sentiments 
among draft-age youth and their parents. 


    In agreeing with the Russian Federation President's 
statement 
that "the military department does not reform itself," it is 
evidently necessary to examine this matter in the Security 
Council, in the Federal Assembly, and in society, creating a 
Committee for Assistance to Military Reform in the Russian 
Federation based on results of the discussion. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46535 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Political Postponement of Peacekeeping Exercise Possible </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Political Postponement of Peacekeeping Exercise Possible </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0456A Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian No 102, 2 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0456A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SEGODNYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Pavel Felgengauer, under rubric "Partnership": </F>
"Conflict in the Atlantic: Politicians Cannot Resolve the Fate 
of Russo-American Exercises"] 
  [Text] In the summer of 1994 the U.S. 3rd Infantry Division 
and the 27th Russian Motorized Rifle Division were supposed to 
have acted jointly to stop a "conflict on the island of 
Atlantida [the Atlantic]," where the inhabitants of two states 
(the "agrarian" one and the "industrial" one) had come to grips 
because of disputed territory. It had been proposed to find 
"Atlantida" on the territory of the vast Totskiy Firing Range in 
the Southern Urals. 
  But in April the Duma enacted a special decree, "proposing" 
to President Yeltsin that he cancel or transfer abroad the joint 
peacekeeping Russo-American exercises. On the threshold of 
signing the Treaty of Public Consent, the president shared the 
fears of the Duma members and ordered the interested departments 
to reconsider the need for the exercises and the time for 
holding them. 
  However, among the country's highest military leadership the 
politicians' actions caused irritation. If the peacekeeping 
exercises at the Totskiy Firing Range actually threaten Russia's 
national interests, then, as a result, the Russian generals who 
agreed to conducting the exercise automatically fall into the 
category of traitors. And, naturally, the generals did not like 
that. 
  In the discussion concerning the Totskiy exercises, Russia's 
higher and higher military leadership acted as a single front. 
Defense Minister General Pavel Grachev: "The attempt is being 
made to disrupt the peacekeeping exercises, but if we want to 
remove the image of the enemy and to proceed toward partnership, 
the exercises must be conducted." Chief of General Staff General 
Kolesnikov: "Public opinion is being specially heated up by 
people who do not know, or who pretend not to know, what a 
command post exercise is." 
  However, the influence of the Ministry of Defense in the 
Duma, the Kremlin, and the White House is limited. Therefore no 
one has yet made any intelligible decision concerning whether to 
conduct the exercises, and, if so, where and when. The American 
partners are also perplexed. Last week 3rd Division commander 
General Holder was supposed to arrive in Moscow (with a 
delegation), in order to carry out the final coordination of the 
exercise details, but our military men were forced to "recommend 
the cancellation of the trip," inasmuch as, properly speaking, 
there was not yet anything to coordinate. 
  On 27 May General Schroeder, deputy commander of U.S. troops 
in Europe and the chief coordinator of the exercises on the 
American side, met on his own initiative with Colonel-General 
Eduard Vorobyev, who is responsible for the exercises on the 
Russian side, in the hope of ascertaining at least something 
definite. But General Vorobyev was able only to express the hope 
that the exercises would indeed by held, perhaps even in 
August-September of this year. In the autumn or winter it will 
be difficult for American infantry to survive in Totskiy. In the 
opinion of the military, 15 September is the extreme date for 
holding exercises in 1994. At the same time the proposal to 
conduct Russo-American exercises in the United States or on 
neutral territory will, obviously, be "brought down" in one form 
or another. Our generals will scarcely agree to expend the 
limited funds in the defense budget to transfer troops to 
conduct a symbolic operation. 
  During the next few weeks Russian politicians will have to 
make the final decision about whether or not to hold the 
exercises this summer. Incidentally, an official representative 
of the U. S. Defense Department expressed to a SEGODNYA 
correspondent his satisfaction with the work that has already 
been done: in the course of preparation for the exercises, the 
military of the two countries have been able to prepare a joint 
manual for the holding of peacekeeping operations, which may 
prove to be useful in the future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46536 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Calls To Cut Military Funding Assailed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Calls To Cut Military Funding Assailed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0806131794 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 8 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> PM0806131794 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Maryukha: "Social Protection for the </F>
Military Is Primarily Necessary To Protect Russia's Interests"] 
  [Text] While the military budget is being "shaken up" in 
an attempt to save 18 trillion [rubles] at the Army's expense 
the mass media are raking up fusty arguments and saying that "we 
are all hostages of the military-industrial complex." Even the 
government's ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA, lobbying for a reduction in 
defense spending, writes about the "occupation regime of the 
Russian military-industrial complex." And says that there is no 
need to intimidate people with the sociopolitical consequences 
of underfunding of the defense sphere since that is just a case 
of shenanigans on the part of "military-industrial complex 
bigwigs" and generals opposed to army reform. 
  The unprecedentedly involved "case of the 18 trillion on 
defense," where everyone seems to be "in favor" and there is 
still no money for the military, by no means constitutes an 
attack by military-industrial complex hawks on the limited state 
budget. The minimum figure requested by the Defense Ministry 
has been decided in accordance with the following principle: 
"Think about the Motherland first and then about yourselves." 
Therefore the list of defense spending that has been submitted 
for ratification is a balanced combination of spending on 
maintaining the troops' combat capability ("undiluted" state 
interest, so to speak) and on social protection for servicemen, 
which -- albeit indirectly -- also affects the state's defense 
capability. Thus the argument over whether or not to provide 
the money has long since changed from being a financial 
"wrangle" to being the subject of political speculation that may 
explode the situation around and within the Army. 
  However, these "explosions" are already regrettably becoming 
a reality instead of just projections. In particular, an acute 
conflict situation has arisen among the Northern Fleet's 
military construction workers. A kind of protest action akin to 
a strike has even been held here. Needless to say, that is 
quite intolerable in army conditions. Although the demands do 
not go beyond what they were promised by the state -- the 
military are asking for their debts to be repaid. Yet the state 
owes money not only to the men of the Northern Fleet and not 
only for pay, which is commonly paid two or three months late in 
the Army and the Navy. 
  When this edition has been signed to press, the State Duma 
will start discussing the question of social guarantees for 
servicemen. It is not worth speculating how the discussion will 
go, whether the State Duma's Defense Committee will succeed in 
persuading the government and deputies that playing financial 
games with the Army is intolerable, just as it is intolerable to 
reduce its standard of living below the lower limit beyond which 
chaos sets in. It is better to turn once again to the facts and 
figures, which, incidentally, were collected by parliamentarians 
themselves at the Northern Fleet. This trip took place in 
mid-May, but since then there has been no change for the better 
and the Duma has not had time to examine the submitted 
documents. However, the report sent to State Duma Chairman Ivan 
Rybkin and addressed to all deputies deals with not so much the 
military aspect of the Northern Fleet's problems, on which 
servicemen themselves usually focus, as the social aspect. And 
this is even more dispiriting than the situation as regards 
combat training or shipments of new arms and manning of units. 
  Thus, as of 1 March just 40.5 percent of the required sum 
had 
been allocated for the upkeep of the Northern Fleet as a whole. 
At the same time there are now 1,487 families without 
apartments in the Northern Fleet, and the number of such 
families will rise while the number of apartments in the fleet's 
housing stock will drop owing to the impossibility of evicting 
people discharged into the reserve from closed garrisons. 
Around 2,500 families will lose their ties with the Navy this 
year and they are to be allocated, in line with current 
legislation, money to build housing outside garrisons. Nor is 
there enough money to look after those who are serving. The 
money allocated last year was barely enough to build just 242 
apartments, of which Northern Fleet servicemen have only 
received 169. 
  Or take medical support. Navy garrisons have half as many 
medics as the Murmansk Oblast average. Things are even worse 
with regard to hospitals and the prevention of disease among 
children. Some 90 percent of children under 16 have been 
deprived of the triple course of multivitamin treatment 
prescribed for polar regions, and naval families are beset by 
illnesses that are unthinkable for children of this age -- 
anemia, diabetes. Over a third of schoolchildren study on a 
second shift -- there is barely 50 percent of the required 
number of schools -- and sometimes classes are held in unfit 
buildings. Thus we are not even talking about the military 
themselves, who are accustomed to "burdens and privations"; the 
trillions, if they appear on a platter, will be used to revive 
Russia's gene pool. And for the social readjustment of the 
quite able-bodied citizens who have been discharged from the 
service. And to implement articles of laws that have been 
announced but are not in force, thus undermining faith in the 
foundations of the state. 
  Regrettably, judging by the way in which the holey blanket 
of 
the state budget is being "pulled" this way and that, you have 
to see all this for yourself, wear uniform, and serve the 
Fatherland not out of fear but out of conscience in order to 
realize that the Army is not asking for anything unnecessary. 
It needs firm social guarantees with financial backup rather 
than laments that everyone is having a hard time of it today. 
The requested minimum sum will not ensure that servicemen have 
an easy life, it only guarantees Russia's security, for which 
men in uniform are accountable. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46537 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Government Underfunding of Army Scored </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Government Underfunding of Army Scored </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM1006101194 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 9 Jun 94 pp 
1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM1006101194 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Vladimir Yermolin report: "Army Needs Worthy Budget"] </F>
  [Text] The State Duma Defense Committee conducted hearings 
Tuesday on "The Social Protection of Servicemen, Persons 
Discharged From Military Service, and Members of Their Families. 
Housing for the Army. Status, Problems, and Ways of Finding 
Solutions." 
  It seems unnecessary to spell out to our readers, 
servicemen, 
and military pensioners the reasons for which parliamentarians 
are turning their attention to this theme. I will just mention 
two aspects. First, the Russian Federation Government sent to 
the State Duma for examination a draft law stipulating the 
removal from existing legislation of a whole series of benefits 
for servicemen and their families. Second, the hearings were a 
last-ditch attempt somehow to exert influence primarily on the 
Russian Federation Government on the eve of the repeat 
discussion in the Duma of the draft law on the 1994 Federal 
Budget, in which, as we know, defense spending was cut by at 
least 18 trillion rubles [R]. And without the required sum of 
R55 trillion, how can we talk about the social protection of 
servicemen? 
  First to outline their stances during the hearings were the 
Defense Ministry (Deputy Minister Colonel General Valeriy 
Mironov), and the Ministry of Finance (Sergey Kondrashov, deputy 
leader of Finance Ministry Department for the Defense Complex). 
<H5>  Defense Ministry: Over 75 Percent of Officers' Families </H5>
Have Incomes Below the Minimum Living Wage 
  It has to be recognized that in recent years the country's 
leadership has demonstrated on several occasions its good 
intentions in respect of servicemen. Over 40 edicts, decrees, 
laws, and other legal acts have been issued which in one way or 
another protect the military and their nearest and dearest. 
There have also been state programs for housing construction, 
and for resettling and catering for troops withdrawn from 
abroad. And, finally, there are the basic guidelines for the 
Russian Federation Government activity on social policy for 
1994, where, again in black and white, there is mention of the 
need to implement all (legislation-backed!) servicemen's rights. 
So what has the Army got as a result? I will cite Col. Gen. 
Valeriy Mironov (but, rest assured, hot on the heels of the 
deputy minister these words will be repeated to us at any 
Russian barracks): "There is a lack of decisions by the Russian 
Federation Government on implementing a number of paragraphs in 
the Russian Federation Law `On the Status of Servicemen,' the 
level of pay is extremely low, the number of homeless is rising, 
and psychological and physical overload owing to a shortage of 
manpower is on the increase." The quick-fire retort -- it's all 
been proclaimed, but it is not being implemented in practice: 
Namely, the right to a place of residence in any populated area 
of the country following discharge, the procedure for offering 
servicemen and their families accommodations following 
discharge, state insurance for servicemen, free shipment of a 
serviceman's personal property when transferring to a new 
service location.... 
  A brief word on pay. Frankly, everything that needs to be 
said was said in the subhead -- just one in four families keeps 
its head above the poverty line. Is it really necessary to 
paint a vivid picture of officer life, the domestic existence of 
officer families, in order to depict precisely what this means? 
So much has been said about this already! To all appearances, 
in a country where the majority of the population only just 
makes ends meet, people are no longer shocked by the notion of a 
poverty-stricken officer. By way of an example, Col. Gen. 
Mironov cited the case of a worker with the most lowly 
qualifications at the Volga Motor Vehicle Plant [VAZ] who earns 
R1.5 million. It emerges that a first category military pilot 
would be better off nowadays resigning and going off to sweep up 
metal filings in a VAZ workshop. And, indeed, this is what they 
are doing. Most of them are men under 30, and generally the 
most promising, energetic, and intelligent officers. 
  Accommodations are altogether a sore point. But particularly 
for those discharged into the reserves. For the latter, the 
program for providing accommodations in 1993 was only fulfilled 
to a level of 15 percent. For those still in service, somewhere 
in the region of 80 percent of what was planned was constructed. 
This figure altogether knocks you off your feet. But the 
thrust is one and the same: The volume of housing construction 
is declining. The deputy defense minister said simply: Today, 
the ministry has no opportunity to implement the government's 
decrees "On Granting Russian Federation Citizens in Need of 
Improved Accommodations Nonreturnable Subsidies To Construct or 
Acquire Housing," and "On Measures for the Social Protection of 
the Population Living in Closed Territorial-Administrative 
Formations." And there is no mention at all of implementing 
state programs -- at best, this aspect will hold its ground at 
last year's level. 
  But you can go on analyzing the situation until you are blue 
in the face, and you can go on recounting disaster after 
disaster, but it all boils down to one thing: What is needed is 
money. And there is none. 
<H5>  Ministry of Finance: The State's Economy Will Not Stretch </H5>
to a Defense Budget of R55 Trillion 
  However, in the opinion of Finance Ministry spokesman Sergey 
Kondrashov, the problem is one of how to "stretch" a defense 
budget albeit of just R37 trillion. As of today, the defense 
budget in the first five months of 1994 was financed to a level 
of just 77.1 percent. Let's think about this: While we argue 
over the missing R18 trillion, while statesmen strike sparks in 
heated debates, and we, here below, keep an eye on the battle of 
the titans in the hope that they do not deal the final blow to 
the Army -- all this time, the Armed Forces have been living for 
almost six months with this same financial noose, some R37 
trillion in length, around its neck. Yet even this measly 37 
trillion is not forthcoming, which is why the noose around the 
Army's neck is growing even tighter. It turns out that the whole 
debate surrounding the defense budget is purely theoretical: 
For economists from various schools, it is an opportunity to 
make a brilliant display of their erudition; for the deputies, 
it is a chance to perfect their debating skills; and for the 
politicians, it is a chance to score points in the eyes of 
gullible "soldier boys".... 
  So what is going on -- is it all villainy on the part of the 
Ministry of Finance? For those who prefer independent analysis, 
I will cite the following information for perusal: First, 
according to the law presented by the government and adopted by 
the Duma, in the second quarter of 1994 finance will be issued 
at a speed "commensurate with the actual receipt into the 
Federal Budget of taxes and payments"; second, in the first five 
months of this year, 15 (yes, fifteen!) percent of the total 
taxes planned for in the draft annual budget were received into 
the budget. This figure was cited at the hearings by Sergey 
Kondrashov. You can argue the details as much as you like, 
accuse one another of bungling and abuses, and allocate billions 
and trillions on paper, but if the state is unable to collect 
the taxes, and if even at this early stage it is slashing the 
size of projected revenue, then what is the value of any state 
program? What is the value of laws which are not backed by a 
single kopeck? 
  The unfortunate Finance Ministry representative first 
expressed doubts that it might be possible to cram the provision 
of all the Army's social needs into a sum as small (he agrees 
with this) as R37 trillion, and then he expressed doubts over 
the possibility of actually succeeding in scraping together even 
these R37 trillion. The forecast for budget receipts is forcing 
the Finance Ministry to resolve one specific task every month: 
namely, whom to underpay, and by how much. As a result, the 
debt to the military department has already hit 5.7 trillion. 
And so it is that the debt-ridden state in the form of the 
government is beginning to devise ways of offsetting this debt. 
If the trillions in taxation cannot be obtained from the 
commercial structures, then perhaps the pockets of the 
disciplined military can be fleeced? So it is that a law has 
been written which abolishes declared benefits. Pay has been 
frozen. And instead of a suitable food allowance, all they have 
received is compensation equal to one minimum wage. Indeed, the 
government has accumulated quite a lot of these fruitful ideas, 
the main one of which, it emerged, is not only to set a defense 
budget below even the lowest level, but also to underfinance 
even this miserliness. Any increase in pay can only be a pipe 
dream, as all that remains is to beseech the gods that, come 
Judgment Day, the cashier's grills might open. Meanwhile, in 
June the Army will be underpaid by an even greater margin than 
in May. This is what Kondrashov said, and he knows what he is 
talking about. It was also noted that, according to official 
calculations by the Finance Ministry and the Ministry of the 
Economy, the "light at the end of the tunnel" will only start 
glimmering at best at the end of 1995. But life has taught us 
that the wisest thing is to prepare for the worst nevertheless. 
<H5>  A Few Words About `Ways of Resolving...'? </H5>
  The Defense Ministry has drawn up a whole package of draft 
laws for state programs aimed at returning our Armed Forces to 
the worthy place in society befitting their status. Some of 
them have been handed over to the Main Legal Administration 
under the Russian Federation president, and some are already 
with the Russian Federation Government. There are also specific 
proposals from the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of the 
Economy. When it sits on Thursday the Duma Defense Committee 
will probably sum up the results of the hearings and compile its 
program of measures with due account of the sides' proposals. 
All proposals, of course, warrant a more detailed discussion on 
the pages of KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, but it is simply that newspaper 
space is limited. But then it is better to talk about 
intentions once they begin to acquire the form of completed 
documents, ready for specific discussion. 
  I will merely point out that the second part of the hearings 
progressed with the participation of representatives of 
commercial structures who had arrived with businesslike 
proposals on how to get moving on the "accursed" problem of 
housing in the Army. This is a separate topic for discussion. 
But as far as we can we will enlighten our readers about 
certain programs. 
  The idea that the might of the Russian Army will "blossom" 
through national business structures is emerging altogether 
somewhat surreptitiously. The idea is preposterous, of course. 
But then it is painfully disagreeable to think that our Army 
should have to vegetate in the outer darkness without money for 
another two years at least, and maybe even more. Who, then, 
will emerge out of this "limbo" into God's world, and with what? 
A section with a 45-mm gun and one missile? Just as in the 
famous book which reminds us to this day of the glory which we 
have inherited, the wealth of experience of defeat and victory. 
But, as Kondrashov said, the Army will only be able to extract 
itself from this impasse in conjunction with the entire national 
economy. And without harboring illusions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46538 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> STRATEGIC DETERRENT FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   START II Impact on Strategic Forces Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    START II Impact on Strategic Forces Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944D0047A Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 1 Jun 94 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 944D0047A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SEGODNYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lev Volkov with introduction by Pavel </F>
Felgengauer: "START II and the Topol Mobile Intercontinental 
Missiles"] 
  [Text] Lev Volkov is a lieutenant general and former 
chief of the Ministry of Defense Central Research Institute (the 
main institute in the system of the Strategic Missile Forces). 
He is a full member of the International and Russian engineering 
academies and a corresponding member of the Russian Academy of 
Sciences. 
  In the first days of January 1993 and, accordingly, in 
the final days of the presidency of George Bush, the 
Russian-American START II treaty on a reduction in strategic 
offensive arms was signed in Moscow. Many observers were 
astonished at that time at the incomprehensible haste in the 
signing and, most importantly, at the necessity for inviting to 
Moscow a president who had just two weeks of his term to go. 
Boris Yeltsin was probably in urgent need of international 
confirmation of his status following the first major (and 
extremely unsuccessful for the president) clash with parliament 
(Congress of People's Deputies) in December 1992. 
  There arose, naturally, quite widespread suspicions 
that START II was an insufficiently weighed, opportunist 
document that by the year 2003 would have placed Russia in a 
position of strategic inequality. 
  But if START II was signed in a hurry, it had been 
prepared quite thoroughly, and not only by specialists of 
Russia's Ministry of Foreign Affairs but also of the General 
Staff, what is more. "START II is a result of the joint efforts 
of two ministries--Russia's Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the 
Ministry of Defense. Never before have the two departments 
worked so closely and in such a friendly working atmosphere," 
Colonel General Mikhail Kolesnikov, chief of the Russian Army 
General Staff, maintains. The group of experts from the Ministry 
of Defense was headed by General Nikolayev, incidentally, who is 
now commander in chief of border forces and who was at that time 
first deputy chief of the General Staff. 
  The former Supreme Soviet greeted the treaty warily and 
after several hearings postponed ratification to the fall of 
1993 in order never to return to it. Altogether, the treaty 
could not have been considered in earnest, for that matter, 
until the fate of the former Soviet strategic arms in Belarus, 
Kazakhstan, and Ukraine had been decided and until these 
countries had ratified the START I treaty and subscribed to the 
Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty. 
  Now all the preliminary conditions have been more or 
less fulfilled, and the time has come for the ratification of 
START II by the new Federal Assembly. The ratification or 
nonratification will determine for many years to come Russia's 
defense policy and the structure of its strategic nuclear force. 
But, in any event, the old strategic weapons systems added to 
our armory in the 1970's and 1980's will have to be eliminated 
since their service life is coming to an end. As a result, in 
the current Strategic Missile Forces system armory there is only 
one system of ground-based intercontinental ballistic 
missiles--the Topol--that simultaneously corresponds to the 
terms of START II and is sufficiently modern to be able to 
survive (with a certain modernization) until the year 2015. In 
the next year or two the Russian military and political 
leadership will have to choose: either stick with the Topol 
system, as the basis of the future ground-based Strategic 
Missile Forces, or immediately begin the development of another 
prospective intercontinental missile.... 
  "According to open press data, six catastrophes 
accompanied by the sinking of the boats, explosions, and fires, 
the result of which were the loss of nuclear munitions and 
missiles and also the loss of life of personnel, have occurred 
in the course of the operation of several dozen nuclear 
submarines. But no one today is raising the question of 
abandoning the use of strategic nuclear weapons on nuclear 
submarines." 
<H8>  START II </H8>
  Compared with the START I treaty, the START II treaty alters 
the structure of the strategic nuclear force thanks to the 
elimination in the Strategic Missile Forces of missiles with 
multiple reentry vehicles. It is necessary in fulfilling START 
II conditions to have dismantled 675-780 launchers (3,775-3,880 
warheads) by the years 2000-2003 and during this time to have 
created in exchange a grouping of 800-900 single-warhead 
missiles. With regard to the country's actual economic 
situation, it will have been possible, most likely, to deploy 
only 600-700 ground-based ICBM's, that is, in practice we will 
not have assimilated the quota of 3,500 warheads for the 
strategic nuclear force. 
  It would be desirable, therefore, to adjust a number of the 
provisions of START II prior to its ratification: the 
"automatic" termination of the treaty in the event of a 
violation of the provisions of the 1972 ABM Treaty and stricter 
control of the possibility of the return to the grouping of the 
warheads removed in accordance with the treaty from the missiles 
and bombers. 
  In addition, it would be desirable to extend the timeframe 
of 
the reduction in the Strategic Missile Forces to the year 2005, 
which would make it possible to make fuller use of the service 
life of the ICBM's to be destroyed, compensating for the 
insufficient funding of strategic nuclear force development 
programs. This adjustment ensues directly from Russia's economic 
difficulties, but it does not alter the cardinal provisions of 
the program for the development of the Strategic Missile Forces, 
merely shifts the time scale for its realization. 
<H8>  Prospect--Single-Warhead Missiles </H8>
  The treaty between the USSR and the United States limiting 
strategic offensive arms (SALT II), which Leonid Brezhnev and 
Jimmy Carter signed in 1979, determined an overall permissible 
number of delivery systems and also the number of ICBM's with 
multiple reentry vehicles (820). As a result, it was 
advantageous to have in the grouping the maximum permissible 
number of ICBM's with multiple reentry vehicles. 
  START I limited to a considerably greater extent the number 
of weapons compared with the number of delivery systems, which 
determined the prospective nature of an increase in the 
single-warhead part of the grouping. Although according to the 
terms of START I it was possible to preserve some part of the 
ICBM's with multiple reentry vehicles, including 154 heavy 
missiles, the overall limitation on the number of warheads 
compelled increased survivability and an aspiration to the 
single-warhead grouping. After all, the destruction by one 
weapon of an ICBM with 10 warheads pays, and the destruction of 
a single-warhead missile with one weapon is only equivalent 
exchange. 
  Thus the switch to single-warhead ICBM's was the arterial 
direction for the development of the Strategic Missile Forces 
grouping adopted in 1991 together with START I, and the terms of 
START II merely accelerated the timeframe of this switch. 
<H8>  Liquid Fuel </H8>
  The Strategic Missile Forces grouping had as of 1 January 
1993 six classes of ICBM's, including four classes using a 
liquid fuel that is highly toxic and dangerous in 
operation--"heptyl" (asymmetrical dimethyl hydrazine--P.F.)--and 
two classes using compound [smesevoy] solid fuel that is 
nontoxic and considerably safer in operation, including the 
Topol single-warhead mobile missiles. The solid fuel is charged 
under plant conditions, repositories, fuel tanks, and fuel 
supply lines in the line units are not needed, and fuel vapor 
discharges are excluded. Solid fuel may be used for the ICBM's 
in both the fixed- and mobile-basing versions, which affords 
opportunities for standardization, whereas it is dangerous to 
use liquid fuel in mobile missiles. 
  We would mention also that our solid fuel is in a number of 
its specifications superior to the fuel used in the United 
States' ICBM's, and in terms of the energetics of the missiles 
as a whole, the solid-fuel systems are only very negligibly 
inferior to their liquid-fuel counterparts. 
  Thus all program developers have unanimously concluded that 
the prospective Strategic Missile Forces grouping should have 
solid-fuel ICBM's. 
<H8>  ICBM Basing Modes </H8>
  The "Fundamental Provisions of the Russian Federation 
Military Doctrine" define as the purpose of policy in the sphere 
of nuclear weapons: removal of the danger of nuclear war by way 
of deterring the unleashing of aggression against the Russian 
Federation and its allies. They also define the mission of the 
strategic nuclear force: maintaining the composition and status 
of the strategic nuclear force at a level providing for the 
assured infliction of the desired damage on an aggressor under 
any conditions. 
  These doctrinal provisions compel the consideration as the 
main scenario of the use of the strategic nuclear force and the 
Strategic Missile Forces the infliction on an aggressor of 
unacceptable damage in a retaliatory strike, that is, after the 
enemy's ICBM and SLBM warheads have delivered a strike against 
the territory of Russia. 
  In the struggle between launcher protection facilities and 
the accuracy of warhead delivery to target that has gone on for 
several decades, victory for the coming decade goes to the 
accuracy of the missile guidance systems. A MX missile warhead 
delivered to a launch silo with the current degree of protection 
(of the order of 100 kg per square centimeter) would destroy it 
with 0.998 probability, and warheads of the Minuteman-3M ICBM 
and the Trident-2 SLBM, with 0.921 probability. Two warheads of 
the Trident-2 SLBM would destroy a launch silo with 0.994 
probability. A further increase in launch silo protection 
requiring big outlays for construction would easily be countered 
by the use of guided warheads capable with a probability of 
close to 1 of destroying launch silos with a protection an order 
of magnitude greater than is customary at the present time. 
  The data presented in respect to launch silo survivability 
raise no doubts since the well-known algebraic dependence 
incorporating three parameters: protection of the launch silo 
and the power and accuracy of the warhead to be delivered to it, 
are used for the calculation. 
  The development of offensive arms has in the past 20 years 
forced the missile engineers of the USSR (Russia) and the United 
States to earnestly seek basing versions with an indeterminate 
location of the ICBM and its launcher. Mobile ground and 
railroad launchers have been developed, whose survival, even 
with the prospective means of space reconnaissance (radar, 
infrared, optical), in a retaliatory strike is six to seven 
times higher than the survivability of a modern launch silo with 
a strike against it of one warhead from a Trident-2 missile. 
  The United States completed the development of ground and 
railroad ICBM sites, but abandoned their deployment under the 
conditions strategic arms reduction since it has a potential for 
a retaliatory strike, thanks to the modernization of submarines 
and their fitting with Trident-2 missiles, two to three times 
greater than Russia. In the USSR mobile sites were deployed at 
the end of the 1980's, which considerably enhanced the 
efficiency of the strategic nuclear force in the delivery of a 
retaliatory strike. 
  In the course of preparation of START I the main efforts of 
the American side were geared to various prohibitions and 
limitations of the Strategic Missile Forces' mobile grouping: a 
ban on the use of several shelters (launchers) for one ICBM, a 
ban on the Strategic Missile Forces' whole mobile grouping, a 
ban on the use of railroad sites, limitation of the strength of 
the mobile grouping, limitation of the mobile ICBM patrolling 
areas, notification of changes of position, and so forth. It 
should be noted that, for the most part, our delegation 
succeeded in preserving an acceptable strength of the mobile 
grouping and conditions whereby it remains sufficiently 
effective. 
  Today approximately one-third of the ICBM's in the Russian 
Strategic Missile Forces are mobile, including 72 launchers with 
Topol missiles that are currently being withdrawn from Belarus. 
It is contemplated that in the future the Strategic Missile 
Forces will have 60-70 percent mobile ICBM's and 30-40 percent 
fixed launch silos. The contribution of the mobile sites to the 
efficiency of a retaliatory strike of the Strategic Missile 
Forces here will constitute 80-85 percent, and to the efficiency 
of the strategic nuclear force, 60-70 percent. 
<H8>  Vulnerability of Mobile Sites in a Conventional War </H8>
  During operations in position areas of sabotage groups or in 
the event of a breach of the front of our forces in the course 
of a conventional war where combat operations are conducted in 
the disposition of Strategic Missile Forces' units and combined 
units, mobile sites are more vulnerable than fixed sites. The 
efficiency of the operations of aviation against mobile and silo 
launchers with guided aerial bombs or cruise missiles with 
conventional shells is approximately identical. One single unit 
of ammunition would with a high degree of probability destroy a 
protected launch silo thanks to greater hitting accuracy, and it 
would be easier to destroy a less protected mobile launcher, but 
harder to find it among several combat launch positions or on 
traffic routes. 
  It should be noted, however, that the views of the 
military-political leadership on the possibility of an 
aggressor's premeditated destruction with impunity of strategic 
nuclear weapons in the course of a conventional war are now 
changing. The "Fundamental Provisions of the Military Doctrine" 
note that massive strikes against the strategic nuclear force by 
conventional weapons could bring about a retaliatory nuclear 
strike. I would like to see this provision strengthened: A 
premeditated attack with the use of conventional weapons on the 
strategic nuclear force means the guaranteed start of a nuclear 
war. It is essential to enshrine this provision politically 
since only the United States and NATO have the possibility of 
inflicting a "nonnuclear" strike against the Russian strategic 
nuclear force, whereas the destruction of the nuclear weapons of 
the United States by conventional arms is highly problematical. 
  Thus possible losses of mobile and fixed ICBM's in a 
conventional war are not a characteristic of the arms but, 
rather, the degree of tolerance of the leadership of the country 
observing the annihilation of strategic weapons reduced to a 
reasonable minimum. The danger of the destruction in a 
conventional war of mobile ICBM's and the possible consequences 
are not in the least bit different from the danger of the 
destruction of nuclear power stations, chemical plants, nuclear 
submarine bases, airfields with strategic bombers, and other 
similar facilities. 
<H8>  Safety of Operation of Mobile Sites in Peacetime </H8>
  It is obvious that the operation of mobile sites connected 
with a change of position on prepared routes is potentially more 
complex and dangerous than ICBM's in launch silos. It is 
important that these potential threats not become reality. 
  A particular feature of the mode of the operational use of 
mobile launchers that is frequently not understood by the 
critics of this basing version is the fact that the missiles in 
a permanent state of readiness 96 percent of the time are in 
battle position, that is, in protected installations where they 
are dependably guarded by personnel using special facilities for 
detecting and destroying intruders. The routes for changing the 
launcher position have engineering support realized in advance, 
the march is usually undertaken at night, when traffic intensity 
is low, the launcher is provided with cover in the front and at 
the rear by special vehicles, the drivers of the launchers are 
highly skilled specialists who constantly undergo training in 
simulators and at automotive test grounds, and the driver's work 
is monitored by the launcher commander and a set of technical 
facilities. 
  The enumerated measures have made it possible to markedly 
increase safety on the march compared with the practical 
operation of the first SS-20 intermediate-range mobile sites. 
There were in the process of operation of several hundred SS-20 
launchers an average of eight to 10 accidents, breakages, and 
instances of damage a year, but none of them signified even the 
preconditions of an incidence of radioactive contamination. 
  As a result of the great deal of organizing work that was 
performed in the Strategic Missile Forces, the introduction of 
new designs, and an improvement in the selection and assignment 
of launcher driver personnel, the accident rate has declined 
sharply and the probability of an incident is not more than 
0.00001 a year. This means that with the operation of 500 
launchers there is a 5 percent probability of an accident at one 
of them over the course of 10 years. In terms of industrial 
grading, conditions of occupational activity with such an 
accident probability are considered safe. 
  I would like to compare the safety of nuclear weapons in 
different components of the strategic nuclear force. According 
to open press data, six catastrophes accompanied by the sinking 
of the boats, explosions, and fires, the result of which were 
the loss of nuclear munitions and missiles and also the loss of 
life of personnel, occurred in the course of the operation of 
several dozen nuclear submarines in the USSR. But today no one 
is raising the question of the abandonment of the use of 
strategic nuclear weapons on nuclear submarines. On the 
contrary, this component of the strategic nuclear force is in 
terms of the proportion of nuclear weapons being augmented. The 
public is also well aware of the accident rate of our aircraft. 
  Thus the potential danger of the operation of mobile sites 
in 
peacetime is compensated in practice by technical and 
organizational measures and represents less of a threat to the 
public and the territories than other components of the 
strategic nuclear force. 
<H8>  Economy of the Strategic Missile Forces' Grouping With </H8>
Mobile Sites 
  Outlays on the creation, introduction to the grouping, and 
operation over the warranty period of sites with fixed or mobile 
basing modes per missile, on the whole, are close for 
prospective fixed and mobile launchers. It should be noted, 
however, that the bulk of the outlays, for which funding per the 
"capital construction" item is the most complicated, is composed 
for the launch silo of expenditure on the reequipping or the 
construction of a new silo, and for the mobile launcher, on the 
development of a road network used by more than just the 
military. For example, the introduction of SS-24 railroad sites 
made it possible to replace the track, reinforce the bed, 
install automated equipment and means of communication, and 
build sidings, which improved the traffic capacity of a 
pronounced portion of our railroads. The development of a 
network of roads in the areas where the mobile ground-based 
sites are located is, naturally, also supported by the local 
administration. Whereas the public money "dug" into the earth in 
the construction of a launch silo is not returned even following 
the dismantling of the launcher and its hand-over to the local 
authorities. 
<H8>  What Happens if the Program To Create Mobile Sites Is Halted </H8>
  The fixed and mobile sites in operation will have exhausted 
their service life by the years 2000-2003. The abandonment of 
one program without the fulfillment of any other would signify, 
therefore, the slow extinction of the most efficient and least 
costly component of the strategic nuclear force. Without the 
Strategic Missile Forces sea and aviation components could not 
perform their set assignments of deterring an aggressor. Critics 
of the program for developing the Strategic Missile Forces 
grouping based on single-warhead solid-fuel ICBM's with two 
basing modes should in saying "a" also be saying "b," that is, 
proposing some reasonable alternative. 
<H8>  Possible Alternative Versions </H8>
  If we do not ratify START II and develop the strategic 
nuclear force and the Strategic Missile Forces under the 
conditions of START I, preserving the current mobile grouping 
strength, it will be necessary to develop a new missile with 
multiple reentry vehicles to replace the SS-18 heavy missile and 
also an SS-24-class light missile for the railroad site. Nor 
will it be possible to abandon the modernization of the 
single-warhead missile here since this part of the grouping will 
by the years 2000-2003 also need to replace the missiles and 
launchers. For the Strategic Missile Forces such a program would 
be at least 30-50 percent more costly, and the grouping's 
efficiency in a retaliatory strike also would still be 
determined mainly by the mobile sites. 
  If START II is ratified (preferably with the proposed 
adjustments), it will be possible to speak only of the ratio of 
silo- and mobile-basing single-warhead missiles. But even today 
more than one-third of the launchers in the grouping are mobile. 
Since the mobile ground sites are several times more efficient 
than the silo sites, with an approximately identical cost, it 
would be expedient to have in the grouping the maximum quantity 
of them determined by the terms of the START I and START II 
treaties, with regard, of course, to the actual possibilities of 
industry, given its limited funding. 
  Thus the ratification or nonratification of START II will 
not 
alter the arterial direction of the development of the Strategic 
Missile Forces--the transition from missiles with multiple 
reentry vehicles to single-warhead missiles--since this is 
determined by the START I treaty that is already in effect (an 
appreciable limitation on the number of warheads compared with 
the number of missiles). The START II treaty merely shortens the 
timeframe of the transition to a single-warhead grouping and, 
the author believes, is in need of adjustment in this respect 
prior to ratification with regard to the country's economic 
situation. It is also obvious that it would be expedient to 
create the single-warhead grouping on the basis of one 
standardized Topol-class (SS-25) missile with two types of 
basing if only because approximately one-third of the ICBM's are 
of mobile ground basing and have the corresponding 
infrastructure of the position areas and an evolved system of 
operation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46539 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> STRATEGIC DETERRENT FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Army's Nuclear Monitoring Service Described </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Army's Nuclear Monitoring Service Described </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0906151994 Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 9 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> PM0906151994 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Oleg Falichev article: "Secrets of the Nuclear Monsters. </F>
U.S. and Soviet Special Services Hunted for Them 
Even...Underground During Cold War. What About Now?"] 
  [Text] Everything was going smoothly during the 
preparations for one of the first treaties between the USSR and 
the United States on limiting nuclear tests. The sides had 
agreed that nuclear explosions do irreparable damage to the 
environment. And in 1974 the treaty "On the Limitation of 
Underground Nuclear Tests" was signed. But it remained 
unratified for another 17 years (!) -- ratification only 
occurring in 1991. Why? 
  First and foremost, owing to the lack of joint services to 
monitor nuclear weapons tests and the top-secret nature of the 
national services. During the Cold War everything relating to 
the development and testing of nuclear monsters was top-secret. 
Each state strove to retain its priorities in this sphere. 
  But the most surprising point was something else. No 
intelligence service was able to obtain the information which 
was obtained by one of the USSR Defense Ministry's special 
services. It was set up by a 13 May 1958 government decree. As 
the document said, it was aimed at organizing permanent 
monitoring of nuclear weapons testing by foreign states and the 
development of the requisite ways and means to carry out this 
task. 
  A great deal for the technical equipping of the USSR Special 
Monitoring Service was done by well-known Academicians I.V. 
Kurchatov and M.A. Sadovskiy.... The very first chief of the 
service and its creator was Doctor of Technical Sciences Major 
General A. Ustyumenko, a State Prize winner. 
  Our Informational Note: 
  Research into the fundamental possibilities of 
recording the physical phenomena accompanying nuclear explosions 
began in the USSR in 1954-1957. That was when the first Armed 
Forces subunits designed to monitor nuclear weapons tests abroad 
were set up. The main result of this period was the practical 
affirmation of the possibility of carrying out such monitoring. 
The results obtained formed the basis of the USSR's position at 
the Geneva talks on ending nuclear testing in the atmosphere, in 
space, and underwater. 
  For 35 years the Special Monitoring Service managed to stay 
"in the background," so to speak. (Although one of its 
subdivisions -- the Eshery Seismic Laboratory -- has been 
repeatedly mentioned by the mass media in connection with the 
Georgian-Abkhaz conflict). Only today can we say something 
about it. How is it organized? Is it true that it can 
determine the location of any nuclear test at any test range in 
the world? 
  The brain center of the Special Monitoring Service of what 
is 
now the Russian Federation Defense Ministry is located in 
Moscow. This is where the organizational, operational, and 
scientific center is based. The city of Dubna in Moscow Oblast 
is home to the Information Collection and Processing Center. 
And then there are special monitoring laboratories, automated 
seismic stations, and autonomous observation centers dispersed 
throughout Russia and even the CIS. 
  We entered the organizational and operations center. The 
duty officer -- Lieutenant Colonel V. Yakovlev -- got up to meet 
us. Alongside his console are automated workstations equipped 
with visual display terminals and personal computers for the 
duty seismologist engineers. Graphics of earthquake intensity 
cover the walls. On the other side is a huge three-color 
display screen for monitoring the seismic situation worldwide. 
  "This is where the data from observation posts located 
around 
the country is collated and analyzed," Lt. Col. Yakovlev said. 
"We can time any nuclear explosion down to the second...." 
  Readers will clearly already have guessed that the main way 
of detecting underground nuclear explosions is by seismic 
equipment. In order to register the seismic waves generated 
during the explosion special highly sensitive instruments -- 
seismographs set up in tunnels or wells -- are used. The more 
powerful the explosion, the stronger the seismic wave at the 
earth's crust and, consequently, the stronger the seismic 
signals recorded. Information is then transmitted by satellite 
to Dubna, where high-speed computers (up to 5 million operations 
per second) process it. 
  For instance, seismic signals from the nuclear range in 
Nevada reach us a few minutes later. And in a very short time 
full details of the underground nuclear explosion (time, place, 
yield, type, and so forth) are reported to the General Staff. 
Data from other monitoring methods -- gas-aerosol, magnetic, 
acoustic, and electronic -- are used to detect ground, air, and 
space-based nuclear explosions. It is impossible to talk about 
each one. I will just say a few words about the aerosol method. 
  There are observation posts on Russian territory equipped 
with devices to sample the tiniest aerosol particles from the 
air. These devices include very simple equipment -- 
gauze-covered tables to collect particles that settle on the 
ground -- and complex filtration and ventilation devices (a kind 
of huge vacuum cleaner that sucks in thousands of cubic meters 
of air). That is on the ground. At high altitude specially 
equipped aircraft are used to sample the aerosols. 
  The heart of the matter is that radioactive products of 
nuclear explosions containing radionuclides can occur within the 
aerosols. From them it is possible to determine the design 
[ustroystvo] of the nuclear charge and find out whether the 
state has gone very far in improving its nuclear weapons. This 
is why at the central laboratory in Moscow aerosol samples are 
impatiently awaited by physicists and analytical chemists armed 
with numerous clever instruments. 
  Specialists can learn a lot, for instance, from using 
gamma-spectroscopes with semiconductor detectors, mass 
spectrometers, and laser analyzers. Ultimately all this helps 
to improve the country's security and is a means of verifying 
the fulfillment of treaty commitments by other states. 
  The experience of radiation research was very useful in 
1986, 
when many Special Monitoring Service specialists had to take 
part in eliminating the consequences of the Chernobyl disaster 
in the first few days after it happened. They experienced all 
the "joys" of working in the airborne and ground reconnaissance 
zone and near the smoking reactor. 
  Our Informational Note: 
  Over the course of 35 years the Special Monitoring 
Service has recorded more than 600 different nuclear explosions 
at foreign test ranges by the United States, France, China, 
Britain, and India. This has helped the country's leaders to 
make not only appropriate but technically substantiated 
political decisions in good time. 
  With the end of the Cold War the problems with monitoring 
nuclear explosions ought to have diminished. But no, explosions 
have begun to be carried out solely underground, in tunnels and 
boreholes. And with small and exceptionally small yields. This 
has made them harder to detect. Potential nuclear weapon states 
have also emerged -- Israel, Iran, Iraq, Pakistan, South Africa, 
North Korea, and Brazil. The world has started talking about 
the threat of nuclear terrorism. All this has made sober-minded 
statesmen seek above all a political solution to this problem. 
Talks under UN auspices have begun in Geneva on a comprehensive 
nuclear test ban. 
  But only two countries currently have highly developed and 
effective systems for monitoring nuclear tests -- Russia and the 
United States. In other words, the realities of life itself are 
forcing the two states to pool their efforts. In the quest for 
new and guaranteed ways and means to prevent the proliferation 
of nuclear weapons. What progress has been made? 
  "Plenty," Colonel V. Kovalenko, deputy chief of the Russian 
Federation Defense Ministry's Special Monitoring Service, said. 
"In December 1992 we signed a memorandum of cooperation with the 
U.S. Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA), which 
deals with similar issues. This makes it possible for us to 
exchange seismic data of potential value for monitoring nuclear 
weapons tests and to carry out joint experiments...." 
  This partnership is mutually advantageous, since both Russia 
and the United States have already reached the limits of the 
monitoring systems sited on their own territories. The 
computerized exchange of information between the centers in 
Dubna and Arlington near Washington is a substantial backup for 
this monitoring. Moreover, in accordance with the treaty 
between Russia and the United States on nuclear weapons 
limitation and testing, we have obtained an opportunity to carry 
out monitoring at U.S. stations (at Brekkhils [name as 
transliterated], Newport, and Tulsa), while they are able to do 
so here (at Obninsk, Arti, and Novosibirsk). It is interesting 
that other countries are already expressing interest in 
cooperating with the Special Monitoring Service, rightly 
believing that this will promote the process of global 
verification of a nuclear test ban and the speedy conclusion of 
an international treaty in this sphere. 
  There are also some purely civilian aspects to the Special 
Monitoring service's work. Last year it was decided through the 
Russian Federation Government decree "On the Formation of a 
Federal Seismological Observation and Earthquake Forecasting 
System" to pool the efforts of seismologists from the Russian 
Academy of Sciences, the Special Monitoring Service, and certain 
other departments to purposefully work on curbing such a 
terrible force of nature as earthquakes -- even though 
forecasting them is quite a complex and risky business currently 
being cautiously tackled by only a few scientists around the 
world. But the Special Monitoring Service has done some good 
groundwork in this area too. A unique data base on earthquakes 
since 1978 has been compiled and a map of earthquake-prone areas 
has been drawn up.... 
  Huge plans are afoot. There is a readiness to cooperate with 
Aeroflot and other airlines in issuing information on storm 
fronts. And to cooperate with customs officials in detecting 
certain narcotic substances with the help of air analyzers.... 
But, nonetheless, the main aim is to create a global computer 
network producing information on nuclear weapons, to become 
integrated into an international system for the seismic 
monitoring of nuclear weapons tests, and also to use space-based 
and other means for purposefully monitoring nuclear weapons. 
Almost everything -- experience, a high level of technical 
equipment, and unique specialists who training takes many years 
-- is in place to accomplish this. 
  The United States and Russia are currently not carrying out 
nuclear tests. I would recall that we have declared a 
moratorium until September 1994. As has the United States -- 
although B. Clinton is said to have already promised to extend 
it for another year. We hope to goodness he does. But the 
Russian Federation Defense Ministry Special Monitoring Service's 
work will not, I repeat, be diminishing. After all, its very 
existence is a kind of guarantee and precondition for a 
nuclear-free world. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46540 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> GROUND TROOPS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tunguska Air Defense System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tunguska Air Defense System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0438A Moscow TEKHNIKA I VOORUZHENIYE in Russian No 1-2, 
1994 pp 33-35 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0438A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow TEKHNIKA I VOORUZHENIYE </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Colonel V. Zhitnikov under rubric </F>
"TEKHNIKA I VOORUZHENIYE Catalog": "Tunguska Gun-Missile Air 
Defense System"] 
  [Text] The system is intended for air defense of motorized 
rifle (tank) regiment subunits against strikes by tactical and 
army aviation, fire support helicopters, cruise missiles and 
remotely piloted vehicles, and also for engaging lightly armored 
ground targets and personnel. The system is capable of engaging 
targets at a range up to 8 km and at an altitude up to 3.5 km. 
It includes a self-propelled antiaircraft mount, 
loader/transporter, servicing and maintenance equipment, and an 
automated monitoring and test station. The self-propelled 
antiaircraft mount on a tracked chassis (MT-S) base is the 
system's weapon platform. A hydromechanical transmission and 
hydropneumatic suspension are used in the chassis construction 
and provide high off-road capability, good maneuverability, and 
smoothness of movement over rugged terrain, which permits firing 
on the move. 
  Two 2A38M twin-barrel automatic antiaircraft guns covered by 
an armored jacket are located on the sides of a turret with 
360 traverse. Their principle of action is based on using 
the energy of powder gases led off through a special opening of 
the barrels into gas cylinders. A liquid evaporation system is 
used to cool the barrels. The twin-barrel configuration of the 
automatic gun permits an intensive rate of fire of up to 5,000 
rounds per minute. The automatic guns have a belt feed. The 
ammunition belt is filled with standardized 30-mm rounds with 
the help of a ramming machine [nabivochnaya mashinka]. The 
loader/transporter loads the unit of fire. Loading time for a 
full unit of fire is 16 minutes. 
  Shipping-launching containers with missiles also are 
situated 
on the sides of the turret and protected by an armored 
enclosure. They perform functions of sealed storage container 
and launcher. The system's 9M311 guided missile is bicaliber and 
two-stage. It has a separating solid-propellant booster motor 
which gives the missile a speed of almost three times that of 
sound. The launch weight is half that of single-stage missiles 
with similar characteristics. The small-caliber propulsion stage 
preserves high speed on the entire flight path. The missile 
warhead is continuous-rod/fragmentation. It has impact and 
proximity fuzes, which ensures destruction of a target both with 
a direct hit as well as when flying by it at a distance of up to 
5 meters. 
  The missile control system is semiautomatic, with a radio 
command communications link. The light flux from a light source 
installed on the missile hits the optical direction finder and 
is converted into an electrical signal proportional to 
deflection from line of sight. The signal goes to the central 
computer system, which generates control commands. Then they are 
transmitted in the form of coded pulses through the tracking 
station to the missile, where the gear generates commands for 
controlling the steering drive. The missile is moved onto the 
line of sight and held there. 
  The radar system of the air defense system consists of 
acquisition and tracking radars as well as a ground 
interrogator. The acquisition radar has a high scan rate and 
reliable means of suppressing a signal from local objects, which 
permits discriminating low-flying targets at ranges up to 18 km 
with high probability. The interrogator operates in two radio 
wavebands and provides guaranteed target recognition. The 
tracking radar accomplishes automatic lock-on and tracking of a 
target at a range up to 16 km. Hydraulic drives support precise, 
rapid training of weapons in a wide dynamic range when firing 
from in place and in movement. 
  The system's high-speed central computer system was 
developed 
based on the series-produced Aron-15 computer. It monitors the 
status of weapon systems, of the turret horizontal gunlaying 
drive, and of the entire system by simulating an aircraft 
overflight. It outputs data on target parameters and generates 
data for firing missile-gun armament. The majority of operations 
for controlling systems of the air defense system are the 
responsibility of the computer and automatic equipment unit. 
This permits a crew with average skills to perform combat work 
successfully. A team consists of four persons: commander, 
operator, gunner and driver. The Tunguska is outfitted with 
special equipment for protecting the crew against weapons of 
mass destruction and for creating normal conditions for its 
functioning within the turret. 


Specifications and Performance Characteristics 

Kill zone range, km 

missile armament                           2.5-8.0 

gun armament                               0.2-4.0 

Kill zone altitude, km 

missile armament                           0.015-3.5 

gun armament                               0-3.0 

Range of fire against ground targets, km   2.0 


Speed of engaged targets, m/sec            Up to 500 

Reaction time (during an overflight),      8-10 
sec 

Kill probability 

missile armament                           0.5-0.8 

gun armament                               0.3-0.6 

Unit of fire 

surface-to-air missiles                    8 

30-mm standardized cartridges              1,936 

Weight of fighting vehicle, t              34.0 


  Combat work is accomplished as follows. The surveillance 
radar scans air space while in place and in movement. After 
acquisition, targets are identified. The system commander, after 
determining that there is a target, selects the kind of armament 
(gun or missile) and passes target designations to the operator 
for lock-on and tracking. The operator monitors automatic 
lock-on on the radar screens. If the enemy employs 
communications jamming, the target is locked-on in a manual 
mode. The tracking radar outputs precise target designations 
over synchronous communications to the optical sight and moves 
it onto the line of sight. The gunner detects the target in the 
sight's field of view, takes it for tracking, and holds the 
sight aiming mark on the target in the process of guidance. Data 
go from the radar to the central computer system for controlling 
successive fire on targets by missiles and gun armament. Based 
on results of fire, the commander makes the decision on 
transferring fire to another target. System reaction time from 
the moment of target acquisition to firing on the target is 8-10 
seconds. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Tekhnika i vooruzheniye", 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46541 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> AIR, AIR DEFENSE FORCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Free-Flight Aviation Rockets </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Free-Flight Aviation Rockets </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0438B Moscow TEKHNIKA I VOORUZHENIYE in Russian No 1-2, 
1994 p 46 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0438B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow TEKHNIKA I VOORUZHENIYE </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article] </F>
  [Text] The Novosibirsk Applied Physics Institute 
demonstrated its military products for the first time at the 
Moscow Air Show-92 international exhibition. These are the S-8 
and S-13 free-flight rocket weapon systems with rockets with 
solid-propellant engines and various types of warheads. They are 
mounted on combat aircraft (helicopters) and intended for 
engaging enemy armored equipment, engineer works and personnel. 
  Platforms for the S-8 80-mm free-flight air-launched weapons 
are Su-17M, Su-24, Su-25, Su-27, MiG-23 and MiG-27 aircraft and 
also Mi-8, Mi-24, Mi-28 and K-252 helicopters. Its 20 rockets 
are accommodated in the special B-8M1 rocket pod (length 3,550 
mm, diameter 410 mm, empty weight 160 kg, loaded weight 400 kg). 
It has a conical nose section and good aerodynamic properties. 
The very same number of rockets is accommodated on helicopters 
in the B-8V20 rocket pod (length 1,790 mm, diameter 521 mm, 
empty weight 100 kg, loaded weight 342 kg). 
  The more powerful S-13 122-mm free-flight air-launched 
rocket 
weapon system is used on Su-27 and MiG-29 fighters and Su-25 
attack aircraft. Its five rockets are located in the B-13L 
rocket pod (length 3,558 mm, diameter 410 mm, empty weight 160 
kg, loaded weight 510 kg). 


Specifications and Performance Characteristics of Rockets 

              S-8KOM           S-8BM             S-8DM          S-8OM 

Type          Shaped-charge    Armor-piercing    With bulk      Illuminating 
warhead       fragmentation                      penetrating    detonating 
                                                 mixture 

Warhead       3.6              7.41              3.63           4.3 
weight, kg 

Weight, kg 

explosive     0.9              0.6               -              - 

mixture       -                -                 2.15           - 

compound      -                -                 -              1.0 

Length, mm    1,570            1,540             1,700          1,632 

Weight, kg    11.3             15.2              11.6           12.1 

Launch 
range, km 

from          1.3-4            1.2-2.2           1.3-3          4-4.5 
aircraft 

from          8.5-2            -                 8.5-2          4-4.5 
helicopter 

Speed,        166-330          166-330           166-330        166-330 
m/sec 




Specifications and Performance Characteristics of Rockets 

                S-13             S-13T                 S-13OF 

Type warhead    Penetrating      Twin-module,          Fragmentation-HE, 
                                 penetrating,          organized 
                                 fragmentation-HE      fragmentation 

Warhead         23               37.3                  33 
weight, kg 

Weight of       1.92             4.5                   7 
explosive, kg 


Length, mm      2,900            3,100                 2,898 

Weight, kg      60               75                    69 

Launch range,   1.1-4.0          1.1-3.0               1.6-3.0 
km 

Speed, m/sec    166-330          166-330               166-330 


  Write to the following address for additional information 
and 
with suggestions: 630117, Novosibirsk, ul. Arbuzova, 1/1, 
Applied Physics Institute. Telephone: (3832) 32-18-50. Fax: 
(3832) 32-18-56. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Tekhnika i vooruzheniye", 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46542 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> REAR SERVICES, SUPPORT ISSUES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Disposal of Unused Garrison Facilities </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Disposal of Unused Garrison Facilities </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0432A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0432A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by KRASNAYA ZVEZDA corresondent Ivan Ivanyuk: </F>
"Military Posts Are Going `Into Retirment.' Do They Really Face 
Destruction or Neglect?"] 
  [Text] "Live at home, and your 
home will not collapse." These words of the poet about something 
simple and vital painfully affecting everyone who has seen the 
senseless destruction are, unfortunately, valid not just for 
wars and conflicts. When the Russian Army went into action and 
began abandoning the familiar garrisons abroad, and all of us 
sighed as we calculated the property losses, it could not have 
occurred to anyone that we would squander far more in our own 
fatherland. And when, with the reduction of the Armed Forces in 
Russia, military posts began to be vacated, it turned out that 
there was actually no one in charge of them.... 
  "A military unit was deployed in Krasnoglinskiy Rayon in the 
city of Samara," V. Ageychenko, chairman of the rayon committee 
of the Alliance for the Social Protection of Pensioners, wrote 
to the editors. "It occupied two 100-apartment buildings, a 
messhall and other premises. The unit left in the spring of 
1993, however. The buildings stand there without windows, floors 
or doors and continue to deteriorate. We went everywhere: to the 
police, the procurator's office, the city administration.... 
There is no one to be found to look after the post. No one is 
doing anything; everyone is blaming everyone else.... 
  Unfortunately, such letters are not isolated entities in our 
mail. Even though alarm signals are coming in from various areas 
of the nation, from the Transbaykal to the Moscow region, they 
do not provide a complete picture of the scale of what is 
happening. The list of military posts vacated in 1993-1994 
within the Russian Federation's Ministry of Defense is extremely 
vast. It was compiled by Russia's State Committee for Property 
and the Central Directorate of Material Resources of the Russian 
Federation's Ministry of Defense in October of last year and 
includes 312 posts. This means hundreds of apartment buildings, 
clubs, barracks, messhalls, storage facilities, garages, parking 
lots and filling stations--property with a value of billions of 
rubles. And the number of posts whose fate has been decided can 
be counted on the fingers of one hand. 
  Why has this happened? Is there actually no one who would 
like to acquire all of this property? Or is the possibility of 
rectifying the financial affairs of the Ministry of Defense, 
which, quite frankly, did not receive very much in the 
privatization process, not obvious? There are more than enough 
good intentions, but the hitch lies in the fact that all of the 
ukases, decrees and directives issued up to this point have not 
provided a precisely defined system for utilizing or selling the 
military's real property. The military posts are federal 
property, and the Ministry of Defense must coordinate their sale 
with the State Committee for Property. According to Russia's 
Land Code, however, the land on which they are located belongs 
to local government agencies. And the latter say that if you 
want to sell your buildings, dismantle them and take them 
wherever you see fit. 
  While such debate is going on, "popular privatization" is 
underway on the sly. The people are starting to remove 
everything they can. They ask why the property should go to 
waste, all the more since there is no one to guard it. This is a 
slight exaggeration, but the fact remains that missiles have 
been dismantled and local aficionados have gradually not just 
removed refrigeration and other equipment of any value but have 
used tolite to blow up things which could not be dismantled.... 
  A more detailed inventory of vacated military posts was 
recently conducted in the Ministry of Defense. They were all 
broken down into groups, to each of which a special approach 
will be taken. The most "prestigious" are the posts which it is 
planned to auction off. Those which cannot be sold will be 
transferred to the pool of local authorities or written off 
entirely as an expense. 
  Instructions for selling the posts and some initial 
experience already exist. There is just no confidence that the 
Ministry of Defense will earn a great deal. Even the state in 
general has not become any richer from this area of revenue. 
Furthermore, anyone attracted to the military property must 
provide firm guarantees, and these are presently stuck in a 
vicious circle of the State Committee for Property, the Ministry 
of Defense and local authorities. 
  Many specialists agree that the only rational route, given 
the present legal regulation of the land issue, is to lease out 
the military posts. And it would be the fair thing to give 
priority as lessees to reserve officers, whose privatization 
interests have not yet been taken fully into account. 
  The military posts could be turned into enterprises where 
reserve officers and their wives could work. Their retraining 
could be organized directly for the kind of production engaged 
in by the enterprise. The leased facilities and land would 
remain within the Ministry of Defense and provide profits for 
solving the social problems of military personnel. 
  One specific project for deciding the future of the military 
posts in this way has been worked out by the Independent Trade 
Union of Military Personnel and submitted to the government. It 
calls for setting up an auction association, one of whose 
founders would be the Ministry of Defense. The plan is meeting 
with support from commercial structures. Specifically, 
Tveruniversalbank is prepared to finance it. The Russian 
Business Center for Reserve Servicemen set up under the 
Independent Trade Union of Military Personnel is already working 
out the technical feasibility for building motor-vehicle service 
centers out of two large garrisons on the Moscow-St. Petersburg 
and Moscow-Smolensk routes. It is planned to locate a Moscow 
area center near Golitsyno-2, one of the main basing sites for 
military space personnel, which already has some experience in 
the retraining and job placement of reserve officers. 
  There are other options as well: for example, selling the 
posts together with the land. In any case drastic steps must be 
taken so that the inheritance of the armed forces, created by 
the labor of more than just a single generation, is not thrown 
to the wind or sold for next to nothing to those who are totally 
unconcerned about the military problems or the fate of the 
former servicemen. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46543 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CIS/RUSSIAN MILITARY ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> REAR SERVICES, SUPPORT ISSUES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Servicemen's Social Protection Measures Not Working </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Servicemen's Social Protection Measures Not Working </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM0906104394 Moscow TRUD in Russian 9 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> PM0906104394 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow TRUD </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Fedor Yemchenko report: "Officers, Eyes Right! But No </F>
Money Left"] 
  [Text] Mikhail Kolchev, chairman of the Independent Trade 
Union of Servicemen Central Committee, and Sergey Obrezanov, 
vice president of the State Security Veterans Club, held a press 
conference yesterday. 
  "The social tension in military units and aboard naval 
vessels is increasing all the time," Mikhail Kolchev said. "The 
Northern Fleet command, for instance, have not received their 
pay for three months. Around 140,000 officers have been forced 
to rent corners of other people's apartments. 
  "The president and the government," the Independent Trade 
Union of Servicemen leader noted, "have issued dozens of edicts 
and decrees aimed at ensuring social protection for servicemen. 
But these documents are not working. Local authorities are 
impeding in every possible way the implementation of the state 
program to build housing for officers discharged to the reserve." 
  Last year sufficient funds were allocated for these 
purposes. 
But the regions have only received half of the money. As a 
result, not a single [square] meter of housing has been 
commissioned in Murmansk. The housing program has been just 3 
percent fulfilled. 
  The suits filed by the trade union with judicial organs 
alleging a failure to use state funds properly have not led to 
anything. Russian justice could find no legal grounds for 
initiating proceedings against those responsible. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46544 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Convene Conference on Measures To Improve Discipline </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Convene Conference on Measures To Improve Discipline </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Radetskyy Stresses Impact on Force Readiness </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0413A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 5 May 94 pp 1-2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0413A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Excerpt from presentation of Minister of Defense of Ukraine </F>
General of the Army of Ukraine Vitaliy Radetskyy at a 
practical-science conference: "Military Discipline--A Very 
Important Component of Combat Readiness"] 
  [Text] The Armed Forces, along with the chief task of 
ensuring the protection of the independence and territorial 
integrity of Ukraine, face the task of taking into account, in 
military development under contemporary conditions, the dynamic 
of changes in geopolitical circumstances and the accomplishment 
of a great deal of work that would make it possible to ensure in 
quality fashion the national security of Ukraine. 
  One of the chief places among the multifaceted areas of that 
activity belongs to the strengthening of military discipline. 
Military discipline is one type of state discipline, and has 
particular significance for the Armed Forces. It performs a role 
of an organizational nature, and instills orders in and protects 
the system of relations within the setting of the military 
collectives. Military discipline is undoubtedly one of the most 
important constituent elements of the combat readiness of the 
troops and the functioning of the Armed Forces as a whole. We 
are in extreme need today of a state of affairs under which 
every serviceman would knowingly fulfill the laws and norms of 
morality. Numerous instances, however, testify that we are still 
far away from that. 
  A considerable number of legal offenses were committed over 
the first quarter of this year in the ranks. And even though the 
increase is insignificant compared to the same statistical 
period for 1993, it must be admitted that a serious situation 
has taken shape in the Army. The state of military discipline as 
a whole is eliciting considerable concern in the Air Forces, the 
troops of the Odessa Military District and the ground forces. 
The supply of housing and the health of people remain acute 
problems among the troops. 
  The prevention of absence without leave from units by 
conscript servicemen and searching for them is not being 
resolved in satisfactory fashion. 
  The moral-psychological climate in many military subunits is 
not improving, and there are instances of non-regulation 
relations and barracks hooliganism; the overall number of 
instances of non-regulation relations in the Armed Forces of 
Ukraine this year has increased compared to the analogous period 
of last year. 
  The number of crimes connected with the theft of state 
property is increasing. One out of nine crimes is the theft of 
material assets of military units, organizations and 
institutions. 
  Why, while constantly and daily occupied with questions of 
strengthening military discipline, are we forced to admit that 
there is a drop in the overall level of organization and order 
and a rise in the crime rate? 
  The unfavorable influence of the social climate that is 
taking shape surrounding the Armed Forces is being felt first of 
all. The increased difficulty of the socio-economic situation in 
Ukraine, the negative processes that are taking place in society 
and being recreated in the Armed Forces, are leading to an 
increase in psychological tensions, apathy, confusion and 
uncertainty for the future in the officer corps, and are 
affecting the socio-psychological phenomena that constitute the 
foundation of its moral-psychological state. 
  Military sociological polling on problems of the social 
sentiments of servicemen in the Armed Forces of Ukraine has 
shown, at the same time, that the officer corps of the Armed 
Forces of Ukraine, despite all of the difficulties and problems 
of everyday life, still has a certain reserve of professional 
energy that permits the state and military leadership to count 
on the maintenance of the necessary level of combat and 
mobilization readiness in the units and subunits of the Armed 
Forces. This is testified to by the fact that close to 49 
percent of the officers of the Armed Forces of Ukraine have a 
positive attitude toward their social status today, and are 
striving for the realization of creative initiative, the 
discovery of intellectual and physical capabilities and 
characteristics of will in their service activity. These values 
occupy the second and third places respectively after the 
aspiration for material security, which is natural under our 
conditions. 
  Second, the higher leadership of the Armed Forces still has 
a 
reserve of trust among the overwhelming majority of the officer 
corps. This is the opinion of 72 percent of the servicemen who 
were polled for their assessment of the reasons for the problems 
and troubles in the Armed Forces. This credit of trust should be 
utilized by us as a means of consolidating and rallying the 
personnel in the contemporary stage of development of the Armed 
Forces of Ukraine. 
  At the same time, if we do not make use of the patriotic 
potential of the officer corps, the consequences could be 
disastrous for the Armed Forces. The results of research also 
testify to this. 
  We military people, however, in speaking of the immediate 
and 
organic dependence of military organization on the state of 
affairs in society as a whole, do not have the right to be 
troubled by it ourselves. One also cannot help but see the fact 
that our methods of activity are not in harmony with the actual 
circumstances and extraordinary conditions which the Armed 
Forces and state are in. There are many who approach the 
problems of today with the measures of yesterday, who do not see 
the disparity of the decisions that are being made with the way 
the Armed Forces are living and what people expect of them. That 
is happening in the central apparatus of the Ministry of Defense 
as well. 
  We have also not been able to make a qualitative 
breakthrough 
in stabilizing military discipline because certain methods of 
work that had positive results under the conditions of the Armed 
Forces of the former Soviet Union have not yet played themselves 
out today, but have rather become a distinctive kind of brake. A 
number of generals and officers have had great difficulty 
getting rid of the approaches of yesterday in the indoctrination 
of the personnel and the strengthening of discipline. "Force" 
forms and "command pedagogy" frequently have the opposite 
effect. The human factor is being taken into account in word but 
not in deed. 
  The generals and officers of the central apparatus of the 
Ministry of Defense, on questions of strengthening military 
discipline, must in the spirit of personal responsibility: 
  --improve the style and methods of management activity, and 
raise their personal executive discipline and responsibility for 
the ultimate results of the training of the troops; 
  --fundamentally rebuild the process of working through and 
making decisions on questions of military discipline; 
  --promptly review issues raised by the troops, be an example 
of energetic action to eliminate shortcomings and to strengthen 
organization and law and order, and raise comprehensively the 
effectiveness of organizational, executive and legal assurance 
of the fulfillment of the requirements of the Temporary 
Regulations of the Armed Forces; 
  --forego inspectional activity and move to 
organizational-creative activity among the troops on the basis 
of professionalism, a critical attitude toward each step, and 
checking of oneself through practical results. This is also 
important because a significant change in cadres has occurred 
over the last two years in the 
regiment--brigade--division--corps--district echelons. The 
overwhelming majority of senior officers and commanders do not 
have sufficient practical experience. Shouting, abuse and image 
cannot train them to lead their subordinate units and formations 
in competent fashion. This signifies that we must not only learn 
ourselves, but also teach our subordinates and provide practical 
assistance in the field; 
  --display constant concern for the professional growth of 
cadres in subordinate military structures, and provide practical 
assistance without excessive administration in the formation of 
a healthy moral atmosphere among the military collectives; and 
  --be highly demanding of those who have a disdainful 
attitude 
toward the needs and aspirations of the troops, or who make 
formalistic assessments of the state of affairs in subordinate 
units. 
  Our prestige as military leaders and our successes in the 
key 
areas of the organizational development of the Armed Forces as a 
whole will depend to a significant extent on this. 
  Third. We must look in a new way at the problems of the 
moral-psychological state of all categories of servicemen under 
the conditions of the destabilization of the situation in the 
state and the changes that are occurring in the vital activity 
of the Armed Forces, as is required by the Military Doctrine of 
Ukraine. There can be no strong military discipline, no official 
activity in the mastery of military hardware and weaponry, no 
reliable maintenance of the guaranteed level of combat readiness 
and battleworthiness without these components. 
  The Main Directorate for Indoctrination Work must take more 
decisive steps in the direction of the systematic development 
and formulation of a healthy moral-psychological state among the 
personnel along with the principal criteria for evaluating it, 
both in peacetime and in special times. Serious and practical 
work is needed. A unification of the efforts of all the 
directorates of the central apparatus of the Ministry of Defense 
is expected for the accomplishment of that task. 
  The moral-psychological training of personnel is a 
constituent element of combat readiness. The commanders and 
superior officers supervising combat training, however, also 
have an effect on spiritual processes in the military 
environment. 
  Very serious work still lies ahead for us in order to see 
that the moral-psychological factor is activated. It would be 
expedient, in my opinion, to begin promptly the development of a 
system for the study, analysis and resolution of problems of the 
moral-psychological state of the troops. I feel that the 
question of more profound and scientific study of the problem of 
the moral-psychological state could be the subject of discussion 
at one of the practical-science conferences of the central 
apparatus of the Ministry of Defense in 1995, after the 
completion of the first stage of the organizational development 
of the Armed Forces. This does not signify, however, that this 
question will only be raised a year from now. The results of 
work on these problems should be passed along to the military 
administrative elements at all levels to the extent of the 
receipt of those results, and they should pass through the prism 
of military practice during training, maneuvers and exercises. 
  Fourth. The skill of the military personnel to conduct 
purposeful indoctrination work gains great value in 
strengthening military discipline under the conditions of the 
democratization of army life. Practice today demands that we 
think about the creation of an indoctrination mechanism for 
strengthening military discipline. We are unfortunately not able 
to do this to the full extent today, because we do not yet have 
a scientifically substantiated system of views on the 
indoctrination of the personnel of the Armed Forces of Ukraine. 
And that is not just a pretty theoretical reference. Life itself 
dictates the development of a national theory of the 
indoctrination process in the Armed Forces. The difficult 
socio-economic and political situation in Ukraine and around it, 
around the Armed Forces of Ukraine, the sometime impossibility 
of foreseeing the development of this situation, the ideological 
fragmentation and uncertainty in the consciousness of people, 
the wholesale denigration of all and everything, including the 
best traditions of the Armed Forces of the former USSR, whence 
we all came, and the denigration of the young Ukrainian Army are 
all undermining the morale of the troops and causing a real 
necessity of urgent measures of a political, economic, 
organizational, educational and moral-psychological nature to 
strengthen the moral-psychological climate for servicemen in the 
Armed Forces of Ukraine. The national theory of the 
indoctrination of the personnel, in my opinion, should reflect 
all aspects of the indoctrination work with the troops, from the 
basic aims and concepts and the system of views to the 
preparation and distribution of cadres of logistical and 
financial support for the indoctrination process. A prominent 
place in it should belong to the substance, forms and methods of 
military indoctrination and the educational mechanism for 
strengthening military discipline. 
  This should signify, first of all, a thorough knowledge of 
circumstances at all levels of the army organism, their constant 
analysis, the clear-cut distribution of duties of all officials 
on which the improvement of military discipline depends for the 
officers and generals of the directorates of the central 
apparatus of the Ministry of Defense--when what and how each of 
them should be doing what. The speeches of the generals and 
officers of the central apparatus of the Ministry of Defense to 
the personnel on topical problems in military organizational 
development must be put into practice. 
  The preparations for the fiftieth anniversary of Victory in 
the Great Patriotic War are opening up broad possibilities for 
expanding the work to indoctrinate the personnel in the combat 
traditions of the people who, in unified combat ranks with the 
peoples of the former USSR and the anti-Hitlerite coalition, 
made a substantial contribution to the rout of German fascism 
and Japanese militarism. The martial glories of the warriors of 
Ukraine should be turned into a continuously running generator 
for the formation of civil consciousness and patriotism. 
  The system of humanities training for the personnel should 
be 
an important factor in the indoctrination process. Much is being 
done in this area, but there are many shortcomings as well. 
Significant corrections in both the substance and the forms of 
the work are required. One cannot circumvent, in speaking of the 
indoctrination of discipline, the problems of the 
individualization of that process based on the utilization of 
the achievements of general and military psychology and 
sociology. Much cadre, theoretical and practical work lies ahead 
in this area. I feel, in the area of content, that a system of 
socio-psychological support for military discipline that would 
be composed of four basic elements should be created in the 
Armed Forces. 
  First is a unified system of military professional 
and psychological selection. 
  Second is socio-psychological support for 
military-professional activity. 
  Third is the psychological training of all 
categories of personnel in official positions. 
  Fourth is intensified special and dedicated 
moral-psychological training, depending on the specific nature 
of the professional activity. 
  The creation of a system of indoctrinational work in the 
Armed Forces and an indoctrinational mechanism for the 
strengthening of military discipline is one of our chief tasks. 
This requires high competence and initiative, great inner 
organization and personal discipline from every officer and 
general in the central apparatus of the Ministry of Defense. A 
very great deal already depends on us today if we want to be the 
Ministry of Defense of a great European power--Ukraine. 
  Fifth, it is important to impart a steadfast social-legal 
orientation to the process of strengthening military discipline. 
The priority areas of the military policy of the leadership of 
Ukraine and the activity of the Ministry of Defense should thus 
be constant attention toward the problems of social protections 
for servicemen. 
  There is an urgent need for the rapid development of 
measures 
to ensure the stabilization of the social situation of officer 
personnel, and especially certain socio-demographic and 
professional categories. 
  The Supreme Commander-in-Chief and the Military Collegium of 
the Ministry of Defense, notwithstanding the difficult economic 
conditions, are devoting constant attention to the problems of 
social security for servicemen. The discussion concerns, first 
and foremost, carrying out compensatory measures under 
conditions of inflation and permanent price rises, and the 
resolution of the housing problem. On the agenda is the 
development of drafts of such legislation in the sphere of 
social protections for servicemen. It is very important here to 
learn to accumulate both our own and overseas experience. 
  We must think seriously about the development of a 
comprehensive, dedicated program for the social development of 
the Armed Forces. The essence of them, in my view, should 
consist of a scientifically substantiated definition of the 
aims, tasks, indications and measures, the establishment of the 
deadlines, rates and proportions of the development of the 
military-professional spiritual and social spheres from the 
military unit or ship up to the Armed Forces as a whole, and in 
the long run, the full-scale integration of the social sphere of 
the Army into the social sphere of all of society. The generals 
and officers of the central apparatus of the Ministry of Defense 
of Ukraine should structure their organizational and 
indoctrination work among the troops exclusively on the basis of 
the laws of Ukraine, the edicts and directives of the President 
of Ukraine as the Supreme Commander-in-Chief of the Armed 
Forces, and statutes and orders. A situation must be sought in 
which the law is respected to an identical extent and is upheld 
by both superior officers and subordinates. The organization of 
a regulation way of life and the introduction of monitoring of 
the upholding of law and order should be a prominent direction 
of our work. 
  The Minister of Defense of Ukraine, referring to the 
participants in the conference, emphasized that "We will never 
raise discipline if we do not work on prevention. But 
military-social activity is not a static, fixed structure from a 
dynamic point of view; it is a unity of processes and phenomena 
that change and develop. We should thus be concerned with the 
introduction of scientific approaches to studying the reasons 
for offenses, predicting the possible development of processes 
in discipline and devising paramount and long-term preventive 
measures. In the sphere of social-legal work to strengthen 
military discipline, we must single out more clearly the 
principal chains that are linked with the contemporary 
turnaround stage in the emergence of the Ukrainian state and 
military organizational development. The main thing here, in my 
opinion (and this is very important today), is to advance not by 
means of an escalation of the arrogant conclusions of verbal 
courage, but rather by means of penetration to the very depths 
of social-legal problems on the basis of accumulated experience, 
a scientific approach and their guaranteed resolution in the 
interests of the person in uniform." 
  Sixth, the successful strengthening of military discipline 
is 
possible only with a well-versed knowledge of its real 
situation. Objective, timely and complete information on 
violations of regulation order, incidents and crimes has great 
significance in this regard. This information should be present 
at all levels of military administration, from the subunit to 
the Ministry of Defense. The organizational measures of 
commanders and staffs of the bodies for indoctrination work at 
all levels should occupy an even more important place in this 
matter. 
  The institution of regulation order, increased exactingness 
toward subordinates, improvement of the system of monitoring and 
the application of disciplinary practice should all be of an 
effective, educational nature. I feel that it is essential that 
the officers of the central apparatus of the Ministry of Defense 
analyze diligently the fulfillment of the requirements of 
orders, directives and instructions pertaining to the 
strengthening of military discipline, make an assessment of the 
organization of that activity by commanders, staffs and bodies 
for indoctrination work, and provide practical assistance on 
this issue during the end-of-training-period performance 
evaluations in the ranks. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46545 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Convene Conference on Measures To Improve Discipline </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Convene Conference on Measures To Improve Discipline </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Kobzar Stresses Moral-Psychological Factors </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0413B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 5 May 94 pp 1-2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0413B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article prepared from a speech by Main Directorate for </F>
Indoctrination and Moral-Psychological Work of the Ministry of 
Defense of Ukraine Chief Lieutenant-General Anatoliy Kobzar to a 
practical-science conference by NARODNA ARMIYA correspondent 
Lieutenant-Colonel Volodymyr But: "We Will Be Able To Reach 
Better Indicators of Military Discipline Only Through Purposeful 
Influence on the Moral-Psychological State of the Troops"] 
  [Text] Analysis of the state of military discipline in the 
Armed Forces of Ukraine shows that no qualitative changes have 
been achieved in this issue. This signifies, first of all, that 
the complex military organism is not working as it should and, 
second, that the forms and methods we have chosen to strengthen 
military discipline have not been effective. 
  The low level of military discipline by no means testifies 
to 
the healthy and strong moral-psychological state of the 
troops--an indicator that, as world experience shows, has no 
less significance for the Armed Forces than modern weaponry. 
  So what the moral-psychological state of the troops mean? It 
is, on a general plane, the set of spiritual qualities of the 
personnel that signifies its conformity to the tasks of military 
service. The moral-psychological state of the troops, that is, 
is reduced to the so-called "human factor," with all of its 
multitude of components. 
  The military person should have not only a national and 
political awareness that is psychologically well grounded and 
emotionally committed to his Fatherland, but should also be well 
fed, dressed, armed and physically and professionally prepared 
for the performance of his duties. The moral-psychological state 
of the troops is based on a whole series of components. We are 
talking first and foremost namely about those, since we are 
primarily interested in the areas of practical work. And the 
components of a strong moral-psychological state, and not its 
traits, goes back to that. 
  Science shows that, first, it is impossible to formulate 
specifically any trait of a strong moral-psychological state, 
and second, that any of these traits can be formulated only 
through all-round influence on all of the constituent elements 
that make it up. In order to form such an integral trait as 
courage, for example, among the personnel, it is necessary to 
foster a thrust toward certain values, psychological tempering 
and physical durability, the people must be well armed, since 
courage relies on confidence in one's powers, and so forth. 
  The indicator of the moral-psychological state encompasses a 
very broad circle of areas of work, and reacts with sensitivity 
to a great many of the factors under which the military person 
operates. It is, that is to say, an integrating indicator in 
which a multitude of components are focused, each of which 
proceeds from the satisfaction of these or those requirements of 
people starting with the biological and ending with the 
spiritual. The level of development of spiritual requirements 
itself is definitive in the evaluation of the 
moral-psychological state. 
  These views lead us to the conclusion that strengthening the 
moral-psychological state of the troops will require work with 
areas that lie outside the jurisdiction of the bodies for 
indoctrination work as well. It must thus be acknowledged that 
overall responsibility for the moral-psychological state of the 
personnel lies with the commander as the chief organizer and 
sole ultimate authority. 
  There exists a fundamentally important general law for us, 
however--the same way that certain factors affect the 
moral-psychological state of the troops, that state also affects 
the perception of any factor in their everyday conditions by the 
personnel, the level of insecurity in housing, a narrow circle 
of association etc. The level of development of spiritual 
requirements and a streamlined system for satisfying them are 
able to compensate for even the substantial problems that 
military-professional activity, and the conduct of combat 
operations in particular, entails. That is why the bodies for 
indoctrination work occupy a central place in the cause of 
strengthening the moral-psychological state of the troops. 
  We will be able to reach a better indicator of the military 
discipline only through purposeful influence on the 
moral-psychological state of the troops. That influence should 
be exercised by all the elements of field command and control. 
The methods of that influence differ in accordance with the 
specific tasks. 
  How can military discipline be maintained at a more or less 
satisfactory level under conditions where the level of 
discipline among the personnel remains low? We have always been 
trying to do just that by directing our efforts in raising 
military discipline mainly toward the creation of conditions 
where an undisciplined--that is, psychologically ready for an 
offense--serviceman was forced to uphold stipulated norms 
through the intensification of monitoring, increased 
exactingness etc. Life has shown that we were not able to 
achieve a radical change in the situation with such an approach. 
  So the way to strengthen military discipline, from the 
scientific point of view, lies in influencing the 
moral-psychological state of the troops as one with the level of 
discipline of the personnel--the main precondition for strong 
military discipline. 
  We understand that educational influences on the personnel 
on 
the part of indoctrination bodies alone are insufficient to 
achieve positive indicators of the moral-psychological state of 
the troops. 
  There is, by the way, another positive element connected 
with 
our orientation toward the concept of the moral-psychological 
state in the cause of strengthening military discipline, as well 
as the fighting ability of the troops--such an orientation 
allows us not to destroy the important components of practical 
work and not to focus on indoctrination alone. 
  We proceed from the fact that the formation of the level of 
discipline as a socio-psychological trait should be accomplished 
at both the conscious and the subconscious levels of each 
individual consciousness. This is achieved in practice thanks to 
the combination of measures of an indoctrinational, including 
ideological, work and measures for the socio-psychological 
support of military service in an interconnected system. 
  Indoctrination work in the Armed Forces is directed toward 
the formation of such personality traits as patriotism, 
ideological loyalty to the cause of building and protecting the 
Ukrainian state, respect for the law, and a conscientious 
attitude toward service obligations. 
  Both commanders at all levels and the corresponding 
officials 
of the bodies for indoctrination work--the deputy commanders, 
ethnic studies specialists, and workers in culture and 
education--are working on namely those tasks. 
  A great deal has been done in particular with regard to the 
development of guiding documents and the institution of 
standards for indoctrination work in the Armed Forces of Ukraine. 
  The standard complements of the Centers for Culture, 
Education and Leisure of the Armed Forces of Ukraine have been 
developed in accordance with the areas and amounts of their 
work. The Minister of Defense has signed the order "The Conduct 
of a Review Competition of the Centers of Culture, Education and 
Leisure, Collectives of Artistic Amateur Activities, Clubs and 
Ethnic-Studies Rooms," the provisions and requirements of which 
have been adopted by the troops for fulfillment, with the aim of 
a qualitative rise in the level of cultural and indoctrination 
work. 
  But it must be acknowledged as a whole that indoctrination 
work on our part is still unfortunately reduced to the ordinary 
informing of the personnel, while it should be emotionally 
amusing, should incite deep passions in servicemen, a historical 
memory of their people, a universal perception of their 
forefathers, and be based on subconscious national traits and 
models of behavior. Then the indoctrination work will bring 
significantly better results in the cause of strengthening the 
moral-psychological state of the troops and the level of 
discipline of the personnel. We are thus directing ourselves 
toward a search for and re-creation of new, vital forms of 
indoctrination work. An organizational structure of the bodies 
for indoctrination work has been developed and incorporated for 
this purpose that makes it possible to encompass all of these 
areas. We are devoting primary attention to the training of 
officials in practical work and the satisfaction of the needs of 
the Armed Forces for methodological support for the work with 
personnel--both in the form of practical recommendations, making 
use for that purpose of the capabilities of the 
Scientific-Research and Methodological Center of the Armed 
Forces of Ukraine and special issues of the newspapers NARODNA 
ARMIYA and ZVYTYAZHETS, and in the form of specialized 
techniques and tests, oriented first and foremost toward those 
questions that are the most pressing. 
  Some questions of practical work require further scientific 
study, which would make it possible to reach a level of support 
of social technologies in work with the personnel. In order for 
the process of transition to those technologies to begin as soon 
as possible, we have ordered and are coordinating the 
corresponding research programs. They are being carried out both 
by our own military specialists, and by leading scholars of the 
Institute of Sociology and Psychology of the Academy of Sciences 
of Ukraine. 
  The question not only of scientific-methodological support 
for the work with personnel, but raising the psychological and 
pedagogical competence of all officer personnel, is an ever more 
pressing one on the agenda. Each officer is an educator and 
pedagogue in the broad understanding of those words, and life 
requires today--and will require in the future--that we place 
emphasis on that. 
  The deputy commander for indoctrination work cannot stand 
apart from the broad circle of questions that pertain one way or 
another to the interests and needs of the person. And this in 
turn requires a reliance on the mechanism for the administration 
of bodies of indoctrination work. We do not have such an 
opportunity today even in some very important areas. The fact is 
that some extremely necessary structures do not even exist, they 
have not been created. I have in mind the departments for 
indoctrination work of the administration of the central 
apparatus of the Ministry of Defense and the General Staff. 
  The definition of indicators for evaluating the quality of 
work of the bodies for military administration in this area, as 
well as the set-up of a system for the corresponding information 
support, that is, a system of accounting for the work, is a 
fundamentally important issue in the cause of strengthening 
military discipline. 
  The importance of this question is connected with the fact 
that it pertains to feedback, without which positive results in 
the activity of administrative bodies cannot be achieved. 
  The principal requirement for any feedback is that it should 
correspond to the substance of the practical work. A scientific 
approach to this question is such, and we are oriented namely 
toward that. Structuring feedback using indicators of the 
quantity of violations of military discipline and crimes is 
renewing the erroneous system of concealment and focus on 
secondary measures and areas of work that will never provide 
stable and profound positive results. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46546 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Attend Conference To Discuss Strengthening Discipline </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Attend Conference To Discuss Strengthening Discipline </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Speakers, Problems, Goals Noted </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0414A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 5 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0414A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Strengthening Law and Order and </F>
Discipline Is a Priority Area in the Activity of Military 
Cadres"] 
  [Text] The "Legal and Socio-Psychological Problems of 
Military Discipline and Regulation Order in the Armed Forces of 
Ukraine and Ways of Strengthening Them Today" practical-science 
conference of the central apparatus of the Ministry of Defense 
was held the other day. 
  Ministry of Defense of Ukraine Main Directorate for 
Indoctrination Work Chief Lieutenant-General Anatoliy Kobzar 
made the opening remarks at the meeting; he stated in particular 
that "the problem of military discipline and law and order in 
the ranks has always attracted the attention of theoreticians 
and practitioners, thanks to which a definite increase can be 
observed every year in knowledge and experience in the study of 
this social aspect of the vital activity of the Army. 
Notwithstanding this, the state of military discipline has grown 
significantly worse, and there exists a steady trend toward 
growth in such types of offenses as evasion of military service, 
the theft of state property and official abuses. The number of 
instances of suicides remains very high in the Army. Life forces 
us to address this problem again and again, and to make an 
attempt to find and realize new reserves to improve 
organizational and indoctrination work. 
  "The practical-science conference was devoted to all of 
these 
issues as well. The task is to study deeply the problems of law 
and order and military discipline, which are becoming more and 
more widespread, by moving beyond the traditional framework and 
encompassing not only purely statistical data, but the host of 
preconditions that give rise to them." 
  He gave the floor to Minister of Defense of Ukraine General 
of the Army of Ukraine Vitaliy Radetskyy for the report, "The 
Moral-Psychological State of the Personnel of the Armed Forces 
and the Activity of the Bodies of Military Administration to 
Strengthen Military Discipline and Law and Order in the Ranks." 
(The report is being published in somewhat abridged form.) 
  Ministry of Defense of Ukraine Main Directorate for 
Indoctrination Work Chief Lieutenant-General Anatoliy Kobzar 
spoke following the report of Minister of Defense of Ukraine 
General of the Army of Ukraine Vitaliy Radetskyy. He devoted his 
presentation to a topical theme for the vital activity of the 
troops: "The Practice of the Utilization of Scientific 
Approaches in the Activity of Bodies for Indoctrination and 
Socio-Psychological Work Directed at Indoctrination and Raising 
the Level of Discipline of the Personnel." 
  As Minister of Defense of Ukraine General of the Army of 
Ukraine Vitaliy Radetskyy indicated in his closing words, a 
serious and productive exchange of opinions took place during 
the practical-science conference with regard to strengthening 
military discipline in the Armed Forces. The conference 
demonstrated that the level of serious scientific study of 
problem issues in the vital activity of the Armed Forces and 
their well-founded analysis has been reached. The participants 
in the conference were able to formulate, in clear-cut and 
scientifically substantiated fashion, new and progressive 
approaches to solving the problem of strengthening military 
discipline. 
  The practical-science conference provided a profound 
analysis 
of the state of discipline in the ranks, and projected the 
principal directions of organizational and indoctrination work 
of the bodies of military administration. The report by Minister 
of Defense of Ukraine General of the Army of Ukraine Vitaliy 
Radetskyy and the speeches of Ministry of Defense of Ukraine 
Main Directorate for Indoctrination Work Chief 
Lieutenant-General Anatoliy Kobzar, Deputy Minister of Defense 
for Rear Services--Chief of Rear Services for the Armed Forces 
of Ukraine Colonel-General Hryhoriy Mikhaylichenko, Deputy 
Minister of Defense for Weaponry--Chief of Weaponry of the Armed 
Forces of Ukraine Colonel-General Ivan Oliynyk, Ministry of 
Defense Main Directorate for Cadres Lieutenant-General Hryhoriy 
Dyachuk, Main Organizational-Mobilization Directorate of the 
General Staff of the Armed Forces Chief Major-General Valeriy 
Venher and other participants in the conference made it possible 
to draw the fundamental conclusion that the level of military 
discipline is defined to a considerable extent by the 
moral-psychological state of the personnel, which reflects the 
needs of the servicemen at a certain moment in time, their 
interests, social points of reference and psycho-physiological 
state, which determines the readiness of people to engage in 
various types of military activity and fulfill the requirements 
of standards and ethics. 
  The leadership of the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine and the 
participants in the practical-science conference feel that the 
following are essential in order to invigorate the work 
pertaining to the establishment of law and order and strong 
military discipline: 
  1. To designate the work pertaining to strengthening law and 
order and discipline as one of the priority areas of activity of 
military cadres at all levels of military supervision. 
  The work system of military cadres with regard to the 
maintenance of strict law and order and conscious discipline in 
the ranks should encompass the principal areas of this activity, 
ascertain and substantiate indicators of the effectiveness of 
the measures that are being carried out, and create 
organizational-social and psychological-pedagogical conditions 
for the formation of a level of discipline among the personnel. 
  2. The organizational work of commanders, staffs and bodies 
for indoctrination work should be concentrated on eliminating 
the causes that worsen the moral-psychological state of the 
personnel and, as a consequence, cause violations of the norms 
of regulations for service activity. 
  3. The indoctrination work of commanders and senior officers 
of all levels should promote the formation and development of 
such individual qualities as discipline among servicemen. The 
underpinnings for that should be the pedagogization of all 
spheres of military activity and individual indoctrination work, 
which should be of a preventive nature. 
  4. The efforts of military scholars and social-sciences 
scholars, in collaboration with scientists at prominent 
scientific institutions of Ukraine, should promote the formation 
and incarnation within the Armed Forces of the ideology of the 
Ukrainian state--an ideology of public patriotism with the 
person and his life, rights and freedoms at its center. 
  5. The efforts of bodies of military administration should 
be 
directed toward the achievement of a solid interconnection 
between Ukrainian society and the Armed Forces of Ukraine, 
through active collaboration and interaction with all of the 
public organizations of Ukraine to the benefit of state 
interests. 
  6. The bodies for indoctrination work, together with 
commanders, must focus their efforts on the formation of 
positive military traditions and rituals within the military 
collectives. The development of a system of measures with regard 
to moral incentives to stimulate the service activity of 
servicemen of various categories would be expedient. 
  7. Commanders and superior officers at all levels, together 
with the cadre bodies of the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine, 
must uphold the principle of social justice during the naming of 
servicemen to official positions. It is important to be guided 
therein by professional competence, high moral qualities and 
experience in the service of military cadres, with the broadest 
possible enlistment in this work of the officers' assemblies and 
their conduct with a regard for public opinion. 
  8. Military scholars must launch the profound development of 
a program with regard to the study, analysis and strengthening 
of the moral-psychological state of the troops. 
  9. The Main Directorate for Indoctrination Work must 
invigorate the activity of its sociological structures for the 
purpose of obtaining objective and prompt information on the 
moral-psychological state of the personnel in the Armed Forces 
of Ukraine. 
  It would be expedient to be guided, during the evaluation of 
the state of military discipline in subordinate troops, by 
criteria that are clearly formulated by the corresponding 
guiding documents. 
  The leaders of the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine and the 
participants in the practical-science conference expressed the 
hope that the generals and officers of the central apparatus of 
the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine will be actively involved in 
the work to establish strong law and order and conscious 
military discipline in the ranks, and will display creativity, 
exactingness and discipline therein. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46547 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Leaders Attend Conference To Discuss Strengthening Discipline </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Leaders Attend Conference To Discuss Strengthening Discipline </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Rear Services Head Mikhaylichenko on Supply, Support Problems </H4>

<F P=102> 94UM0414B Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Ukrainian 6 May 94 pp 1-3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0414B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Ukrainian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Deputy Minister of Defense for Rear </F>
Services--Chief of Rear Services for the Armed Forces of Ukraine 
Colonel-General Hryhoriy Mikhaylichenko: "Answering for the 
Vital Activity of the Troops"] 
  [Text] The maintenance of high combat readiness and the 
necessary level of military discipline and organization in 
formations and units is directly connected with the full and 
timely satisfaction of the everyday material requirements of the 
personnel. The necessary material base for the resolution of 
these tasks exists within the Armed Forces of Ukraine, and it 
must be constantly maintained in a viable state. 
  It is very hard to do that under contemporary conditions, 
however, since the decline in production in the state is having 
a negative effect on logistical supply for the troops as well. 
  Resolution of questions of rear support is becoming more and 
more difficult owing to the limited financing of the Army. The 
funds allocated do not provide for even the vital needs of the 
troops. The indebtedness to enterprises and late payments for 
the receipt of materials are leading to cutbacks in the output 
of products that are needed by the Armed Forces. The Ministry of 
Defense is squandering the industrial capacity of enterprises 
that were created over many years, and it will be very difficult 
to restore it. 
  A significant quantity of food products is being received 
from suppliers without payment, as a consequence of which the 
indebtedness of the Armed Forces is increasing. The suppliers 
are in turn imposing penalties that total more than four billion 
karbovantsi a day. And who is suffering the losses? The Armed 
Forces once again! Funds cannot be allocated in this case for 
the development of the material base of the troops or improving 
the social conditions of the servicemen. The suppliers of 
Kharkiv, Poltava, Luhansk and Chernihivsk oblasts are refusing 
to supply the troops with meat, eggs and other foodstuffs. The 
food reserves at central and district warehouses have decreased 
sharply, which is leading in turn to disruptions in the supply 
of foodstuffs to the personnel in accordance with established 
supply norms. We thus see the way out for the resolution of the 
tasks that face the rear services of the Armed Forces of Ukraine 
in the arrangement of logistical support for the troops with 
food, mat&eacute;riel, fuels, medical equipment and medicines, 
and 
the resolution of a whole set of social problems that touch on 
the interests of all categories of servicemen. 
  The leadership of the Armed Forces of Ukraine, under these 
difficult conditions, is taking every step with regard to 
improving the supply of foodstuffs to the servicemen. Tobacco 
products have been issued to the conscript servicemen as of 1 
January 1994. Those who do not smoke are permitted to receive 
monetary compensation in the amount of the value of the 
corresponding class of cigarettes. 
  Concern for quality food for the servicemen is constantly at 
the center of attention of the rear-support command at all 
levels. The food is prepared in tasty and varied fashion in most 
of the mess halls of military units. 
  A corresponding program is being developed with the aim of 
further improvements in the organization of food, which provides 
in particular for: 
  --the establishment of a unified day for the food service in 
the Armed Forces of Ukraine (the second Wednesday of each 
month). The monitored demonstration preparation of food, 
exchange of experience in the preparation of various dishes, 
especially Ukrainian cuisine, and the exhibition of dishes and 
confectionery and flour items are all performed on that day; 
  --the model upkeep of mess halls, a rise in the standards 
for 
eating and the straightening out of the schedule of mess hall 
operation; 
  --expansion of the assortment in the preparation of dishes, 
so that dishes are not repeated more than twice in a week; 
cutlets, meat patties and schnitzels are prepared no less than 
two or three times; flour items are baked one or two times; 
  --a competitive inspection is conducted every year for the 
best soldiers', sailors' and cadets' mess halls in garrisons, 
formations, large units and military districts of the branches 
of the Armed Forces of Ukraine; 
  --radical improvement in the training and placement of 
cadres 
in the food service. Only officers who have special education 
are to be named to the positions of chief of the service, and 
chiefs of the food service and mess halls are to be released 
from all types of details; 
  --the salary of the chiefs of mess halls are set at grade 9; 
the most responsible and conscientious warrant officers are to 
be named to that position; 
  --the certification of the culinary personnel of military 
mess halls by commissions of the military units is performed 
twice a year after the training periods. Up to 50 percent of the 
standard quantity of cooks may be women who have a motherly 
attitude toward the soldiers and prepare dishes with higher 
quality; 
  --increased everyday monitoring of the completeness of the 
issue of food and the reaching of stipulated consumption norms 
for the personnel. Every military mess hall shall equip a 
monitoring corner in a suitable manner for this purpose. The 
deputy commanders of units for rear support will conduct a 
session with the supervisory personnel and rear-support 
employees once every quarter with regard to monitoring the 
organization of food and the preparation of dishes; 
  --the development and entry into force of the "Uniform 
Requirements for the Organization and Upkeep of Military Mess 
Halls" and the "Instructions for Monitoring Military Catering." 
  I would like to direct your attention herein to the fact 
that 
notwithstanding all of the difficulties, our conscript 
servicemen are not eating all that badly. They receive 200 grams 
of meat, 100 grams of fish, 100 grams of milk, 30 grams of 
cream, 70 grams of sugar, 750 grams of bread, 900 grams of 
vegetables and potatoes a day, and four eggs a week and other 
foods as well. 
  Proper eating plays a large role in improving health care. 
All of the medical treatment facilities are for that reason 
supplied with fish, milk and dairy products, fresh vegetables 
and fruits, pork, meat from livestock and poultry first and 
foremost. 
  A vivid demonstration of the concern of the state for its 
protectors is the fulfillment of the Law of Ukraine "The Social 
and Legal Protection of Servicemen and the Members of Their 
Families." The institution of the issue of a food ration also 
testifies to this. The rear support for the Armed Forces is 
making no small effort to fulfill that task, launching 
broad-scale work on military sovkhozes and the subsidiary plots 
of units. The food obtained thereby goes for the consumption of 
the troops. Real improvements in food supply for the servicemen, 
however, requires continuous and regular financing first of all. 
We are thankful to the many representatives of the President and 
the heads of the local industrial enterprises who are assisting 
us with the provision of dishes and mess hall equipment and its 
repair. 
  The enterprises of military trade play a large role in 
improving the food situation. Fresh vegetables and fruits and 
confectionery items are being found in the solders' pots first 
and foremost. 
  The summer trade of cold drinks and frozen and baked items 
will be organized at all military compounds as of May 1. 
  The medical service of the Armed Forces of Ukraine is 
working 
on improving medical support for servicemen. A new standard 
organizational structure is being instituted in the hospitals, 
which provides for the offering of specialized medical 
assistance. The possibility is being considered of offering it 
to the members of the families of servicemen and employees of 
the Armed Forces of Ukraine. The existing method of research for 
flight medical evaluations is being reviewed, and fundamentally 
new approaches to the individual assessment of the state of 
health, psycho-physiological condition of pilots and specialists 
of the flight operations control groups for each flight shift 
are being developed. A database for all personnel is being 
created under the program of medical support. 
  The physical plant of the service is also being developed. 
The construction of treatment wings at military hospitals 
located in Kovel, Kharkiv and Odessa is underway, along with 
diagnostic wings at Vinnytsya and Rivne. A great deal of 
attention is being paid to improving health-resort treatment. 
The construction of a diagnostics and treatment center at the 
Shklo military sanatorium is continuing for that purpose, along 
with overnight wings at the Truskavetskyy and Yevpatoriya 
children's sanatoria and a mess hall for 1,000 at the Frunzenske 
sanatorium. 
  The medical personnel are also putting a great deal of 
effort 
into providing the military infirmaries, hospitals and sanatoria 
with medicines and medical mat&eacute;riel, and acquiring new 
diagnostics and treatment apparatus. The insufficient funding, 
however, is impeding the resolution of those tasks. 
  As vexing as it may be to talk about, the bath and laundry 
support for the troops has worsened considerably of late. The 
units and institutions have nothing with which to pay off the 
bath and laundry enterprises. And they have too few funds to 
obtain detergents and equipment, or for the prompt payment of 
wages to their employees or to pay for municipal services. But 
what is more, the Armed Forces are indebted for more than 50 
billion karbovantsi to the enterprises of light industry for 
mat&eacute;riel received. The conscript servicemen are already 
wearing out their uniforms, but the mills have not even been 
paid for them yet. 
  The lack of funds makes it impossible to reach agreements 
with enterprises for the manufacture of mat&eacute;riel for 1994, 
although four months have already passed. The availability of 
some types of mat&eacute;riel at warehouses makes it possible to 
supply only the spring draft of young replacements and to shift 
to the wearing of summer dress. 
  The military uniform has always been one of the most 
important attributes of armed formations. 
  It can be reported today with all certainty that the new 
uniforms for the Armed Forces of Ukraine have been created and 
are being introduced. 
  They will be manufactured in the first half of this year for 
graduates of military institutes and schools, and for generals 
and officers of the central apparatus of the Ministry of 
Defense. The capabilities of the textile mills and combines to 
sew the uniforms for military trade provide for the sewing of 
new uniforms for other categories of servicemen as well. The 
lack of funds for the procurement of measured material, however, 
is unfortunately restraining this process. 
  The papakhas for the colonels have been left thanks to a 
host 
of requests. It is, after all, a long historical tradition of 
the Ukrainian Cossacks, and its replacement would have a 
negative effect not only on the servicemen, but on other 
segments of the population as well, as was indicated 
unequivocably in the mass media. Many complaints were received 
from some superior officers and servicemen with regard to the 
introduction of leather overcoats for generals. I assure you 
that the sewing of leather overcoat for generals is done only by 
request and only for a fee. 
  A series of measures is being instituted to improve the 
military uniform of cadets, which is, by the way, as close as 
possible to an officer's. They will be issued everyday uniforms 
in camouflage coloring as of 1 September 1994. Changes have also 
been made in the insignia. A new brass buckle is being developed 
in place of the "claw" buckle. 
  Shoes with high shins are being issued to conscript 
servicemen instead of the canvas high-tops. The overcoats are 
being replaced by a jacket from cape fabric, and the parade and 
open jackets with a dress jacket. 
  The discharge of conscript servicemen into the reserves at 
their request is permitted in parade dress, everyday field 
uniform that they are wearing or, in special cases, in civilian 
dress. 
  Servicemen who are entering service under contract in the 
positions of soldier or sergeant are provided only with the 
items of the field uniform according to the season during the 
trial period. 
  The rear support of the Armed Forces is taking a series of 
measures to improve the municipal-services support for 
servicemen in extended service. The use of military bathhouses 
and the services of the military unit support services combines 
is permitted for them and the members of their families, as well 
as hair cutting at non-regulation barber shops. 
  A very difficult situation has taken shape surrounding the 
provision of the troops with fuels and lubricants. The lack of 
funds for the procurement of the necessary quantity of fuel is 
reducing the training of flight personnel and drivers, which is 
having a negative effect on the combat readiness of the troops. 
Air defense units stationed a distance of 10--15 km or more from 
populated areas do not even have enough fuel to take the 
children to school, or the servicemen to their service locations. 
  Another problem must also be kept in mind--200 various types 
of fuels and lubricants are employed in the military hardware of 
the Armed Forces of Ukraine. More than 150 of those types are 
not manufactured at the enterprises of Ukraine. The State 
Committee of Ukraine for Oil and Gas has refused to supply us 
with them for the last two years. The supply of fuels and 
lubricants has improved somewhat thanks to repeated appeals by 
the Ministry of Defense to the Cabinet of Ministers. The 
Ukrnaftoprodukt Association is ready to assume the entire 
obligation of providing the Armed Forces with fuels and 
lubricants. The ultimate resolution of this issue, however, 
depends on the availability of funds that the Ministry of 
Defense does not have at this time... 
  We are collecting funds in karbovantsi under these difficult 
conditions so as to at least somehow support the vital activity 
of the troops. We are leasing empty tank capacity, arranging the 
output of lubricants using our own manpower, and obtaining fuel 
through barter transactions. These measures, however, cover only 
a paltry portion of requirements, and are not solving the 
problem. Orders and directives have moreover been sent to the 
troops along with recommendations on restricting the consumption 
of fuels, economizing them, making widespread use of simulators, 
and various types of reductions in the number of trucks in the 
transport groups. 
  There are already tight restrictions on the use of passenger 
cars. Limits have been introduced for the expenditure of fuels 
and the service lives of motors, and an efficient system of 
centralized shipment of cargo is being developed. The system of 
logistical support is being reviewed so as to reduce the 
distance of shipment of cargo and the consumption of fuel, and 
new storage areas are being created at the bases of troop that 
are subject to disbanding, along with other measures. 
  Hasty and poorly thought-out decisions are having negative 
consequences in many cases. The commercialization of military 
trade is an example of this. The sale and leasing of those 
enterprises and stores has caused large losses, turning military 
trade from profitable into beggarly. Only thanks to the 
considerable efforts of the Minister of Defense of Ukraine and 
Edict No. 41/94 of the President of Ukraine of 10 February 1994 
has this campaign been halted for the social protection of the 
servicemen, first and foremost the conscript servicemen, as well 
as to improve the trade and domestic support for the troops, 
especially those at remote or closed locations. 
  The leaders of military trade, notwithstanding all of the 
difficulties, have resolved the task of seeking out the goods of 
prime necessity, starting with sewing needles and ending with 
complex technical groups of goods. It is worth noting that most 
of the collectives have met their targets for the trade and 
domestic support of military formations. 
  The difficult situation has also had an effect on the 
provision of servicemen in the Air Forces and the Air Defense 
Forces with everything they need. The rear services have been 
occupied there only with supporting flights and combat 
readiness, while the question of material and domestic support 
has always been relegated to the background. Two groups of 
rear-support specialists of the Armed Forces have been created 
today that are studying the actual circumstances of those 
troops, and are taking steps to improve the living and domestic 
conditions of servicemen and provide them with the necessary 
mat&eacute;riel. 
  The rear-services inspectorate of the Armed Forces of 
Ukraine 
is working intensively. The theft of the people's property has 
been curtailed thanks to its resolute and principled work, and 
funds have been supplemented at the expense of those guilty of 
waste, shortages and abuses. A number of officials guilty of 
abuses of their official positions and excessive spending have 
been relieved of their duties, and the criminal cases have been 
turned over to the military procuracy. 
  The central bodies of the rear support for the Armed Forces 
of Ukraine are staffed by highly qualified officers who are 
capable of organizing the rear support for the troops. 
  I say to the parents of the servicemen not to worry about 
your sons. We can assure you that there will be no disruptions 
in food supply, medical care and the provision of 
mat&eacute;riel. 
If there are problems in some places with questions of 
logistical support or complaints regarding the poor quality of 
the food, we ask you to write to the address 252063, city 
of Kiev, Dehtyarivska St., Deputy Minister of Defense of Ukraine 
for Rear Services--Chief of Rear Services for the Armed Forces 
of Ukraine. Or telephone at (044) 213-72-61. 
  I promise that immediate steps to end those problems and 
improve the state of affairs will be undertaken. 
  I appeal to the leaders of local authorities at all levels 
to 
find an opportunity to allocate plots of land to servicemen for 
their own gardening activity, so that they will be able to 
provide their families with potatoes and vegetables. 
  The heads of the kolkhozes and sovkhozes of military units 
are ready to provide accommodations and assistance in equipping 
stores for the sale of their products at military 
compounds--milk, meat, eggs, vegetables--which will be mutually 
advantageous for both parties. We have agreed to take into the 
Agriculture Directorate of Rear Services for the Armed Forces 
the kolkhozes and sovkhozes that have lost faith in their 
existence. Assistance will be granted on our part. 
  The leaders of the Ministry of Defense and Rear Services for 
the Armed Forces of Ukraine are working nonstop. A constant 
search is underway, as can be seen, for ways of solving complex 
problems, increasing the maneuverability and steadfastness of 
support and service units, and finding sources of extrabudgetary 
financing for the measures being pursued in the Armed Forces. 
  I would like to emphasize, in summing up the aforementioned, 
that the complexity of the problems that have arisen cannot 
diminish our perseverance in the cause of building the Armed 
Forces of an independent Ukraine. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46548 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> UKRAINE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Officers Called Upon To Improve Staff Skills </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Officers Called Upon To Improve Staff Skills </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0461A Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA in Russian 4 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0461A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Col. Georgiy Kostenko, academician, under "How </F>
Should the Army of Ukraine Be?": "The General and the Lieutenant 
Both Need Training, or on the Problems in the Formation of the 
Staff Skills of the Officer Personnel of the Armed Forces"] 
  [Text] In analyzing and comparing World War II 
documents, historians throughout the world note a high level of 
staff skills of officers of the Red Army, which at that time 
predetermined a common understanding of the orders and 
directives from the supreme commander down to the platoon leader 
and in our time a high readability of front documents. Approved 
and crystallized in the battles of the Great Patriotic War, 
staff skills have subsequently become that quality indicator 
that defines the degree of professionalism of officers. 
  In the process of the development of the Armed Forces 
of Ukraine, our officers have a unique opportunity not only to 
bring their staff skills up to world standards but also to give 
them a national coloring. Unfortunately, this is not happening. 
The author of these lines, being chairman and member of 
certification boards at different levels and also being involved 
through the nature of his work in the study of official 
documents, has reached an alarming conclusion: today it is 
necessary to speak not only of the further improvement of staff 
skills of officers of command and control agencies but also of 
their partial restoration. 
  Staff skills are a constant factor that represents the 
totality of theoretical knowledge and practical skills that the 
officer needs to perform his official duties. This does not 
contradict military art, which includes the theory and practice 
of command and control of forces. In addition, regardless of the 
position held, the staff skills of the officer are characterized 
by system knowledge of questions having to do with his immediate 
functions, by the continuous search for new knowledge and more 
advanced practical skills within the limits of the position held 
and for a step higher, and also by the possession of the means 
to perform duties on the basis of interchangeability. 
  The qualitative indicators that best characterize the 
genuine 
staff skills of the officer are knowledge of the achievements of 
contemporary military thought; the ability to collect and 
analyze the necessary information in a timely manner and to make 
the correct conclusions, proposals, and recommendations; and the 
capability to comprehend adequately the intention of the 
commander (chief) and ability to put his decision into effect 
through means guaranteeing a common understanding by all 
subordinates. Knowledge of the balance of secrets in his field 
of professional interests makes it possible for the officer 
dependably to keep secrets entrusted to him and not to overload 
regime agencies with obsolete information. The lowering of staff 
skills is a sign of the decline of the professionalism of the 
officer, which is fraught with the danger of his performance of 
official duties at an amateur level. 
  Each of the indicators enumerated above could be the subject 
of a separate conversation. But the intention of the present 
notes is to show the basic reason for the lowering of staff 
skills and to propose a simple, effective, and inexpensive means 
of improving them in the command and control agencies of all 
levels. The assertion that it is possible to establish an 
effective mechanism of military development in the absence of 
the corresponding skills of the officers is the result of 
incorrect thinking and profound error. 
  The lowering of staff skills is the result of a set of 
objective and subjective reasons. And as bitter as it may be, it 
should be recognized that the determining reason is the second 
one, which is expressed in diminished interest in comtemporary 
military theory. It is not difficult to see that inadequate 
immersion in the theory of the subject is the basis for the 
complex situations in which individual leaders find themselves 
who try to carry out partial reforms outside of the state 
program for the development of the armed forces. In the period 
of intensive military development as one of the components of 
the development of the state, knowledge of current theory of his 
subject of professional interests is the basic indicator of the 
staff skills of the officer and a criterion for the assessment 
of his professionalism. Errors at the theoretical level lead in 
practice to economic expenditures that are inadmissible for us 
today. 
  The negligence of the command and control agency is the 
other 
side of the low staff skills of its officer personnel. I dare 
express the unpopular idea that the responsibility for the poor 
performance today must be assigned equally to the author of the 
document and to the command agency that is directed to carry it 
out. If for guidance use is made of a document wherein it is 
impossible to clarify the content of the subject, then there is 
no answer to the question: "What is to be done?" and, the main 
thing, if there is no clear determination of the final result of 
the activity, then such a document was based on negligence in 
the planning stage. Personal conversations with the developers 
of such schemes permit one to reach the depressing conclusion 
that they have a negative attitude toward military theory as the 
highest form of organization of military knowledge. 
  Is there an effective way to raise the staff skills of all 
categories of officers? From 1979 through 1989, I carried out 
investigations in the course of 46 operational-tactical, 
command-staff, tactical, mobilization, testing, and experimental 
exercises, including 9 with field firing. My conclusion is that 
an exercise on any scale carried out without preliminary 
theoretical preparation of the officer personnel comes close to 
an experimental exercise not in form but in content and this is 
the reason for its poor results. And there is another aspect of 
such organization of exercises. To analyze exercises with 
theoretically untrained personnel is ignorant from a pedagogical 
point of view and immoral from an ethical point of view. 
  To raise staff skills, it is necessary to give back to 
officer personnel their striving for in-depth theoretical 
knowledge on the subject of their professional interests. For 
this there is a simple, effective, and inexpensive 
mechanism--preliminary conferences and seminars on the subject 
of the pending exercises and training drills. Such a mechanism 
is effective because of the consistent integration of theory and 
practice and the possibility of approving the corresponding 
theoretical positions under the conditions of Ukraine with their 
subsequent adjustment and the refinement of existing plans. 
Today this has one other rather important meaning. To begin an 
exercise or training drill without preliminary theoretical study 
of the theme is wasteful from an economic point of view and 
useless from a juridical point of view, because in the near 
future the conditions of contract service will prohibit taking 
personnel out into the field without preliminary theoretical 
training. 
  In the intervals between exercises and training drills, 
up-to-date staff skills of the officer are developed through his 
assimilation of the theory of the subject of his professional 
interests in the process of daily creative labor and initiative. 
  In conclusion, I would like once again to stress that staff 
skills can be raised only if the officers assimilate current 
military theory. There is no other way. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46549 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> CAUCASIAN STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   RF Troops Serve as Armenia's Border Guards </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    RF Troops Serve as Armenia's Border Guards </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1391A Yerevan GOLOS ARMENII in Russian 7 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1391A </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan GOLOS ARMENII </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Lieutenant Colonel Pavel Ilin, deputy chief </F>
of a border detachment for personnel, by Vladimir Arutyunyan, 
special correspondent of GOLOS ARMENII for the Shirak region; 
place and date not given: "The Mission of the Border 
Troops--Defense of the Interests of Russia and the Guarding of 
the Exterior Borders of the CIS"] 
  [Text] Since the start of the 19th century 
Gyumri-Aleksandropol had always been regarded as a most 
important strategic point on the southern borders of the Russian 
Empire. And in Soviet times also Leninakan was "singled out" in 
a military respect. The permanent presence of quite a tangible 
contingent of military always creates a distinctive atmosphere 
and makes its mark on the tenor of urban life. Gyumri has always 
treated people in military uniform with affection and respect. 
But even against this background the border guards were a 
special, privileged caste, as it were. As we know, according to 
a number of agreements, the guarding of the "exterior" border of 
Armenia (with Turkey and Iran) has been entrusted to units of 
the border forces of the Russian Federation. On 20 May the 
Gyumri border detachment celebrated its 70th anniversary. On 
this occasion and in connection with the fact that 28 May is 
Border Guards Day we decided to meet with a representative of 
the Gyumri Border Detachment and chat about the present times. 
Our interlocutor is Lieutenant Colonel Pavel Igorevich Ilin, 
deputy chief of the border detachment for personnel and work 
with the staff. 
  [Arutyunyan] A few words about the history of the 
detachment, 
if you will. 
  [Ilin] Our detachment, the oldest on the territory of 
Armenia, was formed in 1924. Two heroes of the Soviet Union: 
Colonel Dudko, who fell in the fighting for Berlin, and Colonel 
Leonov, chief of the detachment, who was posthumously awarded 
the title of hero of the Soviet Union for the events of 15-16 
March 1969 on Damanskiy Island on the Ussuri River, were raised 
here. 
  [Arutyunyan] Previously the border troops were officially 
called the border troops of the USSR KGB. What is the troops' 
present status and what is their place in the overall system of 
the armed forces of Russia? 
  [Ilin] Our relationship with the Armed Forces is relatively 
undefined. An edict of the president of Russia has formed the 
Federal Border Service, which is subordinate to the president of 
the Russian Federation directly. 
  [Arutyunyan] It is symbolic that your holiday--Border Guards 
Day--coincides in Armenia with our national 
holiday--Independence Day. And independence begins with the 
sanctity of the border. How in this sense do you see the 
functions and missions of the border troops of Russia stationed 
in Armenia? 
  [Ilin] The status and functions of the border troops here 
are 
defined by mutual agreements between the Russian Federation and 
the Republic of Armenia. And the border troops' mission is to 
defend Russia's interests on the territory of the Republic of 
Armenia and to guard the exterior borders of the CIS--in this 
case, the border with Turkey. And, in accordance with the 
agreement, the troops are deployed here to carry out this 
mission. 
  [Arutyunyan] We have already observed that there has always 
been a friendly attitude toward the border guards in our city. 
How are relations shaping up with the authorities and the public 
currently? 
  [Ilin] We are building relations with the authorities at 
practically all levels--from the leadership of the rayons 
through Mr. Kocharyan, authorized government representative for 
the Shirak zone. 
  They consider all our problems their own. And they settle 
practically all the questions that we put to them for support 
for the guarding of the borders. In the past 18 months there 
have been no conflict situations with the local populace or any 
provocations in respect to the border guards. We met just before 
the detachment's anniversary with the leaders of almost all 
enterprises of the city, and they all expressed a single 
thought: The ties of sponsorship that had been established back 
in the so-called stagnation times needed to be restored and more 
meetings with representatives of the enterprises and 
organizations needed to be held. We have already reserved 
sponsorship for some enterprises. 
  [Arutyunyan] The image of the border guard was for many 
years 
here associated with that of the fair-haired Russian type. What 
is the national composition of your detachment, say, now? 
  [Ilin] Representatives of 26-28 nationalities have 
customarily served in our detachment. There are now, in fact, 
just two--Russians and Armenians. More precisely, when draftees 
come from Russia, we come across Bashkirs, say, but mainly 
representatives of the two nationalities (we would add that the 
fact that Armenians also serve in the unit could have been 
guessed without the clarifying question: almost 100 vehicles at 
the gate of the unit and attempts to squeeze through the gate 
and the fence, with a throng at the checkpoint, in a word, the 
painfully familiar native "Armenian landscape"--V.A.). 
  [Arutyunyan] We know from past years that the so-called 
border regime was quite strict. What kind of changes have there 
been in the essence of the border regime? 
  [Ilin] By a decision of the Government of Armenia a number 
of 
forces that used to enter the border zone now no longer do so, 
and the procedure of the drafting of the papers for crossing the 
line of engineer structures has been simplified. We are now 
seeing, however, and the local leadership has appealed to us 
repeatedly in this connection, that it is altogether necessary 
to tighten the regime. This applies particularly to the area of 
the Akhuryanskoye Reservoir and questions of fishing. For the 
inhabitants of some villages have been issued permits for 
agricultural work beyond the line of the engineer structures, 
and they are not cultivating the land but fishing. On the other 
hand, not a tightening up exactly but simply greater strictness 
in the permit procedure is required. Because Turkey remains 
Turkey, and questions of the safety of the inhabitants that work 
in the vicinity of the border cannot be left unattended. 
  [Arutyunyan] Are the violations of the border and 
provocations from "that side" frequent? 
  [Ilin] There are violations both on the part of Turkey and 
from our rear. 
  [Arutyunyan] More detail, if you can: What are the 
violations 
from the rear? 
  [Ilin] These are mainly mentally defective people. If we 
take 
the border itself, however, we have on the part of the 
contiguous territory the rustling of livestock and a violation 
of the border regime almost daily. Rustling of livestock on our 
territory. This also remains at the level of protests as yet--on 
the part of the border commissar. 
  [Arutyunyan] Do such generally quite petty phenomena pursue 
the actual aim of inflaming the atmosphere or are these simply 
chance occurrences? 
  [Ilin] I would not say that the atmosphere on the border is 
being inflamed on Turkey's part today, I could not today say 
this. But there are instances of a violation of the border 
regime that pursue the goal of a test of our strength and of the 
border that we guard. Flights by Turkish combat aircraft along 
the border, say. 
  [Arutyunyan] Living conditions in Armenia are quite 
difficult 
today. What is life like for the detachment under these 
conditions? 
  [Ilin] We are attempting first and foremost to resolve the 
lighting problem. There are border posts that have not had 
lighting for months. In connection with the agreement signed on 
15 March in Yerevan, the Government of Armenia has now allocated 
us cash for the local purchase of flour and to pay for the 
water, lighting, and the products of the meat-packing plant that 
we purchase. But this is not enough for us, all the same. In 
accordance with this agreement, Armenia will assume 50 percent 
of the expenses on the maintenance of the troops, and the amount 
that Armenia should contribute for the upkeep of the troops and 
the border military units on the territory of Armenia has been 
determined. There are problems with firewood and coal. The 
firewood problem is being resolved, it would seem, the coal 
problem, no. We are supplied with gasoline from Russia. There is 
no water at all at our base in the village of Akhurchik, there 
is no water supply. 
  [Arutyunyan] And how has the question of the employment and 
education of the members of the families of the border guards 
been resolved? 
  [Ilin] There is always work for our wives in the detachment, 
this problem has been resolved. Positions to enable women to 
work, on contract included, have been determined at the border 
posts. We have our own kindergarten and our own high school, 
which is attached to School 25 of the city of Sochi. We 
recruited the teachers on a competitive basis--95 percent of 
them are local, and there is a professor and candidate of 
sciences. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46550 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> CAUCASIAN STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Forced Roundup of Conscripts Seen Harmful </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Forced Roundup of Conscripts Seen Harmful </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1297A Yerevan AZG in Armenian 7 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1297A </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan AZG </F>
<F P=105>  Armenian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Editorial: "Armies and Battlefronts Cannot Be Run With </F>
Roundups"] 
  [Text] What is happening today in the capital's streets, 
roads, bus and metro stations, markets and coffee shops is 
beyond anyone's imagination. Classic Armenian disorganization 
and cottage-industry and self-enterprise mentality could not 
have taken a worse form than the means that have been "selected" 
for the organization of the current conscription drive. At 
virtually every step men, especially young ones, are targeted 
for roundups that use the crudest methods: force, brutality and 
disparagement. What is being done behind slogans of defending 
the fatherland and mobilizing the Army is discrediting the 
entire essence of this worthy program. As a result, neither the 
Army can be properly mobilized nor can the defense of the 
borders of the fatherland become more sound. Instead, fear, 
panic and demoralization may overtake people's minds, perhaps in 
an irreversible manner. 
  What is most disturbing, however, is not the roundups but 
the 
mistrust which follows them. In the past few days our office has 
received numerous reports that the individuals who are in charge 
of these "operations" rob and plunder indiscriminately 
everyone--those who are liable as well as those who are not 
liable for military service--with insatiable enthusiasm. Our 
information about the seizure of cash and jewelry and the 
collection of bribes in American dollars has already gone beyond 
the limits of rumors. Strong protests are heard especially from 
those who cannot afford to "liberate" their kin, because they 
think that if they had the means their sons and husbands would 
not be taken to the Army and that the defense of the Army would 
not have turned into a "merchants'" business. 
  Yes, mistrust rules everywhere, and the minister of state 
responsible for defense [Vazgen Sargsyan] could not dispel that 
mistrust with his well-known television address. He could not 
dispel it by presenting the conscription drive as a personal, 
almost private, task to the people without taking into account 
Armenia's morale and psychological state, the socioeconomic 
condition of the people, the presence of foreign influences that 
corrupt the young, the natural fear of military service and 
especially the political capital that the ruling group has lost 
amongst the people. 
  Since there is no organization or press organ which opposes 
a 
strong army and a sound defense, an important task such as the 
conscription drive should have been arranged pannationally as 
befits a state in a truly organized and professional manner with 
the appropriate propaganda. 
  Otherwise, with the current foul means we can have neither a 
combat-ready army nor a sound defense. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46551 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> CAUCASIAN STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Pilot Sentenced to Death in Nagorno-Karabakh </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Pilot Sentenced to Death in Nagorno-Karabakh </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0457A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 28 May 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0457A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liana Minasyan, under rubric "Justice": </F>
"Nagorno-Karabakh Republic Military Tribunal Sentences Yuriy 
Belichenko to Death: Radical Party Attempts To Save the 
Mercenary"] 
  [Text] Yuriy Belichenko, a military pilot who was sentenced 
four days ago by the Nagorno-Karabakh Republic Military Tribunal 
in accordance with the articles pertaining to "premeditated 
murder under aggravating circumstances" and for the "inflicting 
of material damage of an especially large scale" (213 million 
rubles in August 1992 prices), has been sentenced to death. He 
participated in bombings by the Azerbaijani air forces of 
villages in Mardakertskiy Rayon, which led to losses of human 
life and large amounts of destruction. Belichenko, who formally 
is considered to be a citizen of Ukraine (where he was called up 
into the Soviet Army of that period), and served in Azerbaijan. 
After the collapse of the USSR and the withdrawal of Russian 
troops, he continued to serve there. His aircraft was shot down 
after a combat sortie and, according to the data in the 
investigation, the pilot admitted that he had been recruited for 
$10,000 monthly, plus a bonus for successful bombing. 
  Incidentally, there is another pilot -- true, a Russian one, 
Chistyakov -- who is in a similar situation. The only difference 
is that the court that is trying him in Stepanakert is still in 
session and the sentence has not yet been pronounced. 
Belichenko, however, is left with the possibility of requesting 
the presidium of the NKR [Nagorno-Karabakh Republic] Supreme 
Council to pardon him, but, according to data provided by the 
miliary procurator, such a request has not yet been made. 
  According to certain information, the Ukrainian authorities 
have not shown any interest in Belichenko's fate, despite his 
formal Ukrainian citizenship. The reason that they give is that 
his actions were the consequence of a personal choice and that 
he himself bears the responsibility for them. As a mercenary, 
this pilot cannot be recognized as a prisoner of war, and the 
laws governing the protection of prisoners of war do not extend 
to him. 
  Nevertheless Belichenko's wife, who now lives with their 
children in Krasnodar Kray, has sent telegrams to Russian 
minister of foreign affairs Kozyrev and to the Karabakh 
authorities, requesting them to take part in her husband's fate. 
Something that can serve as a formal precedent for such 
participation is the situation involving six Russian mercenaries 
who were sentenced to death in Baku for having participated in 
combat actions on the side of the Karabakh Armenians. At that 
time they were handed over to the Russian authorities in 
exchange for several Azerbaijanis who had been taken prisoner. 
Karabakh official consultations that have already been conducted 
by the Russian MID [Ministry of Foreign Affairs], are linked 
with the possibility of exchanging Belichenko for five Armenians 
who also have been sentenced to death -- they are incriminated 
in the murder of Azerbaijani journalist Salatyn Askerova 
(originally, seven persons had been accused, but two of them 
have already died in prison, and the fate of the remaining 
persons still remains unknown). As for pilot Chistyakov, it is 
not precluded that, after the sentence has been pronounced, he 
will be handed over to Russia and will serve his punishment on 
its territory. 
  Meanwhile the Radical Party has decided to choose the 
example 
of Belichenko to carry out a demonstration to abolish the death 
penalty and to establish a permanent international tribunal on 
military crimes. Party members who picketed yesterday in front 
of the Armenian Embassy in Moscow feel that crimes similar to 
those that Belichenko is accused of committing should be under 
the jurisdiction of an international criminal court with 
supranational powers, and they have stated that "the incident 
with him is viewed as a model one, and we are speaking not about 
a humanitarian, but a political problem." Having shared their 
views with Armenian ambassador Mamikonyan, who received them and 
who stated that "the context spoils the idea: pity concerning 
the sentencing of a person whose actions led to the death of 
peaceful citizens, was expressed with a complete lack of an 
attempt to analyze other similar incidents from the opposite 
side," the participants in the demonstration expressed their 
readiness to picket the Azerbaijani Embassy also. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46552 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> STATE AND LOCAL MILITARY FORCES </F>
<F P=101> CENTRAL ASIAN STATES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Insurgent Supply Dumps Found in Tajikistan </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Insurgent Supply Dumps Found in Tajikistan </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0437A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 2 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0437A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [ITAR-TASS item from Dushanbe: "Tajikistan Military </F>
Authorities Assert the Situation Is Fully Under Control"] 
  [Text] Eleven major underground supply dumps with weapons 
and sets of military uniforms were discovered in mountains of 
the Tajik Pripamirye during a large-scale operation conducted by 
forces of the Republic Ministry of Defense together with local 
Ministry of Security and Ministry of Internal Affairs subunits. 
  According to a statement by Tajikistan Minister of Defense 
Major General Aleksandr Shishlyannikov, subunits of government 
forces are in full control of the situation in the Pripamirye 
region and are providing reliable security for Khaburabad Pass. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46553 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMS TRADE </F>
<H3> <TI>   U.S., Novosibirsk Share Conversion Tasks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    U.S., Novosibirsk Share Conversion Tasks </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0792A Novosibirsk VECHERNIY NOVOSIBIRSK in Russian 7 Jun 
94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0792A </F>
<F P=104>  Novosibirsk VECHERNIY NOVOSIBIRSK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vadim Yuryev: "We Have Been Offered U.S. Army </F>
Know-How"] 
  [Text] Frederick Shapu, executive of the American 
company ICT Group, has brought good news from Los Angeles to 
Novosibirsk: Conversion is also under way at military plants in 
the United States; of course, it causes many problems of all 
kinds. Well, perhaps they are not as serious as here, but 
nonetheless it is a pleasure. 
  Since production at the defense enterprises in America is 
being cut back sharply, they are looking for new clients. 
Frederick Shapu decided to take advantage of the moment. Just a 
few months ago, the U.S. Department of Defense declassified its 
technological developments in the area of digital, that is, 
wireless telephone communications. Incidentally, they have been 
used for a long time in the U.S. Army, but their use was 
forbidden for civilian purposes. Such an opportunity has now 
appeared. So Shapu flew to Novosibirsk in order to propose his 
investment project to develop the same system of 
telecommunications here. In his words, the ICT Group company is 
in a position to free us of virtually all communication wires 
and cables: Telephones, TV channels, and faxes will all be 
digital. 
  In discussing the potential of his company, Frederick Shapu 
emphasized the following. First, he said, this is not just 
another toy for the rich: For example, the installation of a 
digital telephone will cost a client no more than the 
installation of a regular telephone. However, the quality of 
communications will be absolutely incomparable. Second, local 
enterprises would manufacture the equipment; that is to say, new 
jobs will appear here. This is to say nothing about Novosibirsk 
not being required to make any financial outlays--he will invest 
the money. 
  I do not know if everything is indeed as lucrative as Shapu 
says, but the oblast administration undertook to work on the 
proposal of the American businessman with local enterprises. If 
they turn down this scheme, for some reason, another proposal 
may very well be made by the American workers of military 
plants: Russian proletarians, let us unite! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46554 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMS TRADE </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Voyentekh' Director Funtikov Interviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Voyentekh' Director Funtikov Interviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0436A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0436A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Anatoliy Grigoryevich Funtikov, Voyentekh </F>
general director, by Valentin Rudenko; place and date of 
interview not given: "Voyentekh Does Have Something To Offer"] 
  [Text] From KRASNAYA ZVEZDA files: Lieutenant General 
(Reserve) Anatoliy Funtikov was born in 1931. He graduated from 
the Serpukhov Aviation-Technical School and from the Air Force 
Engineering Academy imeni Mozhayskiy. He served in combat units, 
at the Baykonur Cosmodrome, and in the central administration of 
the Ministry of Defense. He was employed in the testing of 
strategic missiles, for which he earned the State Prize. He is a 
doctor of technical sciences, a professor, and an academician of 
the International Engineering Academy. Prior to his appointment 
as general director of the Voyentekh State Armament and Military 
Equipment Sales Company, he was first deputy chief for armament 
of the Russian Armed Forces. 
  [Rudenko] Anatoliy Grigoryevich, when and why was the 
Voyentekh State Company formed, and who was its founder? 
  [Funtikov] The idea of creating our company belongs to the 
leaders of the Armed Forces ministries, and chiefly defense 
minister, General of the Army Pavel Sergeyevich Grachev. In 
order to get money to build housing for servicemen from 
somewhere other than the budget, he proposed creating a special 
cost accounting foreign trade organization that would export 
combat equipment and armament at the disposal of the Ministry of 
Defense. This proposal was carefully examined by Russian 
President Boris Yeltsin, and in mid-1992 a special government 
decree was published forming the Voyentekh State Armament and 
Military Equipment Sales Company. The Ministry of Defense, the 
Russian Federal Property Fund, the RF State Committee for the 
Management of State Property, the Committee for Social Support 
to Servicemen, the Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations and 
the RF State Committee for Defense Industry acted as the 
company's founders. 
  [Rudenko] How justified was creation of yet another foreign 
trade organization, since after all, the Oboroneksport VO, the 
Spetsvneshtekhnika GVK or, for example, the GUSK would have been 
fully capable of assuming the task of selling freed armament? 
They did have the experience and the corresponding structures 
for this, didn't they? 
  [Funtikov] Yes, they did. But they naturally didn't want to 
get fully into the business of exporting used armament at a time 
when the warehouses of the defense enterprises were literally 
bursting with new products: It would have been a lot of trouble, 
and the work would not have been very profitable. Each item had 
to be fitted out, repaired, and painted. 
  Because it was established by the Ministry of Defense, and 
works in the interests of the Army (97 percent of the proceeds 
from weapon sales go specifically to construction of housing for 
servicemen), and having support from powerful structures of the 
Ministry of Defense such as the GRAU [Main Missile and Artillery 
Directorate] and the Main Directorate of Armored Forces, from 
engineering and chemical troops, and from the main procurement 
directorates of the arms and services, the Voyentekh State 
Company was vitally interested in organizing the work of 
exporting freed armament. 
  [Rudenko] Do you share the point of view of those who feel 
that the Ministry of Defense shouldn't involve itself in arms 
exports at all? 
  [Funtikov] The Ministry of Defense is of course not a 
military trade organization. It has other tasks, and another 
purpose. But weapon exports are a special item. The reality is 
such that approximately a fourth to a fifth of the assortment of 
armament sought by foreign clients can be delivered efficiently 
only from the forces. This is not to mention the fact that 
comprehensive testing of combat equipment, specialist training 
and repair of weapons and combat equipment proceed practically 
100 percent at the proving grounds, training centers and repair 
plants of the Ministry of Defense. 
  The Main Directorate of International Military Cooperation 
of 
the General Staff of the RF Armed Forces could organize arms 
exports quite professionally, and well. And it must be said that 
it is exerting a great deal of effort to develop 
military-technical cooperation, to train foreign specialists and 
to render other services. 
  Considering that a military department is not fully suited 
to 
purely commercial activity, our state company assumed this 
function. It is a state enterprise, fully answerable to 
currently effective legislation. Everyone here understands the 
interests of both military arms manufacturers and citizens well. 
We realize that the role our company plays will grow considering 
the inadequate financing of the Ministry of Defense. After all, 
selling freed combat equipment and weapons is a realistic way of 
obtaining nonbudgetary resources not only to solve social 
problems but also to reequip the Army. 
  [Rudenko] How much "surplus" weaponry does the Army have 
today that could be offered for sale? 
  [Funtikov] Our state company does not keep records on the 
amount of armament freed in the course of the Russian Army's 
reduction--that's a function of the General Staff, but there is 
no debate that there is a large amount of it. Forces are being 
withdrawn from countries of Eastern Europe and the Baltics, and 
units in internal districts are being disbanded. Moreover there 
is much combat equipment in warehouses and storage depots. Given 
the extreme deficit in the defense budget, the most reasonable 
thing would be to sell it, and use the proceeds to solve social 
problems, and develop and produce new models of armament. 
  [Rudenko] But wanting to sell these weapons isn't enough. 
Someone has to want to by them. How do things stand in this 
area? We are offering used goods, after all. 
  [Funtikov] Armament in the forces can be said to be used 
only 
on paper. It's actually new as a rule. When we train tank crews, 
for example, we use a few training vehicles, leaving the rest of 
the tanks in storage at depots and bases. Air defense weapons 
don't get much use, while infantry weapons get even less. In 
this case their price is naturally below that of new models, 
which is attractive to foreign customers. Far from all countries 
are able to allow themselves to purchase ultramodern weapons 
directly from the conveyers of defense enterprises. 
  [Rudenko] By the way, how are prices of weapons supplied 
from 
the troops set? 
  [Funtikov] The main criteria here are the newness of the 
model, the date of manufacture, remaining life, and actual 
technical condition of the articles. Consider for example a 
helicopter that has served half of its useful life. Its price 
would be approximately 60 percent of the cost of a new 
helicopter. Price policy is a delicate, flexible thing. There 
are also many other factors that have to be accounted for when 
appraising a particular item. But in any case, under no 
circumstances are we offering armament at dumping prices. 
  [Rudenko] What models of armament enjoy the greatest demand 
today? 
  [Funtikov] I would put infantry fighting vehicles at the top 
of the list. And not only the latest BMP-3, but even the BMP-2. 
Foreign customers are showing great interest in antitank 
weapons, T-72S and T-80U tanks, our helicopters--especially the 
Mi-8 and the Mi-24, all models and modifications of the 
Kalashnikov assault rifle, the Igla, Strela-10M, Tor, Tunguska, 
S-300PMU-1 and S-300V surface-to-air missile systems, and of 
course, MiG-29 and Su-27 airplanes, as well as ammunition of all 
types. As for naval equipment, small patrol boats are in demand. 
  When it comes to potential customers, they can be found 
today 
in countries of Southeast Asia, the Near East and Africa. 
  [Rudenko] It's no secret that there was too much red tape in 
our arms trade system. It sometimes took months to finalize a 
contract. Has anything changed recently in this aspect? 
  [Funtikov] Not much, unfortunately. As before, it takes a 
lot 
of legwork to get approval of documents for the sale of weapons 
or combat equipment from the corresponding ministries and 
departments. As an example it took me a little less than 4 
months to finalize a contract to sell a consignment of pistols 
to the Vietnamese Ministry of Internal Affairs. Such an approach 
doesn't of course promote development of military-technical 
cooperation. Many customers want the weapons delivered within a 
week or a month, they are prepared to pay immediately, and we 
need to consider their wishes. 
  [Rudenko] What should be done in your opinion to retake lost 
positions in the arms market? And is such an objective even 
realistic for us in principle? 
  [Funtikov] Of course it's realistic. The main argument in 
favor of this assertion can be found in the fabulous 
characteristics of our armament. The entire world recognizes 
that it is fully competitive, while many models simply have no 
analogues, being superior to foreign prototypes. The fact that 
we sell 16 times less armament than the USA today is explained 
in my opinion primarily by subjective and not objective causes. 
  If we intend to occupy a truly worthy place in the arms 
market, we will need to direct the efforts of not only 
specialized exporters and defense enterprises but also all state 
structures toward this objective. 
  Once I went to Kuwait for negotiations. And do you know who 
went there to officer a consignment of American weapons to the 
Kuwaiti Defense Ministry? A former president of the United 
States. It was Bush. That's the level we're dealing with. 
  It must be said that we have recently been taking steps to 
maximally activate military and technical cooperation. Consider 
at least the government decree granting enterprises the right to 
enter the foreign market on their own. It will doubtlessly sweep 
our exports into the mainstream. 
  The enterprises do have something to offer their foreign 
partners. An inspection of specialized exporters carried out 
recently by the Russian president's inspection administration 
revealed that billions of dollars' worth of weapons and combat 
equipment have accumulated in the warehouse of defense firms. 
  [Rudenko] Wouldn't a mass invasion of the world market by 
enterprises mean the end of the state's monopoly on arms trade? 
  [Funtikov] Of course not. In this case, you see, a monopoly 
is defined not as the existence of a single vendor but as strict 
regulation of arms trade--on the basis of the corresponding 
government decrees, through the licensing committee, and through 
restrictions on what can be traded. 
  I do not support the idea that we should have a thousand 
specialized exporters, but large firms such as, for example, the 
Antey Concern, the Kurganmashzavod Joint-Stock Company, the OKB 
Sukhovo ANPK, MAPO [Moscow Aviation Production Association] and 
others should have access to the foreign market. We can only 
gain from this. 
  By the way, while the right to export defense products is 
possessed by dozens of organizations in the USA and other 
Western countries, the state still maintains a monopoly on 
weapon sales. 
  [Rudenko] What sort of relations are you developing with the 
Rosvooruzheniye State Company, recently formed out of three 
specialized exporters, and with the financial and industrial 
groups being formed out of large defense firms? 
  [Funtikov] Are you asking whether we are entering the 
foreign 
market as competitors? I can say quite certainly, no. And there 
are simply no reasons for such competition to exist between our 
companies. We have different niches. In this case our niche is 
far more modest than that of Rosvooruzheniye. 
  As far as the financial and industrial groups are concerned, 
I am convinced that they will play a most active role in the 
arms market in the immediate future. It is for this reason that 
our company is providing what support it can to their formation. 
  I would like to say in conclusion that because of the sharp 
reduction of appropriations to defense, and consequently to 
armament, we should allocate part of the proceeds from exporting 
defense products to establishing a firm scientific and technical 
foundation upon which to design equipment of the future. These 
may perhaps not be full-scale developments, but we believe that 
the time will come when our state will have the possibility for 
satisfying the Army's demand for the latest weapons to the 
fullest. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46555 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> ARMS TRADE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sweden's Selection of Leopard-2 Tank Over T-80 Examined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Sweden's Selection of Leopard-2 Tank Over T-80 Examined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0460A NARODNA ARMIYA in Russian 18 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0460A </F>
<F P=104>  NARODNA ARMIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by IZVESTIYA correspondent Aleksandr Sychev: "How </F>
the T-80 Tank Lost the Swedish Contract to the Leopard-2"] 
  [Text] In September 1993, at the request of the Swedish 
Ministry of Defense and with the permission of the Russian 
Government, two T-80U tanks were sent to Sweden for testing. 
These combat vehicles returned home in March 1994. Russian heavy 
armament was presented in the West for the first time and in 
principle was seen as a possible variant in the reequipment of 
two tank and three mechanized brigades. 
  At the time of the arrival of the Russian tanks in Sweden, 
the search for a replacement for the obsolete STRV-103 tanks 
produced by the Swedish concern Bofors since the 1960's and for 
its British counterpart of the same age, the "Centurion," had 
been continuing for more than two years. Tests were performed on 
the American tank "M1A2 Abrams," the West German "Leopard-2K 
Imperwood," and the French "Leclerc." 
  There are 400 tanks subject to replacement. So far the 
Swedish Parliament has given its approval for 200 vehicles but 
it has authorized the expenditure of less money than that--about 
a billion kronor (approximately $150 million). The incongruence 
of the dream of the military with the possibilities of the 
country forced the Ministry of Defense to look for an up-to-date 
and high-quality tank that would serve the next 30 years, 
extremely advantageous in terms of price as well as other 
contractual conditions. Therefore, when the T-80U first appeared 
at an arms exhibition in Abu Dhabi, the Swedes decided to test 
it as well. In terms of price--about $3 million--the tank was 
doubtless very interesting. 
  But they were not able to complete the testing. The 
government made the decision to buy West German "Leopards." 
Judging by the haste with which the choice was made and by the 
attempts to disparage the merits of the T-80, the decision was 
basically dictated by political considerations. Swedish Minister 
of Defense Anders Bjoerck declared, in particular, that only 
servicemen no taller than 165 cm can work in a Russian tank, and 
it is difficult to find such people in Sweden, and that the 
loader may lose his arms, although in reality this process has 
been automated.... 
  By the way, the FRG and France demonstrated how to trade 
with 
arms. There were more and more frequent visits of high-ranking 
government delegations from Bonn and Paris in Stockholm and 
Shevde, where a tank test range is located. It is rumored that 
the Germans brought about a ton and a half of documentation and 
advertising about the "Leopard" and the French brought about 3 
tons. In Sweden, the French merchants established a presentation 
office and hired retired generals to work in it. They spent 
about $5 million to promote the "Leclerc." 
  These two main competitors for the big contract (the United 
States was out of the game as soon as it refused to concede even 
a cent) agreed on the most improbable conditions of the deal 
even to the point of concluding contracts on the basis of 
100-percent compensation. The advantage went to Bonn's offer to 
establish a joint enterprise in Sweden for the assembly of the 
"Leopard" tanks, part of the production of which Bonn agreed to 
sell to third countries. This makes it possible for Stockholm 
not only to rearm its army but also to create a large number of 
new jobs, which is quite important in time of crisis. 
  In Sweden, for some reason Washington did not utilize a 
single one of its customary methods to attract a buyer and did 
not even resort to the means of political pressure, which it 
actively utilizes in other regions to increase its share of 
world trade, which in the last few years has increased from 30.5 
to 45.8 percent. 
  The arms market has become tight and to occupy a substantial 
place there it is necessary to trade in the new way, as do the 
French and Germans. It appears that the reform of the arms trade 
in Russia that apparently began with an edict from the president 
on the establishment of the firm "Rosvooruzheniye" was limited 
to this. In any case, the view of trade in the leadership of the 
country has not changed. We expect it to bring many billions 
into the treasury but we are not giving political support to our 
merchants abroad. Not a single delegation visited the T-80 tanks 
in Sweden. And there can be no talk of the organization of a 
temporary representation with the hiring of local military 
people or the establishment of joint production in Sweden. 
  In Sweden, the T-80 tanks justified the funds spent on them 
and showed what they are capable of doing, even though they were 
driven by Swedish crews that quickly learned this art. Even 
during the preparatory phase, the meticulous Swedes set forth 
their questions on 500 pages, questions that were answered by 
close to 10 Russian research establishments. 
  The vehicles were driven through ravines and snow drifts at 
the very Arctic Circle. The tanks did not break down a single 
time over six months. "My observation is that the military 
people liked the T-80," said Aleksandr Vonsovskiy, an expert 
with the state company "Rosvooruzheniye" who has been given 
awards in our time for his commercial successes, "our tank is 
better than the other vehicles and is adapted to Swedish 
conditions. But even if it came to the commercial negotiations 
that are planned for 1995, we could not offer conditions 
analogous to those of the Germans and French." 
  To change the tendency in recent years toward declining 
Russian arms exports (from 1988 through 1992, they declined 83 
percent in comparable prices and amount to about $2 billion), it 
is necessary to change a lot above all in the attitude toward 
this business and also to resolve the problem of the 
compatibility of Western and Russian standards for arms, which 
will inhibit the advancement of complex Russian hardware to 
Western markets. The differences are so great that for the 
Swedes to acquire the T-80U tanks would mean that they would 
have to spend many millions more to restructure all of their 
logistical and technical support facilities. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46556 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Duma's Sulakshin on Impact of Defense Cuts on Industry </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Duma's Sulakshin on Impact of Defense Cuts on Industry </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0434A Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0434A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Stepan Sulakshin, chairman of State Duma </F>
Military-Industrial Complex Subcommittee, under rubric "What 
Lawmakers Propose": "Two Quarters on Starvation Rations"] 
  [Text] 
  [Box insert] 
  That is the position in which defense enterprises may 
find themselves if the State Duma does not support its Defense 
Committee and Industry Committee. 
  [End box insert] 
  The state of affairs in the defense complex presently 
is one of the questions demanding the most careful attention of 
society, specialists, lawmakers, and the executive 
department. 
  We recall how for several years it was impressed on the 
country that the military-industrial "monster is devouring 
taxpayers' money, squandering labor, energy and resources" and 
so on. But then economic reforms and avalanching conversion 
burst forth (Americans ooh and aah over five-percent reductions 
and conversion of military production, but for us they are 
measured in tens of percentage points in a year). In 1993 
compared with 1991 the production volume of arms and military 
equipment was 21.7 percent, capital investments and RDT&amp;E 
financing volumes were halved, and the export of military 
products decreased by more than three times. 
<H8>  What Did Reforms Give Us? </H8>
  It is without question that the militarized economy needed 
reforming, but let us have a look at whether or not the federal 
budget deficit dropped after the engagement with the so-called 
monster, and in essence with ourselves. Who in the country began 
to live better and who was helped by debts and advances unpaid 
to the defense establishment, by insufficient funds of defense 
and of the budget of financed products, and by interest on 
enormous credit discount rates? Is structural perestroyka under 
way? How are conversion programs being fulfilled? Why did the 
country reject the billions of dollars it could have received 
from export deliveries? Is it possible to underfinance the Army 
with defense capability and sociopolitical consequences in mind? 
  Finally, how did it happen that the state and government 
began to consider it permissible for themselves to take away 
products of the defense establishment, but not pay for them, or 
to specify a state order, but not pay an advance for its 
fulfillment, not index the working capital of enterprises, and 
so on? 
  Answers to these questions are provided by life itself. Here 
are the facts. Quite recently the number of defense enterprises 
and organizations exceeded 1,800 and employed 4.5 million 
persons (including 800,000 in the sphere of science). If we 
figure in the "family" factor, then this is 12-15 million 
persons. The defense industrial complex includes over 70 
so-called monofunctional city-plants with an isolated production 
and life support infrastructure. One does not have to be a state 
figure to understand that reforming such a complex without 
losses (present and future) for the country's defense capability 
and without social shocks for people or at least with minimum 
losses is a task not just for a single year. But what is 
happening in the defense complex today has no logical 
explanation. 
  There is another side to the question. A significant portion 
of defense design bureaus, scientific research institutes, and 
plants having unique technologies, equipment and cadres already 
were supporting production of consumer products long ago. In 
1993 the proportion of civilian products put out by defense 
enterprises was 78.3 percent of the overall volume. It seemed 
clear to everyone that conversion programs also require large 
investments of funds, but it very often happens that 
enterprises, having prepared 50, 70, or 90 percent of production 
capacities for output of consumer goods, do not receive the 
remaining money from the state to begin production. Private 
capital also is in no hurry to invest. The majority of directors 
say with substantiation: we work and attract, but neither the 
domestic nor the foreign entrepreneur comes to us and hardly 
will come in the next few years! Help can be expected from 
nowhere except the state. 
  To sum up briefly, no positive results are seen from past 
reforms, with little exception. On the other hand, devastation 
in the defense complex and the increased potential of 
technological, structural and sociopolitical dangers are quite 
evident not only from the standpoint of defense capability, but 
also for the country's sociopolitical situation as a whole. 
<H8>  It Is Very Costly To Economize on Defense </H8>
  The extremely serious situation in defense sectors of 
industry at the present time is the result of an avalanching 
reduction in military expenditures, an avalanching conversion, 
which reached 80 percent, and a monetary system utterly wrecked 
by mutual non-payments, by credit and debit indebtedness, by a 
delay of payments for fulfilled orders on the part of the 
Russian Federation Ministry of Defense and other clients, by 
late payment of conversion credits and subsidies, by the 
lengthiness of noncash banking transactions, and by an absence 
of working capital. 
  As of 1 January 1994 the indebtedness of the Russian 
Federation Ministry of Defense, i.e., the state, was R1.217 
billion and that of customer enterprises was R770 billion. 
Because of late payment of the state defense order, enterprises 
of the defense complex were forced to pay R400 billion from 
budgetary funds for use of bank credit, basically to commercial 
banks. Overall indebtedness for payment of wages is up to R200 
billion. 
  The price increase on material resources and energy carriers 
of almost 11 times compared with 1992, the significantly lesser 
price increase (by 6.6 times) on manufactured products, and also 
late charges brought the majority of enterprises to the verge of 
bankruptcy--artificial bankruptcy, we will note. 
  The number of workers at enterprises of Goskomoboronprom 
[State Committee for the Defense Industry], 4.5 million, dropped 
by 500,000 over the last three years basically because of an 
outflow of highly skilled cadres. The drop in the number of 
associates of many scientific research institutes and design 
bureaus was from 30 to 50 percent. Experimental, test and range 
facilities are in a depressing state. There has been a sharp 
reduction in the scope of tests and experiments being carried 
out. At least 1.2 million persons from defense sectors may be 
let go in 1994 because of a reduction in budget appropriations, 
including around 400,000 from the scientific sector, which will 
lead to irreversible consequences for the defense complex. 
  The 1993 state defense order for certain kinds of arms and 
military equipment busied only 10-15 percent of production 
capacities. The order fell below the minimum permissible level 
for many kinds of articles, and as a result this is leading to 
degradation and loss of high-tech industries. 
  Thus, appropriations for 1991-1993 were reduced by almost 
8.3 
times for military RDT&amp;E and by more than 5 times for 
civilian 
RDT&amp;E. A further reduction in appropriations both for 
purchasing 
arms and military equipment as well as for RDT&amp;E is envisaged 
for 1994, which in particular will permit only paying debts for 
1993, paying for products manufactured during January-March 
1994, and paying for reserve property. No funds remain for the 
rest of defense products envisaged by the state order for 1994. 
  The 1993 state order has been fulfilled only by 47.9 percent 
and the actual financing of military RDT&amp;E in 1993 was 
around 30 
percent. Financing for these items is envisaged at the 20-22 
percent level in 1994. As a result of such actions, entire 
directions for development of combatant ships, special 
communications systems, combat subsystems and military aviation 
elements will be terminated, work to create a reserve of advance 
scientific work essentially will cease, work to develop military 
science and technology as a whole will stop, and creative 
scientific-design collectives formed over the years will break 
up once and for all. 
  The bill "On the 1994 Federal Budget," introduced by the 
Russian Federation government and approved in the first reading 
by the State Duma, provides for allocating defense expenditures 
at the level at which existing Ministry of Defense indebtedness 
essentially equals the volume of allocated funds. Enterprises 
will not even be on starvation rations for essentially the two 
remaining quarters... In evaluating the situation 
professionally, members of the State Duma committees for 
Defense, for Industry and others cannot agree with the proposed 
draft budget. There also is a positive attitude of the President 
of Russia toward bringing corresponding expenditures for the 
defense complex to the minimum permissible. Amendments to the 
second reading of the law on the budget have been prepared and 
the Duma should approve them, while at the same time taking a 
tougher approach to forming the income part of the budget. 
<H8>  Not Just the Manufacturer Is Responsible for the State Order </H8>
  The astounding system of interaction of state, government as 
a whole and Ministry of Finance which has been revealed, 
particularly with the defense complex, demands changes. There 
must be real responsibility (right up to judicial liability and 
dismissal of responsible government persons) for ensuring 
fulfillment of the state defense order and financing it. Under 
market conditions the system of placing the state order must 
become competitive for enterprises of all forms of ownership, 
with guarantees of necessary profitability and concessions on 
the part of the state. In the absence of working capital (there 
also is a presidential edict on this subject), all work must 
receive a mandatory advance. 
  It is necessary to determine the rank of the government 
[kazennyy] defense enterprise and compile a list of these 
enterprises. The rest should be relieved of exorbitant overhead 
expenses and the system of mobilization reserves should be 
revised. The formula in this case is simple. If the state cannot 
finance, release the enterprise and perhaps it "will provide 
for" itself. But now even the state order is sent down and no 
advance at all is given! 
  Laws "On the State Defense Order," "On Mobilization 
Reserves" 
and "On the Government Enterprise" are about to be adopted. 
These laws are in the Duma's portfolio of bills. The law on the 
state defense order is in the June plan. 
  The time has come to revise export policy. Not only would 
many defense enterprises be able to survive, but they would be 
able to develop successfully even with minimum export 
deliveries. A law on military-technical cooperation with foreign 
states is needed. The task is to return lost markets and 
currency earnings to Russia. 
  Of course, each problem touched upon is a subject of 
independent analysis. On the whole, however, it is clear that 
Russian reforms of the economy cannot be carried out by cutting 
off the branch on which we sit. After allowing a sharp slump in 
industrial production, in profits and in taxes into the budget 
(budget incomes in the first quarter were around half of those 
planned), it is now impossible to find money to pay for these 
same reforms. There are no grounds to expect outside investments 
as well as investments of private and banking capital in the 
next few years. This means it is necessary to restore the base 
nucleus of industry and not allow a further production slump. An 
adjustment of economic policy in the country is necessary. The 
State Duma and its specialized committees are working in this 
direction, but the legislative process is not rapid. Operational 
management decisions and adjustments to the economic course in 
the country are up to the government and the president. It must 
be hoped that the long awaited expeditious actions on problems 
being discussed today also finally will follow. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46557 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kirov Plant Shut Down </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kirov Plant Shut Down </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0318A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian No 44, 12 Mar 
94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0318A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Andrey Bagrov and Andrey Sinitsyn: "The </F>
Kirov Plant Has Shut Down: The Putilov Workers Have Gone on 
Leave Until October"] 
  [Text] The threat of a halt in the production of 
strategic missiles and the initiation of sausage production is 
the most popular argument in the discussions of the directors of 
the military-industrial complex with authorities at all levels. 
However, the lack of success in numerous attempts by 
representatives of the Russian VPK [military-industrial complex] 
to convince the other sectors of the economy of the enormous 
benefit of high-tech defense and of their competitiveness in 
world markets provides grounds for doubting the fundamental 
possibility of accustoming VPK enterprises to a "peacetime 
situation" and the budget deficit; yesterday, for the second 
time, the Kirov plant in St. Petersburg was shut down. 
  After going back to work following the first shutdown and 
assembling 150 tractors, the Kirov workers were unable to solve 
the problem of selling them: 400 machines await their fate in 
the yard at the enterprise. The plant management attributes the 
lack of buyers for the Kirov tractors to the doubling in cost of 
the tractors since the beginning of the year, linking this rise 
to a change in the tax laws (which appears extremely doubtful to 
KOMMERSANT-DAILY experts; this can justify no more than a 
10-percent increase.) Due to the shutdown more than 5,000 
workers have been forced to take leave without pay. The most 
likely date for the renewal of production is 1 October, although 
"planted' loans by the federal government to the farmers could 
stimulate demand somewhat, in which case the plant would begin 
operating as of 1 April. Other, purely military assembly 
subdivisions belonging to the Kirov Zavod AO [joint-stock 
association]: the transmission plant, the Spetsmash plant (which 
produces tanks and artillery) and the steam turbine unit (which 
produces steam turbines for submarines, among other things). 
  The shutdown of the Kirov plant is yet another manifestation 
of the already obvious economic crisis in which almost all of 
the enterprises in the Russian military-industrial complex find 
themselves. The overall drop in production at Petersburg defense 
plants was 28.6 percent in 1993, including 38.8 percent in the 
aviation industry, while indebtedness to the state by 132 
military enterprises of the city reached 150 billion rubles. As 
a result Petersburg has assumed 33rd place in Russia with 
respect to the reduction in production volumes (Leningrad 
Oblast, 67th; Moscow, 49th). 
  In this situation it would be logical to expect coordinated 
actions from the management at the plants, local authorities and 
the federal government to overcome the crisis. The plant 
administration is working out plans for respecializing as a rule 
oriented toward financing out of the budget, however, (papers 
pertaining to a coordinated plan with the American Caterpillar 
company were signed quite recently, but implementation of the 
idea of producing city buses is still in the initial stage. A 
recent conference showed that Anatoliy Sobchak has still not 
defined his position--either to restrain the directors of the 
VPK enterprises with a "Democles sword" or unequivocally to 
support their demands (which could have a negative effect on the 
attitude toward the mayor of Petersburg in Moscow). One way or 
another, all of the main hopes are pinned on a solution 
involving the federal budget. The end justifies the means in 
this case. This will put into action the traditional lobbying 
methods (the signing of demands for reduced taxes by the 
directors, exemption from duties, the provision of subsidies, 
the establishment of machine-tool committees and so forth), and 
some now forgotten foreign economic tricks: delegations of 
production veterans with Soviet orders on their lapels in 
government offices. There is no doubt about the choice of the 
members of the current "government management team": to envelop 
the plant in the heroic performance of the first five-year plans 
or not. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46558 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Products From Kurgan Machine-Building Plant </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Products From Kurgan Machine-Building Plant </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0434D Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0434D </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vadim Vlasov under rubric "Portrait of a Firm": </F>
"The Best Infantry Fighting Vehicles in the World Are the 
Product of the Kurgan Machine-Building Plant, but They Make More 
Than Military Equipment Here"] 
  [Text] The Kurgan Machine-Building Plant, known by us 
and abroad for the best infantry fighting vehicles in the world, 
began its history as an enterprise for producing heavy 
bridgebuilding cranes. It was being laid down back in prewar 
time, but the war did not permit construction to be completed. 
The Kurgan Machine-Building Plant put out the first product, 
reduction gears and trolleys for travelling cranes, only in 
1950. At that time it belonged to the Ministry of Transport 
Machine-Building. 
  Beginning in 1954 the Kurgan Plant began mastering 
production of defense products--the ATS-712 medium artillery 
prime mover. 
  A specialized design bureau was established here for 
developing prime movers and other combat equipment. Construction 
of the forge shop, foundry and assembly shop was in full swing. 
At that time the plant was manned by experienced 
engineering-technical cadres of the Omsk Plant imeni October 
Revolution, the Chelyabinsk Tractor Plant and other defense 
enterprises. 
  Following the first vehicle, whose series output began in 
1955, a new one, the ATS-650 artillery prime mover, was designed 
and went into series production in the early 1960's. 
  When the Kurgan Machine-Building Plant was assigned in 1968 
to produce an infantry fighting vehicle (BMP-1) that was 
fundamentally new from the standpoint of military equipment 
design and technology, over 40 percent of manufacturing 
equipment already was operating here in an automatic or 
semiautomatic regime, numerical control machine tools and 
automatic lines were being actively introduced, and instrument 
making shops were being developed intensively. Not many know 
that it was in Kurgan that series production of thin-walled 
armor hulls with use of original manufacturing processes was 
adjusted for the first time in the world, which permitted 
cutting the labor-intensiveness of work in half and achieving 
high quality of manufactured products. 
  The BMP-1 was mastered at the Kurgan Machine-Building Plant 
in a rather short time and 2,000 vehicles per year were 
produced. This number was sufficient to completely satisfy the 
Army's needs for infantry fighting vehicles [IFV's] and spare 
parts for them. The plant was awarded the Order of Labor Red 
Banner for mastering and organizing production of this machine. 
  [Box insert] 
  Our reference 
  The BMP-1 represented a fast, highly maneuverable, armored 
and very reliable fighting vehicle. It was armed with the 2A28 
Grom 73-mm smoothbore gun, a coaxial 7.62-mm PKT [Kalashnikov 
tank machinegun] and Malyutka ATGM system. A spacious passenger 
compartment equipped with firing ports and periscopes permitted 
assault troops to conduct massed fire without leaving the 
vehicle. [End box insert] 
  The BMP-1 received high recognition not only in our Armed 
Forces, but in many foreign armies as well, above all of Warsaw 
Pact countries, and also in many states of the Near East and 
Africa, in India and in others to which they were exported. 
  The concept of infantry fighting vehicles as a kind of 
combat 
equipment proved very successful. The BMP-2 was a further 
development of the BMP-1. 
  [Box insert] 
  Our reference 
  The BMP-2 already had automatic weapons and antitank 
missiles 
of a new generation. In particular, the Malyutka ATGM system was 
replaced with the more advanced Konkurs antitank system. The 
Grom gun gave way to a new 2A42 30-mm automatic cannon 
stabilized in two planes and with a double-belt feed. The BMP-2 
is capable of destroying even helicopters. Even today, it is one 
of the best IFV's. Many designers, engineers and workers of the 
Kurgan Machine-Building Plant were recognized with high awards 
and the State Prize for developing and organizing production of 
the BMP-2. 
  [End box insert] 
  The BMP-2 was used widely in Afghanistan and showed itself 
to 
be a very effective means in conducting combat operations in 
rugged areas, also including the mountains. Our soldiers called 
it the "swallow," and the enemy dubbed it the "devil wagon." Its 
appearance at positions struck panicky fear in them. 
  When the BMP-2 was placed in series production, not even 
everyone at the plant knew that the design of a fundamentally 
new IFV, the BMP-3, already was in full swing in a specialized 
design bureau under the direction of Doctor of Technical 
Sciences Major General A. Blagonravov in close cooperation with 
the Tula Specialized Instrument Making Design Bureau (General 
Designer Academician Shipunov). 
  [Box insert] 
  Our reference 
  The BMP-3 differed from its predecessors not only by the 
weapons complex, but also by its configuration and chassis. A 
more powerful (500 hp) engine was installed in the BMP-3. A 
hydromechanical transmission with power takeoff to water-jet 
propellers was used for the first time on domestic armored 
equipment, which permits it to cross water obstacles at a speed 
of 10 km/hr. On the highway the BMP-3 easily develops a speed of 
up to 70 km/hr and it has a range up to 600 km. 
  The BMP-3's arsenal includes the 2A70 100-mm gun/launcher, 
2A72 30-mm automatic gun and PKT machinegun. All this is 
installed in a single unit in the turret. The IFV combat team 
has at its disposal two PKT machineguns in independent mounts in 
the fighting vehicle's hull front section, two Kalashnikov PK 
machineguns in stowage, six AK-74 assault rifles and a 26-mm 
signal pistol. 
  [End box insert] 
  The BMP-3 was demonstrated at a 1993 arms exhibition in 
Abu-Dhabi, where it received high acclaim from military and 
technical specialists. A number of countries expressed a desire 
to purchase our IFV for their own ground troops. One lot of them 
already has been delivered to the United Arab Emirates. 
  Today, when the volume of the defense order has been cut 
sharply, the Kurgan Machine-Building Plant, along with mastering 
the BMP-3, is forced to engage actively in conversion programs, 
particularly the output of machine-building products for the 
national economy and sophisticated household equipment. Plant 
shops now assemble not only IFV's, but also the KMZ-012 
minitractor with a full set of detachable equipment, trailers, 
and MKSM-800 small, multipurpose, self-propelled civil 
construction vehicles. The civil construction vehicle, for 
example, can be used as a loader, for grading and moving soil, 
digging trenches and pits, stacking pallets, bricks and concrete 
elements, and performing other work. 
  Under conditions of an extremely difficult economic 
situation, all this permitted preserving a more or less stable 
position of the enterprise and unique specialist collectives. 
The proportion of civilian products in the overall production 
volume was 45 percent in 1993. The Kurgan Machine-Building Plant 
has been one of the best defense industry enterprises for more 
than two decades. 
  Speaking of the plant and its establishment, it is 
impossible 
not to note that all combat equipment developments were carried 
out here in close collaboration with specialists of Transmash 
VNII [All-Union Scientific Research Institute], the Military 
Academy of Armored Troops, Kubinka Scientific Test Institute of 
Armored Equipment, and officers of the Russian Ministry of 
Defense Main Armor Directorate. 
  Along with creating and producing a new type of equipment, 
much attention always has been given to solving social and 
everyday problems. Every fifth resident of Kurgan (350,000) is 
connected with plant activity in one way or another. 
  Several years ago the plant was reorganized as an open 
joint-stock company and now is developing along the path of 
reorganization as a major financial-industrial group. Under 
conditions of clear insufficiency of the state defense order and 
practical absence of other kinds of budget financing, the 
enterprise is forced to seek new mechanisms for preserving 
scientific and production cooperation. Essentially the only 
solution is to orient itself toward carefully calculated market 
needs and conquer the market, relying on support of nonstate 
financial and investment institutions. 
  A key point in creating such an infrastructure is the 
determination and development of an optimum model of 
relationships which would permit using the industrial and 
financial potential with greatest effectiveness. The 
Kurganmashinvest Investment Company is being established for 
this purpose at the initiative of the plant, of the specialized 
Russkoye oruzhiye Corporation, and of MENATEP Bank. The 
Spetsialnoye mashinostroyeniye i metallurgiya AO [Joint-Stock 
Company] and a number of major suppliers and traditional 
partners of the Kurgan Machine-Building Plant also became part 
of the company. Founders of this company see their main task to 
be a unification of efforts for developing and producing 
advanced, competitive models of armored equipment by attracting 
nonbudget funds of commercial as well as state structures; 
supporting an active marketing program; and providing legal and 
financial support to the sale of products in markets and to 
their servicing. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46559 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Dvigateli-94' Engine Design Show </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Dvigateli-94' Engine Design Show </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0434C Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0434C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Andryushkov, KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, under </F>
rubric "Exhibitions": "High Technologies: Costs Today, Profits 
Tomorrow"] 
  [Text] The roar of aerospace turbines and of various 
industrial motors of the 2nd Moscow International Exhibition 
Dvigateli-94 is over. It showed (down to the pain of an exposed 
nerve) to its participants and thousands of visitors interested 
in the country's technical progress what a critical state of 
development we are at today. 
  Around a hundred scientific production associations and 
special design bureaus from the CIS and twenty leading engine 
building firms from the far abroad presented their products in 
the Forum pavilion of the exhibition complex on Krasnaya 
Presnya. "The idea of assembling specialists in creating engines 
for different applications in one exhibition is valuable," said 
Russian Federation Government First Deputy Chairman Oleg 
Soskovets, "in that for the first time it enables scientists and 
designers, production engineers and industrial workers to become 
mutually enriched by know-how and foremost technologies, 
coordinate ways of mutually advantageous cooperation, and find 
new partners and new spheres of the market for their products." 
  Time will tell how much the opportunities presented were 
used. Nevertheless, it is already possible to tell about certain 
results. The sensation of the exhibition was the cooperation 
agreement of the Russian Aviadvigatel and Permskiye motory 
joint-stock companies and the United Technologies/Pratt &amp; 
Whitney corporation (USA). Just a few years ago engine builders 
from Perm affirmed their authority in the industrial world by 
certifying the powerful, reliable PS-90A aircraft engine. 
Unfortunately, the state's economic troubles did not permit 
realizing technological improvements in it and expanding the 
operating horizons. But it is common knowledge that nature does 
not tolerate emptiness. The Perm engine builders found a way out 
of a critical situation: they concluded an agreement with Pratt 
&amp; Whitney (USA) to create two joint companies for production 
of 
aircraft and industrial engines. A German firm, Motoren und 
Turbinen (MTU) also is participating in the project. The goal is 
to create a more advanced engine for Il-96, Tu-204 and Il-76 
aircraft using the experience of Russian and foreign engineers. 
The first model, PS-90P, was shown at the exhibition and drew 
the specialists' attention. As Viktor Chuyko, president of the 
Union of Aircraft Engine Building and a doctor of technical 
sciences, said, all the best of what was being created by the 
mind and hands of man was combined in it. 
  The Dvigateli-94 exhibition gladdened Russia's aviators with 
one other event--the announcement of the creation of a trainer 
aircraft for the Air Force. For long years pilots had been 
learning to fly in imported L-29 and L-39 aircraft. As a pilot 
who has mastered these aircraft, I confirm their insufficient 
reliability because of the presence of one engine and dependence 
of the air fleet on politics. The Special Design Bureau imeni 
Mikoyan created a domestic MIG-AT multipurpose aircraft. And 
again there was an example of survival under conditions of a 
lack of money: cooperation with the French company SNECMA. Two 
LARZAC 04Y3 jet engines (photo [photo not reproduced]) will be 
placed on the aircraft. Of course, this alliance has its fine 
points, but their solution is a matter for statesmen. I believe 
they also should spend money to produce a domestic engine. For 
example, specialists from Ufa are ready to set about making it. 
  The exposition of enterprises of the missile-space industry 
and the motor vehicle, tractor, and ship engine makers was 
interesting. The technical exhibition was able for the first 
time to satisfy the interest of specialists in different areas. 
In addition, one of the most important problems of mankind was 
being solved at the exhibition: how to preserve living nature 
under conditions of intensive development of high technologies 
and in the long run not permit ourselves to perish under the 
"umbrella" formed by exhaust gases. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46560 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> DEFENSE INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nuclear Ship Designer Khlopkin Interviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Nuclear Ship Designer Khlopkin Interviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0434B Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 28 May 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0434B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KRASNAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Nikolay Sidorovich Khlopkin, professor, </F>
academician, Hero of Socialist Labor, Lenin and State Prize 
laureate, director of department, Kurchatov Institute, by 
Mikhail Rebrov, KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, date, place and occasion 
unknown, under rubric "Pertinent Interview": "Nuclear Powered 
Ships Are Sending an SOS, but the Nuclear Powered Fleet Is To 
Be"; photograph of Khlopkin included] 
  [Text] 
  [Box insert] 
  From KRASNAYA ZVEZDA's dossier 
  Nikolay Sidorovich Khlopkin. Born in 1923. Went through the 
Great Patriotic War, signed his name on the Reichstag, was 
seriously wounded. Devoted his labor activity to nuclear powered 
ships. He has been in the Kurchatov Institute since 1949, 
beginning as a laboratory assistant working on a degree thesis, 
and now is a department director. He is a professor, 
academician, Hero of Socialist Labor and Lenin and State Prize 
laureate. As his colleagues say, "From the first tholepin to 
today on nuclear powered ships--surface and submarine, civilian 
and military." As he himself says, "This is interesting work and 
a long and difficult search, the meaning of which lies in 
arriving at reliable simplicity after having mastered the 
incredibly complex." 
  [End box insert] 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] Nikolay Sidorovich, the first nuclear 
powered submarine went on alert status three and a half decades 
ago, and a year later the first nuclear powered icebreaker was 
placed in operation. Now the attitude toward these events is 
contradictory and at times even negative... 
  [Khlopkin] Our time generally is full of 
contradictions. All and everything is criticized without 
sufficient argumentation. It would be naive to assert that 
atomic energy does not have its dark sides, but how can one 
perform the missions facing the Navy without it? Only nuclear 
powered submarines can keep from coming to the surface and can 
perform their assigned missions during an entire independent 
deployment. And how can we turn the Northern Sea Route into a 
permanently operating artery without nuclear powered ships? 
  The logic of developing marine nuclear power engineering 
depends to a considerable extent on the country's financial 
capacities, which must be used wisely. 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] Alas, to this day we have not learned 
to count money; more precisely, to count the options in order to 
see the real prospects. But returning to submarines. What has 
been done during these years? 
  [Khlopkin] A great deal, although we succeeded in 
creating a fully unusual construction already for the first 
submarine--I have in mind the small, powerful plant. This was 
done under the direction of Academician A. P. Aleksandrov. Many 
solutions found here proved very successful and were used in 
subsequent design projects... 
  Now, thanks to powerful, compact plants our submarines as a 
rule have higher speeds than foreign ones, while being inferior 
to the latter in concealment. Already in 1970 we had nuclear 
powered submarines with a submerged speed of over 40 knots. A 
further reduction in noise of combatant ships is expected, which 
will ensure concealment of their operations. Integrated acoustic 
designing, where design solutions are aimed at reducing acoustic 
emissions to the minimum, will become a mandatory component in 
creating the new submarines. In other words, the submarine 
should become a unique acoustic "black hole" in the sea which 
will not succeed in being detected by any method. 
  I am setting forth only my own opinion. Quiet submarines 
have 
been developed with powerful fourth-generation plants. Concepts 
for fifth-generation plants are being developed... 
  This is no simple task. Replacing the propeller with a water 
screw and making the transition to full electric propulsion 
similar to that used in diesel submarines open up prospects. One 
other kind of electric propulsion is worth mentioning--without 
screw or water-jet. A propelling pressure is created for the 
ship by passing a current through sea water in strong magnetic 
fields. Superconducting cables and superhigh magnetic fields are 
needed for such a motor... 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] Nikolay Sidorovich, what main 
directions does science see here today? 
  [Khlopkin] There are several such directions. 
Safety of marine power engineering is coming to the foreground. 
Increasing the reliability of plants and the self-protection of 
their reactors by creating negative feedbacks in the core, 
excluding losses of the heat-transfer agent, additional barriers 
preventing a spread of radioactivity... These are only some of 
the measures aimed at precluding both accidents themselves as 
well as their consequences. 
  Safety at sea has its specifics, for a reactor on a ship is 
not only a source of danger, but also a means of saving the ship 
in extreme circumstances. 
  Then there is the search for new areas of applying atomic 
energy and its improvement. There are numerous interesting 
prospects here. To some they may seem unrealistic, but the fact 
is, even the nuclear powered submarine was considered a 
fantastic concept in the late 1940's. 
  Special mention should be made of control. Anatoliy 
Petrovich 
Aleksandrov demanded that it be just as simple as in the 
automobile--step on the gas or take your foot off... And such a 
reactor was created. Reactor power increases when you increase 
the feed water flow rate and power drops when you decrease the 
rate, and this without any shift in the absorbers controlling 
reactivity. 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] You mentioned technical measures, but 
does the so-called human factor also exist?.. 
  [Khlopkin] It does, and its importance is very 
great. And I am thinking not just of operator errors at the 
console in a stress situation. The question posed is broader. 
The entire safety management system is being examined in order 
to preclude the possibility of making incorrect decisions back 
in the design stage and not allow poor quality in manufacturing 
equipment or unsatisfactory operation. This is a very complex 
problem, but it is solvable. 
  Also among questions which must be solved by scientists are 
ecological ones, not just in the course of operation, but also 
when removing reactors from operation... Very strict monitoring 
is important here. We have developed supremely sensitive gear 
for researching radioactivity of sea water. The sunken submarine 
Komsomolets was inspected with its help. The result was that the 
leak was less than 0.1 curie per year. At a distance of a few 
meters from the submarine hull, the level is so low that it is 
not detected. 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] Nuclear powered ships are sending an 
SOS, equipment is aging, appropriations are being reduced, and 
yards are standing idle. But on all corners one hears one and 
the same: conversion, conversion... But the fact is, words and 
actions do not always coincide. How are things with you? 
  [Khlopkin] There is much that is contradictory 
here, and not in the idea itself, which is indisputable. 
Conversion is not only the result of disarmament, but also its 
stimulus. There are a multitude of questions here: scale, time 
periods, state support, consistency and thought-out nature of 
programs... Conversion... We still did not know that word, but 
we began engaging in it around 40 years ago. Nine nuclear 
powered civilian vessels were built and the tenth had been 
launched. By the way, speaking of reasonable approaches, it is 
advisable to replace today's diesel powered icebreakers, which 
have exhausted their service life, with nuclear powered ones. 
This will be cheaper for Russia. Now yards are free for a number 
of reasons. It would appear they should be loaded down with 
orders, but we give these orders for icebreakers to foreign 
firms. I can illustrate the parity of prices with the following 
example. Taymyr with a single reactor unit was built together 
with Finland and cost $140 million. Sibir, more powerful with a 
double reactor unit, was built here and cost 120 million. But 
that was rubles! 
  Here is another example. Floating atomic electric power 
stations for supplying heat and electricity to northern coastal 
cities and mineral enterprises. The degree of necessary 
construction for a building site in this case is enormously less 
and the area of condemned lands is less. Such atomic electric 
power stations can be shifted to any spot... 
  We have created small, unique power plants without analogues 
in the world. They have no moving parts, current is produced 
without a turbine--by a thermoelectric generator operating from 
an atomic reactor. Self-adjusting thermoelectric power stations 
with a minimum of servicing are intended for supplying small 
settlements and military posts with electrical energy. Thermal 
output can be taken to five megawatts, electrical output to 150 
kilowatts, and the service life is up to 25 years. 
  Here is another example. The Rosshelf Joint-Stock Company 
has 
been established. It proposes to use the potential of defense 
sectors to carry on oil and natural gas production on the shelf. 
The initial settling-in of enterprises in areas with an ice 
situation, where enormous reserves of hydrocarbons already now 
have been discovered, can be done with the help of nuclear 
powered icebreakers. They will give the enterprise electrical 
energy and will protect it from ice. Submarines can survey 
deposits, map the bottom, and select routes for laying pipelines. 
  Atomic plants successfully solve the problem of distilling 
water, they are very promising for use in outer space, and they 
are being purchased willingly abroad. In short, the peaceful 
atom is not a phrase, but action. 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] Today the question is heard more and 
more often: With disarmament going on, is it necessary to 
upgrade combatant ships and their power plants? The country is 
growing poor... 
  [Khlopkin] Yes, a considerable reduction is going 
on in the Navy now. Orders for new nuclear powered ships are 
being cut back sharply. Some of them, which were just not 
completed, are being scrapped. And this is not only in Russia, 
but in other countries as well. But again, let us proceed from 
the realities: war, as the last means of solving conflict 
situations, is not excluded from consideration by a single 
state. Russia is a maritime power, and this year its Navy 
celebrates its tricentennial. The Navy was its glory, it 
guaranteed its safety, and that is how it should remain even 
now. It is another matter that the might of a maritime power is 
determined not so much by the number of ships as by their 
fighting qualities. The motto of Admiral Makarov, "Remember the 
war," is pertinent even now. 
  [KRASNAYA ZVEZDA] And the final question, Nikolay 
Sidorovich. You went down the front roads. What was the most 
memorable in those years? 
  [Khlopkin] The war itself, with its horrors, its 
losses, its distorted fates, but also the joy of victory... The 
war mercilessly shoved customary concepts together, transferring 
people's lives into another dimension often inconceivable in its 
tragedy. The last terrible battle was on 1 May 1945, when our 
division was holding back an avalanche of German divisions 
heading for Berlin. We held out... Later came the meeting with 
the Americans, but already beyond the Elbe... I took off my 
greatcoat and captain's shoulderboards in 1945 and since then 
have been a civilian and have been very busy with civilian 
matters. But Russia's military interests are dear to me, and so 
I say: The nuclear powered fleet is to be! There is for now 
simply no alternative to nuclear power engineering for the 
oceangoing submarine fleet. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46561 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> SECURITY SERVICES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nikolayev Reviews Performnce of Border Troops in 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Nikolayev Reviews Performnce of Border Troops in 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0431A Moscow ROSSIYA in Russian No 20, 25-31 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94UM0431A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Col-Gen Andrey Nikolayev, commander in chief </F>
of the Russian Federation's Border Troops, by correspondent 
Eduard Lunev: "The New Border Situation"] 
  [Text] [Lunev] Andrey Ivanovich, this year Russia's Border 
Troops are commemorating their official holiday on new lines. 
The length of the border would appear to have been shortened, 
but, judging from the fact that you are spending most of your 
time out of the office, the number of concerns has increased in 
inverse proportion. What is the explanation for this? 
  [Nikolayev] The border of the former Union exceeded 62,000 
km, while Russia's border is 60,932 km. Not a large difference, 
as you can see. The numerical strength of Russia's Border Troops 
is 30,000 men below the Union level. As much as 30 percent of 
the Border Troops' assets, along with engineering and technical 
equipment, remained outside of Russia. This means that the 
border has been weakened by the same percentage. Around 1,500 
border violators have been apprehended just since the beginning 
of this year. Around 400 weapons and a large quantity of 
ammunition have been detected and confiscated. And so, as you 
can see, the border fully reflects those disturbing processes 
occurring inside the country. This is why I perform my job more 
on the border than in the office. This is confirmed by the fact 
that I have gone on special assignment 14 times in 2 months. 
  [Lunev] You were recently made a member of the Security 
Council, which means that the border service today is regarded 
not just as armed protection and defense of Russia's borders but 
also as a political field contributing to the maintenance of 
diplomatic mutual understanding of contiguous states. Is that so? 
  [Nikolayev] One has to be a diplomat, to seek and find 
mutually acceptable decisions on issues involvig contiguous 
states. Reality is forcing us to do that: 
  the border with countries which are not members of the 
Commonwealth--the Baltic states (which have a border with the 
Russian Federation stretching 1,025 km, and the crossing of the 
border is not defined in the international legal respect); 
  the border with Norway, Finland, Poland, the PRC, Mongolia, 
Korea, Japan and the USA, which coincides with the border of the 
former USSR (with a length of 9,758.2 km; the maritime border 
with Japan and he United States is not defined by legal treaty); 
  the border with the Commonwealth nations--Belarus, Ukraine, 
Georgia, Azerbaijan and Kazakhstan--which extends more than 
12,000 km (these border sections are not covered in the military 
respect and are not defined by legal treaty). 
  [Lunev] Andrey Ivanovich, your name appeared in the 
newspapers when you were still a young lieutenant. Today you are 
a colonel-general. An entire lifetime separates these 
milestones. If you can, tell us about that briefly. 
  [Nikolayev] I was born in Moscow four years following the 
Victory. I had to become a military man if only because that was 
the main occupation for men like us. My father was a 
colonel-general. He brought us up in such way that I was never 
the general's son, but I was the son of a general. The reader 
may not believe that this fact brought me many unpleasant 
moments during my studies at the school. My career as an officer 
then began. I commanded a company, a battalion and a regiment. I 
graduated from the Academy imeni Frunze and the General Staff 
Academy. In order for people not to think that I achieved this 
through patronage I had to strive for gold medals, even though I 
am indifferent when it comes to any kind of award. I shall be 
happy if I can be of benefit to Russia in this post and if at 
least one of my sons continues the family tradition. 
  [Lunev] How do you see the future of the Russian border? 
Will 
it be an "iron curtain" or something like the American-Mexican 
border? 
  [Nikolayev] We shall form on the basis of treaties groups of 
Russian border troops in states of the "near abroad" for the 
joint protection of the CIS' external borders. Such groups have 
already been set up in Armenia, Georgia, Tajikistan and Kyrgyzia. 
  On other sectors of the border there will be a gradual 
transition from continuous (solid) engineering and technical 
equipment of protection based on barbed-wire obstacles to a 
system of covering individual sectors using the latest 
achievements of science and technology. With time, I am certain, 
there will be no "iron curtain." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46562 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> SECURITY SERVICES </F>
<H3> <TI>   General Explains New Border Protection Concept </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    General Explains New Border Protection Concept </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM1406102394 Moscow ROSSIYSKIYE VESTI in Russian 11 Jun 94 
pp 2-3 </F>

<F P=103> PM1406102394 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKIYE VESTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Lieutenant General Aleksandr Tymko, chief of the </F>
Main Staff of the Russian Border Troops: "When Will There Be an 
End to the Lack of Borders. Lieutenant General Aleksandr Tymko, 
Chief of the Border Troops Main Staff, Presents the New Concept 
for the Protection of the State Border"] 
  [Text] Colonel General Andrey Nikolayev, commander in 
chief of the Russian Federation [RF] Border Troops, put the 
Concept for the Border Troops' Protection of the State Border, 
the RF Exclusive Economic Zone, and the CIS States' External 
Borders into effect 25 January this year after submitting it to 
the RF Government. This document is nothing new for the troops. 
May 1991 saw the adoption of the first concept defining reform 
of protection of the border and the USSR's economic zone. 
However it was not put into practice. The processes of 
disintegration made it necessary to considerably rework many of 
its provisions. In December 1992 a new version appeared -- with 
a purely Russian state "slant." But the fluidity of the 
geopolitical situation on the territory of the former USSR had 
an adverse effect on the previously established system of border 
protection and the domestic political situation in Russia 
changed so rapidly throughout 1993 that the second concept too 
suffered the fate of its predecessor -- it was no longer 
current. It became necessary to formulate a new concept to take 
into consideration current realities. Which are as follows. 
  With the formation of the RF there have been radical changes 
in the status, position, and conditions for the protection of 
the State Border. Around 14,000 km of the over 60,000-km 
Russian border (over 80 percent of the land border) is in new 
positions that had not been prepared for service or formalized 
in international law. The RF Border Troops have lost around 40 
percent of their ground-, sea-, and air-based forces and 
facilities along with prepared sites for their deployment and 
for the basing of naval and air-based forces, engineering and 
technical facilities, a well-oiled border infrastructure, 
training facilities, command and communications posts, barracks 
and housing, and virtually all the international communications 
posts in the west and south of the country. The Border Troops' 
combat capabilities have more than halved. 
  Russia currently has one-half or one-third the amount of 
ships and launches as the United States and Japan per unit area 
of its territorial waters and exclusive economic zone. Limited 
use of ships owing to fuel shortages increases this gap still 
further. And the troops' lack of icebreakers virtually reduces 
to zero protection of the State Border and Russia's exclusive 
economic zone in the Arctic. An extremely grave situation has 
developed as regards troop manning, particularly in terms of 
the draft contingent. 
  The troops lack a total of over 7,000 officers alone and 
around 20,000 drafted servicemen. Negative trends have also 
manifested themselves in the social sphere. To date over 10,000 
officers and warrant officers in the Border Troops are without 
apartments, and the question of housing for the families of 
servicemen from the combined formations and units withdrawn from 
the Baltic states and Azerbaijan, and also from the 
newly-created checkpoints, is an acute one. In these conditions 
there was an objective need for the phased creation of the 
Russian Border Troops rather than for their reorganization -- a 
need reflected in the new concept. 
  Revival could be said to be the main idea behind the new 
concept for the protection of Russia's borders. Revival of the 
Border Troops, revival of reliable protection of the Russian 
State Border and the external borders of the CIS states, and 
also revival of the actual prestige of border service. It was 
on this that President Yeltsin focused his attention in his 
speech 27 May this year during a meeting with the leadership of 
the Federal Border Service of the Russian Border Troops Main 
Command. 
  The fundamental difference between the new concept and the 
previous ones is the fact that it allows for a change in the 
conditions of border protection to an extent consonant with the 
transitional period. 
  Presumably in the event of a change of emphasis in Russia's 
domestic and foreign policy certain provisions of the latest 
concept will not be put into effect. However it will by and 
large remain effective. 
  The concept stipulates that its main objective is to revive 
the Russian Border Troops and ensure the protection on the State 
Border of the vital interests of the individual, society, and 
the Russian state within the Commonwealth countries' overall 
collective security system. 
  The concept is based on the principles of the peaceful 
resolution of border issues and the development of cooperation 
in guarding the borders of the Commonwealth states and the 
suitability of combat personnel and the numerical strength of 
the Border Troops with the tasks to be performed, current 
legislation, and Russia's international commitments and economic 
potential. 
  Provision is also made for ensuring the personal safety of 
personnel and Border Troop formations, the centralization of 
their leadership, and the principle of one-man command on a 
legal basis. 
  The concept lays down the main areas of the RF Border 
Troops' 
activity with consideration for the special features of the 
regions and the state's economic potential, along with their 
role and position in guarding the Commonwealth's external 
borders. 
  In two or three years it is planned to create in all regions 
a Border Troop grouping disposed in depth, plus operational 
reserves, and also to form a system of material and technical 
support. 
  Moreover a considerable increase in the troops' potential as 
regards the protection of the exclusive economic zone is 
envisaged. 
  Combating intelligence and subversive activity by foreign 
intelligence services and organizations and also illegal actions 
by criminal communities on the State Border, and raising the 
quality of border surveillance and standards at border 
checkpoints to international norms and standards are priority 
areas in the Border Troops' activity of guarding the State 
Border. The "human factor" -- looking after troops and 
providing servicemen with social protection -- has been singled 
out as a priority area of activity. 
  The creation of the CIS and the Economic Union, and the 
existence of "transparent" borders between the republics of the 
former USSR have also created new political realities, primarily 
a commitment by all Commonwealth states to ensuring a stable 
situation on the external borders. However, by no means all the 
newly formed states have an opportunity or the means to reliably 
protect their borders, which compels them to seek ways of 
pooling efforts to ensure their own security on their external 
borders. 
  At present, in line with requests from the leadership of 
Armenia, Georgia, Kirghizia [Kyrgyzstan], and Tajikistan, RF 
Border Troops are stationed on the territory of these states 
guarding their state borders with Turkey, Iran, Afghanistan, and 
China, which are at the same time Commonwealth external borders. 
What is more, some Russian Border Troop officers and warrant 
officers are protecting Turkmenistan's external state borders 
with Afghanistan and Iran. 
  Questions of pooling or coordinating efforts in the 
protection of external borders on the territory of the former 
USSR are being resolved in one way or another with Belorussia 
[Belarus], Ukraine, Azerbaijan, and Uzbekistan with 
consideration for the special features of each state's approach 
to this matter. 
  The role of the Russian Border Troops in guarding the 
Commonwealth's external borders is vividly manifested in 
Tajikistan. The Russian Border Troops in collaboration with 
troop contingents from other Commonwealth states are performing 
the tasks of stopping armed groups, weapons, munitions, and 
drugs penetrating the Tajik-Afghan border. This is having a 
positive effect on the stabilization of the situation both in 
Tajikistan itself and in other adjacent states. 
  Existing Border Troop groupings will guard the border with 
consideration for special regional features in areas that 
coincide with the former USSR border, while this task will be 
performed by newly-formed Russian Border Troop groupings on 
borders with the Baltic States (as with distant foreign 
countries). 
  In the Caucasus it is planned to guard the border in two 
positions: First -- on the CIS external borders (Georgia, 
Armenia, and possibly Azerbaijan); the second border protection 
line follows the Russian State Border, in view of the situation 
on the border and in adjacent regions. 
  Our border with Belorussia will be guarded on the basis of a 
treaty, focusing more on guarding the external CIS border in 
this region. Our border guards will quite possibly guard this 
section of the CIS border jointly with Belorussia's border 
troops. 
  The Russian-Ukrainian border will be guarded in line with 
the 
situation prevailing there, eventually on a joint basis with 
Ukrainian Border Troops. 
  Our border guards also guard the external borders of 
Tajikistan and Kirghizia on the basis of a treaty. 
  By and large emphasis is placed on a sensible combination of 
possibilities for safeguarding the state's security on its own 
border and the external borders of the Commonwealth. Thus 
memorandums have been signed on joint protection of the 
Commonwealth states' external borders in the Central Asian and 
Western regions. The question of signing a similar memorandum 
with the states of the Transcaucasus is on the agenda. 
  The exclusive economic zone is guarded by formations of 
naval 
forces and aviation and coastal forces and facilities of the 
Border Troops interacting with the forces and facilities of RF 
ministries and departments. At the same time the main efforts 
are concentrated on inhibiting and suppressing illegal activity 
by Russian and foreign ships. The formulation and introduction 
of a state system to monitor and track the situation and 
identify ships by water area and by region is being organized. 
  Over the next year or two we will seek the optimum scenarios 
for the protection of the State Border at sea by means of the 
comprehensive use of sea- and air-based forces and facilities in 
conjunction with land-based (coastal) components. Studies and 
experiments will be conducted into the creation of special 
sea-based formations of the Border Troops on a tactical and 
operational level. 
  In the Arctic region protection of the border is being 
reorganized with consideration for the opening of the Arctic 
ship route to foreign ships in transit through Russian ports; 
operational activity is being improved and the basis of a 
unified system for monitoring the surface situation in 
territorial waters and ports is being outlined, for which a 
structurally complete Border Troop grouping is being created in 
the Arctic. 
  Effective technologies are being introduced at RF State 
Border checkpoints, and the provision of equipment for all 
components of border control is being improved in order to 
detect and avert illegal border crossing by individuals and 
transport systems. 
  At present a considerable proportion of the RF Border Troop 
grouping operates in areas of local wars and armed conflicts. 
The concept stipulates for the first time that under these 
conditions the State Border is guarded in collaboration with the 
forces and facilities of the RF and CIS states' Armed Forces and 
other troops, using forms and methods characteristic of border 
service and systematic combat operations by the troops with 
consideration for the special features of the prevailing 
situation. In some areas the Border Troops are switching to the 
defense and protection of Russia's State Border jointly with the 
Armed Forces. Steps are being taken to ensure the personal 
safety of the Border Troops. 
  Practice shows that any scientific or practical idea and the 
most necessary and carefully conceived program will remain just 
a good intention if it is not backed up by material-technical 
and financial resources. The implementation of the concept 
necessitates the adoption of certain urgent measures at federal 
level to ensure the security of the RF on its borders and the 
external borders of the Commonwealth states. 
  These measures could include the provision of amenities for 
troops on the new borders, the creation of the requisite 
infrastructure to ensure that troops are maintained on permanent 
combat readiness and are capable of performing their tasks of 
reliably guarding the border under varying conditions. The 
concept itself also includes a mechanism for the implementation 
of its main provisions. It envisages in particular the 
submission to RF legislative bodies of draft laws on the 
protection of the State Border, the exclusive economic zone, and 
areas of Border Troop activity; the publication of departmental 
statutory instruments by the commander in chief of the Border 
Troops; and the formulation and adoption of annual plans for 
organizational and other development of the Border Troops. 
  Thus the establishment and formalization in international 
law 
of the RF State Border, the formation and provision of amenities 
for the troops on the new borders, their strengthening and 
development, manning, the intensification of their social 
protection, and also comprehensive material and technical 
support are the priority tasks in 1994. 
  This year provision is being made for the formation of 
additional troop and operational groups, operational-troop 
departments, border detachments, individual border subunits 
[komendatury], a border control detachment and individual 
checkpoints, naval units and subunits, individual air squadrons, 
tactical reserves, and other units. By the end of the year the 
RF Border Troop grouping may have increased by 20,000-30,000 men. 
  A considerable part of the concept is devoted to developing 
a 
system of legal and social protection for servicemen and other 
citizens involved in the protection of the State Border. Draft 
legislative acts designed to provide legal protection, establish 
guarantees and compensation, boost the standard of living of the 
servicemen, primarily those serving in subunits directly 
guarding the border and the exclusive economic zone, and develop 
a system of benefits with consideration for 
physical-geographical and other regional features have been 
outlined and formulated. Agreements are being drafted with 
Commonwealth states on matters pertaining to the legal status, 
material and financial support, benefits and compensation, 
housing, medical, pension, everyday-service and trade, and other 
kinds of support for RF Border Troop servicemen involved in 
guarding the State Border on their territories. 
  The wide-ranging tasks envisaged by the concept can only be 
resolved if the troops are manned by professionally trained 
cadres. 
  The phased transition to a mixed system of manning, 
including 
citizens from the CIS states coming to serve in the Russian 
Border Troops on contract, is a priority in manning and training 
of cadres and personnel for the Russian Border Troops. This is 
only possible once amendments have been made to current 
legislation. 
  It is also necessary to formulate and introduce systems for 
the professional recruitment and assessment of the quality of 
cadres' activity, their transfer and promotion, and the 
provision of incentives for officer cadres' 
military-professional activity; to develop regional centers for 
the training of warrant officers (ensigns); and to improve the 
system of training for border guard officers. The formation of 
a Border Troops Military Academy will undoubtedly help resolve 
the problem of providing the troops with trained officer cadres. 
  The question of creating a Border Troop Polytechnical 
Institute is being studied. 
  Questions pertaining to the scientific study of problems of 
the theory and practice of guarding the State Border hold a 
special place in the concept. 
  In its current state scientific support cannot be improved 
by 
cosmetic means. It must first be shaped into an integral system 
whereby any scientific idea that is of benefit to the troops 
finds someone to implement it and a customer. We have formed a 
complete system of scientific support which makes it possible to 
provide a comprehensive solution to all the troops' important 
problems based on in-depth scientific studies. The Center for 
Operational-Border Studies and the Border Troops Research 
Technical Center is intended to be an important component of the 
system of scientific support for the troops' activity that is 
being developed. 
  In view of the fact that it is hard to predict the duration 
of the transitional period, it has been decided to implement the 
concept by formulating and adopting annual plans for the 
organizational and other development of the Border Troops. 
  I would like to hope that the new document will be a real 
basis for our work of strengthening Russian statehood and 
defending the vital national interests of the RF and the 
Commonwealth states. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46563 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma026___94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-026 </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> GENERAL ISSUES </F>
<F P=101> SECURITY SERVICES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russian Counterintelligence Officer Interviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russian Counterintelligence Officer Interviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0429A Volgograd VOLGOGRADSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 12 May 
94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94UM0429A </F>
<F P=104>  Volgograd VOLGOGRADSKAYA PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Colonel of State Security Viktor </F>
Nikolayevich Bobrov, chief, Department of Military 
Counterintelligence, by I. Barykin; place and date of interview 
not given: "It's Painful To See How They're Selling the 
Motherland'"] 
  [Text] Could I ever have imagined five or so years 
ago that I would be able to interview the counterintelligence 
chief so easily? All the more so because he has no patience with 
the mass media which, in his opinion, are responsible in many 
ways for some of the things that are happening in the country 
now? But V. N. Bobrov, colonel of state security, chief of the 
Department of Military Counterintelligence of the RF Federal 
Counterintelligence Service for the 8th Guards Army Corps, does 
have respect for our firm--VOLGOGRADSKAYA PRAVDA. Because in his 
words it continues to express the views of many, including the 
unfortunate, layers of, and it tries to speak the truth, no 
matter how bitter it may be. 
  At the appointed hour I drove up to the famous "house 
with antennas" on Chekisty Square. Vladimir Nikolayevich 
received me in his modestly furnished office. The furnishings 
were limited to a huge map of Europe covering an entire wall 
showing the locations of the intelligence centers of the NATO 
bloc, portraits of F. E. Dzerzhinskiy and Yu. V. Andropov 
(despite the changes, the occupant of this office remains 
faithful once and forever to assimilated principles), and a pile 
of telephones on a little table, ready for instantaneous 
communication with the most remote points in the country and 
with the chief of the RF Federal Counterintelligence 
Service. 
  No matter how I tried to steer it in the needed channel, our 
conversation, which went on for over an hour, wouldn't stay 
within its banks. Viktor Nikolayevich guided the interview away 
from slippery issues with a smile. Anyway, I soon became used to 
these "secrets of the Madrid court," and accepted the rules of 
the game. 
  My first question touched upon a topic that was most painful 
to my partner in conversation: 
  [Barykin] Would I be right in saying that these are the 
worst 
times for counterintelligence, now that the economy has been 
devastated and the army is disintegrating, now that there are 
huge holes in the borders, and now that people are trying to 
toss 70 years of history into the trash can? 
  [Bobrov] "That's putting it mildly," my partner in 
conversation bitterly asserted. "Many military secrets have been 
sold for 30 pieces of silver (seven and a half dollars, if we 
convert this at today's rate), footholds have been lost in 
Europe, Africa, Latin America and the Near East, and our troops 
are scurrying out of Eastern Europe and the Baltics. Giving away 
state secrets has become so commonplace. Things can't get any 
worse," my partner in conversation sighed. "But no matter how 
they've tried to bring my department down," he continued, "it 
has managed to keep its secrets. There were enough clear minds 
around here that we managed to encrypt the archives and 
information on our agents long before the August coup. For 
example the BND (West German intelligence) is still trying to 
figure out the GDR's undercover operation. I can tell you that 
their efforts are useless." 
  [Barykin] What are the strategy and tactics of 
counterintelligence today? 
  [Bobrov] "Having managed to preserve its operation, our 
department is doing what it is supposed to be doing--protecting 
state and military secrets, providing counterintelligence 
support to the Armed Forces, determining their combat 
capability, and fighting terrorists and saboteurs, organized 
crime and the drug trade (unfortunately it has made its way into 
the army as well)." 
  [Barykin] To the extent possible, can you offer any details 
about the activity of your department? 
  [Bobrov] "Now that servicemen are being withdrawn hastily 
from the Western and Northwestern groups of forces, foreign 
intelligence is openly recruiting our soldiers and officers. We 
are trying to stop this work. Recall the notorious `Gorchakov 
case.' The ex-civil aviation pilot was recruited by the BND, he 
stayed behind in the FRG, and there he organized a local ring, 
trapping in his nets those whose eyes caught fire from the sight 
of dollars and Deutsche marks. Our fellow-countryman from 
Volgograd managed to fall in with them. Gorchakov tasked him to 
collect secret information from a certain unit in the Western 
Group of Forces. The sorry spy was caught red-handed and was 
shuttled over to Moscow, where he faced a military court. My 
associates and I had the occasion to question him in Lefortovo. 
  "Unfortunately such recruitment of our soldiers and officers 
by Western special services is continuing, and it is proceeding 
more intensively. Not only our potential enemies--the special 
services of the USA, France and Germany--but even our former 
friends are showing keen interest in the new huge force grouping 
building up in the Northern Caucasus. Intelligence services of 
Ukraine, Moldova and the Baltic and Transcaucasian states are 
pricking up their ears, even though we had reached agreement 
with them not to engage in such activity. They are all 
interested in learning the scale of deployment of the new force 
grouping, its mobilization plans, its armament, combat 
readiness, and the morale of our soldiers. Our `friends' are 
also interested in the latest developments of our defense 
research institutes and plants. This is why military delegations 
from the NATO countries have started visiting Volgograd so much 
more frequently. All military attaches that visit us are in fact 
career scouts, and they have but one purpose--gathering secret 
information, and filling in the details that their associates in 
espionage failed to root out. 
  "They come here like it's their home, behave impertinently, 
and capitalize on the possibilities offered by the conventional 
arms limitation treaty for their own ends. We naturally keep our 
eyes on all of them. Our operational possibilities allow us to 
do so. When it becomes necessary, we toss them some `bait,' lead 
them on a false trail, and establish who their contacts are. 
  "As long as you've asked for the details," V. N. Bobrov 
said, 
"our department's sphere of activity includes the lower reaches 
of the Volga, and naturally, Kapustin Yar, which is also within 
the zone of interest of `friendly' special services. That's how 
far things have gone! A military attache is, after all, a 
military scout, he can fly into our city incognito, without any 
kind of permission, settle down with some family, and go about 
getting answers to questions he's interested in. 
  "We also monitor the activities of foreign specialists 
employed in construction of military posts. There are no 
restrictions, you see, on their movements about the territory of 
another state. That's how it came about that we detained Turks, 
even in Kapustin Yar, under the guise of vocational-technical 
school students, with forged diplomas and passports. What were 
they doing in Kapustin Yar? 
  "Korean specialists carry dollars from English banks in 
their 
suitcases in circumvention of tax laws." 
  [Barykin] "One of the tasks assigned to military 
counterintelligence, as you yourself have said, is to fight 
organized crime in the army. Has all of this really assumed such 
a scale?" was may next question to Bobrov. 
  [Bobrov] "Unfortunately, all of the negative processes that 
have affected the society are affecting those who work behind 
the high fences of the military. The army is disintegrating, 
discipline and the morale of servicemen are falling, and as a 
result, incidents occur--`dedovshchina' going as far as murder, 
shady bank transactions, and major misappropriations of weapons 
and explosives from military storage dumps. 
  "Recently we fended off an attack on a certain military 
depot 
near Kotluban by persons of Dagestani nationality. They planned 
to kill the sentries and take large lots of weapons out of the 
oblast. To the honor of our division, in the 4 year's that I've 
been in Volgograd only one assault rifle has gone missing. We 
squelched an attempt to obtain several million rubles from a 
bank on the basis of a forged letter of advice." 
  [Barykin] As I understand from this conversation, military 
counterintelligence has its "eyes and ears" everywhere. By that 
I mean undercover agents. 
  [Bobrov] "As they say in cases such as this, we don't get 
paid to do nothing: Where necessary, we use special equipment 
and undercover assistance. These people are patriots who offer 
to help for something other than the sake of money. We simply 
can't offer them any incentives at market prices. All 
intelligence services of the world have their informants, and 
for some reason it's only in our country that the impression 
certain strata of the population sometimes hold of them is not 
as it should be. These people are a priceless treasure to us, 
and they help us a very great deal. Who do you think wrote the 
Old Testament? A scout! This was his first message to the Divine 
Center. Covert operatives--angels--helped him to gather the 
data. And the first counterespionage agent did everything he 
could to keep the message from the Center's scout from falling 
into the wrong hands." 
  During our interview the telephone rang incessantly, and 
Viktor Nikolayevich's short answers--"I'm busy"--once again 
emphasized that this department has respect for our newspaper 
and its representatives. Nonetheless, in order not to abuse the 
counterintelligence agent's time, I cut short my list of 
questions. 
  [Barykin] "Viktor Nikolayevich," I urged my partner in 
conversation to be open, "tell me honestly, are you sorry that 
you went into counterintelligence?" 
  [Bobrov] "So far, no," the occupant of the office smiled. 
"Still, all of these years--and I've worked in this department 
for almost a quarter of a century--I've been unable to calmly 
accept those who are selling the country and its secrets. It's 
painful to see, believe me, and painful to hear that the KGB, 
and now the FSK, is looked at as some kind of monster. It angers 
me to hear that. The country was strong in its secrets, which 
our people have watched over at the cost of their lives. They 
were the first to fall under the knife of the purges of 1932, 
and NKVD divisions defended Stalingrad down to the last warrior. 
And it's not the fault of the rank and file of the KGB that it 
was headed by scum like Beria. There are many people like that 
in the MVD, and if you're looking for a true monster, consider 
what the MVD has transformed into. 
  "I started my military career in the missile forces," the 
counterspy continued his narration when I asked him for a sketch 
of his biography. "I graduated from the appropriate schools. No, 
not the kind you're thinking of--missile schools. The KGB school 
and academy came some time later. Once I was summoned by KGB 
chief Kryuchkov: You're going to Afghanistan for a week, he told 
me. But as it turned out, I stayed half a year there. I worked 
on a special assignment in this country from the first day of 
commitment of our troops. After Afghanistan I worked wherever 
they sent me. In 1990 I moved with my family to Volgograd." 
  Three years ago Viktor Nikolayevich became a grandfather. 
His 
daughter works in the tax inspectorate, his son-in-law is a 
military pilot, and his wife is a well known radio journalist. 
  "No matter how difficult it may be for the motherland today, 
I believe that some sort of stability will nonetheless set in," 
the counterintelligence chief concluded the interview. "And I'll 
be happy if our department could make the contribution within 
its means to this effort. And one other thing. Please extend my 
deep regards to all war veterans in this holiday period. For 
saving the world from the abhorrent yoke of fascism. And this 
rain that is now falling outside this window is the tears of 
soldiers' widows that had not be fully shed during the war." 
  What V. N. Bobrov said in parting is still fresh in my 
memory: "The English have a saying: My country, right or wrong. 
That is, our problems are for us to solve, and we don't need any 
`friends'." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46564 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Arms, Military Equipment </F>
<H3> <TI>   Field SAM Systems Have Always Been the World's Best! But the </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Field SAM Systems Have Always Been the World's Best! But the </PHRASE></F></HT>
  Future? 

<F P=102> 94UM0311A Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 1, 1993 (Signed to press 5 Jul 93) pp 3-8--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0311A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Veniamin Pavlovich Yefremov under the rubric </F>
"Armaments. Military Hardware"] 
  [Text] Veniamin Pavlovich Yefremov was born in 1926. 
He came to the Scientific-Research Electro-Mechanical Institute 
(NIEMI) in 1945, after completing the Moscow Communications 
Tekhnikum. He completed the evening division of the Moscow 
Electrical Engineering Institute of Communications without leave 
from his job. He became the chief of a department in the field 
in 1958, and has headed NIEMI since 1968. 
  V.P. Yefremov has been a General Designer since 1983. 
Currently, while remaining General Designer, he has been heading 
the Anteypromeksport concern, of which NIEMI is the lead 
organization. 
  V.P. Yefremov was awarded the degree of doctor of 
technical sciences in 1966; in 1986 he was elected a 
corresponding member of the USSR Academy of Sciences, and in 
1992 an academician of the Russian Academy of Sciences. 
  V.P. Yefremov is the principal designer of the Krug, 
Osa, S-300V and Tor air-defense missile systems and a number of 
upgrades for the ground forces PVO [air defense] troops. 
  V.P. Yefremov was awarded the title of Hero of 
Socialist Labor, and has been awarded Lenin (1967) and State 
(1984) prizes along with five medals for his contributions to 
the cause of creating domestic arms. 
  [VPK] Veniamin Pavlovich, how do you personally assess the 
air-defense missile weaponry developed by NIEMI? 
  [Yefremov] NIEMI is the leading enterprise in the field of 
air-defense missile armaments for the ground forces. We have 
developed four types of SAM systems--the Krug, Osa, S-300V and 
Tor--each of which is an original. All of these systems have 
been upgraded a number of times. 
  The first SAM system developed by request of the ground 
forces was the Krug system. High mobility is a distinguishing 
feature of that system. The deployment or shutdown time does not 
exceed 20 minutes. This is provided for by the fact that all of 
the SAM system gear is accommodated on highly mobile, tracked 
self-propelled vehicles and are joined by radio links. This 
system entered service with the ground forces in 1966. SAM 
systems comparable in mobility were not being developed anywhere 
at that time. The system replaced the S-75 SAM system with the 
ground forces; its deployment time was several hours. 
  High mobility of a SAM system has much significance for the 
ground forces. It also has great significance in supporting 
combat operations with the employment of high-precision weaponry. 
  A second feature of the SAM system is autonomy. Its own 
radar 
set was created as part of the system for that purpose, for the 
detection of airborne targets, and is also accommodated on a 
tracked vehicle. The properties of mobility and autonomy are 
manifested to an even greater extent in the second SAM system, 
the Osa, which was developed at the institute. This is the first 
SAM system in the world in which all of the elements are located 
on a single self-propelled platform. It must be said that the 
similar Mauler SAM system was being developed at the same time 
in the United States, but its development was never completed. 
  The acquisition radar in the Osa SAM system operates while 
on 
the move and tracks the targets with autotracking, with the 
launch of the SAMs taking place after a brief halt. The system 
can advance with the battle formations of the troops, providing 
defense for them against means of air attack (SVN). The Osa SAM 
system entered service with the ground forces in 1972, but it 
remains quite effective to this day. 
  The Tor SAM system was created to replace the Osa; the 
entire 
process of combat operations is performed in automated mode in 
it. The launch of the SAMs is performed vertically from the body 
of the self-propelled vehicle for the first time in a system of 
this class, which makes it possible to reduce to a minimum the 
operating time of the system and increase its effectiveness in 
battle with airborne targets that appear unexpectedly. The 
possibility of simultaneous firing on several airborne targets 
was also made a reality in the Tor SAM system. Other types of 
SAM systems in this class do not have that trait. 
  Finally, the S-300V SAM system entered service with the 
ground forces in 1982. This is a multichannel SAM system, the 
most powerful weapon in the ground forces today. It was 
developed to fight not only aerodynamic targets, but first and 
foremost operational-tactical and tactical ballistic missiles. 
The S-300V surpasses the Patriot SAM system in this regard, 
supporting not only a more powerful SAM with a highly effective 
warhead, but also having a special acquisition radar as part of 
the SAM system. Another advantage of the S-300V is its high 
mobility. All of the combat elements are placed on highly 
mobile, tracked self-propelled vehicles. 
  The high effectiveness of the Tor and S-300V systems was 
demonstrated in the Oborona-92 exercises conducted in November 
of 1992. 


Table 1 -- Basic Characteristics of Medium-Range SAM Systems 

Characteristics           Krug        S-300V                  Patriot 

ZUR-1                     ZUR-2 

Developer-country         USSR        USSR        USSR        United States 

Year of entry into        1964        1982        1982        1980 
service 

Maximum inclined range: 


defeat of aircraft, km    50          100         80          100 

ballistic missiles, km    --          40          30          up to 30 

Maximum lethal 
altitude: 

aircraft, km              24          30          25          25 

ballistic missiles, km    --          25          25          12--15 

Maximum speed of          1,000       3,000       3,000       900--1,200 
targets being hit, 
m/sec 

Number of SAMs per        2           2           4           4 
launcher 

Shutdown/deployment       5/5         5/5         5/5         30/45 
times, minutes 


  We are of course inferior to the West in the elemental base, 
with all of the consequences arising therefrom, but domestic 
design thought has always been ahead in the field of SAM system 
development. Investments are needed in order to maintain that 
status, however. The loss of our leading position is threatened 
otherwise. 
  [VPK] What shape is NIEMI in today? What is the personnel 
situation? 
  [Yefremov] NIEMI, as many other defense enterprises, is 
experiencing difficult times today. The main cause of that is 
insufficient financing and a lack of clarity with regard to 
state orders. 
  Some 1,500 specialists, roughly 25 percent, have left the 
institute. There were three waves: first the specialists under 
30 years of age left, then those 30--35, and then those 35-40. 
Specialists of the highest grade remain, but their ages are 40 
and up. There are very few young people. This means that the 
principle of succession is being violated. If we are not able to 
restore the principle of succession in 1993-94, then the 
enterprise will lose its traditions, its style and, as they say, 
its look. We are taking steps in three areas to keep that from 
happening. The first area pertains to the selection of the 
priority projects in the defense field. We have been able, 
taking into account a series of organizational measures, to 
raise the average pay at the enterprise. It is, however, still 
markedly inferior to the pay at commercial structures. The 
second area consists of selling models of our weapons aboard. 
The third is the joint development of systems for civilian and 
military purposes with foreign firms. The second and third 
areas, in my opinion, could provide an opportunity to restore 
the potential of the enterprise, bring back those who have left 
and attract young personnel. 
  We have created the Anteypromeksport concern. It includes 
virtually all of the enterprises that are active in the 
development and series production of the types of SAM systems 
that we have been talking about. We are hoping to be able to 
resolve a number of urgent issues with the help of the concern. 
  [VPK] Can the necessary financial resources be obtained 
through the conversion of some of the enterprise? 
  [Yefremov] Conversion does not only provide funds for most 
defense enterprises, it requires considerable expenditures as 
well. If you were to take, say, a tank plant, its conversion to 
national-economic products would require the replacement of the 
basic process equipment. Even the transition of an enterprise in 
the radar field to, for example, microwave ovens entails 
considerable technical difficulties. It must be taken into 
account that the psychology of the designer and the industrial 
engineer in the defense field is markedly different from the 
psychology of an industrial engineer and a designer in the 
production of national-economic goods. This is conditioned by 
the different scope of production of the items and their 
reliability, servicing and cost. 
  It is probably somewhat easier to implement conversion at 
aviation enterprises, i.e. where dual-purpose 
technology is used. 
  It must be kept in mind, however, that the nature of the 
production of goods for the national economy and for defense 
differs substantially. 
  The pursuit of conversion first requires a definition of the 
principle of defensive sufficiency for the state, the military 
doctrine and the required quality and quantity of armaments. The 
enterprises have to be selected for the production of defensive 
hardware proceeding from that, which should become the backbone 
of the military-industrial complex and which would be expedient 
to have under state ownership. The military-industrial complex 
(VPK), in that case, would be subjected to the competition of 
the market and the effects of individual entrepreneurial 
structures to the least extent. 
  The remaining enterprises in the VPK are being converted to 
the output of goods for national-economic purposes and, where 
necessary and expedient, could take orders in defense fields as 
well. 
  [VPK] What international exhibitions has the enterprise 
taken 
part in? What are the successes in the concluding of contracts? 
  [Yefremov] NIEMI has taken part in four international 
exhibitions over the last two years. The Tor SAM system was 
shown at Manila in 1991 and Le Bourget in 1992. The modern 
ground forces air-defense weaponry, including the S-300V and Tor 
SAM systems, was shown for the first time at the Mosaeroshow-92 
at Zhukovskiy. We demonstrated only mock-ups of our systems and 
showed films about them at the exhibition at Afiny. 


Table 2 -- Basic Characteristics of Short-Range SAM Systems 

Characteristics               Name of SAM system 

Tor                           Osa            Roland-2 

Developer-country             USSR           USSR               FRG, France 

Year of entry into service    1986           1972               1979, 1983 

Maximum lethal range, km      12             10                 6.0 

Maximum speed of targets      700            500                450 
being hit, m/sec 

Launch mass of SAM, kg        170            127                62.5 

Number of SAMs per launcher   8              6                  2 


Shutdown/deployment times,    5/5            5/5                3/3 
minutes 


  Foreign specialists demonstrated great interest in our 
prototypes at all of these exhibitions, and they negotiated for 
the purchase of the Tor and S-300V systems. American businessmen 
wanted to buy two of the Tor SAM systems, but we did not agree 
as we are trying to sell an entire lot at once. 
  Negotiations are continuing today on the procurement of our 
SAM systems by various nations. Interest increased considerably 
after the Oborona-92 exercise, at which representatives of 
foreign military circles were present. The systems made a great 
impression on them. 
  We will take part in an arms show at Abu Dhabi in 1993. A 
firing of the Tor SAM system is being proposed there. I feel 
that we will resolve the question of the sale of our systems 
abroad in the first half of 1993, and will be able to rectify 
the financial situation of the institute and the association. 
  [VPK] Talk is being heard that you are encountering a large 
obstacle on the part of the government in trying to sell the 
systems abroad. 
  [Yefremov] This is complex issue. The government, on the one 
hand, is not impeding this trade. We are trying to sell 
defensive weaponry, and there can be no moral condemnation from 
that standpoint; the government even has a vested interest in 
that trade. We received basic permission for the sale of the 
S-300V system on 4 July 1992, and this question was resolved 
even earlier for the Tor SAM system. A state monopoly, on the 
other hand, exists in the trade for this good. 
  It seems to me that the prices should be coordinated among 
the governmental bodies and the producers. 
  [VPK] What business relationships are taking shape between 
you and American specialists and businessmen? 
  [Yefremov] The United States is displaying a great deal of 
interest in our projects. As I mentioned already, we received a 
proposal from U.S. businessmen for the sale of the Tor SAM 
system. We have made several trips to the United States at the 
invitation of various organizations, and taken part in various 
seminars and discussions on theoretical issues. Specialists in 
the United States are interested in what we think on a number of 
scientific and technical problems. A group of our specialists is 
now being sent to the United States, where they will discuss 
questions of the employment of the Tor SAM system to fight 
drug-trafficking groups and the design of phased antenna arrays 
(FAR). 
  The Americans feel that we are underestimating the dangers 
of 
the drug trade, and our country will still be running into this. 
It must be said, with regard to phased antenna arrays, that the 
specialists are attracted by our engineering ideas, which make 
it possible to create inexpensive FARs. 
  (The discussion took place in the middle of December. The 
group has since returned, having conducted their talks 
successfully.) 
  [VPK] What relationships link the institute with the PRC? 
  [Yefremov] Representatives of the PRC are also displaying a 
great deal of interest in our hardware. The Chinese Republic 
wants to re-equip its army, and is seeking a solution to that 
issue. The air-defense weaponry of the PRC army is by and large 
obsolete, but China is still not able to procure modern weaponry 
in large quantities abroad; it is thus trying to find another 
solution to the problem. There is a desire, in particular, to 
develop their own SAM systems with the participation of foreign 
specialists. 
  Our institute has received a proposal to take part in such 
projects. Negotiations are currently underway. 
  [VPK] The defense industry in the Soviet Union, as the rest 
of the national economy, was structured according to the sector 
principle, and was consolidated around the Military-Industrial 
Commission under the Presidium of the Council of Ministers. What 
do you see as the principles for the organization of the defense 
industry and the management of the defense complex under 
contemporary conditions? 
  [Yefremov] The sector structure of the defense industry 
(electronics, electrical engineering, aviation, nuclear etc.) 
headed by the Military-Industrial Commission, in my opinion, was 
the most efficient. Highly skilled personnel and technologies in 
this area were concentrated in the defense industry, on the one 
hand, and the presence of the commission made it possible, on 
the other, to organize interaction among the sectors. The 
planned management of the economy made it possible, by and 
large, for USSR Gosplan to organize all sectors of the national 
economy and formulate targets for five years. The monitoring 
bodies of the government evaluated the activity of the sectors 
and the largest enterprises for the fulfillment of the five-year 
plan. This system, of course, required a certain quantity of 
highly skilled bureaucrats. There were, however, both a target 
and government bodies seeking its attainment. The leading 
capitalist countries borrowed from us the idea of planning the 
development of their economy, especially in the military realm. 
A program for the development of more than twenty new types of 
dual-purpose technology, for instance, has been planned and 
approved at the Congressional level. The SDI program in the 
United States is a vivid example of planning in the military 
realm. 
  The structures for the planning and management of the 
defense 
industry were destroyed during the so-called times of 
restructuring and democracy, and the Ministry of Industry that 
was created proved to be a monster that was unable to do 
anything. 
  A Committee for the Defense Industry has now been created, 
which it seems to me will unite the former sector ministries and 
the military-industrial commission. 
  The idea is not a new one, but it could be asserted in 
advance that this is a positive step compared to the existing 
situation. Planning and strict monitoring of the fulfillment of 
plans on the part of government bodies should undoubtedly exist. 
An army still exists, and a defense complex in industry and the 
bodies for managing it should also exist, i.e. the 
army and the defense complex of industry are inseparable. 
  COPYRIGHT: Vooruzheniye. Politika. Konversiya 1993 No 1 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46565 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Arms, Military Equipment </F>
<H3> <TI>   The Praise for Russian Arms Workers Multiplies in Tula </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    The Praise for Russian Arms Workers Multiplies in Tula </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0311B Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 1, 1993 (Signed to press 5 Jul 93) pp 9-14--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0311B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with KBP general designer Arkadiy Georgiyevich </F>
Shipunov: "The Praise for Russian Arms Workers Multiplies in 
Tula--The KBP Is Developing Weapons for the Ground, Air 
and Naval Forces"] 
  [Text] Arkadiy Georgiyevich Shipunov was born in 1927 
in the city of Tula. After completing the Tula Mechanical 
Institute in 1950, he worked at the Central Scientific-Research 
Institute of Precision Machine Building (city of Podolsk in 
Moscow Oblast). He was named the chief, and chief designer, of 
the Design Bureau of Instrument Building (KBP) in the city of 
Tula in 1962. He has been General Designer since 1983. A number 
of weapons prototypes that have entered service with the ground, 
air and naval forces were developed at the KBP under the 
scientific supervision of Arkadiy Georgiyevich, and with his 
direct participation. 
  The principal ones are the Fagot, Konkurs and Metis 
antitank systems, the Kastet, Shepena, Bastion and Refleks tank 
guided weapons systems, weapons systems for the BMP-2, BMP-3 and 
BMD-2 infantry fighting and assault vehicles, the Krasnopol 
guided artillery weapons systems, the Tunguska and Kortik 
automatic aircraft cannons and the GSh-30, GSh-30-1 and GSh-6-30 
automatic cannons. 
  Arkadiy Georgiyevich has been awarded the title of Hero 
of Socialist Labor for his great contribution to the creation of 
domestic weapons. He has been awarded four orders of the USSR, 
and has received the titles of Laureate of the Lenin and State 
prizes. 
  Arkadiy Georgiyevich is a doctor of technical sciences 
and a professor; he was elected a corresponding member of the 
USSR Academy of Sciences in 1984, and a full member in 1991. 
  [VPK] Arkadiy Georgiyevich, the design bureau that you head 
develops weaponry for the ground forces, PVO [air-defense] 
troops and air and naval forces. How do you evaluate the level 
of that weaponry? 
  [Shipunov] I would like to preface my answer with a small 
introduction. A re-organization of the Design Bureau for 
Instrument Building [KBP] was carried out in 1958-62, and its 
specialization--antitank missiles--was defined. That narrow 
specialization, in my opinion, limits the creative opportunities 
of the design collective. I have thus tried since the very 
beginning of my work at the KBP to expand the spectrum of 
armaments being developed, which fosters competition that 
provides an impetus for the developers and forces them to seek 
out better engineering ideas. This makes it possible to have 
high scientific, engineering and technological levels. The areas 
of tank guided and air-defense weapons, armaments for infantry 
fighting vehicles (BMPs) and guided artillery shells and systems 
have thus been appearing gradually at the KBP. An "old" 
area--automatic cannons--has also been restored. 
  It should be noted, in recalling the past, that the turn to 
missile technology was the correct one, but exaggerations 
started immediately, as usual. Many of the artillery KBPs were 
shut down, and the scientific, design and engineering personnel 
were sent off to other work. Four or five years passed, however, 
and it became clear that an army cannot exist without artillery. 
The artillery areas were "restored" by decrees and the 
corresponding orders, but the personnel had been lost and the 
collectives had dissipated. 
  It is easy to destroy scientific collectives, but difficult 
to create them. The artillery personnel were able to be retained 
at our design bureau. Much credit for that belongs to Vasiliy 
Petrovich Gryazev, who was the most major designer in the world 
of automatic weapons. 
  The deliberate and inadvertant destruction of the country's 
military-industrial complex (VPK) is also underway today. It 
will be impossible to restore the VPK if we pass a certain point 
in its destruction. And if there is no VPK, there will not be a 
modern army in Russia either. 
  Several stages in the development of the armaments being 
created by the KBP can be delineated. 
  The first is the creation of a standardized family of guided 
weaponry for tanks, antitank weaponry and BMPs. 


Table 1 -- Basic Characteristics of PTRK [Antitank Missile Systems] 

Characteristics    Name of PTRK 

Metis              Fagot    Konkurs    Drakon    Milan     HOT 

Developer          USSR     USSR       USSR      United    France,    France, 
country                                          States    FRG        FRG 

Year of entry      1978     1970       1974      1968      1972       1975 
into service 

Firing range: 

max, meters        1,000    2,500      4,000     1,000     2,000      4,000 

min, meters        40       75         75        30        25         75 

Missile launch     4.6      7.3        14.5      6.3       6.55       20 
mass, kg 

Missile            93       120        135       102       103        136 
diameter, mm 

Armor              460      460        500       430       580        750 
penetration, mm 

Average flight     180      180        208       110       200        250 
speed, m/sec 

Type of homing     semi-automatic wire-guided 
system 


  These are the unified control instrument, unified laser-beam 
missile control system and two-caliber (100mm and 125mm) guided 
missiles. 
  There are as yet no missiles in the armies of other 
countries 
that are guided by laser beam. 
  The high level of standardization ensures the relatively low 
cost of production of the guided missiles. 
  The second development stage is the set of weaponry for the 
BMP-3. The work has proceeded with some difficulty, since 
changes in the tactics for waging battles were required therein. 
The new type of BMP can operate as an independent entity without 
tanks and artillery, since the 100mm gun with relatively low 
ballistics fulfills the role of close-support artillery, the 
30mm cannon and machineguns together with the assault force 
perform the role of the classical BMP, and the guided missile 
launched through the cannon barrel is a guided weapons system. 
The BMP-3, combining the qualities of artillery, tanks and BMPs, 
thereby satisfies the requirements for mobile operations and, 
consequently, those of the newly created mobile forces, to the 
greatest extent. To this should be added the fact that the 
combat vehicle should possess certain qualities of 
command-and-control vehicles, so as to reduce the percentage of 
purely supporting military hardware in a group of forces. This 
is very important for the VDV [airborne assault forces] and for 
the mobile forces as a whole. Comparative testing was conducted 
in the United Arab Emirates (UAE) of infantry fighting vehicles 
from all the developer countries. The BMP-3 was the winner. A 
major contract has been signed with the UAE. 
  The third area is the creation of close-support air-defense 
systems for the ground and naval forces. It is completely 
obvious that these systems should be created according to an 
ideology that is different from that of medium- and long-range 
air-defense systems. The intention has arisen at the KBP, for 
the first time in the world, to create autonomous air-defense 
systems that would combine surface-to-air missiles and 
anti-aircraft artillery with target acquisition and control 
equipment. 
  Ten years ago, in the face of colossal opposition from 
extremely influential individuals, the Tunguska system was 
created; it was highly regarded by specialists from foreign 
countries, including the United States. 
  The Tunguska system was developed both in the direction of 
its own intrinsic improvement, and for its employment in various 
branches of the armed forces. The Kortik air-defense system, for 
instance, was created on the basis of it for the Navy. 
  The fourth development area at the KBP is automatic cannons. 
These are part of air-defense systems, and are in service with 
the Air Forces. Our 23mm and 30mm automatic cannons, including 
the twin- and six-barrel GSh-6-23 and GSh-6-30 cannons, have 
been installed in domestic combat aircraft. 
  I would like to note, taking advantage of the situation, the 
invaluable assistance that was been rendered to me and our 
design bureau in the creation of new types of weaponry by GRAU 
Chief Marshal of Artillery P.N. Kuleshov, Commander-in-Chief of 
the Ground Forces Marshal of the Soviet Union V.I. Petrov and 
artillery commander Marshal of Artillery V.M. Mikhalkin, as well 
as the military scientists from the NIU [Scientific-Research 
Directorate] of the Ministry of Defense. 


Table 2 -- Basic Characteristics of BMPs [Infantry Fighting Vehicles] 

Characteristics       Name of model 

BMP-2                 BMP-3         Marder-A1       Bradley 

Developer country     USSR          USSR            FRG           United 
                                                                  States 

Year of entry into    1980          1987            1979          1981 
service 

Combat mass, tonnes   14            18.7            30            22.6 


Armaments: 

cannons, caliber in   30            30 and 100      20            25 
mm 

number of 7.62mm      1             1               1             1 
machineguns 

antitank guided       Konkurs       9M117           Milan         TOW-2 
missiles, type 

Top speed, km/hr      80            70              75            66 

Range, km             500           600             520           480 


  [VPK] What directions in the development of weaponry are 
priority ones today? 
  [Shipunov] The development of weaponry, as is well known, 
depends on views on the waging of war. A tilt has occurred today 
toward the waging of war with the use of conventional weaponry 
and the widespread use of mobile forces. The problem of arming 
the mobile forces arises therein. The ideology of arming the 
mobile forces, in my opinion, should be founded on the choice of 
a uniform and light mobile base. The weaponry itself should be 
relatively light, and not require additional supply trains for 
ammunition. This could be achieved via the widespread 
incorporation of high-precision weaponry. The range of types of 
combat vehicles should be cut back at the same time, not by 
means of directives but rather because they can perform a larger 
number of various firepower tasks. 
  In mobile troop units it is necessary to use technical 
solutions to reduce to a minimum the number of support units; 
that is, a large percentage of the equipment should consist of 
weapons systems. 
  [VPK] What is the status of your enterprise today? What are 
you doing to ensure its viability? 
  [Shipunov] We are currently living badly, since we remain a 
state enterprise, but the state has virtually no concern for our 
existence. We do not know what our prospects are for the near 
future, we do not know what our financing will be. We are living 
under conditions of uncertainty. 


Table 3 -- Basic Characteristics of ZPRKs [Air-Defense Missile Systems] 

                             Name of ZPRK 

Tunguska                     ADATS 

Developer country            USSR                      United States 

Year of entry into service   1982                      1992 


Parameters of lethal zone: 


for cannon armaments: 

by altitude, meters          0--3,000                  0--1,500 

by range, meters             200--4,000                0--2,500 

for missile armaments: 

by altitude                  0--3,500                  0.001--5,000 

by range                     2,500--8,000              1,000--8,000 

Characteristics of 
armaments: 

automatic anti-aircraft 
guns: 

caliber, mm                  30                        25 

rate of fire, rounds/min     4,000--5,000              1,000-2,000 

missiles: 

launch mass of SAM, kg       41.0                      51.4 

average velocity, m/sec      600                       500 

caliber of SAM, mm           152/76                    152 

type of homing system        command                   command 

Mass of air-defense          34                        12 
system, tonnes 

Rate of movement, km/hr      60--65                    65 


  The idea of conversion exists today, but there have been no 
practical steps on the part of the state with regard to the 
design bureau. Credits for conversion are given only to the 
manufacturing plants. What has been accumulated at our 
enterprises has never existed, since the rules that prevailed 
before did not permit it. Now we are being forced take the 
capitalist road in the absence of the initial accumulation. 
Again a "decree on conversion from socialism to capitalism." 
Orders from the Ministry of Defense of Russia are providing only 
30 percent of the level required by the KBP today. 
  Scientific research has effectively halted, and experimental 
design is based on past work. The amount of scientific research 
should be 30-40 percent of experimental design, but that is in 
all of the developed countries; here it is in single-digit 
percentages. Orders from the Ministry of Defense of the Russian 
Federation should be increased to 40-45 percent of enterprise 
capacity in order to preserve our KBP, its field and its work in 
progress. At a lower level, it is to the firm's disadvantage to 
maintain specialized laboratories and testing and auxiliary 
services. We are thus looking for new customers. We have signed 
a contract with the Ministry of Internal Affairs. 
  A biocenter is being built at the KBP and medical apparatus 
is being developed, in particular based on the CO[.sub]2[/] 
laser. The design bureau has designed top-notch prototypes of 
excellent sewing machines that are in no way inferior to 
Japanese models. We are also trying to obtain credits for the 
creation of large-series production. 
  [VPK] What difficulties are being encountered by the KBP in 
gaining access to the international market? 
  [Shipunov] This is a complex issue. We do not yet have a law 
pertaining to intellectual property. The developer thus receives 
a very small portion from the producer and seller of a weapon in 
the international market. It is quite difficult to make money 
from the weapons trade in general, anyway. The system for 
selling weapons today is too cumbersome and slow. It should be 
simplified. 
  The protection of the interests of the state in the sale of 
weaponry should be dome through an annually renewable list of 
models that are permitted for sale, and a determination of the 
list of nations where the sale of those models is prohibited. 
The list should be authorization for the owner of a good to 
conclude contracts, which should be concluded in the name of the 
enterprise. 
  We are ready to bring existing governmental structures in 
first and foremost as intermediaries, to find buyers and 
conclude contracts on terms advantageous to the enterprise. 
  The last three or four years of inaction have led to sharp 
cutbacks in the markets for the sale of weaponry. 
  The design bureau is also limited in the sale of licenses, 
since there are a host of obstacles everywhere, and science 
itself is in a grievous state. It is generally known that a 
series-produced weapon does not pose any particular secrets. 
What still exists in the heads of the scientists, engineers and 
designers must be preserved. 
  We would be investors and buyers ourselves if we were not 
being held back. We have prepared a large program with China for 
the performance of joint development. The assistance of the 
government is required for its realization. 
  The KBP is taking active part in international exhibitions. 
We showed the Tunguska ZPRK [air-defense missile system] at the 
Mosaeroshow-92 exhibition. Many models were presented at the 
exhibition in Abu Dhabi. 
  [VPK] What can you say with regard to conversion? 
  [Shipunov] Our country has a wealth of experience in the 
pursuit of the conversion of military industry--first after the 
end of the war, and then during the times of N.S. Khrushchev. 
The conversion was well planned by the state in both instances. 
The process of conversion took three or four years and had an 
enormous economic impact, while there were no drops in 
production, price rises or worsening of the standard of living 
of the population. The planned pursuit of conversion is needed 
today as well. 
  There could be difficulties at individual enterprises, but 
not in all of industry. 
  There should be clarity in relation to military orders, 
mobilization capacity and sources of financing for military 
industry, including through the sale of arms, an orientation 
toward the product ranges and volume of the output of civilian 
products, and the organization of cooperation in the output of 
consumer goods. 
  COPYRIGHT: Vooruzheniye. Politika. Konversiya 1993 No 1 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46566 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Arms, Military Equipment </F>
<H3> <TI>   The Firm of `Mi'--A National Treasure of Russia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    The Firm of `Mi'--A National Treasure of Russia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0311C Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 1, 1993 (Signed to press 5 Jul 93) pp 15-18--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0311C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Mil OKB General Designer Mark Vladimirovich </F>
Vaynberg] 
  [Text] [VPK] Mark Vladimirovich, what is the status of the 
firm and its relationships with the series-production plans and 
operational organizations today? 
  [Vaynberg] That is a very complex and painful issue. Mil 
helicopters are being series produced today at plants in Kazan, 
Rostov and Ulan-Ude. Some 25,000 helicopters have been produced 
over all this time, of which 15,000 are in service. Five 
thousand helicopters have been supplied to 60 countries around 
the world. Mil helicopters provided 30--50 percent of the 
currency receipts from all aviation exports of the USSR. 
  The Moscow firm consists of the KB [design bureau] itself, 
where the development of the helicopters right through to the 
creation of working drawings takes place, production, where the 
experimental prototypes are manufactured, the flight-test 
complex and the test beds, where testing to determine the 
service life of the item and its systems and assemblies is 
performed. 
  The documentation is refined and passed along to the 
series-production plants after the performance of the testing 
and customer acceptance of the helicopter. The firm had its own 
branches of various sizes at each series-production plant. The 
largest was at the Kazan plant, which reached 1,000 people in 
size. The branches adapt our documentation to the specific 
features of the actual plant. Those branches have become 
independent design organizations today, but strategically they 
depend on the Moscow KB, which heads an association of the 
developers of Mil helicopters. I repeat that the branches are 
economically independent, but are subordinate to the Moscow KB 
on questions of technical policy. The series-production plants 
may put out only Mil type helicopters under these conditions. 
  This question is painful because after the collapse of the 
USSR, various types of commercial structures were formed, with 
the aid of which the former republics have begun to sell 
helicopters without any preliminary technical expert evaluations 
and technical preparation, and moreover at very low prices, at 
dumping prices. Not only selling, but also leasing. The facets 
of reliability and safety have been lost. The situation needs to 
be regulated. 
  We have been forced to seek a way out of this situation. I 
appealed to the Prime Minister of Russia, I wrote that this is a 
very complex issue; the discussion concerns billions of dollars, 
but nothing has come of it. The Mi-8MT or Mi-17 helicopters that 
are series produced in Russia are objectively worth 4--5 million 
dollars, but various structures are selling them for 500,000 
dollars. This leads to the fact that the series-production 
plants are forced to sell them for 1.5 million dollars, 
i.e. the losses reach four million dollars per 
helicopter. The Kazan Aircraft Plant puts out about 200 
helicopters a year, and the losses for that plant alone are 
about 800 million dollars a year. 
  We have been forced to take severe measures. The firm has 
announced that the name Mil will be removed from helicopters 
that have not been sold through our own expert evaluation. The 
owners of helicopters without the observance of our requirements 
do not have the right to sell the helicopters under the name of 
Mil. The KB is declining all responsibility for those 
helicopters. This has been (or is being) reported in all 
countries with Mil helicopters, and is being stated at press 
conferences and international meetings. 
  Another problem arises as a result of the separation of the 
firm of Mil, the series-production plants and the repair and 
operational organizations. Government organizations have ceased 
to engage in the coordination of enterprise operations. Each 
enterprise has to survive on its own today. 
  I have sent all of the series-production plants a proposal 
to 
conclude contracts. The firm of Mil assumes all of the 
obligations of assisting in the sale of the helicopters, 
performing market research and certifying and upgrading 
helicopters apropos of the requirements of the international 
market. The plants should pay the firm a certain share from each 
craft sold. 
  We intend to conclude a similar agreement with the 
operational organizations as well. 
  It is very important to conduct an active technical and 
marketing policy. 
  Our country has to wage a very tough fight against other 
nations, especially the United States, in the international 
market for military products. I do not rule it out that the 
bizarre conversion that is taking place here has not arisen 
without the involvement of the United States. The correct 
attitude has only recently begun to be felt of just what our VPK 
[military-industrial complex] is, and what role it can play in 
lifting up the country's economy. We will hope that the IDEX-93 
exhibition in Abu Dhabi will prove to be a positive move on this 
issue. Russia will be selling cheaper than other countries to 
restore its lost position and win new ones in the international 
arms market. This is advantageous for the country and for the 
Russian defense industry all the same. 
  Some of the currency received from the sale of weapons must 
be invested in our military industry, so as to raise the market 
competitiveness of its products in the international market and 
carry out genuine conversion in the country. 
  [VPK] The KB used to work principally on orders from the 
Ministry of Defense. What is the situation today? 
  [Vaynberg] All of the fundamental projects are being carried 
out under orders from the military. Refinements under orders 
from the Ministry of Civil Aviation are made for civilian 
purposes. This makes up at best about 20 percent of the overall 
financing. Orders from the Ministry of Defense of Russia and 
direct budgetary work within the context of the state program 
for the development of civil aviation constitute about half of 
the required financing today. 
  [VPK] Almost all enterprises in the VPK today are in a 
difficult economic position. How do matters stand with your firm? 
  [Vaynberg] The times we are living in are difficult, but 
unusually interesting for people who do not think dogmatically 
and can approach their work creatively. There are many 
situations that require non-standard solutions. We still have to 
adapt to today's conditions. 
  Several joint structures have been created at the 
enterprises--we have been able to make their work more active. 
The firm earned a solid amount of money over October-December 
1992 as a result. 
  We are engaged in engineering and making use of know-how. 
Our 
teams of specialists often go out to study and organize the 
repair of helicopters on site. 
  All of this has made it possible to stabilize the economic 
situation of the enterprise, and elicit interest in the work 
among our colleagues. The drain of specialists has slowed. The 
average wage at the enterprise is not high, but it is no worse 
than others. To this should be added free medical care, and food 
subsidies for the cafeteria. The children's institutions and 
rest homes for the workers that the KB had have been preserved. 
  I fell that we still have to preserve a firm that is a 
national treasure of Russia. 
  [VPK] How do you evaluate Mil helicopters compared to 
foreign 
ones? 
  [Vaynberg] We are beyond competition in heavy helicopters. 
The Mi-26 helicopter, for instance, transports 20 tonnes, and 
there are no other such craft in the world. 
  We are at the same level as Western firms in helicopters in 
the medium class. The Western light helicopters are better than 
ours. We were not occupied with that class at all for a long 
time, since we had no orders for them. Light helicopters are 
often procured for personal needs, like a passenger car, in the 
West, after all. We are now developing the Mi-34 light 
helicopter, and will launch it immediately at two 
series-production plants. 
  A second light helicopter is under development, and we are 
planning to send it up in August of 1994. A heavier helicopter, 
with a mass of about two tonnes, is planned to be put out in 
roughly three years. A helicopter with a mass of 4--5 tonnes is 
also starting to be developed. This area has begun at the KB, 
but it requires greater efforts, because we have little 
experience in the development of the light craft. 
  [VPK] What relationship do you have with the Kamov firm? 
  [Vaynberg] They are our competitors, and that is a normal 
phenomenon. Roughly 95 percent of the helicopters produced in 
the country today are Mil, and only five percent are Kamov. 
  [VPK] It was reported on the radio that your firm is being 
privatized, and 85 percent of the shares of stock will be under 
the ownership of the your workforce. Is that so? 
  [Vaynberg] The situation is actually as follows. Fifty 
percent of the shares of stock, of which 25 percent will be 
non-voting, will be held by the firm. Fifteen percent will be 
sold to major investors, and 35 percent will be sold at auction. 
Our task is to buy the maximum number of shares from that 
portion, and to see that they do not go to unscrupulous dealers. 
  I feel that it would be proper for a controlling block of 
shares to remain with the state, since the firm of Mil is a 
national treasure of Russia, and the state should protect its 
treasures. But we have not been given that option; either a 
state or a private firm. 
  [VPK] Military reform is underway in Russia, along with the 
formation of mobile forces. What will be the place of your 
helicopters in this, and don't helicopters of a different type 
hold the advantage here? 
  [Vaynberg] I submitted a report to the Ministry of Defense 
of 
the Russian Federation at the beginning of 1992. I wrote that 
since the armed forces of the country would be cut back 
substantially, it would be advisable to create a new branch of 
the troops--mobile forces--and that it needed to be done 
immediately and with the least possible expenditures. I proposed 
that the Mi-8 and Mi-17 helicopters that were in service with 
the troops--and there are thousands of them--be upgraded and 
provided to the mobile forces in the next five years. The 
upgrading should provide for the operation of the helicopters at 
any time of day and in bad weather conditions, i.e. 
under all of the natural and weather conditions in which the 
armed forces operate. Our firm could carry out that upgrading 
quickly and relatively cheaply. 
  It would be expedient to create special helicopters and 
flying infantry fighting vehicles in the future that would not 
only carry an assault force, but also would be able to provide 
fire support for the subunits landing from them. The helicopters 
should thus be equipped with missile and other high-precision 
weaponry. Both the helicopter crew and the assault personnel 
should be well trained as professionals. 
  It seems to me that the mobile forces should be equipped 
specifically with helicopters and not other types of aircraft. A 
helicopter, as opposed to those others, can hover in the air and 
over a spot, can go up quickly and hide quickly behind some 
obstacle, and can move almost along the ground. Other types of 
aircraft do not possess those traits. A dirigible is difficult 
hold over a spot in strong winds, and is moreover very 
noticeable and easily defeated by anti-aircraft weaponry, as 
well as requiring ground equipment for servicing and vital 
support. 
  I thus feel that helicopters best satisfy the requirements 
of 
the mobile forces. The organization of those forces is underway 
in the Ministry of Defense today, as far as I know, and I hope 
that my report played some role in it. 
  I thus feel that our firm has a good future, and its 
products 
will be needed by the armed forces of Russia, as well as perform 
many tasks for the national economy. 
  COPYRIGHT: Vooruzheniye, Politika, Konversiya 1993 No 1 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46567 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Arms, Military Equipment </F>
<H3> <TI>   Advertisement for Weapons for Individual Protection </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Advertisement for Weapons for Individual Protection </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0311D Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 1, 1993 (Signed to press 5 Jul 93) p 26--FOR OFFICIAL </F>

USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0311D </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Text of advertisement] </F>
  [Text] 
<H8>  Individual Weapons for Protection of Office, Property, Cargo </H8>
Being Transported and Personal Security 
  Small Automatic Weapons of Various Calibers (9, 7.62, 5.45 
and 5.56 mm) 
  9mm Machine Pistol (PP-90), which is easily accommodated in 
an inside pocket of your clothing when in portable mode and is 
converted to fighting mode in only two seconds 
  9mm Revolver, with a semi-closed hammer and grip with 
trigger 
assembly moved forward to provide increased compactness and 
convenience in using the revolver. Developed under an order for 
the Ministry of Internal Affairs of the Russian Federation. 
  An irreplaceable weapon for bodyguards and collectors! 
  Design Bureau for Instrument Building 
  300001, city of Tula, Ul. Shcheglovskaya zaseka 
  COPYRIGHT: Vooruzheniye, Politika, Konversiya 1993 No 1 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46568 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Arms, Military Equipment </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Rubin' Maritime Equipment Central Design Bureau Is Not Only </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Rubin' Maritime Equipment Central Design Bureau Is Not Only </PHRASE></F></HT>
  Developing Submarines 

<F P=102> 94UM0312A Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 May 93) pp 5-10--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0312A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by "Rubin" Maritime Equipment Central Design Bureau </F>
Chief Designer Igor Dmitriyevich Spasskiy: "`Rubin' Maritime 
Equipment Central Design Bureau Is Not Only Developing 
Submarines"] 
  [Text] Igor Dmitriyevich Spasskiy, professor and 
doctor of technical sciences, has headed Rubin Maritime 
Equipment TsKB [Central Design Bureau] since 1974. In 1949, he 
graduated from VVMIU [Higher Naval Engineering School] imeni 
F.E. Dzerzhinskiy, then served in the navy, and began working at 
the TsKB in 1953. Many models of nuclear and diesel submarines 
have been developed with Igor Dmitriyevich's participation and 
under his guidance. Having become the TsKB chief, I.D. Spasskiy 
fundamentally rejected the role of primary designer of 
individual models and as Chief Designer is now involved with 
resolving the primary issues. 
  Igor Dmitriyevich was awarded the rank of Hero of 
Socialist Labor for success in the development of arms and 
military equipment for the country's Naval submarine fleet, he 
has been awarded four orders of the USSR, and he is a Lenin and 
State prize laureate. In 1987, he was selected as an academician 
of the USSR Academy of Sciences. 
  The Naval Equipment TsKB was created in 1926 from a small 
collective at Baltiysk Plant. B.M. Malinin, who became the 
primary designer of the first Soviet submarines, was the first 
bureau chief. Already in 1928, the TsKB managed to develop the 
first ship from the "Dekabrist" series. Six of these ships were 
built during the period from 1928 through 1931. The 
"Narodovolets", the second submarine of this series, has been 
preserved to our days. It has been installed at Vasilyevskiy 
Island in Galernyy Harbor on the territory of the exhibition 
complex. They plan to open a pavilion through which entry into 
the submarine will be accomplished on the 300th Anniversary of 
the Russian Navy. Our TsKB is also participating in this work. 
  A number of series of submarines, specifically, series of 
such famous submarines as "Shchuka" and "Malyutka" with which 
the Pacific Ocean Fleet was equipped, were developed at the TsKB 
prior to the Great Patriotic War. Nearly completed submarines 
were shipped by railroad (on special flat cars) to the Far East 
where they were completed because a special shipbuilding plant 
had not been created there. 
  The largest submarine of the prewar period -- was the 14th 
series "K" class submarine -- which could complete long-range 
cruises. The submarines that were developed at the TsKB actively 
participated in the Great Patriotic War but much has already 
been written about that and there's no sense repeating that. 
  After the war, a number of diesel submarines were developed 
that were in the Naval inventory for a long time. They were 
designs 611 and 613. Approximately 200 of the latter design were 
built. Later, many new classes of submarines were developed 
based upon them, specifically, it is on them that we began to 
familiarize ourselves with missile weapons. The idea of a single 
engine that permits a submarine to be submerged for a prolonged 
period of time was developed on design 615 submarines that 
appeared after 1953. 
  At the beginning of the 1960's, submarines with nuclear 
power 
plants appeared but diesel submarines continued to be improved 
in parallel. Specifically, modifications of design 613 
submarines were armed with cruise missiles. The latest 
diesel-electric submarine, developed at the TsKB --is the 
"Varshavyanka" (NATO designation -- Kilo). We need to note one 
other diesel electric submarine -- "Neptun". This is an 
excursion ship designed for 40 passengers that can remain 
submerged for nearly an hour. "Neptun", like other submarines 
developed by the TsKB, was built by "Sevmash" Production 
Association at Severodvinsk. Right now "Neptun" is being 
utilized to attract tourists to the Antilles Islands. 
  Submarines with nuclear power plants, equipped with cruise 
missiles and ballistic missiles, were also developed at the 
TsKB. These submarines are known under the NATO designations 
Oscar, Delta and others. The latest, the largest submarine is 
the "Tayfun". The specifications of the submarines are listed in 
JANES, the well-known weapons reference book. 
  If you compare our submarines with American submarines, we 
need to say that many technical solutions are very similar but 
there are differences in their architecture. We devote greater 
attention to the missions of survivability due to the complexity 
of accessing the open ocean. 
  Ballistic and cruise missiles are strategic submarines' 
primary weapons. Domestically-produced missiles are heavier and 
larger than their foreign equivalents with approximately 
identical operating ranges. But we are striving to accommodate 
the same number of missiles on our submarines as on foreign 
submarines. Furthermore, domestically-produced onboard 
electronic equipment is also heavier and larger. All of this 
results in the fact that domestically-produced submarines are 
larger than foreign submarines. Some of their specifications are 
cited in the table. 


Primary Tactical-Technical Elements of Russian Federation Submarines and Their Foreign Equivalents 

Submarine     Displacement, Tonnes     Weapons       Engine Type         Engine        Submarine         Maximum      Sailing      Endurance,    Size of 
Class,                                               (Nuclear,           Output,       Surveillance      Speed,       Range,       Days          Crew 
Years                                                Diesel-Electric)    Horsepower    and               Knots:       Miles 
Built,                                                                                 Communications    Surface 
State That                                                                             Systems 
Owned the 
Initial 
Model 

              Surface    Underwater                                                                      Submerged 

OHIO,         16,600     18,700        24            nuclear             60,000        AN/BQQ-6          25-30        1,000,000    70            2x157(15) 
1981-1982,                             Trident-1                                       Acoustic System                without                    or 
United                                 or                                                                             refueling                  2x133(16) 
States                                 Trident-2                                                                      the 
                                       ballistic                                                                      reactor 
                                       missiles, 4 
                                       533-mm 
                                       torpedo 
                                       tubes x 21 
                                       torpedoes 

"TAYFUN",                30,000        20            nuclear             --            --                --           --           --            -- 
1982,                                  SS-NKh-20 
Russian                                missiles, 6 
Federation                             or 8 
                                       torpedo 
                                       tubes x 21 
                                       torpedoes 

LOS           60,000     6,900         HARPOON       nuclear             30,000        AN/BQQ-5          32-35        60,000       100           127(12) 
ANGELES,                               antiship                                        acoustic system 
1976-1983,                             missiles, 
United                                 TOMAHAWK 
States                                 cruise 
                                       missiles, 
                                       SABROC 
                                       antiship 
                                       guided 
                                       missiles, 4 
                                       533-mm 
                                       torpedo 
                                       tubes x 21 
                                       Mk 48 
                                       torpedoes, 
                                       Mk 57 or Mk 
                                       67 mines 

                                                                                                         20 

OSCAR,        --         14,000        24            nuclear             --            --                --           --           --            -- 
1981,                                  SS-NKh-19 
Russian                                missiles, 8 
Federation                             torpedo 
                                       tubes x 21 
                                       torpedoes 

UPHOLDER,     2,160      2,400         6 533-mm      diesel-electric     5,400         2040 acoustic     20           228(4)       55            44(7) 
1988,                                  torpedo                                         equipment 
England                                tubes, 12 
                                       spare 
                                       missiles, 
                                       SABROC 
                                       antiship 
                                       guided 
                                       missiles, 
                                       HARPOON 
                                       antiship 
                                       missiles, 
                                       mines 

                                                                         3,600         DSVV-24           12           13,500 
                                                                                       acoustic 
                                                                                       equipment 

KILO, 1979,   2,500      3,200         8 torpedo     diesel-electric     --            --                --           --           --            -- 
Russian                                tubes X 21 
Federation                             torpedoes 


  We need to point out that right now the United States is 
building strategic submarines only with nuclear power plants. By 
the end of the century, these probably will be Ohio and Los 
Angeles class submarines. In our country, we are proposing 
building "Tayfun" and Oscar class submarines. 
  For a long time, our submarines had a high noise level and 
therefore were easily detected by acoustic instruments. However, 
during the last ten years, the noise level has been reduced and 
has become the same as that of American submarines. In the 
opinion of U.S. admirals, it has now become much more difficult 
to detect our submarines. 
  For a long time the Maritime Equipment TsKB was the only KB 
[design bureau] for the development of submarines in the 
country. But two other KB's appeared in the USSR during the last 
20-30 years: "Makhalit" and "Lazurit" which branched off from 
our TsKB. During the time of the USSR's existence, approximately 
1,000 submarines were handed over to the Navy, of them more than 
80% were developed at "Rubin" TsKB. 
  Previously, our three KB's had a total of approximately 
8,000 
developers. In today's situation, that number of KB's and 
specialists-developers of submarines is excessive as a result of 
the appearance of the military concept of defensive sufficiency 
and the drastic reduction of defense orders. 
  A similar situation is being observed not only in the sphere 
of military shipbuilding but also in all directions of weapons 
and military equipment. Some people are advocating the 
maintenance of all military directions and all defense 
enterprises. I think that this is incorrect and the main thing 
-- impossible. First and foremost, we need to preserve the 
scientific potential of the defense profile and to optimize the 
structure of enterprises and the number of their workers. 
  That policy has been conducted in our KB for nearly five 
years. We understand that military orders will be substantially 
reduced and the productivity of design work is significantly 
increasing due to its computerization. Based upon anticipated 
orders from the Navy, we will be able to pay for the work of 
approximately 1,000 people. We have begun to reduce the number 
of KB workers. So, previously there were 4,000 designers in the 
KB and right now approximately 2,000 are left. We are conducting 
job placement for all of those people whose jobs have been 
eliminated, primarily in the small enterprises that are being 
formed around the KB and in other structures that are associated 
with us. A submarine is a very complex structure that is 
equipped with practically all types of equipment. If we are to 
develop a good submarine, then we need to have good specialists 
for each type of equipment and for each functional assembly, not 
only for the structural profile but also for various spheres of 
science and technology, and who analyze all of the processes of 
that assembly's interaction with other functional assemblies and 
systems. Proceeding from this, the number of designers must be 
no less than 1,500-2,000 people. 
  So, it is impossible to count only on defense orders. While 
resolving the problem of ensuring the enterprise's stability and 
preserving the collective that is needed to develop a submarine, 
we have followed that path which major foreign firms have long 
followed: they have several different directions of activity. 
Previously, they thought that three were adequate and now they 
are orienting themselves on five directions. Then the firm will 
be stable under any cataclysms. Figuratively speaking, they 
stand on three (or five) legs. If one leg turns out to be 
removed, the enterprise's stability is nevertheless preserved. 
  We at the TsKB have also begun to form other technical 
directions that are oriented on the needs of the national 
economy. Some of the TsKB's associates have transferred to these 
directions, utilizing their rich experience as designers in 
them. Generally speaking, it turns out to be useful for many 
developers to sometimes change work profiles. They contribute 
their ideas in the new direction which turn out to be very 
productive here. So, a mutual enrichment occurs both of the 
developers and of the technical directions to which they have 
transferred. 
  We have noted several new directions of the TsKB's work. We 
have rejected some of them and some were grabbed by other firms. 
However, we have begun to develop at least three directions 
besides submarine building. 
  First of all, I need to talk about the direction of the 
development of high-speed rolling stock for the St. 
Petersburg-Moscow Main Line. The TsKB has been involved with the 
development of this project for approximately a year. During 
that time, the cooperation of enterprises has been developed 
both on the design and also on the production of high-speed 
rolling stock and there are already a number of contracts. The 
TsKB has managed to gain prestige among those design collectives 
that were previously involved with these issues. Enterprises 
that were previously not part of the military-industrial complex 
have not managed to do this project because they were financed 
based upon the residual principle and did not have the 
capability to develop and retain good specialists, and so forth. 
The best cadres were concentrated in military-industrial complex 
enterprises and their involvement in national economic matters 
has had a positive impact because they are introducing new 
ideas. Not only our but also other defense enterprises have been 
attracted to this direction. Specifically, VNIItransmash 
[All-Union Scientific Institute of Machinery for 
Transportation], the director of which is E.K. Potemkin, is 
conducting the design of a special dolly. I think that we, 
jointly with other defense complex enterprises and rail 
transportation specialists from Moscow, St. Petersburg, and 
Riga, are successfully resolving this task in which the Maritime 
Equipment TsKB is performing the function of lead design and 
coordinating center. The manufacture of rolling stock will be 
conducted near St. Petersburg in the city of Tikhvin at the 
Transmash plant that previously produced transmissions for 
tractors and that accomplished some orders on a defense theme. 
The plant has been equipped with modern equipment and has good 
cadres and a technological culture. This enterprise will be the 
lead enterprise and will receive components from subcontractors. 
The Yakovlev KB has undertaken the design of the body from 
aluminum alloys, the control panel, and so forth. 
  Our TsKB, as the lead design bureau, is involved with the 
critical analysis of all issues associated with the construction 
of the main line. The rail line has been laid through Novgorod. 
This rail line will be specialized and slow rolling stock will 
not move along it. They plan to attain rolling stock speeds of 
up to 350 kph in order for a train to cover the distance between 
St. Petersburg-Moscow in two hours. Launch of the rail line will 
be carried out gradually: the first rolling stock must begin 
movement already in 1996, indeed, its speed at the beginning 
will be somewhat less (250 kph). By utilizing the experience of 
the entire world (France, the United States, Japan and Italy) 
during the critical analysis, we hope to introduce original 
solutions to individual assemblies of the rolling stock that 
permit us to improve their quality. 
  The second direction -- is the development of offshore 
platforms for oil and gas production on the continental shelf. 
This direction is close to our primary direction because these 
platforms are equipped with all kinds of life support, 
electrical and power systems just like submarines. We are 
oriented on the Northern and Sakhalin areas. In the Sakhalin 
area, we are working jointly with American, English and Japanese 
firms. We did the technical and economic feasibility (TEO) 
jointly with Americans in Houston. The technical and economic 
feasibility has been approved, however, the leadership on 
Sakhalin has changed right now and further work has slowed down 
for the time being. 
  A great deal of work is being proposed in the Northern Area 
-- the Shtokmanovskiy Oil Field in the Barents Sea. This oil 
field is very large and oil production work can begin already in 
the near future. Although we are encountering fierce competition 
from foreign firms and everything is not clear organizationally, 
this direction will mandatorily be actively developed and 
significant forces of our TsKB will participate in it. 
  The third direction is associated with electric power. 
Specifically, we are already participating on the Far East order 
in the design of underground AES's [nuclear power plants]. I 
think that this direction is the future of nuclear power 
engineering. Only at first glance does it appear that these 
AES's will be very expensive. However, they will occupy 
substantially less space, we have found a simpler solution to 
remove them from service, the safety of the plant itself is 
being sharply increased, and so forth. Consequently, these AES's 
will be even cheaper than surface AES's, if you take into 
account their entire life cycle, including the stage to remove 
them from service and scrap them. 
  These three directions have permitted us to preserve the 
strength of our TsKB at approximately 2,000 people. Right now we 
are acquiring a large shipment of computers that will increase 
the labor productivity of designers and we will be able to 
dismiss a few more workers. I think that the remaining 
specialists will ensure the resolution of tasks in these three 
directions and the main thing -- they will be able to 
successfully continue work on our main profile -- the 
development of submarines. 
  Right now, polemics are being conducted with regard to types 
of nuclear weapon delivery platforms. The polemics indicate that 
a shift to two types is possible: submarines and airborne 
platforms. Therefore submarines remain promising for another 
prolonged period of time and, consequently, we need to continue 
to develop our primary direction. 
  As I have already pointed out, already five years ago the 
TsKB leadership arrived at the conclusion that they had to 
anticipate a substantial reduction of military orders and 
searches began for possible paths to support the future TsKB. 
For example, we built a business center. This is an entire 
complex: a 100-room European-level hotel equipped with modern 
communications systems and rooms for offices that have been 
leased to businessmen. Right now we are building a restaurant, a 
sports complex with a swimming pool, and a greenhouse in which 
vegetables will be cultivated the whole year round. Utilizing 
our previous experience of developing greenhouses on submarines 
that are going out on cruises for a prolonged period of time, we 
have already developed one greenhouse and we have adapted attic 
rooms to do that. We annually conduct four harvests of 
vegetables and we sell them to city restaurants. 
  The Council on Conversion, headed by Retired Admiral 
Shcherbakov, has been created in St. Petersburg under the city 
administration. I serve as deputy on this Council. In our city, 
more than half of the work was in the defense complex. It is 
difficult to restructure all of these enterprises to civilian 
production. 
  We did a great deal of work on the development of a data 
base 
on the city's converted enterprises, the information on which we 
gathered using specially created teams. We utilized the 
experience of East Germany, where a similar data base was also 
created. We have been working with a German firm for 2.5 years. 
Information on converted enterprises has been gathered in a 
separate book that has been published in English, entered into 
an electronic information system and introduced into the 
European Network. This helps to find foreign investors since all 
of this was done in a form that is accepted in Europe and 
America. I need to say that at first many foreign firms 
displayed interest in our enterprises. However, the political 
and economic instability in Russia and the absence of precise 
laws is delaying this process. It is very difficult to operate 
in that situation. How can you begin a new business venture if 
the tax system has not been formed in the country. New laws are 
continuously being adopted that transform all economic 
calculations. What was profitable yesterday becomes unprofitable 
today. Serious investors will not operate in this situation. 
  I need to say that despite the difficulties that arise, work 
nevertheless continues. For example, Kirov Plant, jointly with 
the Germans, has set up the production of tractors for farmers. 
However, this work is still small. If "real" laws are adopted, 
the investment process will broadly expand and not only in our 
country. We will also be able to invest capital in the West and 
obtain a profit both for ourselves and for the country as a 
whole. We are counting on the fact that the required laws will 
be adopted in Russia in the near future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46569 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Arms, Military Equipment </F>
<H3> <TI>   Electronic Warfare Weapons Are Being Developed at RETIS NPO </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Electronic Warfare Weapons Are Being Developed at RETIS NPO </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0312B Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 May 93) pp 11-13--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0312B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with RETIS Scientific Production Association </F>
Chief Designer Yuriy Mitrofanovich Perunov by an unidentified 
VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA correspondent: "Electronic 
Warfare Weapons Are Being Developed at RETIS Scientific 
Production Association"] 
  [Text] Yuriy Mitrofanovich Perunov -- is a professor, 
doctor of technical sciences, full member of the Russian 
Federation Academy of Natural Sciences and Academy of 
Technological Sciences, chairman of the "Nanoelectronics and 
Nanotechnology" Section and the RAN [Russian Academy of 
Sciences] Council on the Problem of "Physical Electronics". 
  Yu.M. Perunov has been Scientific Production 
Association (NPO) Chief Designer since 1987. The NPO develops 
and produces electronic warfare (EW) weapons. "Gradiyent" VNII 
[All-Union Scientific Research Institute] (Rostov), where Yuriy 
Mitrofanovich was the director until 1987, is part of this 
association. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] Yuriy Mitrofanovich, 
does the NPO imeni P.S. Pleshakov exist right now and, if it 
does, in what form? 
  [Perunov] Under new conditions, the NPO is being transformed 
into an associative type association with those same missions 
and in that same composition that it was, with the exception of 
the enterprises that are on the territory of the countries of 
the former USSR. There is approval for entry into the 
association of enterprises of the former Minelektronprom 
[Ministry of the Electronics Industry], specifically, "Almaz" 
NPO (Saratov). This will permit us to more effectively and 
purposefully accomplish the missions of developing the latest 
models of equipment and their modernization. 
  The Future Planning, Prediction, Development and Foreign 
Economic Activities Center has been organized under the Chief 
Designer to ensure coordination of the work and to improve 
interrelations with our customers, including foreign customers. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] How do matters stand 
with orders in the NPO? 
  [Perunov] The policy of wholesale conversion did not bypass 
the association, just like the entire defense industry, and 
therefore practically all customers do not have the required 
resources for their financing when a packet of orders is 
available. If the work that we previously accomplished is 
somehow still being supported with financing, then new work, 
especially scientific-research work, is practically not being 
paid for. 
  There is one more distinctive feature in the financing of 
our 
work. EW systems are normally installed on certain land-based, 
airborne and maritime-based platforms. In the majority of cases, 
the cessation of financing of our work has been associated with 
the fact that the development of the platform is being 
terminated. The enterprise certainly has a broad sphere of work 
in relation to the modernization of previously developed and 
series-produced systems. However, the shortfall in financing is 
also holding back this direction. 
  In 1992, the NPO's enterprises on average were supplied with 
approximately 50% of the financing required and this 
figure 
totaled from 20-80% for individual enterprises. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] Will your enterprises 
manage to retain cadres? How will wages be paid at those 
enterprises that are being poorly financed? 
  [Perunov] The situation is taking shape as follows. We are 
partially supplementing the shortage of resources for state 
orders using budget resources that are being allotted for 
conversion, furthermore, we are manufacturing household 
appliances. However, the resources received are clearly 
inadequate which has naturally resulted in an approximately 
30% 
reduction in the number of workers. Unfortunately, as a rule, 
the best cadres are leaving. 
  In order to ensure the required wage level, we are 
attempting 
to find that customer or those orders that would give us the 
capability to employ so-called dual use technologies for 
civilian production. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] What work is being 
conducted at your association in the context of conversion? 
  [Perunov] The NPO has repeatedly proposed conversion 
programs. The appropriate plans, tasks, and executors exist. 
However, the state is allotting very limited resources for 
conversion which is impacting the effectiveness of putting these 
plans into effect. Commercial structures and banks practically 
do not resort to long-term investment programs or place 
unacceptable terms on credit. 
  If we talk about the content of the conversion plans, then 
they are --medical equipment, security systems, satellite 
television antenna and reception systems, a device for employing 
microwave energy in various productions of the food and 
processing industries, a device to monitor the ecology of the 
environment and to monitor cargoes on rail and motor vehicle 
transportation, and many others. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] Are you only developing 
conversion products or are you involved in their series 
production? 
  [Perunov] We are primarily conducting development and we are 
producing small lots. Of course, there is series production. 
This is primarily tape recorders, washing machines, telephones, 
and microwave ovens. However, in the process, we are 
encountering enormous difficulties in obtaining components. The 
prices for them are continuously increasing which leads to the 
need to increase prices for the end product and, consequently, 
creates difficulties with sales. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] What kind of contacts 
do 
you have with foreign countries and firms? 
  [Perunov] For the time being, our contacts have been largely 
limited to negotiations and to protocols on intentions. However, 
foreign firms are displaying a great deal of interest in some of 
our developments. We are conducting negotiations with the 
countries of the Middle East, China, with representatives of 
South America, and also with European states. Our enterprises 
have also attracted the attention of certain foreign firms. They 
are prepared to invest their resources but the unstable 
situation in Russia, the absence of guarantees by state 
structures, and also the bureaucracy in the countries of these 
firms, COCOM, and certainly the policy directed toward the 
collapse of our scientific and military potential is stopping 
them. This often makes our negotiations futile. They are not 
ending with the conclusion of contracts or joint cooperation. 
For now, cooperation with China and the Middle East countries 
appears to be realistic. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] What has changed with 
the formation of the Defense Sectors Committee? 
  [Perunov] Very little has changed. The Committee is 
practically disenfranchised. However, the situation has still 
improved in comparison with the time when the Ministry of 
Industry existed. Elements of coordination have appeared in the 
modified structure and the board of The Committee for the 
Realization of Sector Programs and Conversion is rendering 
substantial assistance. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] How do you assess the 
level of weapons developed at the NPO in contrast to the West? 
  [Perunov] The EW equipment that the NPO has developed and 
has 
in series production is no worse than foreign models and some of 
the developments are better or do not have equivalents in the 
world. We are resolving the issues of systems engineering and 
integration at a level that is higher than the world average. 
However, there is a certain lagging behind in circuitry. 
  Under today's conditions, the high degree of automation and 
information processing of military equipment determines EW's 
primary role as a deterrent factor, both during the conduct of 
combat operations and also in peacetime. EW equipment is also 
being utilized as performance monitoring and recording devices. 
  Russian First Deputy Minister of Defense A.A. Kokoshin has 
assigned the issues of developing EW among the priorities, 
however, our NPO still has barely felt the practical steps of 
this decision. Only work to equip platforms that are being 
produced and developed is being financed and not completely. 
Work for the future and research work is practically not being 
financed. If the situation doesn't change, we will lose our 
cadres, our reserves, and our ideas. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] The Persian Gulf War 
demonstrated the significance of electronic weapons in combat 
operations. Have the results of this war been reflected in the 
NPO's activities? 
  [Perunov] We foresaw many of the results of this war. We 
knew 
that the Multinational Forces were saturated with electronic 
weapons and we also knew that Iraq practically did not have 
these weapons. If Iraq had had adequate EW systems, say, like 
those that the Russian Armed Forces have, then it is hard to 
predict how soon and with what results that war would have ended. 
  It turned out that the Multinational Forces suppressed 
Iraq's 
electronic systems and the allies' numerous electronic systems 
functioned without jamming. Today aircraft, ships, ground-based 
equipment and other military targets that are not protected by 
EW systems are being transformed into accessible and easily 
destroyed targets. Modern military conflicts -- are first of all 
an information war. Weapons of destruction swing into action 
only after disruption of troop command and control and 
elimination of the enemy's information about itself. The 
Syrian-Israeli and British-Argentine conflicts, the war in 
Vietnam, and combat operations in the Persian Gulf zone confirm 
that axiom. 
  Unfortunately, despite this situation, the NPO is not 
receiving a sufficient number of orders to develop EW systems. 
They tell us that there are other more important concerns. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] Do we supply EW systems 
to other countries? 
  [Perunov] I don't know about such cases. Moreover, the 
Americans also practically do not supply EW weapons to other 
countries. All of the world's leading countries develop these 
kinds of weapons for themselves, although some sort of 
coordination exists in Western Europe. I need to say that the 
West imparts a great deal of significance to EW weapons and the 
issues that are associated with these weapons are among the most 
restricted. 
  Right now negotiations are being conducted on the sale of 
domestically-produced EW weapons along with platforms and also 
on the installations of systems produced in our country on 
foreign platforms and the sale of individual EW systems 
components. However, the rates at which these negotiations are 
being conducted is defining the actually quite long time periods 
for their execution. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-46570 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpuma009__l94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-UMA-94-009-L </AU>
JPRS 
Central Eurasia 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Military Affairs ARMAMENTS, POLITICS, CONVERSION Nos 1 &amp; 2, </ABS>


<TEXT>
1993 
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Arms, Military Equipment </F>
<H3> <TI>   The Experience of Developing Standardized Radar Weapons </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    The Experience of Developing Standardized Radar Weapons </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94UM0312C Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA in 
Russian No 2, 1993 (Signed to press 12 May 93) pp 14-20--FOR </F>

OFFICIAL USE ONLY 
<F P=103> 94UM0312C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Ground Radar Weapons Chief Designer Yuriy </F>
Aleksandrovich Kuznetsov by an unidentified VOORUZHENIYE, 
POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA correspondent: "The Experience of 
Developing Standardized Radar Weapons"] 
  [Text] Yuriy Aleksandrovich Kuznetsov graduated from 
Tomsk Polytechnical Institute. He worked at the 
scientific-research institute of measurement devices 
(Novosibirsk) from 1958 to 1987 and became director of this 
institute in 1970. 
  In 1987, Yuriy Aleksandrovich was appointed Ground 
Radar Weapons Chief Designer. He coordinates the work of 
enterprises in the cities of Moscow, Nizhniy Novgorod, 
Novosibirsk, Pravdinsk, and Murom that are developing and 
producing radar systems. Prior to the breakup of the USSR, this 
group also included the enterprise that is located in Ukraine 
(Zaporozhye). The Chief Designer's residence is located at the 
All-Russian Scientific Research Institute of Radio 
Equipment. 
  Yuriy Aleksandrovich Kuznetsov is the lead designer of 
the S-300V and S-300P Air Defense Missile Systems' detection 
radars and their modernization. 
  Yuriy Aleksandrovich has been awarded orders of the 
USSR and has been awarded the rank of Lenin Prize Laureate for 
contributions in the development of radar weapons. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] Yuriy Aleksandrovich, 
you have a wealth of experience in the development of 
standardized radar weapons. Please tell us what goals were set 
in this work and what successes have been achieved? 
  [Kuznetsov] Radars are utilized by various consumers who 
often make incompatible demands on them. This is one of the 
reasons why it is impossible to get by with one type of radar. 
Another reason consists of the fact that substantially different 
frequency ranges are employed in radars and therefore radar 
components that depend on frequency (antennas, transmitters and 
receivers) cannot be identical. The problem of standardization 
is reduced to the substantiation and development of the 
minimally acceptable standardization. 
  The benefit of standardization is obvious: the economic 
impact during development, production, operation, and repair of 
radars and during the training of personnel. Therefore, the idea 
of standardization has long attracted both developers and also 
customers of radars. This idea is being implemented in two 
directions: the development of radars that can be utilized for 
different purposes and the development of standardized 
components (assemblies, systems) that are designed for various 
types of radars. 
  The first direction is fundamentally possible only in the 
event that the identical frequency range is being utilized and 
there is no great divergence among the requirements made on the 
radar by various consumers. The second direction encompasses 
assemblies of the identical frequency range that are part of 
various radars and also a device that does not depend on the 
frequency range being utilized (power sources, display devices, 
and others). Standardization of this equipment is possible for 
various radars. Implementation of standardization consists of 
finding a compromise between incompatible requirements. Either a 
concession to the requirements or complication of the items 
(rational satisfaction of requirements) is the solution to the 
task. The latter entails certain excesses in the item for each 
consumer but permits us to have a single standardized item. 
Let's illustrate this in the simplest everyday example. 
  A requirement exists for the production of an electric 
shaver 
with different voltages: 220V and 110V. We can produce two 
items: one for 220V and another for 110V. But we can produce an 
electric shaver with a power voltage switch which, naturally, 
complicates the item. However, that standardization permits us 
to produce one item (instead of two), to increase series 
production and, on the whole -- to obtain an economic impact. 
  Of course, it is much more complicated for radars than in 
the 
example cited but the main sense is the same: standardization 
can be accompanied by the complication of the radar. Therefore, 
we need to decide if the end result is justified. Furthermore, 
we need to take into account that its solution strongly depends 
on subjective factors and on the organization of work as a 
result of the compromise nature of the standardization task. 
  In our country, there is definite experience in the 
development of standardized radars. We can cite the P-37 radar 
as a positive example of standardization. The P-37 found 
employment in the Ground forces, the PVO Troops, the Air Force 
and in civil aviation. 
  We can indicate some results on the standardization of 
radars 
through the example of the work of the NII of Measurement 
Instruments (NIIIP) at which I began my work career and where 
the ideas of standardization were being realized already from 
the end of the 1950's. The first airborne target detection radar 
that met Ground Forces requirements was developed at the 
institute. The "Bronya" Rangefinder Radar was installed on an 
off-road armored tracked self-propelled vehicle and the 
deployment and teardown times totaled five minutes. This radar 
was dual-purpose: for utilization as part of the "Krug" Air 
Defense Missile Complex and as part of a radar site. 


Table 1. Specifications of Centimetric Band Airborne Target Detection Radars 

Name of           Short Range                     Medium Range 
Specifications 

                  "Kupol" 9S18    TRMS            "Bronya" 1RL128D       "Obzor-3"       AN/TPS-70         64N6E RLO       VSTAR 
                                                  (1S12)                 9S15                              [Radar 
                                                                                                           Support 
                                                                                                           Services] 

Country of        USSR            FRG [Federal    USSR                   USSR            United States     USSR            United States 
manufacture                       Republic of 
                                  Germany] 

Year accepted     1981            1990            1969                   1985            1985              --              1991 
into the 
inventory 

Operating 
range: 

-- For range,     160             200             220                    300             350               300             -- 
km 

-- For azimuth    360             360             360                    360             360               360             360 

-- For            Up to 55        100             28                     Up to 55        20                Up to 55        Up to 60 
elevation 

Fighter           120             115             200                    200             225               300             185 
aircraft 
detection 
range, km 

Fighter           30              20              30                     30              30                --              30 
aircraft upper 
detection limit 
(ceiling) 

Number of         3               3               2                      3               3                 3               3 
determined 
coordinates 

Accuracy of 
determined 
coordinates: 

-- For range, m   130             115             150                    206             110               200             -- 


-- For azimuth,   21              12              60                     22.2            15                35              -- 
minutes 

-- For angle of   21              18              --                     22.2            (300 m)           25              -- 
elevation, 
minutes (by 
altitude, m) 

Scan rate,        4.5; 6; 9; 12   2; 4            3.3; 10; 13.3          6; 9;12         10                1.2             2; 4 
seconds 

Antenna type      Phased-array    Phased-array    Reflector-parabolic    Phased-array    Phased-array      Double-sided    Phased-array 
                                                                                         (MLAR)            phased-array 
                                                                                         [Multiple-beam 
                                                                                         architecture 
                                                                                         flat-slotted 
                                                                                         array] 

Number and type   1 tracked       2 multiple      1 tracked              1 tracked       2 tracked         multiple        1 tracked 
of transport                      truck and                                                                truck and 
vehicles                          trailer rigs                                                             trailer rig 
                                                                                                           (3 transport 
                                                                                                           vehicles) 

Deployment        5               30              15                     5               60                5               15 
time, minutes 

Where employed    "Buk" Air       Ground Troops   "Krug" Air Defense     "S-300V" Air    Ground Troops     S-200D,         Ground Forces 
                  Defense         air defense     Missile Complex        Defense         air defense       S-300P          Air Defense 
                  Missile                         radar post             Missile                                           (Ground Forces 
                  System                                                 Complex radar                                     antiballistic 
                  division PVO                                           post                                              missile 
                  [Air Defense]                                                                                            defense) 
                  launcher 




Table 2. Specifications of Low-Flying Airborne Target Detection Radars 

Name of            "Dunay-15",     "Kasta-2E2"     MPDR-60/E     AN/GPS-100 
Specifications     P-19, 1RL134    39N6E 

Country of         USSR            USSR            FRG           United 
manufacture                                                      States 

Year accepted      1974            1989            1979          1986 
into the 
inventory 

Operating range: 


-- For range, km   10-200          5-150           100           100 


-- For azimuth     360             360             360           360 

-- For altitude,   Up to 6         Up to 6         Up to 6       Up to 6 
km 

Fighter aircraft 
detection range, 
km: 

At altitudes of    32 (50)*        41 (55)*        --            -- 
100 m 

At altitudes of    140             140             70            75 
3,000 m 

Number of          2               2 plus          2             2 
determined                         altitude 
coordinates 

Accuracy of 
determination of 
coordinates: 

-- For range, m    2,000           100             120           20 

-- For azimuth,    120'            30'-40'         30'           12' 
minutes 

-- For altitude,   --              0-2; 2-4;       --            -- 
km                                 more than 4*; 
                                   5; 10 

Scan rate,         5; 10           5; 10           4             6; 12 
seconds 

Antenna type       Reflector antenna (truncated paraboloid) 

Number and types   2 multiple      2 multiple      2 multiple    1 canister 
of transport       truck and       truck and       truck and 
vehicles           trailer rigs    trailer rigs    trailer 
                                                   rigs 

Deployment time,   20              20              10            -- 
minutes 

Where employed     radar post,     radar post,     air defense   air defense 
                   division PVO    division PVO    automated     automated 
                   launcher,       Launcher,       control       control 
                   "Osa" Air       "Tor" Air       system        system 
                   Defense         Defense 
                   Missile         Missile 
                   Complex         regimental 
                   command post    command post 

Remarks: Antenna height -- 50 m. 




Table 3. Specifications of Metric Band Airborne Target Detection Radars 

Name of           Mobile                     Portable (Transportable) 
Specifications 

                  "Terek",      "Nebo-SV"    "Oborona-14"    "Nebo" 55Zh6-3 
                  P-18,         1L13-3       5N84A 
                  1RL131 

Country of        USSR          USSR         USSR            USSR 
manufacture 

Year accepted     1971          1986         1974            1983 
into the 
inventory 

Operating 
range: 

-- For range,     360           500          1,200           1,200 
km 

-- For            27-30         40           50              75 
altitude, km 

-- For azimuth    360           360          360             360 

-- For angle of   30            25           17              16 
elevation 

Fighter           175; 250      250          300             300 
aircraft          (raised 
detection range   antenna) 
(altitude 10 
km), km 

Fighter           27            30           35              60 
aircraft upper 
detection limit 
(ceiling) 

Number of         2             2            2               3 
determined 
coordinates 

Accuracy of 
determination 
of coordinates: 


-- For range, m   1,800         400          1,200           400 


-- For azimuth,   90'           40'          72'             24' 
minutes 

-- For            --            --           --              750 
altitude, m 

Scan rate,        10; 20        10; 20       10; 20          10; 20 
seconds 

Antenna type      Vibrating     Vibrating    Reflector       AR 
                  array         array        antenna         (rangefinder) 
                                                             MLAR (height 
                                                             finder) 

Number and        2 multiple    2 multiple   2 multiple      7 trailers 
types of          truck and 2   truck and    truck and 4 
transport         trailer       2 trailer    trailer rigs 
vehicles          rigs          rigs 

Deployment        1             0.75         24              22 
time, hours 

Where employed    radar post,   radar        radar post,     radar post 
                  "Krug" Air    post,        "S-200" Air 
                  Defense       "S-300V",    Defense 
                  Missile       "Buk" Air    Missile 
                  System        Defense      Complex 
                  brigade       Missile 
                  command       System 
                  post, "Kub"   brigade 
                  and "Osa"     command 
                  Air Defense   post 
                  Missile 
                  System 
                  regimental 
                  command 
                  post 


  The tradition of the development of radars for various 
employment was continued at the NIIIP with the development of 
second generation Ground Troops air defense weapons. Two 
three-dimensional surveillance radars that are mounted on 
tracked self-propelled mounts and that have a teardown and 
deployment time of five minutes were developed in the 
1970's-1980's. 
  One of them, the "Obzor-3" Radar with a 250-300 km operating 
range, is being utilized as part of the S-300V Air Defense 
Missile System and also at Ground Troops radar posts. The second 
radar, a lighter type, "Kupol", has an operating range of 
100-150 km and is a "Buk" Air Defense Missile Complex detection 
and target designation radar and is part of radar posts. All of 
these radars will be repeatedly modernized in the future. 
  The results cited have turned out to be possible primarily 
thanks to organizational decisions (one customer, one 
enterprise-radar developer for various applications) and through 
the joint efforts of the customer and the developer to 
standardize the requirements for the radar and also to minimize 
the complications of the radar. 
  With regard to the standardization of units and systems, 
that 
is, radar components, I need to say the following. Many units 
that are part of various radars fulfill identical functions. 
Therefore, when several developments are carried out at one 
enterprise or under the management of one lead designer, all of 
these units, as a rule, are common for all of the developments. 
When the frequency range coincides, the mutual standardization 
of the radar device is higher. For example, the previously 
mentioned device for the "Obzor-3" Radar and the S-300P 
detection radar system was standardized by more than 50%. 
A 
high level of standardization can also be achieved for units 
that do not depend on frequency range (power sources, displays, 
and so forth). 
  However, when the organizational conditions are not complied 
with, then the components in various developments will be 
different, especially if the customer does not specially 
stipulate the need to utilize standardized units and systems in 
his requirements. 
  There were several radar customers in the USSR Ministry of 
Defense and that same situation is being preserved in the 
Russian Ministry of Defense. The conditions for radar usage for 
various customers have their distinctive features. These are the 
objective difficulties of standardization. But there are also 
subjective difficulties. Each of the customers has his own 
traditions, his own distinctive features, and each considers 
himself to be more correct, therefore, coordination among them 
is impeded. Receipt of identical technical tasks for radars from 
different customers have practically been excluded. To develop a 
standardized radar, it is necessary for the various customers' 
primary requirements for it (target detection range, throughput, 
accuracy, and operating range) to be sufficiently close. 
However, I repeat, even in this case the development of a 
standardized radar can not occur due to organizational 
difficulties which emerge when there are several customers. 
Therefore, it is necessary that the interests of all consumers 
be submitted by one customer. The Ministry of Defense has 
examples of that organization of work. 
  Furthermore, I need to point out that two lead designers, 
even working on one and the same technical task, will never 
develop identical radars. This is associated with the fact that 
modern radars are very complex items; different experts will 
assess the significance of various parameters and various 
technical solutions in different ways. Therefore, the 
development of standardized radars is only possible under the 
management of one chief designer. 
  We have arrived at the conclusion on the advisability of the 
following organizational regulations to ensure standardization: 
a single technical task, one customer, and one lead designer. 
Analysis of the capabilities, substantiation of the feasibility 
of standardization and development of a single technical task is 
an important phase in the work on standardization. The Chief 
Designer, who heads the Lead Designers Council, along with the 
customers, is called upon to accomplish these functions. 
Cooperation between the Chief Designer, customers and the 
developing enterprises is carried out primarily on the basis of 
previously established ties since the Russian Federation 
Government has so far not introduced the institute of chief 
designers on equipment directions. (As of today, the activity of 
chief designers is determined by an interim decision of our 
department.) Unfortunately, the Chief Designer's impact on the 
work of other enterprises is weak: the Chief Designer's 
decisions are only recommendatory in nature for these 
enterprises. 
  It would be more appropriate if the Ministry of Defense 
concluded contracts with the Chief Designer, but then again in a 
number of cases, it would be advisable to have a contract not on 
an individual system but on a weapons complex, for example, a 
radiotechnical company radar weapon. The Chief Designer himself 
will be able to determine the developers of individual systems, 
conclude contracts with them, and will coordinate their work. 
Then not only would standardized radar weapons be developed but 
many issues for connecting individual systems, their support by 
auxiliary equipment, and the issues of the organization of 
operation and maintenance would also be resolved. It occurs that 
way in practice when a customer assigns the development of an 
air defense missile complex to one Chief (lead) Designer. If the 
customer issued a task to each co-developer of individual 
elements of this complex, significant major difficulties would 
arise during its development. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] Yuriy Aleksandrovich, 
could you cover the work of the Lead Designers Council in more 
detail and also the Interdepartmental Coordinating Council on 
Radar which previously existed under USSR Minradioprom [Ministry 
of the Radio Industry]? 
  [Kuznetsov] The Lead Designers Council was founded in 1988 
as 
a consultative organ. The Council formally existed until 1991, 
that is, until the breakup of the USSR. The substantiation of 
the standardization of radars that is necessary for the 
development of a single radar field and proposals for the 
development of standardized components for all radars was the 
primary result of the Council's work. The Council's 
recommendations were adopted for implementation in the project 
for a single radar field and were included in the (union) Arms 
Program and the recommendations on standardization of components 
are being partially implemented (for example, on the development 
of a secondary processing device and secondary power sources). 
  The Deputy Minister of the USSR Radio Industry headed the 
Interdepartmental Coordinating Council (ICC) on Detection 
Radars. As a consultative organ, it had a broad spectrum of 
tasks on this equipment direction, including on standardization 
issues. Specifically, the ICC reviewed common requirements for 
standardized series of radars. However, coordination of 
requirements on specific models of each series was carried out 
with difficulty. Here the primary difficulty was created once 
again due to the presence of several customers. 
  Still, we managed to implement some of these projects. Two 
variants of the "Kasta-2" low-flying target detection radars 
were developed. They were standardized for employment by two 
consumers. Several standardized radars of another series are 
being developed on behalf of various Armed Forces services. 
There is a high level of inter-project standardization in the 
radars being developed, although this relates more to the 
developments that are being conducted at one enterprise. 
However, I must say that the level of standardization for radars 
on the whole can be increased even further. 
  Furthermore, the Ministry of the Radio Industry ICC did a 
great deal to organize specialized production, beginning with 
standardized base load-bearing structures (the structure of an 
electronic module, unit, or cabinet) and ending with 
technologically specific production (rotation drives, magnesium 
casting and others), which created more favorable conditions for 
employment of standardized solutions on radar components. 
Similar measures, including the creation of ICC-type organs, are 
timely even at the present time. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] How do you assess the 
technical level of our modern radars as compared to foreign 
radars? 
  [Kuznetsov] I already discussed that in a July 1992 KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA interview. We have better results on a number of 
developments. We developed metric band radars with sufficiently 
high technical specifications. There are no equivalents abroad 
and the metric band radar has advantages on detection of small 
airborne targets and targets manufactured using "Stealth" 
technology. Antiradiation missiles cannot be aimed against these 
radars. 
  The high mobility of many types of radars, especially those 
that were developed based upon a Ground Troops order, is another 
of our advantages. But then again, I need to say that high 
mobility has been achieved with other good specifications. So, 
pulse tuning of the carrier frequency and a dual frequency 
signal were already realized in the 1960's in the "Bronya" 
radar. The "Obzor-3" and "Kupol" radars are 3-D radars and have 
adaptive capabilities. An antenna in the shape of an original 
waveguide array was employed in these radars which permitted us 
to obtain the first side lobes at a level of up to minus 35-40 
db and a detection zone based on elevation of up to 45-55. 
Furthermore, these antennas have high technological 
effectiveness. 
  Further, we developed good klystron [reflection 
oscillator]-type transmitters. They have a broadbandness of 
6-7%, have an average output of 10-20 kVt, and also 
stacked 
magnets instead of solenoids. We don't know of any foreign 
klystrons with these specifications. 
  I can cite another entire series of technical solutions on 
which we have an adequately high level (high-voltage power 
sources and certain others). 
  However, we also lag behind. This is in regard to computer 
equipment and circuitry items (for example, digital 
microcircuits, analog-digital transformers, and powerful 
semiconductor instruments). The lag in the sphere of circuitry 
is resulting in a situation where some domestically-produced 
radars consume more energy and their weight and size 
specifications are worse than foreign radars. 
  On the whole, I can say that, in the sum total of 
specifications, individual types of our radars have a high 
technical level and, in principle, are quite competitive on the 
world market. Additionally, we can play on the low unit cost of 
our radars, that is, they sell for prices that are lower than 
the prices of their foreign equivalents. 
  [VOORUZHENIYE, POLITIKA, KONVERSIYA] Continuing the last 
thought, what can you say about the successes of 
domestically-produced radars on the international arms market? 
  [Kuznetsov] We are making our first steps in this sphere. 
One 
and half to two years ago, we understood that, on the one hand, 
we must primarily rely on ourselves and not on the state. On the 
other hand, that we can earn quite a bit through sales of our 
equipment on the world market and that we have something to sell 
on that market. 
  In practice, we have participated in only two international 
arms exhibitions: at "Mosaeroshow" in August 1992 and at 
"IDEX-93" in February 1993. We demonstrated the following 
domestically-produced radars (in the form of mockups, television 
videos, and information sheets) at Abu Dhabi: "Nebo-SV", "Nebo", 
Kasta-2E1", Kasta-2E2", "Obzor-3" as part of the S-300V Air 
Defense Missile System, a radar post that is part of the 
S-300PMU1 Air Defense Missile System, and "Kupol" as part of the 
"Buk" Air Defense Missile Complex. There was a great deal of 
interest in this equipment even though we didn't display any 
actual models. We demonstrated actual models of the "Nebo", 
"Nebo-SV", "Obzor", "Kupol" and Kasta-2E1" radars at the 
"Mosaeroshow-92" exhibition. 
  The exhibitions taught us a great deal. First of all, we saw 
that "Kasta" type radars are valued at $6-8 million on the world 
market, that is, the profitability of these items will be very 
high for us if we manage to sell them on the international 
market. 
  For now, the sale of our models is being carried out without 
our direct participation through specialized foreign trade 
organizations. So far, the organization of arms sales in Russia 
is distinguished very little from how it occurred in the USSR. 
Existing foreign trade organizations are not resolving and 
cannot resolve service and engineering issues. The principle has 
remained as before: "Sold and forgotten". The world's leading 
countries and firms don't sell like that. We must also master 
the entire chain that is associated with arms sales. We need to 
place the arms developer and manufacturer at the center of the 
problem. 
  Russian law states that arms sales are a state monopoly. 
This 
is correct but this needs to be carried out rationally -- 
through the issuance of arms sales licenses to enterprises by 
the state. All enterprises cannot have experts on all sales 
issues. Therefore, we do not need to destroy the existing 
foreign trade structures. They must be utilized but the 
manufacturer must be the main actor in the sale. So far, the 
issue of the developers' participation in sales has not been 
resolved. Here we need to proceed from the fact that arms sales 
can be successful only when we, as sellers, organize concern on 
the entire life cycle of the weapon being sold. This includes 
maintenance, operations training, concern about modernization, 
its implementation for weapons that have already been sold, and 
so forth. That approach requires the mandatory participation of 
the developer. In some cases, the developer needs to assume 
responsibility for many operational issues. Only professionals 
can operate complex items and therefore the developing firm can 
also provide radar crews. I can cite an example. The American 
AN/TPS-117 and AN/TPS-124 radars are serviced by specialists 
from General Electric, the firm that developed them. Naturally, 
the firm supports the operation of these radars for an 
additional payment. 
  And, finally, it would be advisable for us to sell not 
individual items but series of subsystems that are united in a 
system. This cannot be carried out without the developer. 
  Foreign trade organizations cannot organize and support this 
entire weapons life cycle and complex approach. 
  Today, our lack of experience is being manifested in 
relatively simple issues. For example, take information 
servicing. A catalog of exhibition participants with the 
specifications of the exhibitions was printed at Abu Dhabi. 
There was no information in it on the content of Russia's 
exhibitions, only the participant from Russia -- "Oboroneksport" 
VO [Foreign Trade Association] -- was indicated, but it is 
difficult to find in the catalog what that association is 
demonstrating at the exhibition. For example, there is a "Tanks" 
section in the catalog's index: all of the firms 
(countries)-exhibitors are listed in it except for our 
"Oboroneksport". There is not even a mention of the T-80 Tank in 
the catalog even though it caused a furor at the exhibition. The 
same thing occurred with other equipment. Exhibition 
participants and visitors from throughout the world took the 
catalog with them which does not contain all of the required 
information on Russian equipment. 
  We are grateful to "Oboroneksport" for organizing 
participation of a large group of military equipment developers 
and manufacturers in the exhibition at Abu Dhabi. That was 
useful. But we understand that the level of foreign sales 
activity will not be raised without the direct participation of 
the developers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
